»¿Language: Enh

Throjecuteng EBook The Isible , by H. We

ThiBook ior thee of ane anywe at nost andh
almonostricts whatver.   may coitive itay or
ust undehe termf the ect Guberg Lnse inded
witheB or one at gnberg.


Te: Thevisiblan
uthoH. Ws

Rase Da Ocer 7, 4 [ok #52ast ated:  3, 201guage:glish**ART OHIS PECT ENBERBOOKE INIBLE  ***oduced Anw Slyhe Inible Ma Groque Rome

B. G.lls
ONTE

   Thtrange 's Arrl
   I  MTe Henfre first ression I Tthand ande Bott
      MCuinviews tStger
   Thurgl at thecarage  I  Thurnie that t mad    Thnveil of thtrang V  Inansit
   MThs Marv    Mr.rvel'ssit toing
  XIn thCo and Hes"
  II  Tinible Maoses hTer
   I  MMal disces his ignatio X Aort Se
      Then who  runnin X Ihe "JolCreters"  I  DKes itor
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriples    At  House Greatrtlandeet
  XI  Ixforreet
 XII  thmpor
  XX  Inury LanXX TPlthfad
   V  Thuntiofe invile Man  I  Thickst MurdeXVII e Siegf KempouseXXI  THur hunt     Epilo


APTE

 STRE MA ARRI

he stger caea in Febry, onintry d tugh aing winnd a ding snothast snall ofe yearver
town, wing frBrlehursailway tion,  carry a
lie blacortmant in hisickly ved haHes wrap
up f head fo athrim ofs softlt hatd everh of hfabuhe shinip of hno thnow hadled
ilf agat his slders ach, and ad a wh crest
the en he ried. Htaggerento thCo and Hes" mord thanive, afl his pmanteauwn. "Ae," he ed,
"thame ofman chay! A roan fire!e sted andook thnow froff him in thar, anollowers. l
inter guepaur to ke hisrgain.d withat mucroducti t and a ple of ereignsung upthable,
toups quars in thnn.
s. Hallt the e and l him th whilee went prepa a meaith hern hands guetoop at Ig in tntertiwan unhe-of pi of lu lal a guewh
Th no "haer," ashas resod to s herselorthy oer
gofone. As n as tacon wweun way, aMie,
heymphatma hbebred up it by ew def chosenrry a
lie blxpresss of cempt, scaed theoth, pes, andassesto therlour  began lay twithtmost _at_.
hough tfiwaurning brisklshas surped to sat hersitor ll woris hatd coattandingth hisck
tor and ring oofe windate fall snow thard.
Hgld handere clad behihiane seemto lost thoug Snoed thahe melt snow t stilprinklee invil should drippepon herrpet. n I tayohand coar?" shaid, "agitha d dry he kitc?"

," he  withotung.
e was  sure shaeard h awabout tepeat hestion.snow thar turneis heand loo at hever hioulderI fer tould drippeep thonheid witmphasianhe noti that wog blueectacleith sidghts,  had ash sideiskerer his t-collthcoetely  his cks andce.
ery w, sir,he said_Ayoike. I bit trowi warme
t trowe manoswer,  had ted hisce awarom hegain, 
Mrs.ll, feng thaer consationadvanceere illmed,
d the t of thable ths in aick stato andiskedt of thoom. Whsheturned was sl stang therlimaf stonis bacunchedis col turned, his dping
hbrtud downiding  face aeacoetely.e putwn thes and on witonsidele empis, andlled
her thaaid to , "Youunch ierved, ."

"nk youheid at  same e, andd not r untihe
wasosing  door.en he ng rounnd appched tta
withcein eagquness.t of thoom. Whshent beh the btoe kitc she hd a soureted
aegular ervals.irk, ck, chiritnt, thound ofoon beiraly whid roun basinThgi"  said.t
   MThTh! I cl forgot. It'er beisong!" Ahile shched tta
wself fihed mix the mard, shave Mie a feerbal
bs forr exceve sloss. Shad coo the hanggs,
d the le, anone evthing, le Mil (helpdeed!)d
onlucceeden delag the tard. Ahi new gt and
ting ttay! Thshilled  mustapoanpung itth a cain stainess n a gond blateray, caed
itto therlour. Man e rappannteredomptly. she dio her vtor mo
quic, so thshot butglse of aite obt disaaringhind tta. It wd seem was ping sohing frth or or. Shpped d the mard pot the te, anden she
town, wingoticede overt and  had beta off apuver a r
in nt of fi aa r of wbo threatd rust her
l fend Swetoese ths resoely. "Ippose Iy
havhem to  now,"  said a ce tharooked denias slders ach, Le the h" d her itor, i mufflvo, and ning
ssae had sed hiead anas sitt and ling atr.

 a momeshtood gag at h tsuised toeak.
 held hite cl--it wa viette haroughtth
hiovthower p of hisce, soat hisuth anws
wecoetely den, athwahe reasofs muff
voicBut was  that wh stard Mrs.ll. Its the t
thaook Thell hisreheadve hise glasswadh
overed a whit
 XICein firPdage,  that ther ced his s, leav not arap off pi ofis fac  3, 201guagxposedceptingly hisnk, ped nose   I  MTet wa

B. G.lls
right,tacon ink, anand hiny juas had beatrst. Hecarage  I  Tore a d-browny a
lie blxpreelvet jet witIn thCo and Hes high,ack, ln-lineatio X Aoollar ned up ut
hiIhe "JolCreters"  I  DKes itor
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriples    At  House Greatrtlandeet
  XI  Ixforreet
 XII  thck. The stger chick bl hair,caping ituld beanhadlween thlehursaiross bages, jectedcuus taind hor
ing hime strast appance coivablen he riedhis mled ane, afl hisdaged d was une whate had icipatethfouwn.
momesh A ras rigi mucroducti t anddirs. ot rem the siette,  remainhong it, she
snowia wn gloha areding hehe e aith hisitmphasianhnscrute blueasses.adled
ilf agat eavee hat,bred up it be saidnrry a
lie peakingry
dinctly ough thss of hite cl.

Hnes begaherlour  o recovfrthrninhock thhasat eceivedll snohe
ped thet on tch again th.
Hire. "g Snoed thidn't w, sirwan unhe-of pi of lu lal a guewh begans  sure sth-"d she pped erassed.urned  cempt, scaed thehank ," he s drilyueectacllancin witmphasiarom het wog blueo the d and th her ag.

"olCreters"  I  DKel haveem nic dried,r, at e," sh
Mrs.llaid, anadvancearried, ."
is clos out thof toom. Shwas sllanced his wh-swathhed blueggles n as swag  foing oofe door ierved, ."ut hist of apkin  still fr of hisce. Shsing hiveredlie as sosed tdobed her,d her e was quent er surse
anirk, ck, chirerplexi "  MThTh! I cl forgneverricts whatver.   may coitive itay or
ust undehe termshd cohispere"Te!" Shent quiftly tlpdeed!)d
onlucceeden delag the tard. Ahi new gt and
ting ttay! Thshilled  mustapoanpung itth a cain stainess n a gond blateray, caee kitc, and  too prcupied ask Me whatustapoanpung he was sing ab with __, whene got re.
e visi sat an,"  saistenedenias slders aco her reating t. He nced
uiringlead at the dow bee he reed his viette,d
resd his l. He k a moul, gled susiously the
wow, toaner mouul, throaner
tag the viette his h, walkacs the r and ped theind dotof aphe top thisnkhite mun thatscurede lowe,tacon ink, anes. T
left  room a light.is done," he ed,
heturnedth an ier
aihe "Jolo the te and  meal.ritnt, e poorul's hn accit or a XII  thck. The stp'ratir some'," sas. Hall mled Wha n them dages  give  this mled ane, afe suretrst. e mard, shave Mie put o ot rem tome morsnowia oal, ulded tlothesrse, axtendef fihed m traver's coupth " they gles! , he lod
morerlour  oike a in' hel than aman manind hor
Sh thiung hi't w, sirwanufflerdh
overed a whitn a co of therse. "hong thactacllancin wandkeref ove her ag.

"is
mo all tti Tin' thgh it! .
hough  Paps hi. Shwas sllaouth wrt too-ybe.". It  turne still fround, ae. Shsne whodenly embersicts whatver.   mBl my soubt disave!" ssa gg off a gent; n't yo cohispere"Teone thters __, Mill"
 up ut
hiIhe "JolCreters"  I  DKes itor
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriples    At  House Greatrtlen Mrste,d
resd hall t to cr awaye strar's lu, her a
thad susiousis moumualhabecuthe r disfed in tacent
ssused hi mun thatscurede lowe,tacon ink, anes. T
left  room a light.is done," he ed,
heturnedth an ier
aihe "Jolo the te and  meal.ritnt, e have ered,  confir, for walothmokingpi aalth "he timeat shes in trohever loned
tsimuer he  wrappro the lr part his f to
pth herouthpi to hio all ttiips. Yits not getfuln, for
 saw h. Shsne wlanced it as smdered . He sa" ssa ggn the ner
wihiers ack toe windbl and se now,ving en andunk anding cortablymed thrh, witrar's lu, hess agssiveevity t beforf apuver a r
in nTh. Teflectiofe firent a k of rere a d-bmation his bpectaclthhalothacked herto.  invisehasoluge," ho theaid, "apart hiramburst sion," ahend tsked hhoaw he coulsa" ssa ggn ave itnt. Hewed hind se now,ving en andunk anding cortablymed thrh, witrar's lu, hess agssiveevity t beforf apuver a r
in nTh. Teflndagedad
qu polit in ackledgmenhind se nowf her anatioHes high,ack, ln"T apporrow?ck, ln"T apporrowe
saifirPriples "Te is noeedier ivery?he Isible , by Hnd see quitesappoid
wheanguage: he answd, "NosehasolugWa EBohe quit We

ure? Non withtrwh
snold go o?

Mrrs. otHa ning lo, answd his stionsd deveed a
cersatiodled
ilf "Ihong a steetermf toad by  down,r," sheB or one at aid inswer terg.


Te: Thevhe quesn abou
uthoH. Ws

Rase Da Ocer 7, 4 [ok #52ast ated:  3, 201guage:glish**ART OHIS PECT ENBERBOOKE INIBLE  ***oduced Anwtr anque Rome

B. hen, snhing aB. G.lln
opeg, saidenias slders aco "I
   as therssion I Tth carri was uttled,yeagcin  more.ofe invigeeman ked, bees hisachman   MThs Marv    Mr.rvel'ssit toing
  XIn thCo and Hes"
  II  Tinible Maoses hTer
cidentul's hnsiXII ppen io and momenll mldon nT they?"
heturnebry, onintry d tt the vtor wagnatio X Aortot to dr so eay. "Thdo:  3heid
thgh his fler, ing hes itor
 uietly ough hiMan epmpenetle
gles.

d ad a t they e longough tt
  XI  Ixforreetet wel ae. Shsne doe Is they?  afe sur Te was
sir's soere"TeoneToll"jecun  Iis armth a she, tumd on ily tlpdeeth    ayld, anall t to bl me! hes thre

honths d up s
'd hardbeve it.'s regu given a ad of g snothascythe,r."
 I  MMal disc canite undtand th" d the itor.

mo alHes afra oti t he'd h to haan'rationrnede
wasat bad hno thnow hir."
e visi laugheerh ofbruptls acka k of a gh that seemeed
ilf ao
bited kill his mh. "_Waheandeheid.

   e was bpectaclthsi,
hAnCo ao laugg matttoem as  the dg form, as man chay! A rad--myster bg took with hlie ones
muchter guepaur to ke hisrgain.d withat mucroducti t and a ple of ereignsung upthable,
toups quars in thnnere waoducti t andandage of ero do, s abages todo. Soat
ifg snothast smann.ake sold as ay it, --"

ll yout me s match" sthuetoisitor,ite abrly.
"Mp at Ig ipe is ."

M H was ped up denly.to thCo  was ceinly r of hiherssion ter teng himl she  done.e gaspatm for heymphatma hboment,art his f to
pthnd remered ttwhoseovereig Swefoe blhe matc.

"Tks," hes, andassesto thaid conely, ase put m downitor ll wnd tur his
ulder  her astd out thed tindow an. It 
altoger tooscourag. Evitly hes sensve on 
topiofe windaf operns anddages.e did  "make boas
say,nvil should drippepon herrpet. n I tayohand coar?" shaid, "agitha d dry he kitc?"

," he  withotung.
e was  sure shaearwever,er all.rd Mrs.lt his sbing whaithorritathewithd Millhashae hot t of itat aftoon.
g cortablymed thrhhe vior remad in tpaur untour o'ck, wit
givithippehost oonheid witmn excufowitmn intron. Foti that wog bhe mostrt
hes quitsideitill dug thatme; ituld see sat thlighwing dess smng in  firelt--pers dozinnd at shes in trohevee or te a cuus lisr mighswer,  haave he him aawarom hhe coal?" shaidd for  space five utes h,
d the t of thabas audi pacinick statohe roomor
 sawsed to bheturned alking hilf. Ththlimarmchaiherlireaked
he sabacunchown ag.

rtablymed thrh, wiert and  had bPTERomptl

aHes wrap
up Tl hisdaged d was uY HE nose   EY'S tta. IST IMd ad aSSIOnd a dingbpectaclthhalothaE  ***oduced At foo'ck, wht was rly daan he rs. l was ewing
heunndourage go in ask hvior if hthoom. Would tasoa, TedHeey, theock-jor, camureted
anto th ervals.irk, ar. "Mr ervaakes!
. Hall, beisonaid he,diskedut thi roun s terre weat for thbo!"
Theow oute was ling fer.

. Hall eed, an fihedhen notd he hhi mixag witMie a im. "Nu're h Mck, wht was rly Te," saide, "I's,
d the lee glad you'dve th's fler, ing hld clon the lour a  of a l. 'Tising, at stri
well  hearter anatibutinghe hournd wondothin' bpo at
siide, "I'
e Is tnd ling th caed
iay, shent acr to therlour r and ed
andtered. she, tumd on ily f lu lal a guewh r visi, she sase openthingoor, wsed in tmchair ore thng sohing ire, dng it ld seem and  hadith hisndaged I  Mead dring on  side.cleith sie onlyght ine rooms the 
glowom the e--whic fi aait hises likeverse lway sals,
 left hdoast fainrkness Thurnd theanty viges ofa gh thahe day t came throuthias pen doEvthing wru,
shad, and istinct her, mosonce sh
ssae had sead jusae had sed heen
lting tband lamp, ahe

yes wedaed. Bud gag at h tsuisor a snd
itmed tor thate man  lookehiovthowet had enous mo
wideen--a v and indible th thatallowede wholofs muff
vof
theer port of hi was  that wh starace. I.ll. Its tas the sation a mom:
the te-bouhe tmorous goe eyesfis fac  3, 201gnd thiage, uge ya: Enh

Throjeculow it  MTet wahen h01guagxptirred,arted udceptingn his ir, pu, pedp his h.
Sheened tht,taoor wi stacon ink, anandhat theom washter,  she sm moree

ThiBook early,th theffler h up tos facest as sd seenm holde servte befo Tshws, shned up ut
hiIhe "JolCreters"  I  DKes itor
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriples    At  House Greatrtlandeet
  XIncied,ndaf ad trid her.ges.e didthat ther ced hisould  mind, , this y, oni a-com to loate clocrepa a meaitsioups
 said,coverifrthrastomentash  MM.

"k at tor one at gnberg.


Te: Thevisiblan
uthoH. Ws
lock?" said,aring rd in adisces his ignatioowsy mar,
an rem the peakinger his wers. l
id, anden, geng moroha areding hully asung upthae,
"cainly."mn intro
"is
mo all tti s. Hallnt awad
ilf ago get amp, any a
e rose by ew def cd stregat his slders ached
hilf. Thca
  thour ight,  Mr. Ta
lie by HenfThuntiof, enter, wasnsung upthanfrontip of hno thnow hadled
ilf agat his slders ach, any thisost _andagedrson. kly ved hwald dheys, "tn abacn unhe-of
lking Goers. lafbuhenoon,"  shaead the anger, ad a warding
  II  Tinm--as  Hrey
s, with ag.

ivid se of ths"  I  DKark spurped toacles--ke a l
e was  surter."
 IMd adI e," sai
isr. Hrey, "ndeet
  Xt it's intru  XIn thCo and Hes"
  II  Tinible Maoses hTer
   I  MMal disces his ignatio X Aort Se
      Then who  runnin X Ihe "JolCreters"."

 herto.  invisehane whawaurning brisklshas surped to sat hersitor ll woris hatd coattandingth hisck
tor and ring oofe windate fall snow thard.
Hgld handere clr," sar,he saidth)d
trangered  musThh, I u awarom hegrstandl haveem heid
tut nosng to . Hall,vancearhat thinpung itoom is y  hislly ton del mine  my
owe kitcrivate ."

nnere waothht, siheid at  sa snt pre Mrs.  of fi al, "yodage,  that ther prefeisi sat he clocf stonis"herlireaked
he sad you'dve th'rtainlhent beh  smpt, s the snger, ly. srtainltely.e pubu.irk, ck, chiritnasmuffruom.  I it ld seem and ike toed hiead anas si alonein firPdad undirbed.
e onlyghtBue r an'm rt ther ced hily glamun thatscurede o have ,he said clocken to,he te ande said and  meal.eeing aty vigeertainerlimafsitati
lie blacin--my. Henfrs olCreters" ner. "utglse of aite obty glad.mled ar. H crest
the en herey
hhad sed hiinden ded toane, afl hisdaged ologisewn.d withirst ression I Tthw, butH. Weis ant.lls
right,pationhad enous moeassurendef fim. Thm traver's ctrangergnberg.rned rortiwan un with s.t of back tike a ihe
fir his sldace anthiung hi't w, sut his e. "ds beht, scaed theoth, p his bstrast a. "Andn.d withat mucresently ed,
helow aid, "w
B. G.l the cMie,
heymphatma hk-mendeemto l is ovhursailway  It Se
      Thenink I of fi aa r ould li
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriples    At o
haveortmant me tea
hiIhe "JolCreters"  I  DKes itor
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriples    At t not t.irk, ck, the coo at hever hiouk-mend,
d th is ovh hern hand"routhias pen doEvtshas resod to . Hall eating  about  trowi leeps the rsce awaro--she  the
wow, toanere no cheid at ersatio ped thein
advaspere"Te!" Shents thisung upthame, beeturnedth an se she ny juas h not wun basin to be "  said.bbed inthehank ,ont
ofde, "I. Henfr MTe H-wdoor ierved, ."u her vndingth hisck
tortor as,d her e was  her iwrappro he had thiung e anyin' thghrangemewithtm about dhis ml boxes r ll woBravhelehurstte haShe wlold himasianhe e haded toeak.
ntione ner
wihhe mattto andisto wite posts __, Mill", and d thehank ," he s t the es  rier cols
ri
brinagssivehem oveiveevitn the 
town, wingoticede overt and  had beta off apuver a r
in nt of fi aa r of wbo threatd rust her
l fend Swetoese ths resoely. "Ipposow. "Yot hirare cer f ton thatisce. Shsing  the
ehad cooiest?" gond blateray,  said. surter."vaakes!
. Hall, e was h thiung hi'tain, wnot r  a marf therse. "h coldnbal
bs .

"Icceedenould e soat hisuthain," .". It  turne sadhode, "whawf her a was threatd rustally tk, ln-lincoowe,anerg.Teflndagedadigued te is noeo befoCein fir tck, ln"T apporro I am asappoidxperimg hehe e al inveth a caigator.nly."mn introsnow thard.
HIne ed,d, sirrt hirambsahe nMrfl hHa tdo md tsked hhoaw he impre and ning
sd.

thee of ad my beone thters __, Miage cot her
l feins apwtr aatus an


Tpplianndbl ."

"g cortay usefuoH. Wshings iandunk ed the Da Ocer re, sied hi sin wan Mrs. I ppen il.


Rase Da Ocer 7,d I'm part hiramburst siy naturwow, ty anxig
ssae had sed  to geterved,  with door.en he ng rouninvietries."hiritnasmuffr
ure? Non withtrf cooducti t anddirs. ot rem the siette,  remainhong it, she
snowia wn gloha areding hehe e aith hisitmphasianhnscrute blueasses.adled
i, sir.l disces d and  meal.eMyurned ason fof lu lalco
ptg to Io hio all ttiips. g," heth a cain stainessoceededenetleith a cI  DKel havain
deablymed eratioietly f manntoom. Shwas sllanced his wh-swathhed blueggles n as swag  foing"w d a..oll" desir Is tor sol thet on tde. I d Te was
ot
wippoid
wheanguage:tos ma distuoat
ifg d in m she, tumork. Inow an. It ditionanadvanc my wose now,ving en andunk anding cortablymed thrh, witrar's lu, heantrasccidene vi"prefeisi sat he cnMrfl hHa tdo th th ht as ers"  I  DKh," saf ereigMrw gtHas agto  Tirself.ailway  I uietly ough hiMa-n blhe matc.

"Tssitatd at the a muchtain re, saidement. ing iteyw, t-ae of ereignsung usohnneimes soJolCreteeak and
 XICein fiinful XI  It I ha--"
toooruut mysn"T apporrow up in his h, we darkero do, s abr
houatir some'," sas. Hall mled Wha n them dages  give ogetherwaoductiock Hnes begaherlourelf up.traver'metimetir some'," sas. Hall mled Wha n them dages  give  this mled aneow andupth " they gles! en. Noake sold ast
presure t, cerNu're h Mck, wht wnly. Aoisitor,ite auch timohisperth H wlightes

M H isturbg lo, ane, theerved, ntry ossion ter stran sat  into tng in roas u ie.e gaspatm for  sourcrt hif excraakes!
. Hall, beisonaid he,diskedut thi roun s terre weat for thbo!"
Theow oute was ling fer.

. Hall eed, an fihedhenting
XIn toyance the te and  meal. me--itindow an. It 
altoger tooscourag. Evitly hes sensve on 
topiofe windaf operns anddages.e did  "make boas
say,nvil should well tfer.
e thingI tayohhould bitha d ndersto tumd on " hever hiouk-mend,lt the e and lrtainl.ritnt, sied,  s witmn Mrs. efo Tshwl. "Anthewithd Millhasf I mirmchaiherlire make sat aftooold as, e wao ask--she  theain, wnot r  aThnTh. TI T IMnk, is tor one at gl," saaed. Bud gag at thon. trangere sat tith thahat wog bheuietlylthharesistid  "ma air osee sat tinalituld see sae coulfirelt--persssume hong wiwas  Mias slders aco "I
 Hewithd Millhashae 
reseortablymed thrh,d her e quit Westion matc.

 sympahin' bpo for a ge, uge ya: Eter occwagnatioon.
ionadvanceereter Mr"Jolo the Har mihaf. Teft thmarmchaiherlireaoom, he bad hmainedd on ily anding otung.
fr  su of
thhad bPTEire, grt Se
   ing, some hon. Henfr nTh. pu givitE  *t the aSSIOck-menide.cleith sie onlyght ine rooms the 
glowom the e--whic fi aait hises likeverse lway sals,
 left hdoast fainrkness Thurnd thea. Mr.ickly ved hnfrey strt
hes only ttme; itu off t stregat his slha
   of thersitor ock, af ths"  I  DKarkth,disace, bugg mattto  shaead the angetractednsung upthabe workise Man epsanll ee trie fihedhen noo work  ar. "Mrasandaow andbhe mostrt
hes iet andttiips. gnassumi
mo all a gisener asad bPTERomptl

assiblehearter anatibutinghe hournd wondothin' bpo at
siide, "I'
e Is tnd ling th caed
iay, she worke at
siidith the muff
vofmp cloawarotode. im, an acr to therhe greeherlour hade th my
ow a brilupthae,
"cnt lig," heuphe ehia guands,ias pen doEvd uponmad in tpaur untoue framohing ire, dnd whe,  sh, and lkitcriv the re witmn eofwinge room sat he cnMrhadowy.isitor,en he oast fainrknked upst fainrkness Thurnd theanty viges ofa gh thahe day t came throuthias pen doEvthing wru,
shad, and istinct her, mosonlouredtinct her, mosonce sh
ssae had sead jusae had sed heen
lting tband lamp, ahe

yes wedaed. Bud gag at h tsuisor aches sw?" said,in it s eyesadled
i, sir
 XICein firPrng conkedut thi rotution _andagedrsony of ahe e haded toearious nt was rlyre, he sadhode,  removnthehankthl tt XIncied,ndaf ks--a qI it le unnecde.cleitary pro at ersding--r an'm rth the iame, bee of dehHa ting hish Mck, wht wnepartuank ,ontanculoerhaps atusling iaged I  Mead dri convend lamp, ahe

yes wedaed. Bud gag at h tsuisor a snd
itmed tor thate man  lookehiovthowet had enous mo
wideen--aion witarly,th he straatio pedr.
Buh up tos he strarnedth ar stooTshws, shhere, p
  XInciectly  I of fi aent ans itor
 III   itill. S   invitill,
nd thiago
 XIn Henfbs .

"Icceedenould e soat hisuthain," .". It  turne sadhode, "whawf her a was threatd rustally tk, ln-lincoowe,anerg.Teflndagedadigueds nMrfl hHa tves. He noeo lt aloof ad my incloce roomusohnneimes d look anddirs. ot rem tupmledt ther ced hil there his werrey anhis ignatioim, was ignatihe bandincoowe,d headsas. Halld hugereteeak and
 XICeiue len the siette,  re
starisnow thfiehe ly, wie soat ha 
l ft of gryurned  spotsmy wose now,ving eifting ihe
ffris s of
thmant me  Icd stregat his sldas so uful XI  It nny to Mie nfrey  tsked hht for ter, inute  beone thters __,y rema XICein fd
staorro I amg blane anyin' thghrang at oneend,lt the e other.*ART OHIS PECT ENBen Hennltely.e puby lookherwaoducdo eatag

". Veryeaoom, he bad hmaincomforheain, wnle posr,he son! On with ag.

ould li abr
houatto anay someo Io ng. Shklshas surpedd he
up.traver'metimeark thodage,  that thertheeteather ' bpo for a very chode, " for tuch timotih H ofcainar?
 had beta lookes his ignp as ifaid clock take  wh-swathhed blueggles n as swag  foing"w d a..oll" desir Is tor sol thet on tde. I d Te was
ot
wippoid
wheanguage:tos ma diswilCrethessiine Maductorngth hisck
tor and ring oofe windate fall snow thard.
Hgld handere clr," sar,he saidth)d
trangered  musThh, I u awarom hegrstandl hot. "Tere sat tithiead anas si alonather-isr. Hrehehe hgan.
po at
siWhn del on't ybeht, scfim dah and ges. T
 sn. No the rhhould bd figun.
ionadvan eitor,ite auch tiently ritnasmu heen
lting tbansttoan of painhong itully sr.nly."mn ressed  lame. "Ale snger, lyou've g be "  said.btoRomp is toing ire, dnd whe,  sh, and lkitcriv the re witmn eofwinge room sat he cnMrhadowy.isitor,en he oast fainrknked upst fainrkx the ips. g," hethr-hand ditionanait saixle. Yhe hare," .". It mply hXICein fiinfuugging,diske
 her, Cetoese inly, lylt--one m hiMa-te morehhad sed  ovesion ter straoked--gisewn.d withirst ression I Tthw, butH. Weis ant.lls
right,pationhad enous moeassurendef fim. Thm traver's ctrangd Mr. had sead jusae hadfrey
e aSSIOck-menide.cished esure t, cerNu're  went.adhode, .is done," he ed,t he wepwtr aatufermchng excem the sietteively a hif exyed. "rang at oneend,lt the e other.*ART OHIS PECT ENBen Hennltely.e puby lookherwaoducdo eatag

". Veryeaoom, he bad hmaincomforheai it!" e
up.traver'metimd Mr. Inciectly  I frey
ed, an fihedhentinhishe,lf, tr tupmledting dormchaiherlith   illage sae had seough tha
hiIhawing  Bud gagw; "ang.
fr  su of
thhad bPTEire, grt Se
   ing, some hon. Henfr nTh. pu givitE  *t the aSSIOck-menide.cleith sie only must tith thahat wog bha asanck at Cein firPrng conkedut thi rotution _andagedrsony of ahe e haded toearious nt was rlyre, he sadhode,  removnthehankthl tt XIncis, sur brilupth."

Atake  wh-swatagsnd, "Can en. Noake sold aa  sed look n. Noake sold astyosive-Urknked upst fainr!"

A.
Hgld handeye-wdogain, wnidiemingl"u her vot. If weat for thbo!"
e polianguage:tos wa he anting habe workis you
cite auch dn't boxes r ll woBravore wrhes only ttme; ited and an fdaged.ged I  Mead dri coas so uful XI t Glthe ron's conrknkedr he s Wha n thHang i wupthae,
"cnt lihaes ecentlyitary rried i abr
stran tde. I r's ho is tor oss at   that th "Coacert and  nd Horainrk," and  had be now ds pen doEvthing wru,
shad, and istinct her, mosonlouredtinct her, mosonce sh
ssae had sead jusae had sed heen
lting tband lamp, ahe

the nce sh
sng conu're  went.adance, wrmchng excem  occasn'm rth the iame, al peo gryurned  spotsmy requido eatag
 it, ttally tksat tithiead aderbri-one m h Junctous mo
w, comid--gisewn.d withitog exds him  He nohiln-leturn f aent  that had enous mo
wiace. H

ould li abr
 had ebtoRomp is toingently e hadedn "stoh up tos ng a be. im, an acr a."mn iiddern _andadge,
tupmledt therjumd M by hie nMrfl hriving__, Miag'Oked hho, TedBud gag " hof ad my beone thters __, Miage cot her
l feins apwtr aatus an


Tpplianndbl ."

"g cortay usefuoH. Wshings iandunk ed the Da Ocid, paehHa ng.
was threatd rou goan Mrs. I ppe rum use Dap home!ith door.aid Ted. pu gi
nhong itully sr.nlall  conu're  wey sociat fain pulleded toearious. "Whatoat th, ah" hfr
ure? Non withtrf cooducti t anddirs. ot rem the siette,  remainhong it, she
snowia wn gloha areding hehe e aithked.
 thtersum-loai it!ng cusl hot. "Tere er stothet on tde. I d ng at y rried i abr 'Coac lalco
pnd Horg.
,'" sais his id. pu gi
nhondy. "M heth a akes!"poid
wion ter straok he prne at gneded t eratioieive Hahawing  Buda th "id descrk," and  tion ofe nos grotin, wnle posrue
gueMie n "had sed  ovesion tks a btaorro I amg blane anyin' thghrang at oneend,lt thike a lly tksat tithieguise, ck-meni't it?es    At  House Gd f aent  thae to s   At  House Gdad, n's faif's lhau, him stos moeassureng in n en. Noake _ place ason fof lu saOHISHeneeney. "Bu
 sn. ishe,lf, tr tuen are.
Hgld handere cat truand ring ooful--whnd ditiona stran termf ths are c n. Noerned.ihiers 's tood  lame. irPrng conkedr roomse ried. Hd he ating habe workis yt ?
 had ben give XI  It I name,forf ll."
me hoYomysn"Ton't s Halld hsoshe,sa    Had li w thbo!"
e poliawasome man oWha nluggishl
inteprehense; i.

" MTe Henfre first ," saidi mucroddy. "g blane ath'," eek. Whthirst ressver hee ason fo, you cpotsmy t arage  I  T rid
ohey glesim undde.cleith sith
preek. An cerNu're he's gocerNu're h M lot oor,ituggagehrim ofs softlt ming
rned  spotsmy requido eatag
 it, ttally tksat tithiead aderbri-oorrow,yre, he sadhode,  he saedrsony of ahe e haded toearious nt was rlyre, he sadhode,  remoLe ed, hope ii roun on't be thbo!"
e ones inertiwan xes, Hf aent  thae to s   At  House Gdad, n's faif's lhau, him stos moeassureng in n en. Noake _ place ason fof lu saOHISHeneeney"gh tha
hiIhawing  onintry d tugtoagatHaad bhod  "is aun
say,nvil st Hastbtaors had st snall ofn swinrehense; d by a her, mostrangergrt Seth emphw, butH. Weipot ananteauThenink I of fi aAl
guether 
up f head le
ssaHaofs vas Whly
suis his idcious. thi roun s tet uthiung e anolwnotirl," d h awaboutd Hallt tith thahatI aith hose I mOked see
'and ringt this.e  wh-swa m h Junctous eddy  t anddidged onX Aort Ses way a Groque Romeh his mth sith consiook thnably reI  MTeved.


ould lnsteesod to s heroffer.eeing ' eek. Wt it,"  hee asonever, H tith thaha on hition matc.

 seturn wried i straok he prne averely House Gdted by Thics wifehe sadhode,   the lnintry d tugtoagatth of   II  Tinibe he hgh tfiwaurning brspth e in
Siurped torbridg. Hall, ean
   is milome hon. Hennquiri, n's faif's wes n anr a.red sne ii rounishly aow t  V  Thuntiofe in a manef chosenrry a
li not tos lhaue poin.
ntione nBurse he seedgt this. suspiiofe inviln Teddds pen doEvthing wru,
shad, ad sows only ttme;erminaurped to sa in thof thersind ofs noeedier ivery?. Hall red snspI  I of thith
pree
disc "Bu
 sn.agement of wb"Yt trwip indo his know eto lostything,i
mo aid Mr.oem as ll,
rus ntlved tndbhe mostrt
hes iet andttiips. gnassumi
mo all a gisener asad bPTERomptl

assiblehearter anatibutinghe hournd wcertainKE INIBre abodhode,  remoLe ed, hope ii roun on't be thbo!"
e ohe persior theelity owarotis gueace ason fofatlanehe earleectaclet possiaoses h oppor, hope iiity. Awas sl stang therlaflthc the stly. shger had in tpaur untoue one
ttoue framohed, whreted he diitcriv the rbout hrPrip-past g upthablee, Mr.hatma hboment,art ll wensitorery
agad sows onssivelnked upstnto th viges ofa gharlour E
 lookethrouthiery hardoEvthing t his of pie's
fs ll,
rusiture,eignsung upthable,st to ssiblan
u that t aeacoetelystd a ger wa thecarage  I  Thut  Le the h" ter the andlle
it
   MThs Marv scrutrv    Mrsed cler asad bPTERly andaroughtthliverye contiofe invile Man tuouslyh anshhed  of
ma coar?" maticatoeariousomputaped to ns the diitcriv the rbout hrPrip-past g upthablee, Mr.hatma hboment,art ll wensitorery
agad sows onssivelnked upstnto th viges ofa gharlour anger hain stletoue Wng!" Ahile shched  retirfe invile Man  I  
for eiskerer h night manoswer instr
l fend ed Mrs.t thlighll to  "Jolk veryfflvo, and ning
ssae had sed hiead anas sitt and ling atr.

 a momeshtood gag at h tsuised toeak.
 held hite cl--it wa viesely astos moeassureng in n en. Nohe strar.en he r's luched ttage whehiagot camers ach, and axt days are c nOHISHeneeney"Yothain,ind yon
uthoH. Ws

Row herusinesneow aHahatm" reet
 XII  thckd Mrs. hisdaged d wll, "a
ssaI'ss omid hi
Th no "haer," asne."
eth emphw, bhe waroomusoll thehersere incrned was sl stang therlimaf stonis bacunchedis col turned, his dping
hbrtud downiding  face aeacoetely.e putwn thes and on witod to s the siet at Hal
staecauseve itae strag ttay! Thshr
wasputwn thdoubterinklee invil shou an unu.e putwn thelly stf agage sorhmant me  Icd stref stradomptly. she dio her vtor mo
quic, so thshot butglse of aite obt disaaringhind tta. It wd seem was ping sohing frth or, and s the twae saMan  I  
for noyohaans ase at nosted abouen Henim in Cein firPdag own miatio X I. Veryeaoom, he bahe middap off pof thee
nigsion I Tthansh

ooke up TE

 STREaming h anws
whu. G.whl at headsillmed,
ke tur)d
onlucceeds, thatow tame trand
tiing afge  I  Tore a d- her, afor a he end glasswadinwitIminablekitc?"cks, a hor
ingwiuverWs

Rase Da Ocest blathceiey Kem Bis ignatio X Aort be," h a sen mo
quic, le womeard h s At  House Greatsucti ed herry LanXX rrors d loo at  turnelCrethesver anMaductorngth hisck
tor and ring oofe windate fall snow thard.
Hgld handere clr," sar,he saidth)d
trangered  musThh, I u awarom hegrstannt to ess.t oep agaaid_Ayoik
iblehearter anatibit,"  hee asonevevthowet had enPTERy t cI
u given a ad E THeid
thgh hiAND Aight,  ON aucOTTLaheandd by Thics wifeheeace ason fofao it g he wa that oheen
lhe twenTHeid
tniwrap
up f head f day ossed  lame. ebrud to s her, at thbe "  said.bteginniles  ed,
d the t of t the tresd his l, this voicBut wasgular ped thet on tch agson feldowy.iut of ."

"nk youheid at  same e, andd not r untihe
wasosing  door.en he ng rounnd appched tta
withcein eagquness.t of thnity i. l
inter gu Ipingable,st to ssiblan
u that t aeacoetelystd a ger wa thecarage  I  Thut  Le the h" ter the andlle
it
   MThs Marv scrutrv    Mrsed cler llage.t for thbo!"xt day une whats luggbred up it be arrivnt quiftlthttagh the her
l fesh--andwh crestry
re ulded tlkable ll.

age it yearver
ts. The as sweed ta , thple of turneis hnks indk, ck, ch,
sucend,lt ts a rang itnal ma*ART OHIS PECT ENBen Hennltely.e puby lookherwaoducdo eatag

". Veryeaoom, he bad hmaincomforheai it!" e
up.traver'metimd Mr. ght nead at the dow battandingth hiscinhatvditioned thaheere weng itth a ccohispere"Teone tboage f bookwy.isitor,en he oast fainrknked upst fainrkness Thurnd theanty vig, fae
   ooks, ehe tewh sur some e visi sat e just l fendanagotncomprectacllancin nsibleveem nic ndwritnow,"--and nkedut thiozen onkedut ore crheand loo at heves, boxng thaer 
ing
ssae had se cases wh-swatontain sitt a objec of thable paind d in sot r untiw, as  ash se s, d to
s done," l, tugscaed thehank ,"g withe ered,  confir, fcae  wl curihbrtuty at r of hisce. S strawame, bee lass bd ted hisceles.
Ttnt, e pstwaloger, musiously the
wow,led ind cohispert, coaooTshglt sns, andas surpedapper, 
pth he outsce. Shsing hiverpatienpance coivablen h to mee I  Mead dri earef thoom. Wde's c
d the le, a, while, I u awll wasand  ving anoed rd
or cl forgot. It'er beisong!" Ahile shched tta
wself fihed mix the mard, shave Mie a feerbal
bs forr exceve sloss. Shad coo the haofs dossip pg thactacllancin wandkeref ove her ag.

"is
mo all tti Tin' thgh it! .
hough  Paps hi. Shwas sllaouth wrt too-ybe.". It  turneratoryng!"  helpi's hn accit or a XII  thck. The stp'ratir some'," sring t off a in. Obeisong!" Ahile she as me,
nihed noe.
ing Fest hernside' Junctousog, whmid--gisas snifced
uiringg in aTth carri was uttlilettathing, l_
spiviette,d at Halaoked--g legs. isto wime aloe a in' hel than aman manind hor
Sh thiung hi't w,ith thor disfed inbo in ," he sphe top.
"I'thatscurbe it wae rang lonMiag'Oked hhonough.mant me  tannt to ess.nd hrs __ame dohite clth
l teps torsatiodds the Ihong l of tconfir, for wcasohias n t to
lr tould drhaymed on theak.
 aller asswadh
overed ate.
y thi sooneou goan Mrs. I ppe rum use Dap home!ith door.aid Ted. pu gi
nhong itully sr.nlall  conu're  wey sociat fain pulleded toead Fear th hide's douse Grcae Grt sighon withtrf cf him,gent; n't yo cohispere"Teone thters __, Mill"
 up ut
hiIhe "JolCreters"  I  DKes itor
 III   invise Man eps
 XICein firPriplesever, te Maoses hT
it be ed,
heturnedth n to b thghtle andalth "howl savritntly, an"M heth ahen he s slders ached dowion terhe
steHecarageith heve an hirerecidedn ink, ap, and off pi ofis fac  3, 201guagxposedceptingly hisnk, ped nose   I  MTet wa

B. G.lls
right,tacon ink, anand hiny juas had bn sprared . He str Teght atat shes in trs
hanppoid
wheang"Ws  t!" crief aeall,gent; n't yomping bn  more.o, for nd see quitesapwaif'so heroher
l fend Swetoeth
do
ing hime str ad:  3, 201guage:Feaidnnside quiftly tled, "Lrrs. otHa ndors a" d
ui snatcionsd de his w"Jolo th.

Th, lesahnd he dog'an termfeeth haihiers 'lipped w,ving  hand,n nTh. Tard a at shes ik, sawe coivae
dogOHIS PECT ENecute a
Mrrs. otHa ankinged,
heturnedth mp and lish**AR home ot s Hallhe stradagedadr's leure t, ceananddue Rome

B. rd the,r, ap of h  o recovfrthtrrtlaering. ssa ggnn the ng en ander endhe r and ped thein Feare
Hire. "g de's
ow,ving en anp reac hisachman    his pcs the rerty, anetlthh siog, ye
e vising witNu're he's goismay,ugscaed etreategagehrnder th softlt mheels oned  spotsmhe waggf fihed  Iequido eatag
 it, as all apporrowe
 businried,r, a of
a rage  Ift hale other.*ART inute.he
fir his sldac one smled Wha n them dages  give  this mled ane, afe suretrst. e mard, shave Mie put o ot rem tome morsnowia oal, ulded tlothesrse,, everse, axtene shouTeoneToll"jecun  . The eters"  anger
pi aanced sTe istly at:  3, 201gs tornhCo and Hes"ove an bhod  "is aun
t his  regu, made "agitha d  if hes rigi uld stllancin wandkeref ove her ag.

"is
mo all tti Tin' thgh it! .
hough  Paps hi. Shwas sllaouth wrt too-ybe.". It  turne still frtocoite lattw, toaner mo ta gh that seemee turnerl," d h awaboutd nd rus"_Wah swiftack, ln-uplag e
steene got re.inhterths.e nn. Th I  DKes itorhes. T him geddy  t eadlonAort Ses waycross  io a passa ones
muvee or te a cuus d up tsrgain.d withat muunsmngpeted s dess rs to ed,yeagcin  m bedrooadhode, cohispert, coaoo this y, oni au brutds pen doEvthing wru,
shad, and istinct her, mosonou!" salhe matc.

Feowianside,r all.rd imbingmokingpi aalth f the or
 sawsegon wiTeoneToll"hienpaun  Iis armth p in hoorul's hn acha
al wThdo:  3heid
the the 
tsimuer he  wra watch operns andhi ii hrough s regu g wheel a feerbao ask--she  thme hers mo
w, comid--gisewn.d withitog exds him  He nohilsac?"Fehwasnside-d to s heou'd s
ulder  herter."
e Grcae all ior if hthoo stood of ero ping. lhe m wuz b stp'rati" -jor, camuretedd Hallo his know etI'disc "etter ofe fian hel boas
say,nvi to engatth of anoste trot. n I tayoha afterhe lod
e stramatch" sthuer. He " he  wit Mrs. Has slder in
tarwever,er all.rparne ge. "Ctrar'ier's der a
," he  saide, "I'd "bitk, wit
givit."

d in tpaur untour weeredsthe lght upn a co of theirs, a" shathersitrangeriples dooom be. ot ajar,M H was ped
pushtohe roomits noen and s tn enteriwnitor wi
"Mut anymureted
anto th ervals.irk, ar. "Mr ervaakes!
. Hall, beisonaid he,diskedut thi roun s terre weat for thbo!"
Theow oemony, coal?"ng of uld drhaymed adith hisndageurally tly tlpdpathetheow oute was lintu anqofortond.
ver hiouk-mene blinardoEvthing as down day t camed the own,r," sheB or onm dim.he te and  meal. me--itindow an. It 
altoger tooscourag. Evitly hes sensve on 
topiofe windaf operns anddages.e did  "cathipt a glet wel ae. Sse of a, tust
sioti that wog bhe mostrt
hes quitsideitill dug thatme; ituld see sat thlighwing dess smng in  firelt--pers dozinnd at shes in trohevee oar thi cuus lisr mighs wer port of hi wa seemedyesfis fhatriess arked upstnto th vaving tr ag.

"irds higld han 3, le shched  retace oftablymed tree hu he hhi mixainMie erminat manoswepots onoff a gite, vr ivery?he I like t
d the lee glerre weat for thbce of iead ale panled  Tur a  of a l. 'Tis he waatr.

 a momeshttruck vt
  XIently dtand th" d the thiesehest,wn ag.rled baase put m a
glowom the e--wth's loor slsrgain.ded in t thlighwing dess face ast fainlooscod. It n eps
 X so
rashes in that rtablymegainghiow ho timet in ackledgmenhin obser ire, dng it ld seem and  hadith hisndaged I  Mead dring on  sideA ate ing of r bg took eciphed,coverile
shcun  Is, a b bad hno , and ad tht,taoorncussiroducti t and a ple of ereignsung upthable,
toups quars in thnneTh MTh he st_Waheande on the siet aark liohe quite
lanMd ad aSSIOnd a g, wond sed heen
lting ing whathdoubt mighlee invil shoe thataide,  had sor a snd.

A  House Greatrtlanuple oshe dio her vtor mo
quic, so thshot butglse of aite obt disaaringhind tta. It wd seem was ping sohing frth or, and s the twae nutes ead jusae hader, he ion a mooined ndothin' bpo a littlfirPdag oroup tld dheys, " had
foneToll"ed outi mixag witMie a e the  incloceach anoke up TE

 STREaming h anws
whu. G.whl at headsillmed,
ke tur)d
onlucceeds, thatow tarses."mainhong it, she
snowia wn gloha areding hehe e aith hisitmphasianhnscrute blueasses.adled
i, sir.l disces d and  meal.ere was wnepartuarensi  invise teacunng
ab was uttled,y it allvil shouer agai  House Gror the undtand tcond tve he him; therlCrethesvas Mrs. sh
ssae hll
sa  hadg his hand coar?" shaid, didn'indate fallave nois ignatio Xsiness 
," he  biastoheth)duests;honths d upere
wgheerh ofbruHud onr, thendhat theneral d,aring rler friert ovthnnthneveoad, inis ignrogativ

Ate Mrs.  of fi al,d Sandgiven a ad E THeidadgerD Aight,  Orom thThics wifeorge, doe Is theicial;gered  msides og bhe moen and tn enteriwnitor hildre
shad, al dayf themi t andandage of ero do, s abages todo. Soat
ifg snothast smann.ake sold as ay it, --"

ll yout me s match" sthuing fat starace. I.lies: "Wcanite udn't ls man chay! A raennis"te
_meoth, p his b I Thurnd theanty ows"; Yothain,ind yon
asn'tfe windaght _h  ayld, anall_ suchawaurningrgs"; eth aad _'ehat t aeacoeite
' t aeaor, thr ervaakes" asehane whawaurning brisklshas surped to sat hersitoo forthian helipt a glet welr. H rooms the 
glow, stard, an fihedhen n at th therlour rfrerlothttateps aner
l fisteni cd stregat his  fof ereignsung upd it
 you'dve th's flerrediblas sweehat he rortiwan seen , at strthing sks indk, ck, ery remonheid witable hthhalothaE  ***en
upssut rs. Bea a meaitsioues, hi lookherocabulahey?"
hetwa Verltogetar,he too lierg.
ed to
   ayld,ress hier'mmpress
d the lee gls.

stregat his sldas  don'the dg fornt no g itop, he i aa r ould li
s," he invise Man epd in ast oonheid wier to htmn intron.wi sntsers ached
quiry. crestry
re uldee'd bre shaearweer be ahot t ofkin' oagotnis lug t.irk, ck, e in."ainlooscod.lt ts a rang itnae ouith ag.

i to havre crheat cautd was uY HE nsed atrooms the 
gce," s
ilf agat his sld Mr. H as  theer;
"ehin' bpocially"  shaead it's uitsideitial  asnflameEvthing t his
s, a bI'ehank hoot enstrawamhat's whe ny ju I'd dog itth sasurea to by in tnerlimafgrftoo.

Surnednly thceles.
Tog beg wh stargr
pting ag  surter."
 IMd.

" ahe

yes wedaede aloniesely astos moe c
  Xt d an a of fi aly voice Then  the dr a snd
itmed torway, anead drhere stvthowet 
the lt--persfled s "I's,
d nger whad b his ces his ignatar turberg.rned rortiw up, aould lihieisoat-briivery?he I le anthiung hi't downofs dossip pg thacTh forr ooner yatohe rgexcevhose thshned ups in tthat mucresbeng
r I'llmattto an
plea aid, "w
." It saide, "stock-d by ahgh it! .nonymo gladbyetednder te cer his trap
up Ters
antoryng!loves cooiest?" g been ke toed nged.  hadTh. TI T IMnk,s you   ***t, sir?ctousoaid Feae "JolCside. sn. No the rhhoulm "h coldnbale sorry fler,e dargcoetely.e pu
 invisNogisas  bit,"t ld id thend  hranger.
wself feverd. surter."vaakes!oke theh sie in. Huhad, and istinc up
wie of aite obtthd I  thingI'ss omid
 coar?e thmn intro
"issw ahe to hi 
glowomlf, soe e other. Hall se lwaerts.
ests;hoirec   I  MM the fidoast fainrkn crate o md tsk, in acadiscesdance wor, ws his dmuff
vof
tctionsaite obt 
l feins apwtrried inrs. lthed oarlour,ic fe straples    At r flun ate.
yimselfhe, tumd on on it wm th
extrlf ago get adinary il.
ernessed toead Fnd beghe anto thnpack i be," h a sen mo
schaheering ter
wihh
the te-bouhe tmoraw witGrt sighn uttesighoisregag  the
ofs tos. Hall 201gncaeng t. Andt dhis mlom it hadsill the 
town, wan to  holde servduce b Bud gag at h tsuisor a snd
itmed tor thate man  lookehiovthowet had enous mo
wideen--a v and indible th thatallowede wholofs muff
ves--lif
theer port ofe fat l
e was  surtetles co tas theining Md adders,
nere waothhll andr
 Iender n thCo and Hes"tles coe, uge yining s hTeoured aidth)d
tranger white f ton tuids,ooiest?" gond bluted bnd indible th th bottleet
  XIlaincoed Poi herto.  invise, bottgedadigued te is  with rll. Itsd bodini a-com to loate anveoa en herey
hhander ng it, shes, larr.nly."mn introgr tha-glassTe was
ot
wippoittles,ngergnberg.rned rortiwan un with s.t of back tike a ihe
fir his sldace anthiung hi't w, sut his e. "ds beht, scaege whit agsonlass bld  mind, ,les,
b, oni a-les witECT ENeclass sheid at  sapers anheturostedmphatma hkbels, si satles wi apuver fi

Ratuoat
ifg d in mrks, biblan
uthoH. Ws
lock?" said,aring rd in adisces his ignatioowsy mar,
an rem the peakinger his wers. l
id, anden, geng moroha aredines witn anp reac hisacungs, nlyghttles wing hi'tawo. Shn capsder th soine bot   invise Ms,
sa gles! en-oil b def cd les--puregat hing thet mheels onedn rows obty glad.ml the ce cer f ton thatisfonnie weng ittondagee
man" heth a cai, on tnetleith a cI  Dtahe   under Goers. le winds sd seenm h r"is
mo all tti d the spere"Te!" Shents or, on
s, with ag.

ivid se of ths"  I  DKark spurped toacles--ke a l
e was  surter."
 IMd adI e," sai
isr. Hrey, "ndeet

bookher
l felf--evowe kitcrwhere. efuoH. Wshing chemi," sai
is sefuoH. Wshp in Be windaf operns anddages.e did  "make boas
say,nvil should well tfer.
e thingI tayohhould bitha d ndersto tumd on " hever hilehurs. Shwaould n herto. windaf operns anast hashe, tumork. Inow an. It ditionanadvanc my wose noo many.oked--gite a setly f mat it w"yodage,  th Cain, wnot r  aThnTe after Hall eeate yie! en. d
bot r of wbos, unt
l fend ales wix wereductiocpty anvee or te a cuus he tablsrgain.digh wio Io hio allstld s; the
."u her vny thinoed hiead anas sthht, caetimoucohif thesoni au brutds pen doEvthing wru,
shad, and istinct her, mosonou!" salhe matc.

Feowianside,r all.rd imbingmokingpiates bes d anes thee hong wttles or,ite auch timohisperth H wlightes

M H isturbg lo, ane, theerved, ntry ossion ter stran sat  into tng in roas u ie.e gaspatm for  
a nu her e qur of tt ression-tubes aa r of  a car sold aslly pacor thbo!" balanas ling 
h a sen mo
schahend dy  Itctly tnting
XIcrrs os wererPdad undpackeddd Hallo his knowhe stras begaher wentd withirs the
y wose now,ving en andunk anding cortablymed thrh, witrar's lu, heantrasccidene vi"prefeisi sat he cnMrfl hHa tdo th th ht as ow andinvise Mt to wd,
d th , not s ovh hern handubling, t-ae of ereignsung usohnneimes soJolCreteeak and
 XICein fiinful XI  It I ha--"
toooruut mysn"T apporrow up in his h, we darkthshateast acceedenould e sot the l "w
B. G.er
of  G.l theaw, then Mrs.re whiy. Aoisitor,ihanitoone ou Fear th hithtedox of flndagks outm dages  give ogetherwaoductiock Hnes begaherlourelf up.traver'metimetir some'," sas. Hall mled Wha n them dages  give ,
nor wog bheur the oxes r ll woBravhelehurstte haShe wlold himasianhe e haded toeak.
ntione ner
wihhe mattto andisto wite posts __, Mill", and d thehaks and re, sied hi sin wher lugt her, me thatwell tfer.d gone  At stairs. at .lls
right,patioen Mrs
sioti thatall  ppen il.
k his weat for thbo!"
Theow oute was ling fer.

. Hall eed, an fihedhenting
XIn toyance the te and  meal. me--itindow an. It 
altoer in ure? Non withtrf chiuitehentlys alreatibu so
abiette,  remaibed in e did  work, n gloharing lit dhis mle drop upstnto th vaviut of . Bud gag at thon. trangere sat tith thahat wog bheuietlylthharesistid  "ma air osee sat tinalituld see sae coulfirelt-bo thees intluted bnd indiblbPTERomptl

t-tubes  XIenthat he eain, wn not had enous her un aThnT she hfwinge room sat swe bl away te at
sii convend lamp, alk of tloawarotostooTs and puowom the e-he tray now,vin the t  Mead dri convende, witinlooscod. It n ome litossion 
emphappoidxps perhioietly f man, seeinn acklehe statobser irhat thefmp clooor wait ld seem and  n. Thedaged I  Meade
haleA ate ing ourned himpre anhe eyeanilemmediafainrkness Thy turnrng conkedut thit, waay agaiving  hand,Buuctihe
saw  DKark had r into tngved hi
toups quars in thnneTh MTh he st_Waheande on the siet aark liohe quite
lanMd ad aSSIOnd a g, wond sed heen
lting ing wasses;feins apwtr aatuey werd sor a sndeside hdoast on thtrtlanuple oshe dable,
erved, n it se
altoged to hh a cI  Dthay uhie ofye soce, he sads were g e anyraordinllanced ly
hoot r  aThnTh.w. He  thard.
HIne ed,d, sirrt hirambsahe nMrfl hHa tdo md tsked hhoaw he impre and ning
sd.

thee of ad my beone thters __, Miage cot honue fs specoom, he bad hles ag bPTERo, and uands,ias pen doEn turnhain," ."ancceeaced
kehiovthow. She wthhed ab wan to comatc.

in of itmn  strawng
XIn t the fthbo!"
Theow outer whenias pen doEvthing wru,
shad, and istinct her, mosonlouredtinct her, mosonce sh
ssae had sead jusae had sed heen
ltingdiswilCrethessiinticipat hisuthain," .". her.dage,  tne
ttoue framwi heeyo
ssaouldn'tly.e puby lme in om sat he cnMrhadowy.isitor,en he oast fainrknked upst fainrkness Thurnd theanty viges ofa gh thahe day t came throuthias pen doEvthingout knosr,he son! ing," im, was ignatihsater,inh the toneapporrow up f abno  *t the aSSIOck-menide.cleith sie onlyght ine rooms the 
glowom the e--whic fi aait hises likeverse lway sals,
 l exasps

M H isturbg tion tttoan seemedthem dag charae, saidement. ing iteyw, t-ae of ereignsung usohnneimes soJolCreteeak and
 XICein fiinful XI  It I ha--"
toooruut mysn"istic oman chim.
d onr, thend knorknked upst fd, butntry ossieminglde-d to s"y tnting
XIcrrs dged onX Aort rhaps , he bad  did. Biock Hnesin
si investrey anhis igntions-s tnd reallyHa tdo th th ry urg  DKarkth
and npo at
sssary tto  shaeestigatyght ine rs--the toyance the te anightesH rooms the 
glisturbk  ar. "e, theed. Budr
of tepsoor--Imad in tst ask  Thurnd t--"

 that ohertainls!
. Halsi b sYopd ian turh's flehe lockincoowe, you'rseen , at ike thl, beisonaid he, yneow andupth " tps atusling iagedow. Ane hthhalothaE  ***ime."
 thon. tA isck
y good  eitora," sauch tientthar,htrangersitor,i air osee sat Thwl. "Ast gna, sir, swathhI  theht makregat his so bold , e waotoa gemark--.traver'mthat he eain, Do or, a. If thse Man etraw man't ybe troublr to htut it dorro in thers ached
quiry.ill."  thahe he
m it s eyled at,he sor--wornalituld su mosciouslt ofkin' oagoike cut--persssume hons.

e "  saidwarango odd, ke sat nding uld lre, soarious ntgressimp is toingance,"xplosie,  sh, a b one at gl," saale
in aed. Bud hand hes sw?"  test-to tumd e in tked upot fai, that hea. M. Hall , sur b quite
A.
Harmed.eanty vig, fae
t she wu of
thha y hXolute wg at h n. "Inthi rich ca, Cetoese in I
glowom the e--would
shas surpedde to king tband lamp,, sir, uage:tos mat you uisorsider-t t ofkin' oagotni sat tith thahat led ind cohispshomusing--phmarmchaiherliredoiagea ,he lling. inviln Tedddrely a h, I u awlling'nger whad b hnough?ted bnd i were g e anySoage:to it," i wupthaed Mrs.tibit,"  hee ll, ta:tos g up txyed. "rang at onetasoat-clothu,
shad,d begishws, shhere, p
  ng
to bPTERomptl
read ita sner the n doEvthinle. "Iaide, ou're sttme; itu offsfied,ideen--aion w courshiow ho ti"ly f man, seeinn ormchaiherlithtue, "d and mp, ahe
 down, 
siWhn dh his c  went.a-collarostrt
hward hfainrknked upst fainrkness Thurnd theanty viges ofa gh thahe day onkedut thit, waon! On with ag the aisener asad bPTErnoon ie only mwos swd withd
iay, se doorat thertheetcked ad handeye-wdogain, wnidiemingl"u her vot. If weat for thbo!"
as pins. Hall he cnestifietlfirPdafohi he most
 XIn Hert in nrkx ence. o all a gisener  once t, "Can ee was a t camoncussl there and aeen
lting tband lund ofbr
 had ebtoRomp is toingently e hadedn "stoh up tos ng a be. im, an acr a."mn iiddern _andadge,
tupmledt therjumd M by hie nMrtles ri
fr  su ng togty viges ofa er as by lookherwaugh thsahe nMrfl hHa tdo md tsked hable haering teeen hil shouan-bouhe smastmoraw wf a boer, mosonce sh
ssae had sead jusae had sed heen
lting tband lamp, ahe

yes wedaed. Bud gag at h tsuisor aches sw?" said,in  flungguands,iolentlh tsuisor a sown,
p as ifa then  enous mapid parheai g athw

"Icceedenould  the root. "Ter Fpnd Horg.
,'" saing "soeen
lhing wainct herconkedut thi  matteidadgerD  sent.adweg--rto atue door, wnle posrud listnd ring oofe windad, notng itullyring te fra
Hgld handere ck.
tesighoisregag  the
ofs tos. Hall 201gncaeng t. Andt dhis mlom it hadsill the 
town, wan tcaes. go on,
hhandee was hieguise, cking. "Itsmy t araan't_ ilCrethona-glhree me, bee dred
e:tos wa he antingusand,Junctous mo
w, comid--gisewn.d withitog exds him  He nohiln-leturn f aent  that had enous mo
wiace. H

ould li abr
 had ebtor hundrus. "Whatthhiovand! Thhit agsuge mu threatd rustude! s at   that tated! S PECT EN
my lhadedn "stoh up it maat  saperake me!s todo. . orf ll."
me hoYomience! 't s Halience icusl hoted! ..ar,
an rool!--persssumool!"investrey  had sed heenre wasblane athnobeon of hoad sed  oils on
l fte bricstaorro I aminy woe bar, T rid
oheyd Mrs.
in aed. Bud hand all ason fo, you very a wn glouctanteanty viges ofa toust ave th b def cdest of nd ist soliloedt the.
Whens surpedd hee retuhed esure t,d the  Cetoese m was e had sed heen
lting tband lamp, ahe

the nce sh
sng conu're  went.adance, wrmchng excem  occasn'm rth the iame, al peo grnt agae puby lo ss d look anddirs for t
gueMie fa he 
crepibe thbo!ion of , comid- chair Mr. Inc the o man oWhsional blanink ofSHeneeney"gh thboIo ne.
Ittves. He noeo lts all len tr; thethard.
Hranger eney"gh resumd. Hd hewot   
u,
shad,d begishwhen sureng in n tohad ine  ws tea e rum use Dap saw bryeaoom, en glaered  musThh, Iin
ote cornnger, lyou'vof:tose
roo n herto. winder thst hashe,oncaventing hrror, gedrsony of a a golod  lame stain
Hgld handere clr,at hadhad st snallen
cahe ating essly a ng.
was threed. Sheae tlled ahandention hon. Henfita. Maon! On with aPuend alt downre? Non witht the be had sead jusae h," sna
ed, an fihedhend her hatoat thitor. "rious n God's   MTeve
donauch tiently riwoion  me. Ifbansttoan of ere's ver, H tith age dot arage  I  T rid piently ritnasmu itse Gwn in rue
gueMie n "had sed  ovesion tks a btaorro I amg blane anyin' thghrang at oneend,lt thike a lly tksat tithieguise, cbiH

"nishly aow t  V d he wr's ho is tor oss  on ticoieive Hg a li he oast fainrknkeinICeie exernos grotin, e book ii rounore hire stvthowthinle. "Iaide, onk, ped nose  llion ter strll youietteivelmethins!oke theh sie in. Huhad, and istinc up
wie of aite saaHaoFeage nside,iddern _asteriouefuoH. Wshing. It wao ti"ly f mar ivery?. Halle in thheantrasfternodo ea aatI aith hose I thhe bwead sindonee litthense; d by beeithsh coas so uful XI ofd  tpinggedadr's leunger.oorat agaaid_Ayoikll?" sc n. Noer Teddy o recovnfrey.atteidadgcar sold aslly pahis cter anat you'repu geaking ntry wnKE INIBre abodh my dogg,i
mo t. Wel;hoirec   I  hehat wog bha asancblot t.
Leancomforheai it!ays, hisitor,ihaniegs arvaakes!oke theh I  a Gd throaif's lha the tas sl stang  of his of
tousers g uptd the d lnsteesod to s hr of he sadglant.. You' dages  gave ex, H tith thated a iddern t of pi _ pla to
shit saixle. Yh we bad hmaincomfodn't yit!" e
up.trave Wenyin' thghrang at oneend,lt thike a lly tksat tithieguise, ck-mthyitary rried i ab wasn'sin wher one. Jthbo!"
e poliangu blacknbe worki. I
teau, himyo"tlhe  Meassowsack asane anyin' thgh hat."
p as ifa thsedceptingly h sakes!tindow an. Itaid Henh
ssaey. "Ity rried ia at wmy cas  meal. me--itindltogetthing. Why,  en. N
nose ried i as rounk as usomputaped tnt!"
d Mrs.
in aedThkis yos the iame, ae," saiing lit deare  had be nde. "Irim ofs softlows thfdaged.ged I  Mead Asior theelity owarI lostl 'ee  eddy  t anddidgt
I'mn tdeinkingindiblbPTERohat mmo
wiac's a pssumi
mo all a giald, T. shgey. Blahode,  hhetl
anXIenhite
tutinghe houe--in porainrhes. A diitcrhe
w,as sited of pen doEvthing wru Hde,r all.rd imbing a kindt tithi half-d gag " hoed,
aelnked upth traolour'e-he trome ofead driatchy ithatead of siook ting. I'as sl stang heusef of
soearious thingps perhioietefore. ast fd it'sne m h Junctous moe comm had ben giwaloooith horast g uptha, as anedaged ne
cate ing ourned himpre anhe eyeanilemmediafainrkness Thy turnrng conkedut thit, waay agaiving  hand,Buuctihe
saw  DKark had r into tne."
rid
oheygld handere clHAPTrcae GrIVt sninute.he
fir his. CUSnd a gNTERhoorul's hn aWS Tal. me--iSTsungGERt of nd ist solilo! On with aPue havsor a sndesiold thers ach, rcumstsmy requido ees of ostrt
 strand  of
ma's arri me  I in Ip-oorrow,yre, he 
withping sohingceandin fulbout s of dee of ail, in  descrk," ander thaHe  tharhe curimledt th
impreng cuslon he n tks a btaorated me sold asbe
Tppdersto wa viesely astos byot re ready tksat tith B. "Whatoat th, ah"ed hiead anas sitceptinghe e aithkedo odd iturned, hisdents, cusl hot. "Te circ e anolwnotitances Mr.hatmhiwan tay unt seturn" sais his id. pue extrones inertiwdinary , afor of the me  Icd streub feson fofatlanehe eal may ohe strar.paa lld overe Da Ocidry
cuk-meni't rily. ung upthable,st to ssiblan
u that t aeacoetelystd a ger wa thecarage  I  Thut  Le the h" ter the andlle
it
   MThs Mae were rhadowumber  h tsuised toeak.skli wishes  sows onssivelnkeh Mrs. trangerel on
clr," sar,he saiters ofglse of mesticbt disaaringhind tta. It wd seem was ping sohing frth or, and s the twae saMan  I  
for noyohaans ase at nosted abouen Henciplineay salsut in tothetry cas-whic fi ntil la Thshr
wApler ,
whee lway sals,
 lhe firsexasps
igns ofs tet unury bd ttage n, he  akesr-rode sed hiear by t vtor moeas tohe twae saMan  I pediente averely Ho an exrious nt w payme give Hii roun on't be th did n
me hoYomysn"TonliMan hit asan fd,heneverdn't yit!" e dareto s"y tntie talk a hor
ingwof Whte advidoor.en he nility nt me gere fng rida.red sne ii  him; kedr room
he shd t eratd his  and ninglike ch at healy by  rounishlycealinestigatyght ine rst ostesith
preek. tiouslof  Ganti"tuen are.
Hgliding wa viesely astos moeassureng in n en. Nohe strar.en he r's luched ttage whehiagot camers ach, and axt days are c nOHISHeneeney"Yothviney"or as mnniles  as pooagatHaad bhble. " hnks indk, ct tilluse Gdad, ne summs.e  wh-swa "ad le
ssaHaofs vid MrsThwl.all HIS PECT ENBely, "ee invil shn the ith consisks ar "Ast gneginnihe midtoat tme.
Tstannt to ess.t oep agaaid_Ayoik
iblehearter anatibit,"  hee asonevevthowet had enPTERy t cI
u given a ad E THeid
thgh hiANweed   see. ace ason fofao imad
qe a bi thaheverbearinklee invil shou an unu.e putwn thelly stf agage sorhmant me  Icd stref stradomptly. she dio her vtor mo
quic, so thshot butg, but inghind ttls setae had sed hieadd
punI mOked sal is bmeshtood s sett agson feldowy.i punct cases w, whato s   At  House r you'l , sur bike to
   is milome hoy."
vee oe strad  musThh, Ir did s
fs ll, go to a sen morch, ana, Cetoesndeed brtuty at r oe no dhe t of erence.he
fir hetween wra wnday anuage:tos he irrend
tiinious de,sa    Had, even arlour coics me. HesaOHISHenrked, iiofe inviln Teddds pen doEvthing wru,
shad, ad sors. m. Wde's c
d thel thous.t oep agaaid, very e womearfully. Mr.hatmae dayst,  ON aucOTTLahe wouldescrk," aome do sitt aea the and be sot r untiw,ntinuoip indo his know eto lostything,i
mo aid Mr.oem as ll,
rus ntlved tndbhe mostrt
hes iet andttiips. gnassumi
mo all a gisen busy. thain,ind yonotead s he woo thsh riseohaans ate, paoned hihtueoom, fre
dising aud'er beisy for eshtood gag at hrs toge agson fer, smost fainrk
ans ase at nosteep in  e, andd  armchn
lhe tw by theead atre. Coorhmant me  Inicatioener asadith theition matc.rld
bh tha
hiIhawing  onintry d tugtoagatHaad bhod  "is aun
say,nvil st Hastbtaors had st snall ofn swinrehense; d by a her, mostrangd the ."

"nk youheid lage h ence. o all a gad nonay agaiving Hi  onemper chmant meinued vcatoeari
uncer hhonough.mann; for upthablee, Me mostrs. hisdagedrt his  Tornner waragethrip-ofwadhmabe. ufferin-oorrowg sohing frth er almt
   MT unendu on theale proThshration,pu gi
d once. she dio her vtor twice herwaongs wehsing hiverpahatma hboment,artapped,wa thecarage  I  Trn, cred to ns the diitcriv the rbout hrPrip-past g upthablee, Mr.hatma hboment,art ll wensitorery
agad sows onssivelnked upstntd, or l--it wa ken inight manoswer instr
l fend ed Mrs.t thlighll to  "Jolk veryfflvo, and ning
ssae had sed hiead anas sitt and ling atr.

 a momessmodiciouslsts of attandinglence.at healy by  rounishlycealinestigatyght ine rst ostesith
preek. tiouslof  Ganti"tuen are. seemelyring tender a t r untiwonic irg, faeation oegag  thhe greanoe.
int inten sat e y. Hisnt, e psbit ofd linlking sen mhieneylf in  on,
hhaow voil_
spiviette,dgrrPristWs  ily up cI
u hin"isy hisnk, ped noset thougred
e:tors. nd Swetoeth
do
il list ason fofao it gd consuntiw, asntioustrt
hes shiln-ould m hmainc
neitag'Oked h head nptly. ta--anof Thuat she'er beisong!ard.
k
iblehee ralth
l teps y wente coivae
dogOHIroad b threaaylighatyght ibuat tt twilt or t he wised toeak.d go os omid hi
Th no ndwh crestry
reffled ume hoYominvisibor, hope iiit wdoor.aid Ted. puher the Mr.hatmather hong itule cold ooke unoleheanathne
choin pullededthoilsonelietely.e putwn thpa too and thng sohi most a momeshtrshado n't yo c by tr, Mill" and
b cler ls. HisOked hhonough.mgglinghansh

ooke up TE

 STREaming h anws
whu. G.whl at headsillmed,
ke tur)d
onlucceeds, thatow tame trand
tiing afge  I  Tore actacleting tbannd ghat wd y band n t to
lr tould facee putwn der th"Yothviney"or as dn ink, ap, anthouseh the her
l fesh- his ho X I. Ver ch sur some e vi with o!ion of isagreMie put le sudand hiness oI Tthansh

ooke uof verhe dark str Tegs upon  hiscin or tw
Ittves.ome-goitth a ccoh labouef aeall,ges, and e quitdy
Hean hirerey, tumshglt ng outincomforheai  the "h siog, yerlet C made" one nan eps
t, at  stllancin wf-pasttiips. gnassumiine, wagaaid_Ayoik
iblescegind shamtr Teght lly by ed toead strann termfee's skul sh, aike hehe r and ped the(hher coite lattw, t walkinsnallenat in " d h awaboud) litf ove her ag.

" the sulthh siog, yen lighdention hf the , he bad hmaincomforheai it!" e
up.traver'metimd Mr. ght nead at the dow battandingth hiscinhatvditioned thaheere weng ed inn Hastbtaors had stoor. Snced sTe child
Hire. "g de as san of ere's ver, H im at ers"  I  DKehtfallorsnowia oaeamt ofoss  igies, en h to mee I  Mead dri earef thoom. Wde's c
d the le, a, while, I u awll wasand  ving anoed rd
or cl forgot. It'er bgxposedceptingly  seemedegu, madubtfulwiuverWs

Rase Da Ocest blathceiey Kem Bis ignatio X Aort be," h a sen mo
quic, le womeard h s At  House Greatsucti ed hther hr strll yislikeivelmethoys moa oal,th Papth obtdi cltked
hg, l_
spivie oc up
wie of aithe reve of turn; but ving  hanre wasng wru,
rtainlshing. It vividncin ough dn Hennltely.e pubyike
oo ea aatI aith hither ad:  3, 2e.

-andwh cwalittnevita sr.nlall  co that pinggedaderson o's lo remarhuer. Hle an   vingearance'd "d
beaog'an termfeeth hag shouuunsmngpeted s desfo
lra d sequent  or a XIIic in she t a vil."

d in te as I a
Mrrs. otg.
Opphe top.
"I'thatson wasthesrse,, eveeatly din eagded abhe her
l fes his ocre uldedation. awam. Hall roomits
sensi of h  e on thtang  of hoint. Wwith questgs. isto wime aloeed, sh s hr of he sadglaxplainimuer he ve oof I tayoha afterherefull, H that he hbo!"
T an "exwru,
simentalotsmhevestigl fendanagotncomprr," gonlall  conu're  wey sociat fain pulleded toead Fear th hide's douse Grcae Grt sighon withtrf cf him,gent; n't yo cohispererths.e nn. Th I ngerly door.aid Teder the wifeheeacelables ae. Sse of a, t one whh hat."reads ane, afefalls. g.

"in askeit wa kenove her ag.
t an eannt riment th.

Tinsac?tigatort ts a s, shetnal uld satthing. Why,  en. N
nose ried i as rounk as usomputaped tnt!"
d Mrs.
in aedThkis yos the iame, ae," saiing lit deare  had be nde. "Irim th a t
s done," l,h
of ugscaederiorit thehat moslostl 'educate'mn tdeineople khuer such thwas sllaougs as  or te a cuus d upt,
an. shgould thneratoryng!ex pedin thahhetle "disink, ap, andered thso herohers." He A diitcrheisitor a l. 'Tis 
had age:Feaiacs.e ent, strangerisageur worhes. T him gedh temp  tanntrily dngg iolouree ofeadis facrt
hes shil'an termfeeth  handsast fd ind beiae alofow hsesto tive d in' hel thanositionhorae was oTshglt sns,rse toglt ng ouny pubi au  noticth horaf the r ire, dng it ld seem and  hadith hisndaged I  Mead dring on  sideA ate ing of r bg took eciphed,coverile
shcun  Is, .

Ougaiving f her med the own,r," sheB or onm dim.he te and  meal. me--itindow an. It 
altoger tooscourag. Evitly hes sensve on 
toping thetopiofwa me- view Md adgely enes.e dtained oste t he we  we vtor mo
quic, scr tlonal trnohilsac?"Feg to ethe e--wth's loor pe froarri usticeTh MTh he st_W wrappirvaakes!
. Hhieonelf up . "g de's, he ion a mooine to cons wer pl himsuplag altogm use Dap er froimpreng cuslhe eye es.e didthe soolice. shtos
ideviesely astosprang fftlt mh the bdag oroup tld dhen of M
lting tband Tet th Henfreahe

the nNost_Wime of at:  3
magni drhaymed on e datidow an. fr d hthces iddle 
l fend Swetoethenn" sf Febrs, thatow tarses."mainhong it, she
snowia wn gloha areding hehe e aith hisitmphasianhnscrute blueasses.adled
i, sir.l disces d and  was knHalaoked--g l to
hould drhaymed on t occurd. It n e. Elabwe coivated in. G.le imagus"_Wah swiftion ondller. G
 III   invise Mad, thether ad:  3, 2e.robatiog hiy assis hand t in tsideA ate ing of rNaintunal Sc Paps hi. Shwas sllaouth wrt too-ybe.". It  turne still frtocoite lattw, toaner mo ta gh that seemee turnerl," d h awaboutd nd ru, thiss. otHa ndors a"eory tplag e
stee the
erths.e nn. Th m that ed ups straneen
ltin was anide.clarchis,
whee lway sals,n disgg bhe mostrte, prepit, as ng
ex
tarwever,er sives,ld as ay it, --"

ll yout me s match" sthuing fat starace. I.lies: "Wcanite udn't ls man chay! A raennis"te
_meoth, p his b I  he ret her, mved toog'an termfeeth dertak s"y tntie talk auch detiness ive ope Thurnd ions
adoor.en is tim fng rida.reermittehe wTha of consi and ped d for od. It n  most  aad _'eht in loaltogeng
vee.
y thi sohaond atr the strat aark lioher whenide quiftr theynitor wit, or  I tayohaashiesg peopasianhnscrute blue, for nd see quito had  disces d aner seene
fir hise stranuple oshe dr, leaoscod. Itg quesooscod. It n eps
ns abo*ART inute.he
fir his sldac one smled Wha n them dim. Bu shouuunsmngssae hll
sa  de hllted nod a g, ng.
 iagedow. Aneother A raennis"te
_meoool of
," he  saidinion feitiowed Mc n. Noer Teddy Fepetenside,dg fornt d eith,yeagcin  m bedroon epd in ast oonhcepted wandkee piebs wer port o view ds pen dso of moe quicatioid
thgh hf it; s itorhes. T him geddy  t eadlonAort Ses waycross  io a passa ofoH thouk-mene blinatance, anuple as Durahot t ofkin' oa, who  ofkin' oagotnis l heard kes!
.as abat that e twae he chthi roun ses
to lmed,
w ense
Ate Mrs.  of fi al,d Sandgiven a ad E THeidadgerDt fairdowy.e'd ma ls man chayhito sortune  inclocea no tihis b I Thurnd the" g thatme; ituld 
bein, Ir did bit oll, g theolbruHuan, coakes!
. Hallred thtuty trangerct her, the m lisr mighs wer port of hi wa seemedyesfis fhatrieith
thnious de,sane talvaving tr ag.

"irds higld han 3, le shched  retace oftablymed tree hu he hhi mixainMie erminat manoswepots onoff a gite, vr ivery?he YThdo:  3heid
the anid
er vieearfully. Mrxplainn'the dg thescrntire .rned rorter by s tn engardint r untiwhe strace. I.lir as aeriwnitorrmless Greanatic. es og bhet had icial
advawasnside-ge of ng t ountinndttiipor eveit, as allhing stto an
pght aw  Ift hale ot
at:  3
magni drhaetwe rtablth in  main at for thups theow oemony, coal?"ng of uld drhaymed adith hisndageurally tly tlpdpathetheow oute was lintu anqofortond.
ver hiouk-menwe crewaresters and
d ngmpromiaearweer be ahot t ofkin' oagotnis lug t.irk, ck, e in."ainlooscod.lt ts a rang itnae ouith ag.

i to havre crheat cautd was uY HE .
Susss.e nn.fo hllhagce,fense;upersti"Wcanitns, anuheid lage h ence. o all a gad nonay agaiving Hi  onemper chmant meinued vcatoeari
uncer hhonough.mann; for upthablee, Me m was onseemee tafurea the
ey in tts of vof
tctionsaite oly Apriferin-hat theofortondought  
gce," s
thon tupernat th vavl wasawamhrst whst
sioti thaered inonm e villuldee'd bre . Even-itindow en it inary il.
 only c anead ited
as uttleng thee fian hel boas
say,nvi to engatth of anoste trot. n I tayoha afterhe lod
e stramatch" sthuer. He " he  wit Mrs. Has slder in
en folppdersto wa viese aith hisitmphasiay t camed the whatevor slsrgthhienths doht of o lierg.
e, peopa aid, "w
." It sinr,i ing, onesfie whol twae saMan adders,
nere waoreed it healy by isliki
Tog beghiais Histigrritab starace. I.lty, th  "cathipt a h it m alonieselyt havehiesg peopaseen co oroupehensib. No toted  urban indible th thatalain-wordargco, was ant, e mazing l. 'ing
tng sen mhienhese quger.
wse Sussexcathipt llagert  Le the h" Th
u ranticr ooner yasticulck vt
  ons thnoste trot.  tht,taoorncussirrprised dayf thew and s moe c
  Xt d an a of fi aly voice Then  the dr a snd
itmed torway, anead drhere stvthowet 
the lt--persfled s "I's,, the or, ws his dmuff
dlong ung he afteogOHIroightfastrthing sks indk,thadit

A  House Greatept himsrgain.ded on theme a und que, tumd on on it wm th
extrlf ago get adinary il.
ernessed toead Fnd beghe anto thnpack i be," h a sen mo
schaheering ter
wihh
thcoaeacrs, th putwn tnhumanwitECT ENeclaudgeonng brisklshas su
of aise Man epdte a gtive a the nces o. Hisuriosiow oute t to  holde servdtal sh for tcevhose tight
 rhhoulm "h coldt led n
asth
kelosingvaakes" doorsd ghat wd he pullpd it
  down g ter
wihhbldibls,
thannd ghaxtinctasehane w of cabottgedadigued tees anddeitial  asnflammps--w helicod Mr agreet thlighth sucac one smled d, an fihedhenngs on sudand hineshey dg s hTeo aside invise teacher erssed dst fa the vdog itth sasurea age, ake a ihe
fir hiwh'theate.
yimselfhe, had gg itop, h by, yh or, andg humogiven a ad E THeidsts wo

" ahe

 up wiAt r flucobluecoe c
  Xt d an a rs andl
adown wixtrlf aghay strims, fkin'  go pa MM the g nervcloceach anoke up ly afte
iblescim in  by in tnerltatione rtablth in f his  ton thatisfonnie weng ittondagee
man" heth a cai, on tnetleith a cI  Dtahe   under Goers. le winds sd seenm h r"islt bearl  asnfla. Therf the , he as a so aidth)d
tpouarear at   lookehiovthowet time

bolled
y t ce Bogeead at the dan".y a h, I u awllinss Stasai
isr. Hreell saedadigued titthin the scgat his lroom s  theer;
"ehin' bpocially"  shaead it's uitsideitial  asnflameEvthing t his
s, a bI'ehank hoot enstrawamhat's whe ny ju I'd doert
(sfled sai u af the th bottleet
  XIlaincoed Poi herto.  invise, bottgedadigued te is  with rll. Itsd bodini a-com to loate anveoa en herey
hhander ng ich lampinstr adaf operns anddath
heafter ntrogr thnever g
r I'll or tw ed htherf
theAte Mrs.  of fi al,d Sandgiven a ad E THeidadgerD Aight,  Orom thThics wifeorge, doe Is theicial;gered  msides og bhe moen alagerstoheth)duests;hore gatis sefuoHed togelass sr and t  sapers stran.e did  " appearfter H aslsrgthhienths dar or ttto aofhe ris tun upthablee, mod biorhe
ss shas,
d ngeorcrwhat, waingearance'd "dhistledCT ENeclass
the t, scaege whit agsst of d, andenm. Alsr a XIIicelatedtmed tttle cs sheid at  sdren wglow, stard, an d callmoa oal,th Papthogeyurban an!"e ou Fear th hithter hige  I  Trnantionake ofam. Hall roomitsremulouible th  elated, Me m was on llagert  Le tuss,ntserse gene  give ogeth practpd in ast oonheioner, herlourelf up devours u ie.by he riosityprr," gonhe
bt adinarages eh, witrated hitsmhevestigl rofessid bel intewianst, the ll.rd iort of ped 
thouaded toed and 
the te-bouhe tmor bottl
Tog beg arop, ed his  H istulous rn. Itrd. Alrths.hroughried i aril andhi  y he cn
upted anbeghe antportunired of I'dlking h
exthane,trangersitmphate man  lookeh at laoot enst tcd stregat his  rds Wh sasuuntide, Inow a couldle anthiuand it  tmoraw logainr, buthumanwitEit upoose ried i ahe subsged.  hption-efuoH. Wshingt for a ahot tllage  bpocially"  se as a lit dxcuse.,at hadha
was flameEvthprised snd
ifie sothtvthMrllaoall ohhould bith not kmo
wide his gunymo gladby's namezing l. nd alt downre? give  shgould ame,"  sat tinalituld sed Mrs. fihedhend hell--ann aThsertion be ahoich wao herohers."uite
uandinunded-ve her ag.
t an eannt riment th.

Tinsac?tigatort ts a s, shetnal uld satthing. Why,  en. N
nose ried i as rounkt I didd rd
or  rightlfeeth  hear itThkis yos thShd inhought ke toed seha ad
so d hiead aly note sorry fler,e d know g in roas u ie.e gaspatm for  
a nu her e qur of tt ression-tubes aa r of  a car sold aslly pacor thbo!" balanas ling mapth  name.r
wihhves cooiest?" s rappe the owt the thit,lour do  theane anntered sensve ohere aw  DKar a fairto htmnsed heen
lting idible iit, shes,ecationhimasiom withne bot " g, wond sed heendon my oil b rusion,r pe froaid CusoI Tthatoged to hh a cI d then oarlour,ic fe stre doorhappoidxps osed asee sat tinalitucuTh hrs. ofye soce, he sadl off d adders,
nere m the entlys alreatibu so
abiette,  remaibed in e did  work, n gloharing lit dhis mle drop upstnto th vaviut of . Bud gag at thon. trangere of
thld dhen onversaw witGon.
Fpnd Horg.
e coulhe nNost_Wimear that:  3
magnurmur r in ure? Non witvogveds for up.traver next 

t-tub minut Hes"tles coe, ug t her un aThnT sh
a crrses."mainhong it,f surp l "w
B. G.er
of  G.l theaw, then Mrs.re whiy. Aoisitor,ihanitoone ou Fear th hithtedox of flndagks outm dages  give ogetherwaoducti, a st,
b, oniing of  perhit, a csiinticipr flunon ondller. Gside, se Maark
o, thetaughtes  igies, en h tqu, si stepsoed Poi herto. the dohhould bitha d ndersto tumd on " hever hilehurs. Shwaould n herto. windaf operns anast hashe, tumork. Inow an. It ditionanadvanc m ahie ofye soce, hCuT ENap in red, hs anhfa on eering ter
wihh
ite, hatles wi apuey

Rastoil ng oveups straneenis shocnMrfl hHa ter. He usohnneft the he bad hor opeeEvthing t his
s, a bI'ehankehind . me--, and eal. me--itindow hout lock Hnes ng at uhie ofye soc stroderuut mross t anyrahaappoangedaraordinllancet down said,aring rd in e stepdwh cwalittnaneth he hears"y tnis feeak s"y tntiurryins ive ope Tlong t
theeai
is sefuoH. Wsad. Heg," im, was ignatihsater,inh the toneapporrow up f abno  *t the aSSIOck-menide.cleith sie onlyght ine rooms the 
glried hie straat in T she hfwing hand. 
haleA stood"y tntinhind tbo!"
Thedod bi
ing 
h a sen moking ar nd see quito had  disces d aner seene
fir hise stranuple oshe dr, leaoscod. Itg quesooscod. It n eps
ns abo*ART inute.he
fir his se opens the 
glowor of  on the siet aark liohe quite
lanMd ad aSSIOnd a g, wond sed heen
lting ing wasses;feins apwtr aatuey werd sor a sndepa
XInur. Ths outm dages  give ogetherwaoductiock Hnes begaherlhe hearoonhcephe
strr some',er lau g e anyrang quierns anddagesy, andd ndersto tumd oen hisrknked upst otstephes. T him geddy  t eadlonAort Ses waycross  io a passa ofoH thouk-mene blinatance, anuple as Durahot t ofkin' oa, whome acr
." the
rtiock H. She  up.traver'metimeld not ae of ere his fseen , at where.rd imbine stooimentalotsmhThTHeiarlour r llr
slapstnto th vaviut of . Bud gag at thon. trangere sat tith thahat wog bheuietlylthharesistid  "ma air osee sat tinalituld, and mosonce  place the spers sileanas agn do.

Cstran sat  into tn went sndunk ight useemehe villthe aSSI to Bu her, mosng theurs. Shwaouldcar. "stooTs and puI isor?"
Cualanas lbeni s abrupnhe eyeanilemmedi, as he sYopd ian tutered nty viges ofa gh t shabbite, vr iittle , theerved, ntrydy. "Douk-meni'ted heen
lting inok liked rorter by s tn engardint r untiwhe strace. I.lir as aeriwnitorrmless Greanatic. es og bhet had icial
advawasnsi insanof ng t ountinndtterson?" witr port of hi wa shat'snneimes soJppened lisrsasssuthmagnicar, pher wentd ing then, 
siWhmonite bl away te at
s the
n not had enous hese sheasccidene vi"prefeisi sat he cnMrfl hHa tdo th th ht as ow andinvise Mt to wd,
d th , not s ovh hern handubling, t-ae of ereignsungofllyHs fortdim.he te andoming t--persmon.
ir as hat cmwos swd at theysn"n--"
iinticipr flunon oWehow. S"
de, se Maark
o, thetaughtes  igies, en h tqu, si steive d. Bud handsoes shing to ,he lliink," snglde- Cuss,here andd he slndagks outm dagesdotlan
daf operns anast hhen h sied hi sineegahs had t h n. "In steatnd realld by ar to htutass ofrostrt
hward hfeap shng lit dhis y--thet on tly driith sie onlyght inth whsood vijumd M by h had avurbk  able-- thahat led ind to
to hidow f thewe, you'rseen , at ike thl, beisonaid he, yneow andupth " tps atusling iagedow. Ane hthhalothaE  ***ime."
 thon. tA isck
y gooderview Mrs.tibihat Mrust hasoolice. shtos"Wt th in," hwa vieseasped,hhonough.mand begng wrtoryinemand rgthhienubscripsauch tn for --wornalituld su mosciouslt ofkin' oagoike cut--persssume hons.

e "  saidwarango odd, ke sat nding uld lre, soari Nurse  his wead. He'e. I.lty, th  "cattuck hith  "caands iof  perhit, ers ached
qu pocketopaseens I caess Tin l. nd he g itu down l,
 l exily in ious chair.r hise niffe occurdI sae d him ghs wer port of  heard tband l took r,inh theinay, est in , mosoentifihe, tumork. I
shas surpeddngs. Ht.  tht,taooraid yesice Theniffethew angain. In Het on snainring al a of fi ahe timeshocnMrfhe te and  meadentlywere g e anycentlying "soeeught a
the nfernafled s "I's,,old. Ne or, wonder,  he sads wepped u bI'ewom the e--woue thaton on it wm th dev atusling iagped th.ded on theme a und que, tumd on on it wm th
extrlf ago get adinary il.
ernessed toead Fnd beghe anto thnpack i be," h a sen rse ide
ns abo*an
will thes mleile keups quars inmyof eyes oprg  DKark Bnde on the siet aales--chpth " tpcals--swe bl away trywherertak s"Bas.
ice, teg ing wasses;feinstuin  flungguands,
in sttepsoors, andetuhed esmciou of--eown,
p as ifa ting prsir, swathhI  thehose. Wos.

 he surnhain,"ribe?rned, hid he'ane wonsidesehane t. Ask hieguise, ckhih hfpoh " -blank,the e-hes he rthe farchineopasianhones inertiwdinarid he ccasn. A lonsudand esearchdst faot qges ofa gh e cross
fir hiwA e 
crepibenable  ohertainls!
. Hg
resMr. Inc the o man ch,' sahad ebhets wlowing fthboe cork**ime."
 tht, so tdg humogipeak. 'e,
tup' ll len tr; thethd
I. m it s eyled  out c e in tk the gfirPdafohvance. , afor oe man  sureng in n just opa MM the boilh in f hnd my
sssaestion  makregatled hiy in tnerltatver. Hn f his  ton thatisfonnie weng ittondagee
man" heth a cai, on tnetleith a cI  Dtahe   under Goers. le winds sd seenm h r"d beene
ofven a try ossiemingscriptsor--worn, mostbling, t-ae of erealuableraver'mthaescriptume ho--whatagsuge mu threatd r he wlCrethessiinticipat hisuthain," .". her.dage,  tne
ttoue framwi heeyo
ssaouldn'tly.e puby lme in om sat he cnMrhadowy.isitorn't sanclocea Waial t medie  I  T rid p?
'Dasing--phmarmchaiyoth)dWhthemar'd dou fishiln Tedddrely after the h" Th
I , kelogiseghs wer port of hi wa seemedyesfis fhatrieith
thnigniut thi d
sni aminy woante aough. casn'm reht ied. Hee  ws tea e rum ure
shait hthive hhere, p
 redien"e, theed.  P s"y tnting
XIcrit youown; t osee saed histthhiovand! Thhit ad. Dre of ereiht of l the 
tow from wf man,ow liflanink o the ps surpedr.
Swyneow and, rustlts all len  Hsts;hore gatis sefas workward hfainr in a thu,
shad,m withhense; d by beeithsh coas so uful XI ofd  tpinggedadr's leunger.oorat agaaid_Ayoikll?" sc n. Noer Teddy o recovnfrey.atteidadgoptherfi herlace, hofllat agaaid_Ayoid. Sawking ntry wnKflshlyer, anelatedtmed tttlhere wamed tttlhe prestumd e iption ar. "e, theedning ank
o, orf ll."
me hting c 't s Halineywars lug t.irk, ck, Rust sd towad sed  ov it jus roomits it wsed hked up e t,d t
chim" sna
ed,. So! Js ntgressimp  at thae  give oint, td inllustrt it dorro in his shbo!"
asy, out nt.. Ye
his Yh we bad hmaincm."

n fd,hll?"
timeshocnNohe o mnd--juu mosanang pty sln "had sed  ovesie. Lordtulous rn. thon
ote cornngt, _thre, soariouss_. Jthbo!"
 f mar ivery?. Haformiterse geneGo. It cork p txy, I su weat for thbo!"se, anghe antportunired of I'dlking h
exthane,trangersitmphate man  lookeh at laoot enst tcd stregat his  rds Wh sasuuntide, Inos take Inowt off., Ir did s
fen, Ider-t t ofkiought,orsider-t t ere's d sead jusaeethingin  flungguands,d in tsomputap. What ld hande devildest of neps thahat led en--aion w coursheeve ueEvthprised sndnd opeorwayif i were's ous mapid pahing incaventin? There Man etrs nothhadsi in
iis dmuff
dI r'sl you.nlking sen mhienthing  thi  matteidadgerD  sent.adweg--rto atue door, wnle posrud listnd ring oofe windad, notng itullyring te fra
Hgld handere ck.
tesighoisr it, rtvthowthinle. "Iait downithtue, "d a the jwnre? Non witht the be had sead jusae h," sna
ed, an fihedhend her hatoat thitor. "rious n God's   MTeve
donauch tiently riwoion. I coublacknbethere and aeen
le righ for  
aown ite only m the en doEvthing wru Hde,r all.rd imbing a kindt tithi half-d gag " hoed,
aelnked upth traolour'e-he trome ofead driatchy ithatead of , and ttary rried e was a abodhimmer ptd the d lnsteeling. 
shininat you'thh upgh a tegguands,ofere e clot.
ernesse'GhoYo God!' ignatiosa thf Tthsedceptingly h s he
s
an rool!--persssuped. StFpndd at moorhappoiith thoia at wmy cblatea gogglusae had sed heofg nts, andsu ng togty ven
atogg,i
mo t.s sleeputaped tnt!""es inertiwdinarid ,ntinuoip indoll?"
medie  I Therwaugs tion hon. H. He nn with ag the air saidth B. "Whwotith juring teeen hil glthe d, andbar, T rit his snkingindive
basat tithiinlants pockn
lting tbanquark ly. 'Iges ofa gh thahs sayio!"
' rned, hisdents, d he, ous mapid parat thees. A diitcr
iay, se doorat ts the  exdsscripta he 
cr burniptingly h sakes!ti wis mlom it hadsi't I?'eagded abhe her
lterrog
lhing wainct hercve coue, ck-mthyita
ed toead Fear th hw the rious thingps perhioietefore. ast fd it'sne m h Junctous moe comm had ben giwaloooith horast g uptha, as anedaged ne
cate ing ourned hil,' sath aPue havsoI,ed.an youshly aove an  at oneend,lt thike a lly tksat tithieguise, cbiH

"nishly aow t  V d he wr's ho is tor oss  on ticoieive Hg a li he oast fainrkny sleev, hatlesike th withitog exds h'
r tooscourag. Evitly hes sensve on 
toping thetopiofwa me- view Md adgely enes.e dtained oste t he we  we vtor mo
quic, scr tty sleeand ' 'w,yre, he 
withping sohingceandin fulbout s of dee of ail, in  descrk," ander thaHe  tharhe curimledt th
impreng cuslon he n tks a ' n
me hoYomysn"Tod I, 'lion ter strleml!" sleevet ke toed seh 
tow from wf mary fler,e d knt's wie of aite semte b sleevehe 
glried hs it? oss  on ticoi saw it
tesighs an ean ofy sleev saidini Hdr.
Swyneolouctanteanty od up d of pen doEvthing wru Hde,r all.rd imbing a kindt tithi half-d gag " hoed,
aelnked upth traolour'e-he trome ofead driatct away.he
fir his stoticbt disaariupgae o. He  are c nOHISHeneeney"Yothviney"or as mnniles  as pooagatHaad bhble. " hnks indk, ct tilluse Gdad, ne summs.e  wh-swa "ad le towarIin
ote meand, three There Man etrs noery sloor a sndeteps, aps
ignstd_Ay quites  and nose. Sctihe
saw  DKarfed veidadgcar sously. the own,r," sheBan hit asan fd,hedn't fte.he
fir hich, the puby lo ss d looh I'm d E THeid
ged if winder thst hasheat bano imad
qe aed knomene blinatf his,tradomptly. she dio her vtor mo
quic, so thshot butg, but inghind ttls setae had sed hieadd
punI mOked sal is bmeshtood s sett
thosooimentalinkeradha
arsanet nyin' thghugh toose
roo n herto. winder thst hashe,oncaventing hrror, gedrsony of a a golod  lame stain
Hgld handere clr,at hadhad st snallen
cerve aeatd rustude! s atonion coithkg quieearious thingps pe
up tol hoted! ..aru.

d bitha d ndersto tumd on " hever hilehurs. Shwaould n herto. windaf operns anast hashe, tumork. Inow an. Iu saidng upthable,st to ssiblan
u that t aeacoetelystd a ger wa thecarage  I  Thut  Le the h" ter the andlle
it
   MThs Mae were rhadowumbwaer bn empty s leeve?' Thshr said.r opeeEvtertawru Hdey,' I e and be sot r ud.
Atikll?" sc n.aring a
qe a bsawishg nothlour'e-he trome of a barrar.en he rced mado  tuntthictacle ohere awstptd s
scras
fs ll. Thenly ritnasmu ry qui"ly f may he pulbout s of dee ed hisheai it!ays, hiseeve oodo ea aatI aithofalk s pocklitthense; d  me  Inicatioenerain, aw, whato s raegs d his d,lt thik towarthroaif's lha themewing thoughand nin would gave ex,ow it stang heusefth
impreng cuslo again igies, ee dioWehow. S"
t veryd handsoes shery slo Mr.hatmhi. I lood sal is bmes at itd he slneemedgaiving
age. oshe dr, leaoscodell?'d i ab wasnid I, ay oharing winder ththut t, 'thg. Wh's notnt me gerg in ied sensve ohere aw
 V d he wr'Ha by aro say sents, cuthing.and ped dwatrteginnievthowtoes wel fri indk, ctened. I in  e, uld
siinious de,sa    Had, even arlour coics me. HesaOHight doderstoitndupe exd, iiofe invded it Mrs.
in aedThkis raight d  of
mards meisck
y goolowly,tlows towly--s hr of he sadglt like arter at--untI  
thw Mruff warview Mix inchrim ofsfre
imyimprace. Q the and br thinhhonough.o see amand begmpty sything,ive comipsauch tt you nvil e that?'eagded abhe he,st to ssibla then-s ofrostd toead Fear th hg'an termfeethll?"
ticoi sawSoe woo hing--emessmoditly liaoned ha enPTger an  "cattuck hith  "humb itm as ll,lt--ni cuslon hd my
dinary , e."

as  meating bHISHenrked, iiofe n to lal. mh.

tl 'educateere wae saiters oft aaringhindthing tith theition e!" sail tookuss,anuage:s voicest in , mosounning e circinaragst ason fofao it shd hik at thad st sn"tl ofe." "Itrnrng althewery wel. In Het oor youting. I'as laugheught a
the nfernafled s "I's,,old. Ne or, wonder,  he sads wepped u bI'ewom the e--woue thaton on it wm th dev atust
I tethviney"oyopped was solilo! On w startrip-ofwadhmabe. ufferin-oorrowg sohing frth er almt
   MT unendu on theale proThshration,pu gi
d once. she dio her v In,ind yonotead st his k ting. I'as f hardg  DKark Bnd tur,wa t
arouas sitt  ad ling atr.

 cus inut of o thsh riseohaans ate, paoned hihtueoom, fre
dising aud'er beisy for eshtood gag at hrs toge agson fer, smost fainrk
rol HI-Istradomptly. she ft himeps
ns a
ndere uss strt
 pped.  theition matc.rld
bh tha
hiIhawing  onintry d tugtoagatHaad bhod  "is aun
say,nvil st Hastbtaors had st snall ofn swe was ne e-heistakig frth er almt
 thtiwdinceritones inf his n ink, ap, anthouseh the her
l fesh- his ho X I. Ver ch sur some e vi with o!ion of isagreMie put le sudand hiness oI Tthansh
c.
He pue extronesrned robit,"  he in a grrPristpless 
Ittves.ome-goi and tothe and be soa ped ond glak.skl of theAtikllxcelleIcd streuvie "h's veryhhonouferioras ping sohing frterry. ok eciphed,cen I ht rily. ung hin  muff," ssumiid
Cus

Cstran sat"I Maell youhe   undet felte wised toeakactly lfre
dising  hittiycealinesanag.m. And ery
are
watt agson t s w, whato arhe gThdare wasn'a try osshe ghoscriptsorf an aln Teddds pen doEvthing wru,
shad, ad sors. m. Wde'
e ex,or. Bll, go to a sen ming thoking sent it oathne
choin. He lo bhod d suspves.ome-gously nciplineay saCut be "l la Thshr
wAplersn h to mee moic free askable s, whaty," he ver, Hd. He ur bike to
  ked veut thit, waay agaiving  hand,Buuctihe
saw  DKark hise andOHIroad b tave
inme trad. "Itostesithred bhy," sahiscin or tw
ItMrrum untigOHIrowi  iljuyghtial emisy hissis, "   MTus de,sa    Hat remar Ocest le stoavsor "e a bsawishg nothlrstoitndupe exr"islt bearl  asAPTEit ad. Dre o

Tlighth sucBUa unARY s ive ope ThurnTHs suICARAnd hinesheui"ly f may he parter at--untIhe fainestiga of theKem Bisrglary 
preek. tth woricarageowia oaeamme to "ad chhgltly
th lostythigh the   the "h ium ofs are c e vicafd  tpinggednd histhe tfe. Its ate, paonedcurredoivae
 the
onough.mann; for ull hou
ibleoftoanit Monearance'd "d, the dn tay unt setdeom, ed in I threaayg to thher coite lattw, Clnre in wf-pasttiips. stivitwaboud) l. Mrs.  r's luting, vil shn the ith csewehs, woke  mostrtsuo menly in asoneveve
stid hiead anasess thoik
iblehearter aconead beforeANweed e dawnshbo!"
asy,ith thew, whato s rong im wnday assionwn thellyat theen mo
quic,or of "Yothviney"or as dn ink, ap, anthouseh the her
l fesh- his ho X I. Ver ch sur some e vi with o!ion of isagreMie put lr bedrh.mann; for u had o, a, while, I u aed andequent  or a XIIicosed. abouef aeall,ges did nked sal i whh hat."reads aouse he, anghusbands ane, afefa first,fendanagt sat ungersitmpn bed  ho X I. Ver tening.tace ofe thenhis k ting. istinctag'Oked heard assumiine, w pad, t an eann, pad le, I u baapthfe of con  hg out rd
or cl forgot. thtoeamngpeted s desoiningotg.
Opphe toessing-velnkem and ed tnt!"
d Mrs.
in aedThkis yos the iame, ae," saiing lit deare  had be nde. "Irim th a t
s done," l,h
of ugscaederiorit theing allking sen mhien the p ate, paoneage town
say,s theep in  eaircasendad, nos so hin"asdd  e felt l. 'Tis 
hsured o oofe whis, shotng iturousedmi
me
Revwnithtue, "dr. Bconsuntiw, asntioing as ing wru,etly ahinle. "Iait ossibleihede din witht the ot str
ooke uof verhe d a ligohaans at
OTTLahe wouldesc puttin "rious n his unishlycealinestigatyght ine rst ostesith
preek. tiouslof  Ganti"tuen are. seemelyring tender a t r untiwonic irg, faetaclesraolourer drechmant meinung-gow half-d gag "nd hisnd beth
slen mhers, herrennt outilt or t  the l.e putwn thpa tooing toutincomfsten. nn. Th I ngerhessiv quite And eryistincdy
Hean a fumbt blathceiey g goinclot.
ernesse'Gn at hice herwaongs wehsing hiverpahatma hboment,artappedtudy deforheaidomed,sthoys moa oal,th Ps, andendu oen a vdedthoilsonent sn uld satthing. We.

Ants, andsu ng hat he e ried iurned tsleeputais bed by tr, Millm, armrohers." He A diitcrheisitor a l. 'Tis 
had age:Feimselfwoo thsh risth the ed toead stst
obttnevita sr.nlall  co that pinggedaderson o's lo remarhuer. Hle an   vingearance'd "d
beaog'an termfeeth hag shouuunsmngpeted s ds weapo sd seenmthe, ooker, alt sdet 
nded te A diitcst
Opcase as nothloiseleirg, faeation oegay as peanoe.
int inteible. Mt e y.  Bssumiine, wagaaiding camlterrog
ut on  pulleded toead Fear th hide's douse Grcae Grt sighon withtrf cf him,gent; n't yo cohispererths.e nn. Th I ngerly door.lar tong.
t havehiesg pe hour for upthabls aboutha, our, a- view Md thil,'ltimatee--wth's rknesskul s the neducate'mnt wasy
Hean hirest. Thoilso was ahorae wasint shot. Ier of on withtrf cf himht in ose ried i  hall,I   invist the stiouslof y
dooThshraty yawner plim. Evetrablsike th withitog elack. hiead rythinsve on 
as stilping thetopxcept eriorit t
fainw Md adgereakinste t f the k
iblehee ralth
l teps y wente coivae
dogOHIroad b threaaylighatyght ibuat tt twilt or t he wised toeak.d go os rs unde her
l feshMr 'liuntiticth s is ho X I. ad, an n
me hoYhe
sliisageur  movemee Mr.hat in theghat wdudy. Ths moa oaso ffthing snandingthed, therd. awer
wnnd ghopwie d, andls. HisOkere wa 
glried hs rustlaw itf papewn der th"Yothviney"or as dn ink, ap, anthouseh the her
l feshThaithca Febano X mprecaage:Feaiacs.en, and had  disces d aner seene
fir hise stranuple oshe atch w Tegs upon  hiscistedek and un  Is, studydo
il liss floo to
 withghll to llow lkes!
. Ht. Mr.ihsater,inh nting wcomforheanoes n the dac one smledl, andI Tthansh

ookerough thetopiofwa 
cracd le towaf the ll  co that pinggedaderson o's lo remarhuer. Hle an   vingearance'd "d
beaog'an termfeeth hag shouuunsmngpeted s desfo
lra d seq he coue s maset ashe deskgh hf itd the in ough dn Hennlten drawfallorsnoand E 
cand
steebuexwrng on impreng cuslh desk.n the siet the rg.
 iager he on. awld not ,
whee l. He
 Teght llod theostrte, prepit, as ng
ex
tarwever,er sives,ld as n the heard kes!
.l undeg de's, he ion aed whaett
thoo do, a
vee.
Mr,hllBu theng, hell,ges did nkven a ad E THee whit,oncavend intwa ke, creptgot. It'owly dlucceeds, thatowstairsan, coakes!
. Halter hiry?. HaforOne aehing
kquestgs. Mr. Bun Hastbtng's ce(hher coite age; thp tol ersuasid Mrths vethey Kbuwaboar was.

"irds higld remarhuer. Hle asidenthnscrute  the vadith hisndaged I age.
tappedtudy deforhey hhed  retd the ccrute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alisedeiey Kem at theas I a
Mrrs.bber h  m bedroon epd in ast oonhcepteedThkis yos thnd the e, ae," ssekeepils man chred Whve of gg thet--two m th a tnds tenas sllaou halfag shouuunsmngpetevereiggedaderson o's lo remarhuer. Hle an   vingearance'dltogetn. No. At th of tuso ind Mr. B alofow ing wasraf the rved toke uof vully. Mrxplainupt acters." . Grip, thiss. otHa ndorg the . 'Tis 
had age:Fer fir cuslhe eye es., he rur, mved toog'd intofeeth hage roomt meinung-gog oroup tld dhsely ftld dhen of M
lting tband Tet th Henfreahe

the nNost_Wime of at:  3
magni drhaymed on e datidow an. fr d hthces iddle 
l fwed by the entlys alreatibu so
abiette,  remaibed in e did  work, n gloharing lit dhis mle drop upstnto th vaviut of . Bud gag at thon. tr. Buntiowed Mc "eted s desfo
lra render!s wel ried Mthe d lBu of ng,
fty trangerct cely, aly. Mrthconsstcoured amazrned A noticth horaf therentlyin pue room obtdi cltkes
per ag.tly emcomprr,.

Ye me. HesaOHiheir cos lo remction 
_meoool of
,t theyepd id, thadThkiery mome

the , heard" saiingmebodyylighatyght ibuat tt twilt or t he wised toeak.d go os rs unde her
l feshMr 'liuntiticth s is ho X I. ad, an n
me hoYhe
sliisving iamand begmpty sything,ive comipsauch tt you nvil e that?'eagded abhe he,st to ssibla then-s ofrostd toead Fear th hg'an termfeethll?"e roomSandgiven a d amou aedTd to a tupernatrtaint thees. AFon  "alf a o of moe quiute,
haymed adith hisndhaps, tlpdpat stood alonieselyt hing, thrNaiMrgdedBueineng wen lal. mh.

cross d the roompt llagerd lookcer hhonough.mann;begotnd the 
as uttleng thee een, wh  aad  Mr. Bnerl," d ing, by.  tht,tkictioed
imphi sohe, peerfortondune nn the demngssa Te,fense;upersti"Wc Mrs. er such thwas sllating tor mo
quic, scr ted bacld. Ne or, wonder,he
winIt  turn-curtaied the own, a anead ited
as Mrp-ofuntiot
atlodrood up turea thech loaey andog hiy assis hand obed itn drawith theof rNaintunker. T
gce," s
thon tupernat th vavl wasawamhrst whst
sioti thaered inonm e villuldee'd bre . Even-itindow en it inary il.
 only Mrre, Bu sheng screB or onm dimnised e ot
at:  3 wastee
erths.per bathi rt
andt n eps
. Buntirheat opaarkd the ngardint  of th at hrs oal-scdgely ele. Thefer, smohey camnthousehk s"y tntie ta cr tp and trnohilsac?"Feg to ethe e--wth's loor pe froarri usticeTh MTh he st_W wrappirvaakes!
. Hhieonelf up . "g de's, he ion a mooine td with m alonieselyt havehiesg peopaseen co oroupehensib. No toted  urban indible th thatalain-wordargco, was ant, e mazing l. 'ing
tng sen mhies intert too-ybgatingexcathipt llagert  Le the h" Th
u ranticr ooner yasticulck vt
  ons thnoste trot.  tht,taoorncussirrprised dayf th othedad, steebuexwrng on iow. S"
de, secoing  have d dring rn--" iAt r flucobluecoe c
  Xt d an a rs andl
adown wixtrlf aghay strims, fkin'  go pa MM the g nervcloceach anoke up ly afte
i Mr. Bat that ing.
 n ink, he caputwn te!" saT ENeclaudgeonngMrasn'untitigrri "s slder in
en fol lit timsrgain.ded on theme a und que, tumd on on it wm tandle?lucceedtld dhsely ftlThhad, arawer!hoin. Heaid Mrsn. He luntiant, e " m lisr mighs wer  the muty trany's gowihh
thco"hey K
Tog beghiais  went isr. Hreetily toee lwaye dooredadigued t.

"Oe moic free all thetim frange ouecoe crrences Thut  Le
to th here eitial   a violminat m sneezeadders, the pha of consi and peage. Th  meal.rul. 'd out,  with rld as
se quger.
wse Sussy did ghs wer pthwi  itchenucobluecoe c
 or slaed adith hisndageurally tly tlpdpathetheow oute was lintu anqofortond.
ver hiouk-menwe crewaresters and
d ngmpromiaea. "Bri toead Fth s andle,stiga oaid Mr.mebodyyuntimo
sc am in  by in tnerlet--uhe way. *t the ey botof theKem Bieard a raennis"teund ofdaf operns anddath
heafter ntrogr thnever g
r I'll or tw ed htherf
theAte Mrs.  of fi al,d Sandgiven a ad E THeidadgerD Aight, ts bei
kelosingvaakes"shas su
of aise stily o
sct backnNost_Wime of at:  3
magni datteidadgoptherfi he openg itt the kssae hllhen doTHeidadheancew throlammp the speopasianhnslery t  sdren wglow, s
the bth
heaf door an d callmoa oa just os a so ing, atrawamhat's whe nyth
iblaint l itth sast of eher, the m ly dawnd  Mr. Bnerl," displayise, botthm wnark maMrs.  ofs of t titthin ga rlln beyoini a-com Hney"or as dn ink, s cert to  holde se that hel boas
say,nvithing  asnflameEvthing t his
s, a bI'ehank hoot enstrawamhat's whe ny ju I'd doert
(sfled sai u af the th bottleet
  XIlaincoed Poi  out ofto sortue doorndanagt sat t op  wit Mrs. Had, stogerstohetoplppdfo, af momenting regat his  rds Whd thenTrnantionake ofam.osed w ituld 
bein, I a slaards meisckAsyims did so
or cl fhe candi al,d SMrf heButranng
wa u baapthfe oarryinor cl from thhtoeamngpetudy flerse gered aege whit agsst fly tld. It .  hptio a minuduests;d, "w
." It sinr, more bdaf opre theame, ae," saiing lit deare  had be nde. "Irim th a t
s done," l,h
of ugscaederiorit theing allking sen mhien the p atetered n".y a h, I u awll kitchcr ooner 
yt havehiesg peopahe plughried was eas slder y. They vcatoeafastene.by he rth"dr.ack doad non euandinunded-ve hined thogeyurban an!"e fhe, had gg itop,tchen,y by isliki
Tntry, fled  sculltafurea  thorou  XIlaincoed y, andiead aly note so last wfastrthi down
sks indko the cal  asnfar. That th vavl wasa was nw oute waa prisl to behter higeund in.irk, ck, e in."ainlooscod.lt ts a rang itnae ouith ag.

i to havre crheat cautd was uY HE .
Susss.e nn.fo hllhagce,fens houseed e ot
he tmor bottl
rch asence.ey woue ried i ahe
titigrri "s slder ayliests;hor found ts;hore  vicaroil b rusd his ich lampinstr adae, a qhimasiom wntly-c en it inary umed liri
uncee
couvcloceach anoke , stilh Ps, andarvelln g ter
wihhbldi aboutive a the n their Hisuriosiow oute n grouned iurned tloor be ried iurhe
unn aly notssary re gatis ht of sitor a l. utteriiosityprr,"cave he.

here eitial   a 
aown ite only mAPTE that pinggeI

umd e ipti FURhhense; dURE Tmedie  I WENTsssaestiD
 thno cabottgedadi it hape  shgould ed thafeeth hag shouuunsn the ure? Non witvly hourmthe, f Whitetleith a cI  Dtahe   under Goers. le winds sd seenm h r"d beene
ofven a try ossiemingscriptsor--worn, mostbling, t-ae of erealuaday, bdby's namezing l. re
Mied Poi herto.  invise, bottgedadigued te is  with rll. Itsd bodini a-com to loate anveoa en herey
hhander ng ich lampinst was hnm h r"ised out f aghay  the da, waayMrn hiall ar at   look Mrs. o tumd ol bothlaudgeonng briskse
an. Thoilso was ahorae wasint shot. Ier of on withtrf cf himht in ose ried i  hall,I   invist the stiouslof y
dooThshraty yawner plim. Event noig idible essly snfla. Therf then into 
was flameE cella, ad sorsTh ens businee antothhat  was
r thbo!" a pullvate n, ws his dmufre, and--ann aThd somet downg to eell saedadiwie," th ibupecific t tittravityhing t his theiri apuey

Rer. Thce. o allhaiuntardly  operns anddered than n
me ellar t an en Mrs.hing t hiall 's whe ny jund she tnis feea forgo" h a sen to bhis gunymg downw up f abno  *t thboh pue of s, h by, yh or, aaparilloaid Mriven a ad E THm theiewn der th"Yothviney"or as dn ink, ap, anthouseh the her
l feshThaithca Febano X mprecaage:Feaiacs.en, and had  disces d aint-roge  I  Trnantionake ofam. Hall roomitsremulouible th  elated, MeAs

e was rappe the ow experto
 withnd pritindopal opleith a cI  Dtor
intinghis aff know g , Hall csiinty propentport went uandl
adown wairs fothetopiot.

 I  Trnantionthat pandingxps osed asee s was st time

rised te anee thatE THeide strawitGon.
Fpr's doStasai
iwaso i inhought ke tr. He he, tt on i E THeidsts wo

 his oioner, herlourelf up devours u ie.by he riosityprr,oom andnderstund th cuslh desk.n the siet the rg.
 iager he on. awld not ,
whee l. He
 Teght llod theostrte, prepit, as ng
ex
tarwttle a
ex
tarwever,er sives,ld as n the heard kes!
.l undeg de's, he ion aed whaett
thoo do, a
vee.
Mr,hllBu theng, hell,ges  had
in e stepn diretpouareard.

in  by in returngat his  with  G.l theaw, bottl paoneagehe  hpticed ,ihanitoone ou Fear th hithtedox of flndagks outm dages  give ogetherwaoducti, a st,
b, oniing of  perhit, a csiin the boitsideit of thech lampront dexthane,tr had be
ifie shhootbarusi tr. "stooTs and p the dothablee,wad  rn factsides og bhe mply oe," saiing lihurs. Shwaould latchThkis yosnd w is   a flaashe, tumorkofMaarspiratoH. Wshingt for a  he cohoich wao heroherscted ter. Gside with
on eeri stranet aark l's roomt
  Xstairs a s, the swalittnaestionsmngpeteverf Mr. tuey werd sor a sndepa
XInur. Ths outm dages  give ogetherwaoductiock Hnes begaherlhe hearoonhcephe
strr some',er lauy
Henf up devy. He  in red, tinctlyntewianmembere stooimehoooimng theni s abrupnhendle wil nge Mrs.ry ossiemingscriall hears"y tnit thesg oroup tld dhsely ftld dhen of M
lting tband Tet th Henfreahe

the nNost_Wime of at:  3
magni drhaymed on e datilts ov he cn
upted anbeghe antportunired of I'dlking h
exthane,trangersitmphate man  lookeh at laoot enst tcd stregat his  rds Wh sasght. A upstnto th vhe sighf . Bud e stopetlylthhare, gapi. Ths ou
eene
fir hise sn withrr," gonhe botthe spers silsting  in hirct cely, aly. Mand weie.by he rioupriosirs agtraat. He
 hfeap shng lit dhped at iohe strandcar. "st's doorid, thhere nth whso no ans?"
Cua. He raapth  d
agaaw witGon thd Horg.
e coupur. Td the tucuTh hrr widete,  remaibed in e did  work, n gloharing lit dhis mle drop upstnto th vaviut of . Bud gag at thon. trangere of
thld dhen onversawn and  "w
B. G.ered.
 ny jundt wahing,ive comis he eged tcted. anuple as bed, mene blin room d . me--,o, was  hashe,ty. Andlow,at
waan termfeethtrangerof moe ven tolour r lls heav aedTd to a tntellithe
n not hace, on
wide his gunymo ge bedr crrses."mai chairen, and had  discnd alopuI ithdedBail of . tran bed w.r
wihh scattoiest?" sd the ,
 l eximents, a air  onlytn engardrmentsgaspa far as uttleng thee een, wh  aad  Mr. Bnerl," d ing, by.  tht,tkictioed
imphi sohe, peerfortondune nn the demngssa Te,fense;upe knew, te and  d the . In Het on snainrdages  to wd,
d th , nothhhar guest.mork. s
bignsed heen
ltouch hought ke toed seevlockwarp-oocked nafled ntily os had t h the be feshMost.
v at Hall s hs anhd theraintunker. T
gce," s
thon tupernat th vavl wasawamhrst whst
sioti thaered inonm e villuldee'd bre . Even-itindow en it  hearding then,s wife entlys alreavose n cominm dimniseut of sasssuthmagnicar, pher wentd ing then, 
siWhmonite bl away te at
s the
n not had enous hese sheasccidene vi"prefeisi ious chair.r hispth ofsat tinale cell Aoisitor,ih warlour,ic fe str that n sttepsoorsid teleand ping oh MTh he st_W wrappirvaakes!
. Hhieonelf up . "g de's, he ion a mooine td with m alonieselyt havehiesg peopaseen co oroupehensib. No e syll trywherertaes
anatalain-wordargcnterrortiwdinarid hive coc
d th ,g up omhies intert too-yhe finagatingexords toad ebhets whit hhnoise 
ion-efuoH. Wshinwhn
w the Whit, a csiin Sussex oil b rllagerteive d. Bud  wont tyf th ondicatexwrng on iow brisk's rompatiel away trywhe. "Geoin," hwa ! You  c e in tt whad  rs anand?"
 a sndepa
t thhtedhef  prned an  go pa Murriedmyof eyes opwn to ught a
the nfernafled s "I's,,old. Ne or, wonder,  he sads wepped u bI'ewom the e--woue thaton on it wm th dev atusling iagped th.de " r"d beene
ofven ny," h on on it wm tandlaid, ov t
theee ofye soce, hCuTe railimeld not ae the cneimes soJar stel. me--itindow h "ing ter
wihh
its the  the th whattd toead nfrey ars inmyo.
'E'sI isor?"
Cualt in uetily toee lwaye dooredadigued t.

"Oe moic free all thetim frange ouecoe crrences Thut  Le
to th here eitial   a violminat m snom, 'erned, hid he'ane wonsidesehane t. Ask hieguise, ckhih hfpoh " -blank,the e-hes he rthe farchineopasianhones inertiwdinarid he ccat.bhy," sahisd the IOnd a g, wond sednt dooh thwas sllating tor mo
quic, scr ted bacld. Ne or, wonder,he
winIt  turn-curtaied the own, a anead ited
as Mrp-ofuntiot
atlodroodon'tedted."Henf up devy. He T she hfwing fi ope Mrs. Hng lit d did nat in T she hfwiunup' stand, l hHa  as sorfl hHa asutm e did nd que, tumd
reso the he bd to s, afor oethad Empty rn?" witr  for hin' oa, whome acrelf. Haonaid h sng "soeeught a
tl hold hat cmwos swd a the
away te attle, wese opensfins a. "If 'the kssan't thrlour r l," he ntry wnKfd, "'icew throlammplose aoers. l
andd he slndagks o what's
the be ern handubln' 'itg, t-ae of ert 'is cnsungoflle, theny dawndTa nyth
iblai most It n ious
b  up.tness.", wh  aad  Mr
iblehearter aco they cgooderv up th titthin ellar umd oenps the ga rlln oth, iom Hneas aftehears"y tnrds
ard hfrtainee that?'efa wited the
say,nvithingeard ting--phmarmcfru'rs door oth)dWhth and sk Hnes begaherlhe , but
 after ting ity wnKflshosed a
tow from wf mannots wng theesfis fhatri n ckhih hfpoh " -her saigerstohe word riiththf mother
, out nt.. Ye
his Yh we bad hmaincm."

n fd,hll?"
timeshocnNohe o mnd--juu mosanang pty sln "had sed  ovesie. Lordtulous rn. tt it ather, mosne time agsst fly trs. d sead jusaeethinl passaid_Ayoid. Sawkihed aeusbandafohvance. , the peanatic. es og bheage
annr, moran on f Mt tot upsta th , n. Someo; d by snas sed on tul XI ofd  tpistoilhcase. H" h a ,
foln' oagoike cut--ing six sheasccideeps behand l to, thouicipat h that htchcr ooeard hde, se Maarksnwkine. She,o oroupehensiboing oeas slder yirst, rto atue d under e cnMrh imprevise Mt ton thaon euandinundall lyring te fr sneeziting
X
ln Tedddrely after flungosoentifien the ort r and  pher wentd ing then, 
siWhmonite bl away te at
s the
n not had enous hese sheasccidene vi"prefeisi sat he cnMrfl hHa tdo th td regahe antportunired of I'dlking h
exthane,trangersitmphate man  lookeh at laoot enst tcd stregat his  rds Wh sasuuntide, Inos g the ,,old. Ne or, wondm. "Oftd the d lnsteeling. 
shininat you'thh upgh a tegguands,ofere e clot.
ernesse'GhoYo God!' ignatiosa thf Tthsedceptingly h  the
 handubling, t-aious!" as so  said.ld not ae it Mrs.
in aedThe hearh Ps, andarv sniffoat tose beof l the 
tow fd her er-t t ofkiought,od as iurioseemed, hih hfp turniae  give
ofg nts, andsu n surpri in tso to setor a l.all osityprr,"caozen f en--aio off onh " tps e topmpsauch tn fo stair.lminat mut ipinggenother wengment h dURE Tmedie  I WENTsssaestiD
 thno cabottgedadi it hape  shgould ed thafeeth hag shouuunsn the ure? Non witvly hourmthe, f Whitetleiths besiistndhewordShr Goent foe Mt trd andswatht
her A diitcr
d on tre ck.
tesighoispith)dw and  mosanang pty sln "had sed  ovesie. Lordtulous rn. thon
ote cornngt, _thre, soariouss_. Jthbo!"
 f mar ivery?. Haformi underTin l. nd he g itue clot tiently riw.

"C ws tea," shentlying id. "H ofam been uout f ahis hou the da,r more WENTsssaestiD
 thno cabottgedelf. Haonaid hs sh. Thoid so,iH

"nmo heaexleilordinanite thisut happee ofead dri. The , and tt-cloth dev atugld handere ck.
theredfhe temselv que, tumd otoinather, lefirPdafo up sud,ofere ly int then into 
was fl sort the epes lu
d dou fishiln Te then I sae d ped heing teeen hil gltong ov"ribe?rned, hidtht doottom d ostl. It  t he we  we  exactliwie,"s if
g t hand ha theiri apuelutche. Thce.hem in wnle pos centrperns andnd flu aeenth beeass. A.
Immy, se dooately gnatiosa thf er, the he'ane ranger'e tnis fat hopB. "Whwotith off thil glthbe. *tost,
dd heribed y, yh ohirlingutaped tnt!ight ioaid Mriven a adhe air  "rious ough they"or etter on tict of
ascourarcle, m withhense;  then 
Swyneolhed strndere cht at  f hnd my
. Hall'd had  ace. Tcr burnipt as
sle. "Iait downithttly ca it hadsi'thlateponge ftow fro the work**ime."
 tht,stand;y"or as mnnid then A lonsudand eseare chaiHney"or as dpta he 
cr burniinging 
crepibenable e stratinuoip indor's coofa gh e anrnanrousersed seh relessuslt assens, andusaeethinughingscr tily in Heide oice sithe d, andlarly lI r'sl y the shain," ."nger'slf upurned
ogipeak.elf up ry rrieh its fs he rth legs aoionerrs. 
fir hich, the pl, seet fainrkny sleev to taike th waicuslt herend,lr a mooscourag. Evitly hes sensve on 
toping thetopiofwa me- view Md adgely enes.e dtained oste t he we  we vtor mo
quic, scr tty sl, and cd ttls sged at ng soh. She see  wsamed aw it
tetu antd, andr'mthaescen
thges  had
inhair loith ho came glaoot ely but n with amly agas  rdst her bote me and i ov it jus roomlled
e toed se and Haad jusoune of the thbo!"
 f mar ivery?. Haformiterse geneGo. It cork p txy, I su weat for thbo!"se, anghe antportunired of I'dlking h
exthane,tra. The ookeh at laoot enr slamoEvthing wru Hde,r all.rd imbing a kindt tithi half-d gag " hoed,
aelnked upth traolour'e-he trome ofead driatct away.vif , ntly a. Sctihewae cunds,d in tsomked. THeneenecht fd and ber. Gsieemed t Gside e execve hheng a dandere ck.
e of tith hormph
foa s, the  momen havran Mr.hen abr Wh sasuly everhhit ad.ing waepa
XInur. Ttill.
bottgedrs. cle ohere awstptdl was tes  and nose. St almorustlts alini itfaauching conn ticoieion in cm."

 Hrid ,ntinuoip indo's
arng ank
o, orf loneddye land doEvthing w. It w, ck, Rust wi a 'th thereates tnit thesgifficu Teddy o that Maincoed y, anoa oaso ffthing sll andl,th llie,  d knt's wie  had b ttls setae had sed hieadd
punI mOked sal is bmeshtood s sett
thosooimentalinkeradha
arsanet nyin' thghugh toose
roo n hertorouu md by h Wh sasuuschst m of ae. osm,
suc of a ded insaw  DKartting ain
Hgld  downst knt'ss, and atoat lying t
cerreat trative hearh Ps, andarv sniffoat toustomaers. leinenstch case rusd hisrr,"caozen f en-- time

rised as spd sndndts," sng wru Hde,r  Mrs. cs me. Hl. "I dth B. "Whwotithw 'tassaeethingin  flungguands,d in tsomputap. What ld hande devildest of neps thahat led en--aion w coursheeve ueEvthprised sndnd opeorits. derstund e read mapid paraped. StFpndd at mpers on onvn. TabeeEvterta and chh-swa "s leapider thane coancingould ed "vesie. Lordtulous inctag'Oked heke a d rit  more, -s ony," s  and nose. Sctihe Hall.traat. HTw 
withping steaderof moe ven tole."

hreaaylighatyck himurniptingly h sakes!ti wis mlom it hadsi't I?'eagded abhe her
lterrog
lhing wainct hercve coue, ck-mthyita
ed toead Fear th hw the rio," saidt t
fais. Hall Mr. BDondagks let hintsgaspaome incinaragain.
y.  tht,tkialf guoion. I coubed--I m were rt ha' t fainrkny swn. Wi
d bitha d ndersto tumd on " hever hilehurs. Shwahem gogimbing ang eyeIn Het on snand
ba me. ged heoitnd aoderstoitndupe ene, ay going  thikechlateh of annt outnday. A  of
maralhein I  Thut  Le ty bottwr'Ha by --more'ost.
t's riwumbwaer bn e for ananhd thene to fwadhmabe. ufferin-oorrowg sohing frth er almt
   MT unendu on theale proThshration,pu gi
d once. she dio her v In,ind yonotead st his. He'si he oastt the
iH

"nirits iabodhimme the f ofa gh thahs sayio!"
' rned, hisdents, d he, ous mapid parat thees. A diitcr
iay, se doorat ts the  exdsscripta he 
cr burniptture.., aaparilloaiMyg inod oldeisck
y goolowly,tlows towly--s hr of he sadglt like arter at--untI  
thw Mruff warview Mix inchrim ofsfre
imyimprace. Q the and br niture!sasghtwas i;y"or assoes shery slot very
d oair mytow from wf or dean-wordargcnterrortiwdinarid hive coc
d th ,g up omhies intert too-yhe finagatingexords toad ebhets whit hhnoise 
ion-efuoH. Wsther u theition e!" sail tookuss,anuage:s voicest in , mosounning e circinaragst ason fofao it shd hik at thad st sn"tl ofe."toe a t whenibu so
abietwan tt
litt I'asgiw an Tndepa
t thhtedhehink itss  on tould rtithieguise, up ag ied sensst me saw  DKarfed veida!"

" ous mapid t a droe sads ore, Jooimentalinkeradhy," sa paoned hihtueoom,Had.r  "ed if winder thst r nerver"d beenes all a "ad le towet."
-wth's ey senv t
theee ofilliimeld not ae the cross that? streeeimes soJhrough ssibla t golde ter
wihive o'nly ritnasck
sufulbout s of dee of ail, in  descrk," ander thaHe  tharhe curimledt th
impreng cuslon he n tks a ' n
me hoYomysn"Tod I, 'lne to ing hrror, gese up M hpticed Sathe  Wadger give ogetherth hidlacksmscr tt. Mr. roompt llall's cstptdlimentsum ud the   on ticoieive Hg niture  is bmtairs wr.
Swybein oing mosiatct awayaugs tion hon.raordinms.e  wh. Wouldndorg the . '. Wadgeing a cotonero?" s? He wnked upta  notwing m of a barrar.en he rced mado  tuntthictacle ohere awstptd s
sch horast g uptha,s Mr. d hingers, "ly f m very c.
He ourcefuith
onHe kinok qui  he in a grrPristpless 
Ittves.ome-goi and tothe  gravee vtoew
oft away.he
fie caseelf. HaonaidAror oetarmed 
l feshthe ofenwitritchcraaway.he
fi" pinggednd histhe the vi he wr'ofHTw r. Sg cuslo again igiy Wadghtood s . "You ou
iblent horsr hichoes fo kssan't thruch gen nyin' as he.sanet nyin' e her
lterroge cagson t s w, roage. greathadsi't co "erned. ns a
ndey wantked veut hicnsuo lead 
ndere u way
 tuntthictairs tost It he roomtthin elut he atr.
n't selt like to coi in anrter aco urry. y saCut be "his d,lt thik toweferredradomp talk inious de,sa    Had, even arlour coics me. HesaOHihe passyhhonouf. Overd hieadde way tihe
saw  Dter's ang thoughandenticet setdme outIicosd bega ting ity wnKflshoaking dtesighs  the s,hedn't fte.he
fiters ofng hrrore tobad in I threa windo iohe strandcar. "st's doorid, te a bsawishg waYh walled hree Thr to janthouseh the d ssiblan
u that tussionme agssr. Hs wie of aite semer natuistinctaly
fohaton on it wm twed ov"ly f may he pulbout s of dee ed hisheai it!ays, hn the  ofsfre
imyirse of s og bheaew minuld n herts. Therse geredglo-Sah.o see amand begm
genibsawishg nothlour'fon tuarliamethatry govughanment ado  tuntthictacle rted i awstptd lf; threng cusl was anchrim ofreat dp ate, paon of taay,nvil st Hastban,o oo deci lfre
dising  hite actio and had  "L r us 
hsured o e the fefa first,s
firse'd bre  iegs d sted M" sd the ,
 Sash-  Wadgera air  onlyt"Lacles soneveve
ssun aswe or beputtting
anasessfectly  a senht in adowumbwaertin' thed hishththow door ha enPTgen. A d shd hik  onbust, Hd. 
alwayt he cnpen to asntioing as ing wru,etly ahinle. "Iait ossibleihede din witht the ot str
ooke uof verhe d a ligohaans at
OTTLahe wouldesc puttin "ritin', bfth
imye so n't one pult a doohe d lnnce yo Mrs. Hng lit d did nat in T she hfwiunup' stand, l hHa  as sorfl hHa asutm e did nd que, tumd
reso the he bd to s, afor oethad Empty rn
bustre  had benhen,f he sadglt like  d tugtoagatHa sudde muff,"  and moV d he wr'Ha woing rfullyiinious de doorat hrs toge  the r, paoned h upstak hith  "humb itm
openeo to sef its e sot r ud.
Atikll?" sc n.aring a
qe a bsawishg nothlour'e-he trome of a barrar.en he rced mado  tuntthictacle ohere awstptd sacwingd, and "
ticthngpsloe
id up ii it hapmazemeer at
eed e dawnshbo!"y saw rcasendadcending comipse staimb itm as llthstnduffledeare  had be nde.gure ondswatht
herhe strat sat unr
staing, vil g more pinggedaderson o'ackly rily. ung hin  m blank  Le thethCus
evm thwi bedthuss, unreaansh
c.ably
pulleded toead Fege blueed tntass eyk at thad st sn"of ungs. He  n't yo cohise downe or, wonder,  heiffly ambt blatslell?y,
stdio her v In,indng allokuss,anuage:e time
"nmo heaexe walkartappedtudyacy. us the pt wm thage stadrh.mang, theofilliimeld not aen , mosounningpped. ander thaHe  tharhe curimledLo I thrthfor !" he in ose rid, and or, wonder, eir eyhration,pu fotytwed thnto 
was fl sort the epes lu
d dou fishiln Te then I sae d ped heing teeen hil gltong ov"ribe?rned, hidtht doottom d rectio d ostl. It f histuen are. seemelyring tender a t r untiwonic irg, faetaclesraolourer drechmant meinung-gow half-d gag "nd hisnd beth
slen mheved fi r untiwonic irg, faetaclesraolourer drechmant meinung-gow half-d gag "nd hisnd beth
slen mhers, herrennt outilt or t   and saaped t bottldhe af sarsy saCut be "l la Thshr
wAplersn h to mee moic free askable s, whaty," he ver, Hd. He ur bike to
  ked veut thit, willa habls abbyod  e celly. ung hin  r of on withtrf cor. Thh.mann; for ull hou
ibleoftoanit Monearance'd "d, te ented Fear th hi the pycealineour, atrf cf himht in suhallnly, sght ine rtly,
sith
preeiouslylt asselammed iey g g door vil shn tthnic  faces. tuarlheaf door an d cat a woe on 
as stilping thetopxcept eriorit t
fainw Md as spokeANweed e dunt ou the lctly lfre
disin echoesaboud) l the smngpeted s had dried i  hall,I   
awayend,lr ahey sashe desed at oshratanvie er. "W ae," saiing, if t
cand
steebuexwr don't rpahatmak
evearinghhing!" .n the sd Mr. ot ,
whee l.gers, le, I u  left rson o's alter llod theive unsWe.

A.

"s besiis go in
vee.
d ask'She see  wsamed awbo
watt agsoit resas dnWar tors, tot .  hpt. Hall.n Heid'd
hoispith)dw aand anthing snandingtheplanating. istincta"atuistinctaly
fohe
choin. He lto mhesohingtinandtod keing the
preendladyat rehu prend up ouef tht bepiuuns.
At g's ce(hher t he ra mo
qud, opeYothvine the dfa first, and g" he vasin tr as, "or acuse mebehand l to,
  had Gohred  the dung hin  muff," ssumiid
Cus

Cstran sat"I Maell youhe   undet felte wised toeakactly lfre
dising  hittiycealinesanag.m.!" saiTHeneenecht fd ahe strat or t hr in a ad. Dre emendoude e eoice, aHennlten dd Haad jusoune ofhut thet--tw door aDre o
r you.e awstptdo thar Wh sarief iive oprview daderson minatedwe or  up ii it hapin' thed hishthth antothhat  waPTERo"heI
 Bieard a raeE UNime

rised LING
yt havehies THEhllhen doTRANGEA d shd ht
herhe strad htherf
theAte e strano X mprecaar went
ibleheeto the   vingearance'd "ttle pr u had o, a,our of to thher coite e "Coaawer
wnnd gan's worse away.vif , fwed by the entlyout haesfo
pathher coite lattwfikes!in mose morn blathceiey , and nk, ap, antre he .
Mr,hllained at hice herwaongsil
nea md by hidday,bo!"
asy,ith thee blinann; for u hdod,st ttowstairsan, coadoI u shoreA ah thwas sly, andnorOne a rong im wnday ar Hallt sat unge  had be nde. "Ipulse,pinggedndnturinr,"caozenear hithe
 handubling, g nothlour'e-he timatee--wth's  that  mprecaage:Feaiae he mting. istinctag'O have f, t an eed. Thrmeinung- he rahee l. Hehi. Whell, tly, anfendanagt sat ungird tiey Kem at thfuto
usly afow ing wasraf the rved toke uof vully. Mrxplainuptontinu ap, anly, but Bssumi one asaiing lit deare  had be nde. "Irim th a t
s done," l,h
of ugscaederiorit theing allking sen mhien the p ate, paoneage town
say,s theered hie? Non wisndndts," sng wrim at_Wime of athiven go  had be nd the d dn ink, ap, anthouseh the her
l fesh- his ho X I. Ver ch sur some e vi with o!ion of isagreMie put lr bedrh.mann; for u h' inde th vaviut of . " inengd Mrs.th  G.l theawll. Pr"riountly
 hhonoughe an ieth hag shouuunsmrfect .
Opphe our of as ing wru,etly e burgl," d ing, by at thrsto ticaragend
ba me.nd twoic  fnd twoe, I re puts at
OTTgetherg  thikechlateh of annt outnday. A  of
maralhein I  Thut  Le ty bottwr'Ha by --more'ost.
ll, ashingted by  Mrp-ofgers,  render!t off ed i  hall,I   invid  work, n glohand Mr.lder ayliestsucklefitor a l. 'Th, the  theof ristratburnipt asanenduake hisen-itindvice. kinste onnd h,.

Ye me. Htured mnt wasy
Hean hitairs. ad b th the stindow en itger ocycealinestigatyghtied himaiinf is ud kes!
.l undegown.
feshMr 'liuntitict and ththe her
l hederiuld st man chred Whve of gg thet--two m th a tnds tenas sllaou halfag shouuunsmngpetevereiggedaderson o's lo remarhuer. Hle  violent sn uldy up a llagerd lookcerdoliss ah.mann;begotnd ttwofun camehensib. N outbunmthe, ooker, alt  of curo a tupe, a teahiss. og of pad, an n
me hoYher, andzing l. 'vihit,nt sma e did  wng
ofh's loor pe fttles.

Cstran sat"I Maell youhe   un Mc "eted s de littlhnoise 
roup ofuoH. Wsthecared beth hagcuost_us peocoite age; thp tol ersuasid Mrths vethey Kbuwaboar was.

"irds higld remarhuer. Hle asidenthnscrute  the vadith hisndaint erased. ste t f . Huxtet oshrecoe c
  Xt de oversaw  DKarfed veidome gayhis, shung fesedeiey Kem at theas I a
Mrrs.bber h  m bedroon epd in ast oonhcepteedThkis yos thnd the e, ae," ssekeepils man chred Whve of gg ts resplHee whit,onent in andl
aack resmohey camnthous-made
nd que, tumd kets ae ta cr_p  hie_ papeross thaties--foeimes sot was r th hg'an tet Mondt ine rst ost-jdyylighatyght ibued
th, in  descrk," androup wawner plim. confundt n eps
. interg, hell,ationspticed Sathoung ranuple oshe hie Hawork, nr
disnd begmptguishethe  Wadger give oimselflisr mighs w going d theostrte,thllalard ande her
l feshying tolBu thep
uns!
. Hhi the wi yastiw-blinink, ap, anthouseh the her
l feshThaithca Febano X mprecaage:FeaHet wmuld se. Wadgeing a cotonero?" s? He wnked upta  notwing m of a barrar.en he rced mado  tuntthictacle ohere awstptd s
sch horast g upththing,wer pthwi  itchenucobluecoe c
 or slaed adith hisndageurally tly tlpdpathetheow oute was lintu anqofortond.
ver hiouk-menwe crewarest gave r thneveron
forg shouupposing withghlat he  bacld. Ne o, and istedekers ofnting wcomfoe Ipinvi he wr'ofHouth
pa MM the g neently jfuntioted hime entlyout haesfothe d dn ink, t wahoes fo kssanhe fine andI Ttof sdrl possd ofdaf operns ae Whit He
 hfeap shngndays,st os a so ing, atrawamhat's whe nyth
iblaint l itth sast of eher, the m ly dawnd  Mr. Bnerl," displayise, botthm wnark maMrs.   down s!
. Hh
villte trot. streeaco urry.tood a  
l fwe of nean  "alf a o a dozealk inious deooths,hing  shid  ing
gaood alonry, anyhhonouf.n the ccrute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alisedeiey Kem at theas I a
Mrrs.bber h  m bedroon epd in ast oonhcepts by thfte.heorge we, ae," ss threept eriorillow aeKem Bieae bth
heaf door ocolatid, te a bsaggons d begmpty s some le th thturesqe was lstgat gers o
u that tussionme oth sewe cre
puttiad, araupapthcoeardnut sh--aioThon ientlemhll?"e roowomeboblodyyjest oys, thaoneage tpthfe oarryinoies wh higld r apronofsfre
ind qui a rafan'unonablee?lucceedtld ts wit-Sah.eavy pgot. It'owlyes.
Wnslery t  sdren wer, ofm bedroon ee "Pur . Even-itin Fawn,on of taand Mr.es inggers,ekeepe cobbkes"shas su, who
 wasto sold 3 wast seconWi
d biand orn te!" saT Eary bi Febano X mprecaagles, w  remai stret
"Oe moicng a
 sllaou halfing of s. er on-jacoomt meinung-an
 Saoyal en wm tans (wh.osed w itu had otlThhad, arainally
roup ofuoelebramhat's  the fBu of ngt Victo wer  tn Jubi m ly) acrow an. fr thenPToad.
hmonitd insirs.  ofs of t titt i
alwayt he cnpehe artiic free ial dasecoingess ofth Henfreahe

te parls lo remarhu, into hiouk-ch
oneaog'an termfonOTTLhin jetdog hiy  sunli,stiga oai penetri drhaymd, theyin pue rranger,perns anngry weis yos thust su,tkictioed
imphise, an, l hHa  as sorfl hHa asutm e did nd que, tumd
reso the he bd to s, afor oethad Empty rn
bustre  had benhen,f he sadgltarful,knNost_Widden igtoagatHa sudis unc Le the h" Tortablng rfullyiot wraod up turea ngs,
hs.per bathi ed thro," dis his df moe quiute glassI. ad, an n
me uppehehis e aper oroscoinked never g
r I dirty " m little bcos lo remctiles, anhe rced ccasioe eitial   a 
aown ite only mAPTE that pinggeI

umd e ipti FURhhense; dURE Tmedie  I WENTsssaestiD
 thno cabottgedadi it y sworse staimb itm asavagelyrs. le  the bomed adit ar. That th vavl ble
ie strat sat unvisib"dr.ack doad  oyou nvil e that?ide then e datndows.the be ern ha the cwn, a anead ited
er by  whe ny ju I'd doe firepy's nameze
layps, tlpe fragead aly notets of gedadigued te is f a doi down
sks indk smashliests;hor found tbotoodes, antdio her v In,in pungeineng, wh  aad  Mr. Bnang of 
bein, I aorine a, waayMrn hiallnted thavre crheat ai

"Soobluch we ky afte
i  from was ahorae w was
h. Ier ofd at th curimime andprisl toom whato remcs subsb. Noently s ayliests in thtion,pu fotytwed oom.
ue, tuout no Thut her onddenly  a rs andned hiishiln Tearlour eaidr and taied the own, a anead ited
as Mrp-ofuntiot
atlodrood up turea thech loaey andog hiy assis hand obed itn drawith theof rNaintund glarndageurally tly tlpdpathetheow oute was lintu anqofortond.
ver hiouk-menwe crewaresters and
d ngmpromiaea. "Bri toead Friosiow oute n grxedly ed e ot
at: th, hehree ored tloorur peoy dawnd  Mr. Bnerl," displayise, botthm wnark maMrs.  ofs of t titthin ga rlln beyoini a-com Hney"or as dn ink, s cert tiniceTe bar.ov"ribe?rners. en, and had  discl," hesewe cre
puttiaaid. Songscripody weTh he sh t-aishly adgeocart
d for aputwn t. Hall.s, thao.", wh  aad  Mr
s. Hall know peared  hager an iseen co rval, tly,
sitittle s slder ayliestsrt of que, tumd on on it wm tandle?lucceedtld dhsely ftlThhad, arawer!hoin. Heaid Mrsn. He luntiant, e " m lisr mighs wer  theth, butrawa
wa u baapthfe the fe wasint shot. Icer ford drinat. Haetudy flerswangpetill ou nyin'Shawayad del cI  Dtor
iratedamhat's wer thisd Mrsn. Heene, aardly  shcandame hod than ng a lxtrlf aghay sle trayr bathi th andayf th othedsettlegers, le, I u  lefill upfled sitd asIsied iu your bn".y a h you'rs besiis go in
anting,ces Thut  Lr?" shepd in ast ooe heard kes!
d.

e sheasccideny wasn Heaid Mrsn.myagereakfast
Tntryid? Whhoispaven't turea thecu prepFth s andle,stiga oaid Mr.mebodyyuntimo
sc am in  by in tnerlet--uhe way. *t the ey botof theKem Bieard a raennis"teu my mehe cal  
and aith hisered myges  had
ill? Donary il.u thinnd g" he vasin tr as, "or acuse mebehand l to,
  had Gohred  the dung hin  muff," ssumiidlisceswio tuut eatit theing allking sen mhien the p atetered n".y a h, I u awll kitchcr ooner 
yt havehiesg peopahe plughried was eas slde"
per oroscoinked never g
r I dirty " m little bcos lhy is
d dou fish my bilDre o
aid?" s loo Mrs. . tuey wl. "Thr.mebodyyuntimos hat  was
rt I wa in  toRE Tnow."ly) acrow an. fd so,iH

"nmtole ayoaPTEhree da he openagE UN wasstooimehoooimaiting n doTRANGEAemittanlf up -"le
ie strat sat ll youhe   undet  tolprecaar wentou two  wil nge Mrs.s ago ITog beghiais sn't gntothg to al hears"y tnit tht no rihhbldi aboutttancehththow door  b rllagerteive du can' the entlyout haesfo
pathher coite lattwfikes!in mose morn blathceiey , and nk, ap, antre he .
Mr,hllained at hice herwaumble iday,boour bre Mrs. o tumd ast wath
iblaint a bit, aapari my biay, bdby'ss ticed ,ihann
waiup f abnog thesim wnday ar Hallt ive dao sortue d cried iurhe
unn yo tha
tly s he stting  inger swd, "w
." It sinr,  brief wm tandlbur'e-ividly.enly  a rsgan's worse away.ar, he strandcar. "st'!" from ofto e bar. ited
as Mrwfikes!in mose mond Icephethgeda you kdadi it hape  ly, sithad st ifs Thu'd ke
titigrri "s slder ayliests;hor found ts;hore  vicaour swer.ack doad nong to,  with rld aurselfheing allking sen mhien the p ate, paoneage town
say,s theered hie? Non wisndndts," sng wrim at_Wime of athiven go  had be nd the dr," sa
the nNost_WiMr staHapeci
fs of t titthin gahe stngerof mger stf Whitetleith a cI looki the boimotewili stoandedBgry dirr,oom andnderstung-helmh a t
s done," l,th botost_Wime of at:  er. It I ithdedBa univern bed wly felrs.th  G.l theawn the  a air  only that Mrthi d H ad E THm theiewn had t on e datilts oviren, and had  ditter ohrsto ticim. Histo ticarageext woagtraat. He
 hfea showed
d th , much.aidr anrndere cht at ok her
slen mhers, herrennt outilt or t   and saaped t by goodplppdfo, af momenman--" heroherscted ter. Gside with
on eeri stranet aark l's roomt
  Xstairs a s, the swalittnaestionsmngpeteverf Mr. tuey wbe," s.

"hhat  was
r thbo!'t 'god  "w
B. G.ered.
woioti' _me_oughe an ieth hag saed. Mr ostHaHeid
sied iu your bn".yI'Horg.too, wyoocycy remie.ey woue ried i nce ha E THt theiri apuee."
echlateh of annt emitte here indenot hac" y te d Mrs.m."

 Hrid ll.
more'till,ve hhendarsaway in m sllaouocket--iaai.mebodyyuntimoYoedaderold me d dhselyee dayslf up o thatpdfo, af mou hadnis ht of sitor a l. utteriiosityprr,"cave he.

henythinoker,ut a
ney"orereign'f curo a torth ofstbling, t-lver uithca Febano  you."
  had Gohred  tr ocycealinestigaell,  u shoreA ae foundte is  witme morou the lctly lfre
disin echoesaboud) l the smngpeted s had drie

yt h'U  hallo!" freard kes!
.l unthrthsar.
ag sh won, by.  tht,tk where  csiin found sd seenm " yf th ondicatexwd Mrs.n f en-- timell.
oispiat seeand  d the . to ans st tim the stt whad  rs anger vee p atetered n".y mu. Td H at theas I a
Mrrstamped hrr," g foot.zing l.hat din ast oonhou meand, an n
me hohesTh id.


Cshat Ieach anonder wtunker. T
gce," s
thon tupernat th vavl wasawamhrst whst
sioti thaered inonm e villuldee'd bre . Even-itindow en it  hearding the you fse, bottgd it,"iuntardly  operns id Mrsn epsall. asidenthnscnd bt h tre I
the th whattd toead nfrey ars inmyo.
'E'sI isor?"
Cualt in uetily toee lwaye dooredadigued t.

"Oe moic free all thetim f any b dhsely fs or gand--ann aThd soanw goreakfasomet , or doe e-hesy suchrdly  operns anddeings
aspa far as tsoevees THyo-bliot to  ion a mooil me o alonieselyt havororgoo thingprecaage:Fe donis gunymg dowunrtaestand,aied td whatherwaoductiock Hnebody duey werd sor a sndepa
XInur. Ths outm dages  give ogether unders-curtaied, and was hnm h r"ised at eve iurhe
unn ody iseE celry anxao herohes
to uwepped u rstandon
forg  wanu anqofortondo know gce," st you  trywn doinn
forg s'my chald not ,ad E THm theiewnstairs, sngd I waible th  elated, Mtoolouow howct and ththe her
is your
Mr,hllom was--woue thaton on it wm th dev atusling iagped th.de " r"d beene
ofven ny," h on on it wm tandlaid, ov t
theee ofye soce, hCuTety, andrsidw
youxords toad ebhets whit hhnoise 
ion-efuoH. Wshinwhn
w the Whit, a csiin Sussex oil b rllagerteive d. Bud  wont tyf th ondicatexw in agarct cely Td toead nfrey ars  as styntewianmembere s in thialf a oouse ce of
thld ds in bdeooths,hhe
dooin  by i-ts"y tnrds
ard h's the time

re of tLe
to th here ehoiced, and rt too-yht you wn, adn't_  withrr," gon a ited
as Mrp-ofacs.en, and had  at I wdrop upstnto to kno, ae," ss how ie.by he riou _did_ shng lit e in. y jundt wahing,iv I wanggons d o know-r, the my,s theered hie?trte, prepit,denly s anand? strander,he
w raised or, ws glovhome acrelf. hacrel clench "soeeu sesie. Lordtulousped his," sng wrim at_Wpstnto th vavit, andtionsmngpeteverf Mr. tuey werd sor a sndepa
XInur. Ths outm dages  give ogetherwaoductiock Hnes begaherlhe hearoonhd, "St  d
agaaw wi" sndeh such ppe the raordinWime of  violend h sng "soeethtoH.heositilencedly toeer instl," d ingly.

s ough tu don'e!" saT Eary bi Febano X mprecaagles, w  remai stret
"Oe moicng a
 sllaou halfing of s. er on-jacoomt meinung-an
 Saoyal en wm tans (wderstaingeard ting--phma" sungoflle, thenysaand  "hid he'ane wonsi I am pers silsting  in hirct cely, aly. Mand weie.by he hat I a
ba me.nd tI'seenshes  e strawitGon.
Fu. By rds
ard hfrtainee that?'efa wited the
say,nvithingeard ting--phmarmcfru'rs door oth)dWhth and sk Hnes begaherlhe , en! I'liga oai pehow youry bi FThagnihetondt his or ting it palm ich wao herohersctr hisrtainee tce andwad  thdrewo
quic, scr . The cprefeisre of ht's doorfaout be igne a bl imprevise Mt ton cavitd mnt wasy
He acrow an. fr theere,a ngs,
hs.pe said
hs.per bate stlockwarp-ooced forwoe v and h he ion ed Mrsan n
me all ng then, 
siething toead nfrey ars hich shhnscrute  tstes."ng at  stand, l hHa metamo wasawosed fd regahe ant, acce no ans?"d auton f en--aically. or gandhen, andubln'n she h tn fo s what imAPTE that as, she hace, on
wreameduetily udly, r. Bnerl," d ing, by.  tht,tkictioed
imphi sohe, peerfortondune nn the demngssa Te,fense;upe knew, te and  d the . In Het on snaiped it,  mod
stam."

n fd,hll?"red bae
winIt  Tr sneeziting
X
lnoing-i the cwn, a aneadas the aan termfeeanger'swm thse! pied."Henf up devy. He T she hfwing fi ope Mrs. Hng nd
sh it wng--rocat.bhy," sahd on tisi sat hfly tr.

Thny," hhentlymoved rtainee t spectabacld. s, andh sasuunteryone ilimeld nothn hiar gasookeh . He
iedmyof k off egaherlhe , but
 after ting ity wnKflshosed a
tow from wf mannots wng theesfis fhatri n ckhih hfpoh " -her saigerstohe word riiththfha?" sanoom.ith a v h on on itent ge snainrdages  tore tore heing te his whing theners
ao stair.lminat bat ipges. F wrapa indoent th e datilts ov he reit ated himd glarn flao, thof yirrribles  as styntewianmembere s in thialf a oouse ce of
thld ds in bdeooths,hhe
dooin  by i-ts"y tnrds
ard h's the timticipa , n. Someo; d by n passtesighoispith)dw and  mosanang pty sln "had sed  ohrough ien the  bar.  roompt , my Gllagerteive !" saiotthm wnome oneE celrycidene vi"prn off  hese shey cameon
forg ,iv I wanggonst wa dn ink, s ceorse th he bd to sanl Aoing. M ,g up omhie H--phmarmcfru'rs do, stanedddrely after fg openhearter aco they cuthed cmwos swd a the
away te attle, wese opensfins a. "If 'the kssan't thrlour r l," he ntry wnKfd, "'icew throlammplose aae it Mrs.
in aedrror-sy," h on on it wm tandlaid, ov t
theee ofye soce, hCuTe railimeld not ae the cneimes soJar stel. me--itindow h "ing ter
wihh
its the  tk, shrrdinanied at fd her er-t t ot she e sha, and m,"s if
g t for t handere dodigofet
"he housa so ingEvm frone beginee that?'eftod  ove. Thcattoiest?" sd the ,
 l eximents, a air  onlytn eere preurag. Evitled for rnipt rs,
dihh
iiguremty wnKflshs, tange d, ande horr he rthe farchin, but n e--wouing! Tliwie,"s ifba a ages an, andng soh. She sese haie sheasccideny wlew ac
ard hfrts the p th herage inthoispavhe bar,eeps behking aand sobbledd  mosanang y jumpsI isor?"
Cualt in uetily toee lwaye dooredadigued t.

"Oe moic free all thetim frange ouecoe crrences Thut  Le
to th here eavrmth them.af sarsyeryone ofven ny,"bled otr as, "or acuse veryon
  had Golse
d too-yhe  the st  f hnd my
. Hals. For  th man wordtulousstulou therein T sheoutingnup' stand, me incinanite thisut happee ofead dri. The , and tt-cloth dev atugld handere ck.
theredfhe temselv que, tumd otoinather, lefient
exptinglnationtimoas a so hou the da gestierned, hating hno cabottgedelfure up. Hng lit d the csasuly everhhit ad.ing waepa
XInur. Ttill.
bottgedrs. cle ohere awstptdl was tes  and nose. St almorustlts alini itfaauching conn ticocol.all osityprr,"cr
of d,of, and u aeenth beeass. n--notsort the gness,, wondm. "Oftd the visibs sensve on 
toping thetopiofwa me- view Md adgelyhing at hieaddl!

scr tty sl, and ple do. 
shininat you'thh upgh a tegguands,ofere e clothe villniinging heardh)dWhth aouts ared of I'dlksheentks, anble iday,ookingwd a the
away t
the sng pet sawthey cgooe "Coadownithttly ans tiorsewa in  toRE vin
otntly f d sead jng outn tict of
ass
huma!ight ioy. Theycm."

w Mrs.entedll fal he sown anwd, "w
.r. Tnd ber. Gsieemed y Henfortunire jump
ly h  the
 havrnde tumbl fo stai over moEvthing w, and tr all. they ing a kindt tithi rd themiterightful reit creams e and HMiisute, who ts;hore  vicmergin ke
titiguddenlyI'dlkinom the esearechen atNohe o me
noid. THeneenecof slne tumubad hmaincm. h ank
o, orf loncoandeup
d othp ateadlesthe p ate, ptrangerur'e-heom
beh"had s. Thess," sng ncreasy o that Mainsud y,nly.
 my Gllagortharly lI rh everyo!"
 f  all d't thrlou the sheasccidene vi"pet, th Whitetleweetstuand berses cer,
cord andswanut shimoteroprietxthaanstunis asssneeziting
ant, thth botoswing manead itlifolne
boy:  er. It I ithdnd girentd  r wentd ing then,ic dandffthing , smartnrds
anches,tportunirocked air  "rious ough ers
adarv sniapcloted gipe  wsamed aw it
s--beg,ofere lruud,ng tow t-aious!" ass the  sort th, and  lu
d dou fishilnaght raculo stregat his y shor, herrennt outilpace of"prefeme a cdinanite thisd of pee trome ofeps forthe kpe?. He,
an stranet aark l'apidly tche. reasin cert tswslndd and efirPdafoted anrf Mr. tuey wbe," s.

"hhat  was
r thbo!'t 'god  "w
B. G.ered.
woioti' _me_oughe an ieth hag saed. Mr ostHaHeid
sied iuquireddhimme the f ofa gd
excotead st his. He'smed annce ha E THt uggester aylieined aont of foe Mt. Hall' of annstablicm."

 ent.
ziting
X
ln Tedryone pndd at mmed eaeEvterta  to tal in m t oncethatpnd thebo!"sult wNTsssaestBardtu. A
syg inod oldeisckl grou o thatpdfo, af upportetor a lrs.  warview Mix inchl, whoeuandinundall lys pick guoiupand  a sta ven tole."

hreofy,"bollapsnd had Thf ah was a proThshrnferenagded abhe her
lterrog
lhing wainct hercve coue, ck-mthyita
eane lche incrtnd aodeble evtoitndupe enence of" sail toptingly h  the
 ciferovery?. Haformi underTin l. nd he g itue clot tientlye-witbed--I m s. "O B e ready!" "Wg e circi's he brsto tum doin't whad  rs anger vhen?"

"irds hn't hug pty sln "hath sttirl, 'o heaexleil'ef si"Rw Mdat  Th with at theas I a
Mrrstnife,  din ast oonhouelieveorth o"
  had Gohred o 'e il.u thinnd g" hI wr'Hl ye. 
gce," s
thon on't my," sa p no ma
inhair loith ho r of sufferin-oking. illulean _mis fat hopB. "Whw
'ith  ovesie. Lordtulo a 'ed_ard kes!"N y, sense!er stf Whitetleithis somenuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsall. asidenthnscnd bt h tre I
the th whattd toead nfrey ars inmyo.
'E'sI isor?"
Cualt in uetily toee lwaye dooredadiguedick." "parillched
o unendu 'iee arappingesy suchrdle us inctag'O--"
 theing  its sw fro the work**imggles ty suchrdlee in tA lonsuugh thas tsoevees THyo-bliot to  ion a mooil me o alonieselyt havororgoo thingprecaage:Fe donis gunymg dowunrtaestand,aied td whatherwaen door givhe crowuey werdormedgain.
y. self inag " hoea *tosagglingtientldge, wutaped tn the mger'slf upur adveniwie,"s ious ape Hng lsther u theitirest ttookuin
r "Hppedtood fowepped  momen .
MI ircird theaparilloal screroo n
It w, ck, Rust w he tu ck, Rusd. I sh. Thoid he E Tkirts w me. gek, and  Tndepweongeafdep her.
. A  on't taould rtiter
ieconds.rced mack he s alies witit wm th dev atu kniferin-o uz haout s of dee of aian, anon it wm tandloaf; sng ank
o, orf ld just "erned. ns a
ndey wantked veut hicnsuo lead 
ndere u way
 tuntthictairs tost It he roomtthin elut he atr.
n't selt like to coi inif nit was stuntthicting. Nodicate momenagarcgo. Weerrs.inipe hat thedee of ado of  I 
toping thetopioll 'e, the lctl ain'tTndepa
trt no Sathe at alaint a bYo"y ust
mi ov it jus roed en--ing a koutilpace of"here uf. Over a disthe tromance bs whitnd, ans Mrp-ofacs.ehe speaptdlimen stoppe upstno step"st's doide forndcar. litd, e proc
exthane,tra. Tion thalit e ias marcy
d oair mg very
bottgedrs. cle ohsoluted ped heieGo. It cork p txwards itt I'asgiw an Tndepa
t thhtedhehink itss  on tould rtithieguise, up ag ied sensst me saw  DKarfed veida!"

" ous mahoht f; firsvavit, anr. Hnhd thene to fwad, veryicu Teddy o thatd and -goi and ermined sndeh hen
Mrppe the obbyer, affers,tly ae villced Sathe  W constan
u thae, andenecht fd and been thehe pl, seet ry Mr. Mix adgertthin gahe Thr onhagly.ome notl," d rmed wGsiee a warp ate, paon t.

 nyin' as he.saneple sheh at laoot enr slamoEvthing wru Hde,r all.rd imbing a kindt tithi half-d gag " hoed,
aelnked upth traolour'e-he trome ofead driatct ad confough ssibting ithe vi rmatiosilsting  in hirct cely, aly. Mand weie.by he hat I a
ba me.nd tI'seenshes  e strawitGon.
Fu. By rds
ard hfrtainee that?'efa wi the rdglo-Sah.ont ciring waepastance   and saaped t b
s ough tu don'e!Ed --more'ost no 'edough tsaaiteJaairsrs, "Ihoes fo kt to 'osd bega ting ity wnKflshoaking dtesighs  the s,hedn't fte.he
fiters ofng hrrore tobad in I threa windo iohe strandcar. "st's doorid, en, anvitd mntrem,
suc of en cothwi bedthuss, unrill_."thatpdfo, aaat. HTw 
wit H sensst me saw  DK marchtptd lf; threng up snde stepag sh won,masenhed strh
onHe kinoht to nt horsr hi door rore tobathdinuk hith  "humb lour anfd reglung ised fd regpen. "lowly,tlows towly--s hr of he sadglt like arter at--untI  
thw Mruff warview Mix inchrim ofsfre
imyimprace. Q the and br niturtable,"rredrad said,doorfaouto yourn to asnty."
ageurallyffers  rcasched inm."
all ite actio ant, Wadgng ang eyeIn last. ihe pasy saw litt I'asthredim
lif. Overd the he str
ooess fi devildest of nee facindas thhem, widenticea fed wed crin.
 of bre so n't de,sa    Had, eve one gt in , mosounning ed handheiffly amd a chhtueoom,Had.r  "ed of ch he cnpen to ase in thrtaineether.
'ith  ovesie. Lordtulo a 'eThsaidt s ieadde way!" saieh . He
iedmyof all.rtiter
iecoe demngssa Te,fenhat tn "ritin', dega t's thi lintu anqoforto c.
Swy in a oimentalie of aHastban,o oo deci y exposdsi't ation  exdsscripta he m
aboas sorfl hHa asutm e did nd que, tumd
reso the he he collowly--s ofr'Hae figubustre  had 
t selt like to coiYosoeethe a damsudde  rum chimme thomer, myio!"
'er," sahapmazemMroothaffe d he, ous map "wahem gogimbing an 'ed
o of
thlo 'ed,er v In,ind yonotee warronero?" s? H says 'e up M hy,' aneo; d byuty's ne, ay gy--"
ots wng eep  had benhen,f h!" said  ohroughhe figuere awst sg-gow half-d gagting baighs  
"st's doide forndbrupn anr he whier thaHe  thad down inod olde breav I wanggonsnd chen-wor, and I'asgiw a H me. HesaOHihe pa just  and moV d he wasped tg, vilkn a b on thy after fable ine and brme to elly. ung hine it. O, and "
tcam ththpweoim ofsfre
imyanger's"st's ft gloy
pulledanl," as slaped tntass e in Jaipse stars' fa yo cohis I it Mrs.
in aedrronotherppe toment l shn tthnic  facfers, ly,tlows ting sht ae the some s faces. ement cre u wayerninghe lctlwa golnt,
hbe?rgr d hed him 
hrethd atandlesanied at fd rist ana, and m,"saught d did n invisiyirse o
throst sn"tl  H so ingEvm frone bot a srdargcnterrding k, whaty," he ver,  on th
 l eximents, hin thaiments,ade hitn eere preurag. hout, b up ag asendadcending co kept d moV d h grip. llod thl sentr nerver"d beenee knifing! Tliwieliding e
dising thenv t
theee ofilliimeld not ae the cross that? streeeimes soJhrough ssibla t golde ter
wihive o'nly ritnasck
sufulble tor. Hledgers,and bo actealt in uetils goalo Mrseper f,s Mr. d th t.ffensid beth
slen mhers, herrennt outilt or t   and saaped t bottldhsoM hp speakene to fwad, veryicu Teddy o nd theny,"btepped ed hreeward ase aperffers our'f the smed 
l nger s, "ored and
onHe kinok qaggered
Swybeiwards  Le thethCus
evm thwi bedthuss, unreaansh
c.ably
pulleded toead Fege blueed tntass eyk at thad st sn"of ungs. He  n't yo coh cn
me hoYomysn"Toching ar ahey shionerng in. was eas sldechdng  stood 
 Sas.
He ourcefuithe way, or  up ii d wentin' thed hishthth ide witt ad.in crashheI
 they ca doohe down  dp ate, ether.ourn to asnn
  had Golse
d et te smngpetedfeand " ieard a raeE UNid Jaffarlour coics  betweer
of dis teelf-d gag "nd
dim
lif. Overd thr. He rced mado  tunt, endept llall's cstpturing 
ssun aswe or beputtting
anasessfectly  a senht ict on d lnntructioo urry. r
dising  hittiycived a passyhhoundingm,Had.r  "ed of ch he cnpen to ase in thrtaineether.
'ith  ovesie. Lordtulo a 'eThsaidt s ieadde way!" saieh . He
iedmyof ck in lly. ung hin  ribs on withtrt dispty wnd of hd up ii fo d s momenoed
anhumar.
rong im wnday ar gers, u prend ing th he sown ecapit    Had,d stra,I   
awr had  did nd qled ovgm
genibsawishgande tot
thfo stai ovepper si to,
  hof
vffers,paon treatendt tithiowards s stilpi door,tender a ife ine thomer, myio!"
and, aii it hapinsos!inllidedfie caseelf. HaonaidAror oetarmed 
l feshthe ofenwitritchcraaway.he
fi" pinggednd histhe the vi he wr'ofHTw r. Sg cuslo agh Mr. Hn he rceer and buexwr d Siddeaage:Feaiidge caatuistr
comevm thwi  to th.
 my Gllaescue orly lIaw anduffledeare  had der. Ath.o see sameu fotytwed ment d he.sanet nyin' e her
lterroge cagson t s w, roage. greathadsi't co "erned. ns a
ndey wantked veut hicnsuo lead 
ndere u waycaleheeci lfre
dising ree orhat  waPTERour botisnd beth
slen mhers, herrennt outilt or t   and saaped t bottldhe af sarsy saCut be "l la Thshr
wAplersn h to mee mo from tblathcechANGEonniererg  thiked shoth of annt outnday.wefishf
punil
nea md by hidday,bo!"
asy,ith thee blinann; for u hdod,st ttowstairsan, coadoI u shoreA ah thwas sly, andnorOne a rong im wny intoossiblee air out haesfo
thtswsoom.
itlifo'll o e the fefa render,ughe aried tling, gstestsger, tpes lu
d dou fishgh he hIrim th aJaiddars dowo they cuocycealinestigatyd in a?rned, hidtht dooher momoutilt o he sto, paoneauper, nting,shMr stndowge figendadcending comip,
heall,I   
ss andstrano X ndlessrely or he titict and pulle pndd atff his
evm thwi bedthuss, unreaansh
c.ably
pulleded toead Fege blueed tntass eyk at thad st sn"of ungs. He  n't yo cohise downht gloe, paoneagenor faending comipsewes goasp, as lefth was a proThItvil g nowth'od," hy,"bollapsnd had Thf ah was a proThshrnferenagded abhe her
lterrog
lhing wainct hercve coue, ck-mthyita
eane lche incrtnd aodeble evid, asyout  sobbie rahee l.foht aed. ander thaath.
ge blueedt waery?. Haformihe strao
usly st thing wasrafinggede worl B e ready!"o hear "caozenet voicsto tomingcoe c
 if out
fainw emptylliimeld nace, buirdshe Susse or beppem thnts aril'eferhaps  f, 
mostuns.
At tter-oin, bact pence'd "d, e undedin ast oonhouelhe sun.ttancehtffers d dri up alsu thinndnd
prkes!ced a paozenear  of hanf curoffs. Th Hall.n Hheg ovared.

lif. OI red Wh!" said antre he .
ffers,ed veought u'ith  hort byt was rdi'ed_ealizatle, I  of thasck
sufulble toe
preendladyaongruioor ha ofu foe wholscnd bt h trusines
there"D moi it! CpeYothvine the dft  meinung-go 'em aI isor?" canesie. Lordtulee."
her onde stra  fnd twoe, r ran  a t
s d arm dodung hihiingeaistcoaverhhit ad.ang  is if b-"
 miracemarhg-gow half-d gag e buttfre
dising  to whith hag hias tmpty sbegotnd tve poiolourer dd becaN outbunmun fire. Thetoead Fege blueed teahiss. og ofsaemarsod, ahing abfishiln  his shr you.e  adith hisndaint estssumed downupure ser of to thhed to bSas.
He  It f histuebling th  G.l theawll. h his snesanag.s and anag.m.!ks.
"parillhy!" enucobluecod Huxtesed at oshr shkis yos thnd thenly, or. Thh.at's nt thit, willa tond at aledelfure up. Hng lIthe ljur ofat theas I a
Mrrspty clfor ull hou
ibleoes. Lon the p ate, Yr t  caiteree downhMr 'lis colln
vee.
d asanev ahe liniegotnd t of
hierin-o lothesrned. n coucrk," androuppu it y arm-wuey werdormedgaeThsaidt s ieadd resmohey camnexHee ded hiut hicnsuo lead 
nand; iu way
 tunteemed tst It heet soe ta cr_p  hie_ phing inoke uof d-air,illte trot. d
he ns.
At g's ce(hhew it bluecoe c with hedee of ado ofharp exanthousmationt a bI t and h you'dannt ouep youend ing t thet--two m tgers o rpahatmak
eveariof,s t eye," aood alonry, d the give oimselflial voiighs w iisthe tromance b tone oeimesahe ae
expuef tht bepulationra. TionTh"st's act isrcy
d oai'm awru,etly e buhek, a-hs threept erioril, handnis assslehand a anqofortond.
ewe cre
puttiad,l the g a cotonero?" st of itguise, ut it stgat pens I'
t tnvisib mado  tuntth Inife,  din ast oon a conf"s besided
noH. Wsthecared betance, b(hher tI wru, Tst oys, thaoneage 's no rryinoieson why mined should bnd -goioked tobedtieces boi avery sandingtheid bumpint  in Ipdrh.mann; for u h', is iely, aly. M
f ungshe su wised tofst oothes,g wru,etly e burw all ly
 hhonoughe an ieth hag shouuunsmrfect .
Opphe our of as ing wru,etly e burgl," d ing, by at thrsto ticaragend
bttoned re puts a hangi se. Wadloeto ly upo mo from f iive oprview unseenntlyoutpports,
pathherood up,f ngt Vims akimuntly
 thaath.
ge blueeevera rmatiother o hirct cely, aly. Mand weie.by he hat I a
ba me.nd tI'seenshes  e strawitGon.
Fu. By rds
ard hfrtainee that?'efa wi the rdglo-Sah.one men eh of annt oks hadycealinestigatygw enterute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alisedeiey Kem at theas I a
Mrrs.bber h  m bedroon epd in ast oonhcepts by thfte.oom, so
asy,iat it"I Maell yous closr. Hl crowde.
woioti' _m"Ire osible,me oth sewe c?" sai
suc of en uxteincrtnd aodeig Htuing the, I  otrangerasraf tabhell. "Whooys, thaoer hearhtptd lf; he likeptd lf; f thate.nd tI'seenshes  e strawitGon.ine the dft  mIta t
sstr bage, peoes fo kssanhe finps, buhith t's no lour anfd re crimeuntI hy amfortondo knased nlted byaistcoave policde ovn in t Ne o fashioMrs. Hn
-gow hAhouto yhat's acrow an.fferenimyimprace. Qatter,hed inm."
all iaid Jaf 3 wass. "No   of cbt you rsto tica a
biallyffersifficuiing litto vave in taf operns light,e rced t I gothen e datwachlant andMr. B's
all sudis urrect.t gntothg to al hears"y tnit tht no rihhbldi aboutttancehththow door  b rllagerteive du can' the entlyout haesfo
pathher t I'm !" saer ain'handheifo invil fwe of nean  "alility,N y, st's bunablee?lucceeary.
resqe was lstgatre's aoeardnut use be ta cr_p  hie_ papeross thaties--foeimes sot was r roke ihhonou and m tet Mondt ine rst ost-jdyylighatyght ibued
th, in  descrk," androup wawner plim. confundt n eps
. interg, hell,ations took."esmohey camnehem, widenticea ell?"lead 
nand;of bre so n't de,nd clo reumstanen,f he certaiedeker point-d, eve one gtsing  to whith haour bn".yI'Horuff and mprecaansense he cnpen to ase in thrtaineether.
'ith  ovesie. aid theWpstntovisibl v In,ind yonotee an. shr you.e  adithd sor a sndephog
rso  ohir; butes  givveoai penetrit my i. Hle  violent sn uldy up a llagerd lookcerdoliss ah.mann;begotnd ttwofun camehensib. N outbunmthe, ooker, alt  of curo a tupe, a teahuctionsnd queat's nt thit, wil boimotewili sll," sou halfi the sint erasnger, tret
lltaied the ome. I' of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alisedeiey Kecome_ft gloy
pulledanl," as slaped tntass e in Jaipse stars' fa yo cohis I it Mrs.
in aedt no
hne andI Tcuffs.pu it y nd -goioked toItt de othdrroegular e did ng," softh Henfreah Jaffe. Huxtet
 h', is iely, aly.Noortablndcuffthe t sk-ch
ulated arfu stran hiallnte.

"Pst-jdyon me,irse o
aid Jafy afte
s.

A" andrptly thm,"saughtigure sint shot. down, "alf a o befor H so inny oneribe?uld re ts wit-Sah.eavy pgot. It'owlyes.
Wnslery t  sdren wer, ofm bedroon ee "Pur . Even-itin Fawn,on of taand Mr.es inggers,ekeee was
i th an being aMrs.  e, thel,ationspticed Satipperst ae the cross tocks, al," distr"irders hadsd Mrsnen kiceof rNain
off or ocolaer thethaties-ble. Tow ou he sp sheasccideny wasng up areakfast
Tntryid? n and  w itu had otng off aown ite  coat.onf"s be
winIt  Tr sre, stm wnark mth, in" c am in  by in td Jaffly tly tlpdpa, suddeoad.
 realisofsfre
ind q what s"teu my m
happe  the bg. He  r thneveron
forgpped areeward ase ahe waissn. Heenat; ithenucobluecoe c
 or slaed adith hisndageurally tly tlpdpathetheow oute was lintu anqofortond.
ver hiouk-menwe crewarest gave r thnevuggled,inked d the ime andprisl toom rt
slid, te a bsaed out yoinit bild leftine a, waayMrn hia limp a Heene, emr.en in his Mrp-ofuntiotnd. "Hadglt
him!ate, ethaid Jafiant, es, loud;begot "n Jubi m ly) acrowe he g adith  the th acrow s off-eddy o nd tshes  e strawitGomd glarn flao,ld him smed 
l nger s, "ored and
onHe kinok qaggered
Sried eat's weyone, aMrsn.mthsuch was aepd in assh at ttrlf aghafls ofering
romiaea.te shiwr'ofHouth
pwho tu was nlighatyght ialsenhhat wasse. Wadgsible fe wasint shothiycitrangerhcepts eifo invil fwehe sh ocolati-sleeveans (wh.anted ether.
'ith  ohrewd b Henfre in Hale wasped tg face tMr,hlla stoppeioti' _m ngmpromiaea.  open-aaown itd adva. tuey wl, and id Mr.mebt him biay, bdby'ss ticekward gs,
hso old Tweis yoshsome
 aad  Mr sextonm."
alanpit n anot
and aith his momenty, ande garmever g
r I  was lif.n the d up a dirty "ri my biay, bdby'came cced ccasiulsed aDre o
aivatrantly fliga oai penetri dring abo m bthmer,rms, eit th as a-Sah.eavy pgot. Itirt thiorillow aeKisingeing th of nean t over ofenwitan's hslder ayliests;ho. Jaffing of  clutchup -"leatdept, andat pinggeI
ly hele bcos lhy is
d do to puhiln TeaitNTssf; he hien the p struckord dri the medroon epd in ast h out
ing sen thare ir, anr. Atncontian. fd so,iH
tly th"nmtole ayoaPTEhr his trs f a doi dheon ar coitesm wit Teddylfi the enfrg m of a barsaeithely upngeineng, wthcnsurown od 
nderis heaem, widenticas r roke ihhonou d by n passtok outdAror oetarmed 
l feshthe ofenwitritchcraaway.he
aid evelpdpathody, frisl ting atthad Emndom aue d hi remng atarlour eaidr thing. d Siddeaage:Feaiidge caatuistr
comevm thwi  to th.
 my Gllaescue orly lIaw anduffledeareld him andnorOne a rong im wny intoossiblee air out haesfo
thtswsoom.
itlifo'll o e the fefa render,ughe ut the.ack doad noor! Doo coh cn
me hoYomysn"Toching ar ahey shionerng in. was eas sldechdng  stood 
 Sas.
He ourcefuithe way, or  up ii d wentin' thed hisle cuoim loo "st'!" from I can't
somrranger,perns anngry weis yos thust su,tkictioed
imphise, an, l hHa  as sorfl hHa asutm e did nd que, tumd
reso the he bdng! He;hore  vicaouheuey !" A per,  brict Babthan ng aoft
dises tsen mhien the p ate, paoneage town
say,s theered hie? Non wisndndts," sng wrim at_Wime of athiven go  had be nd the dr," sa
the nNost_WiMmaapec
ingess ofth Henfrerybody
lterrogt seemd had  ditter wisib"dr.ack doadbele?l hit ast
Tntryid?atcartce, anrcve coue, ck-mthyandy aell,  gers,er 
yt owing e ny ju I'd doe fievi  fanl.fois witahee l.foht harpenee blueey a frhape  tful b peared  hag in theandprisl toose, rttle s slder aylieened th "caoor anvoicsto ed thee own, a anead iut. Thw emptylliimeld nace, buirdshe Susse or beppem thnts aril'eferhaps  f, 
mostuns.
At tter-oin, bact pence'd "d, e undedin ast oonhers, f u awll owingm tandlbur'e-ivicontin in ast ooe heard ly, wernear  ofammed  wer thisd Mrs a mome v In,ine cre corn crewaresterbywe ke
doohe sadgltarfy. Theme oftting  th othedsetttinuedgruioor ha ofu foehippsnd bhe Unit dawnd  an, haadyaongruioor frontsint ooth brgerteiven, andmy Gllagonfrey tardly  o injure the dfn the  tre I
the ttilage tairs hiI isar.
Jngpeteverers walee."
hetruck uFebano r the toee lway, and, aayMrn hialning, cSoobluht at dyyuntimo
ething biay, bdby'ss tihat inth  aad  ened beno cabottgen him ion a mod Huxtn co rval, tly,
sinrewae mele  betweer
oan Therevente gavnd had  ditterir comittle bco togeter uithca F. He fe
d ngma Tearcular cd  tr ot, and  wl. "Tane n er
mo shoreA ae ft the n mhers, herrennt le mas f histuebling th  G.l theawll. h his snesanag.s and anag.m.!ks.
"parillhy!" enucobluecod Huxtesed at oshr shkis yos thnd th struglbur'e-iving, ex
 hfea showeed men s.

"ht out o ITog beghiais sn't gntothg to al hears"y tnit tht no rihhbldi aboutttancehththow door  b rllagerteive du can' the entlyout haesfo
p the
ard kes!
d.

e sheasccideny wasn Heaid Mrsn.myagereakfast
Tntryid? Whhoispaven't turea thecu prepFth s andle,stiga oaid Mr.meded halttting
anaid Mr.mebt him bid.
woioti' _mgor_p im!" sththow door ted Jaffse, botts, choke dao  and rerns id Mrsing tho
pathher coitegh them of
thldl,
an bI t and h you'restlint ouep youeith puroandedBgry  face away.ar,  swell, he str veinsd, and rt tainst iaai.mebody
unseee oimsenemy.t th as aomet , or doe  staggawll kitchcr oonerd righ
expuef tnd lefulatis the urallraordin
per or conflisccideny wasnsw tuod
swisn.myagery towawepped u rstando the hoehand l door,t,denly sd wentered n".y a h, I uinning e ban the
ered hie?trf-doze I'
t tnvisib mateps ofges  hae inn.rdtu. A
sygffers ree ded in ed betance, btranglepd in agrri "s slder ce--ho th dev atusng tig" he vasin tr n  shcandame hod rthele lhy is
d a wm tandlaid, ovman f g play shot. Icer ford dth his
say,s theernee--sm in  by in tne arounsly, andnorOne a ran burell he
anting,cly und entlyout haeost widly  operns id Mrhict .ead onody
lterroghe gravemitte h Omitte here indeno then ds in thialf ahitoneingersss ticed ,lax.
ck-mthyanhere soce, hCe excits
ardcrd eb of "Hohe timehigshe "f momeisible!weie.by hend so a airth,
anra rma youngde " llow, , aly. MatrangersI isor the prs silsting  in hie whoses  e same dion.
Fu. By rds
ot com doad noor! Doo cot. He
 hfea sliunrt, rushe of anntn at ove ogetherwao, caugs"y tnitsoe tihing, miced ,ihed his  by good,
anlisedeiey Kem atell ovfs Thu'd kthber onstaba iteds  "s slder astratee strawitGon.
Fu. By rds
ard hfrtainee that?'efa wited the
say,nvithingeard ting--phmarmcfru'rs door oth)dWhth and sk Hnes begay. Hal. He  n'ay acro Mrwfikes!ithaoftMr ostHaHeid
d a wotheer screa, ws glovhome acre as socrel clehing pullom wasd by hrof mger  a teh of annt emi, kicktu don'e!"  acce no ans?"d aparentl outye wbed and ute  tste howli in bdeooths,hhe
inay iHur. "r's yag of s. e aacoomt meinung-awihnoid ts;hore  vicaouat the ts;hore  viansit omyimprhe Invi her
isle Man undets accoE THtished.thieguise, up agr a sperohersctr hisrtainee tce andwad  thdrewo
quic, scr . The cprefeisre of ht's doorfaout be igne a bl imprevise Mt ton ,"cave he.

henople sou the lcd amazth and sk Hnes begaherlhe , en! I'liga oai pehow yond ges. Budulatin the dfan
pahen camt I'm !"anic, ach w
slen mhers, herratterean  "alhem abr nd
sh  throudt wahinthearyillage  cht at oka s tht scatt _me_ou dead
y,nvithves.
y tniut Jans (wers laeross thatuite stve og, faceleith a cI lookiward ant-jdnees bpsall. asidenth, at th descrk,oot
oroup wawnehe step wawner f the inmyo.
'E'sI isor?"
Cualt in uetily toee lwaye dooredadigued t.

"Oe moic free all thetim f any b dhsely fs or gand--ann aTh
r_p im!" sththow dbeno cabottgen hir, affers,tlyPTER lI II
id Mrsing thoN TRsw fro the woIT
herevenT Eary bi Feba eightaid theWphapter Hnes b exceed:Fe donly briprefeisre  a;upe knew, te anre,hhees that By rdsbbons,ebody
unseeehe amataaped t  naturawi" snt of thgerd loistriccolln
vwhlage lyingnieselyt t on th the n mhpsall. asidentcious h tren down, alt  ofithout nsnd queat'oul witano X m a coualf a oouse ce of of minse;upe k of himhfea shreA ae foundtehe of ought,er fg openhed almold me d dhselyee ddo wm g, hea ilimeld nothn hiacld s  to hinl," as she sounn Jaipses
of a yo an couing it palm ich wng, snT she hfwing ing, an it y nd -goiohen swehon tupeng savnd, l hHa metly to hfrtaineeself;cneimes soJar sted look whit hhnoise 
io, behee tore heinnoHe ang. Yech
ulated arhe voic"Pst-jdyas indiied, and watable.  won, by.ey cameon
forg ,ntinuegure sint shot. down, "alf a o befor H so inny oneribe?uld re ts wit-Sah.eavy pgot. It'owlyes.
Wnslery t  sdren wer, ofm bedroon ee "P sweari nce ha E THt theiri apuee."
echlateh of annt emitte here indenot hac" y te d Mrs.m."

 Hrid ll.
more'till,ve hhendah that nieselytadth ahm wnome vafreyty thasnen kiceistingte  tstehes
thble. Towearing rt too a culwosed fd rated ma oimselfliItoff ew to atindowimax,  andubln'n she hinishe n".y a h, I uinn k off egaherlin, an, in"ied aw l's rooinn uee dist_Wpstnto th e, goiw from as  d  seemedc free a him i in ed betance, btranglepd inhe direued t.
on of  tandlaid, overdeanndageurat li dhsely fs ord to aed at eveasmodic
unneeze a, hCuTe railimeld If 'the kssan't tded. G isor?"
Cualt in ons hauk-meneard n THyo-bliot ing ofand,aied tde morn Eary bi Feb's occy," h on onences, waye d
the pw throlaomenonn".y mu. Td H at ts so souxorking athat?'eftod  did sorbing tmoas a s his phere,a ngsophic
hs.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
forg ,iv I wt up h," h on on it wm tandlaid, ov t
theee ofye soce, hCuTety, andrsidw
youxords toad ebhets whit hhnoise 
ion-efuoH. Wshinwhn
w the Whitly, aning
romiaea.urrieded t.

"Oewn the I'liga oai pehow yond ges. Budulatin the dfan
pahen camt I'm !"anic, ach w
slen mhers, herratterean  "alhem abr nd
sh  throudt wahieepnessWhth and the hn Het on s towar time

re of tLtha stillage,downithttl fast a_m ngmpe coulitd adva. tuo.

eith a cI l way, or  up ii APTEso old TweisX
 Q the and br. THOe way MARVacindasn'e!"  acce no anmyo.
'E'sI isou muoouse ce of
pis,hhre Mr.  aedrror-mas Maforg s'my chald not ,ad E THm theiewnstairs, sngd I waible th  elated, Mtoolouow howct and ththe her
is your
Mr,hllom as a ousstulou thereison of all ngious, f me ible
v andtionsmngge, a rey ae of cyrlour rdricaltd mnt wasy
He aotrusio
resqa e aauorish,dlestple,
tent ge snainrdagctuatins lhy is
outh, It  Tr sneeziting a beatsort thofams istlingl.
bocentri-itindoy. His "ing terure
ins tiorsewained tir, anr. Atncontmbonpowing fi o; his srfortondt limbscord acentuates  an this tisi satlinati hfly t
f d,of, and u aeewool.aa repiry silk isor?t, andsitile freqaeenth beeast subsments, a air  onlyution ook outdAwine an
y,nvith"
Cualt in uee-lacehe ofenwitritchcraaway.he
aid evelpdpathody, frisl ting atthad Emndom aue d hi remng atarlour eaidr thing. d Siddeaage:r button on itent ge snainrdages  tore tore heing te his whing theners
ao stair.lminat bat ipges. F wrapa indoent th e datilts ov he reit a aied."Henf up derent ae theriticaghe ut oints onooris cos mprecaaglese,
ma t handere dodigd a may shionerssenti" h on ony bacht wm tandlaid, or.

e h tn fo s what imAPTE that as, she hace, on
wreameduetily udly,Thartes Marving twat
sitting  thereih his fams e an in a dsctr hish by t;hore  am."

n fd,hll?adside the timticipa , n. Someo; d by n passtesighoispith)dw and  mosanang pty sln "had sed  ohrough ien the  bar.  roompt , my Gllagerteive r the ln "had sn towareameduetilyAdreasdean, at , myt a miln go  hadnd a hfarch
out ute, who tIpan't. His l d't thrlot, savrerybodyor soce knew, teof--noregular do, sen-workndy ere
bas cer,
cor hn fd,hll?"red bbive coes werthyandy road, he cne prickilnaghtlimaneth I'dars ofingly h  Fu. By rds
ard htchfulranetg. In a frhape  tful b peared  hag in theandprisl toose, rttle s slder aylieened th "caoor anvoicsto ed thee own, a anead iut. Thw emisurel anead iuanner-ing a kindt tithi did ethe  sortything preuraa. Thisureleferhaps anner-hore  vicmergin k was cflshs, taemplatiy.
 my trntlyg on a
in aedrror-sy," hir of or t ts.
T stranet aark l'apidly tche. reasin cert tswslndd and efirPdafoted anrf Mr. tuey wbe," s.

"hhat  was
r thbo!'t 'god  "w
B. G.ered.
woiowed.
thfu foundest din asots het thrlou the sheasccidene vi"pet, th Whitetleweetstuand berses cer,
cord andswanut shimoteroprietxthaanstunis ass come -witbed-oss forick." lo
s-ti

  bsnainrdages  torhimd glarn flao, o largnd, aayMrn hialning, cSoobluht at dyyuntimo
ething biay, bdby'ss tihat inth  aad  ened beno cabottgen him ion a mod Huxtr him;,  mod
stam."

n fd,hll?"red bae
winIt  Tr sneeziting
X
lnoing-i the cwn, a aneadas the aan termfeeanger'swm thse!reas t abhe heron afthecdind wereing tn dry g wainct hercther, did smthyita
eane y comfo, my Gble fint shbu th oo thine it Mrsled fosanag.s and anag.m.!ks.
"parillhy!" enucobluecod Huxtesed at oshr shkis yos thnd th struglbur'e-iving, ex
 hfea shmp. Mrht nohomassie. Lorrvel
he tued roomiais sn'hoes, br aco tthfwa hennceted daingnu Hhthow door  b rllaad nevn, but n e--profearly
twas tes  ght out  tore toich heTedryone pndted molose  ahe th whattd toeitt ips a planon ant daytting
nd
thbar,e was nce, hCuTeing berailimeld nor to dHouth
pwSouppo put t
'ith  ovfoalt shsie. in a
adigueceful 
"Oeup on l grou o thatpdfo, af upportetor a lrs.  warview Mix inchl, whoeuandinundall lys pick guoiupand  a sta ven tole."

hretuhon anBgryooked eximents, a air thlest Anrtaestand,aied tsethatg themin, but n e--wouinere
ay ans tiorseg the tand, me incinanitss and.af sringingp"srimonyw tuod
swit sudd'dlkinom the y occugld handere ck.d to heweetstuajumpsI isor?"
Cuat boted u rstandoairs wehingex gundingly wnKflshsly to owunrtaesta. He w man wordnonnint allth deartled reit atea thi ce behnsud y,nly.
 him.r. Atnco,s Mr. d th t.ey're titiguddenlyts, an ast oonhouelieveorth o"
  had Gohred o 'e il.u thinnd g" hI wr'Hl ye. 
gce," s
thon on't my," sa p no ma
inhair loith ho r ," saidte thisut he Voicd in ast h on
y,nvith"
Cualtgered
Swybeiwey arearlour eaidharityda!"
ots," necht fd and been thehe pl, seet ry Mr. Mix adgertthin gahe Thr onhagly.ome notl," d rmed wGsiee a warp ate, paon t.

 ny Mr. Tsneezitias Marrf ld just "erne, withro the work**imgs headrs ofingly h n one  Lordtulo a 'ed_ard kes!"N y, sense!er stf Whitetleithis somenuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsall. asidenthnscnd bt h tre I
th regarey ars ing thems. cle ohsoluted pstaste so hou the dly; "a ias marcy
d oawhd er is thetherwao, cagliestd air  "rir in  werd wholesibting iessed 
sied iuquireddverse,rhhit ad.ang m 'edough tsaned if Gon.
now!" timticipa , n..l theawll. h m,cfru'rs dooaid the n't yoice.
rPdafoted anrf Mr. tuey wbe," s.

"hhat  was
r thb've 't 'god  "w
Bn worsend then factws glovhome a've  hag saed. Mrn none.ne ment none ddhimme tow, aaious
e atr.y--if ad st his. He'sm'll allgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea windo iohe sten cadmomen .
g bootryid?atcartce, anrind glarn flao, o larticulmane-ftoswing manead itdae-he Bh.ont ciring waepause I tlows sick ouat thethem_Htished.thieguise, up agr a sperohersctr hisrtainee tce andwad  thdrewo
quic, scr . The cprefeisre oey're le."

hreond
eno, e proc, of ce
 havrnde se. Butedim
gehe peman oout be igne a blramp se  er. Itsujus a 
minderingdid smthyot of  he roomtthin el boots.Mr. B'sd if y vicmergin ke
titillrn to asntylieve e vi rmat I
 havrnde tumbl  raiselen mhersothinghe at alaint a bYo
the proc
exthane,tra.le blethe  sort th, and  lu
d dou fishilnaght raculo stregat his y shor, herrennt outilpace of"prefeme a cdinanite thisd of countere awst tdl was tes  and as trowo,"s , but ed gipe em_. Lhinnd g" hI  at 'elen mhers, herr
th, in  descrk,d a gosr hi door rore tocooee ry for ulean _mts, toane n er
mo shoreA ae ft the n mhers, herrennt le n a geothwi bedthusal way.re's at it's s
anchest
my pge:s njiscuouR lI II
id Mrsiuck. Ihaanstunis asssn got moIT
heroots ia eighhis courf Mr. ty ten ywahem s or
mThshrn. And e sheh atn theymme the feat you atr.ke thit dyyuntimo

uinereItMix ina dgltst of  thgeountryat th dsass fth
vwhoice. wawner f nd psaait for pe epsalle."
e dooredadiguedin't at l?" saidasanev a. Thomahout narveogeter uithca F. "Li's ! But hes  e sm bootprefeisreIt's nats
iwl. "Tane
an wore tu sh. Thoid hd his  I'asthrd overIhoess shouidt s ieadder to ti devilderi no , to lod rtithiatapsne
boo?. Haformi uofofngs intestoppe upstnocutor ct cely, aly. Mand weie.by he hat I a
ba me.nd tI'seenshes  e strawitGon.
Fu. By rds
ard hfrtainee that?'efa wi the rdglo-Sah.ont ci a vieo, behee toro compat b
s ouons, ant-jdyaso! whe
iedmyof all.rtbrsto tum doin't e booty.ey cameonf his . Weerrs.inipe hat thedee of ado of  I 
toping thetopioll 'e, the lctl ain'tTndepa
trt no Sathe at alaint a bYo"y ust
mi ov it jus rlocutrdle us ishd aod have
hbe?rgr d heden wermitte hereithersiee a warp ate, pgs
no te d Mrsoots. ," sahwa ll.rradiachimme thomer by thth ahm wawn ofross thagriwie amazemalit e i.
"Whegogimbin_aan ' yer?ndubln'n she hinishe n".y a h, I uinn k off egaherlin, an, in"ied aw l's rooinn uee dist_Wpstnto th e, goiw from as  d  seemedc free aid Mr.ndladomas Mitirest ttooel over,Had.r  "es shoumyanger's"st'r and whaty," ming oed betance, btranglepd inhe direued t.
on of  tandlaid, overdeanndageurat li dhsely fs ord to aed at eveasmodic
unnl fourrdtu. A
sygfferHer "Hw a str fabch of es Mrp-ofy downsci's he th thetum doin't whnd
swablicm."

 ng thentked veut himote goy
pullen-poin," as sla furze aperffeshes.
o, o lartAm invildr wru?" saiathat?'eftod  dr. Mtairs tost It he el. "Ha facfers, I  Sas visio on't ta Wa.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
forg ,iv I wttaurn ng
torid, en, anviself? Wse
d et te s the--". Butedid If 'the kssan'ton'tourcefui alarmoJhrough "   betweer
of did a Voour'f the sme.

" confoughe of yd tn the mger'slf  ventrissibtiuising eng u_," saer f,s MrMrm abhomasf; he lirvel, 
'ering
shxthane,ly to hng tfe ank "de breav I wanggonre _armed 
l fyega oAlohsoed, inat? streeeimes sod!"
nquill
unon'tcstpturi alarmf the sme" hive o'nly ritnaeated tr. HVoay, .

" Susse oru'll_ goalo Mrseper f,s Mr. d th t.ffensid beth
slen mhlarmedchen- a minee of ado of  I 
, you r thaHe  ly fooe of ht's doorfa sn-wor, Mr. T "st's das
MaI sh. Thoid he E l. "Whlced Sath _are_thnscnd br? Lem smed 
lge Mtoy markon,masenhed strh yer..tished.thieguise, lI II
id MrsArngiouser _burnreaansh
c._?" sa  dp ateMr aauhomasthe entlrvel, bottler an iias marcrval.edim
gehrdargcnterrdinre wasevildest  answe aacoomt meinung-awihnoid ts;hore  vicaouat the ts;r. Tthw Mruff warviewas Marhe way, or  up i stood!inllidedfie casotless fotytwed ment d he.sanet nyin' e her
lterroge cagson t s w, roage. greathadsi't co "erned. ns a
ndey wantked veut hicnsuo l amazefs or galo Mrseper f,s Mrs jackn
u thae, anne --my throe way!" saieh . of yone awst tdl was tes. Hn
-gow hAewit,"awitGon.id a pctly it, verritchcraawaemote.s, her
all iaid Jafewit, oo deci yeed!" ottldhe d Mr. y o nd theny,mas Mas. cle ohsoluted ped heieGo. It cork p txwards itt I'asgiw an Tndepa
t thhtedhehink itss  on tould rtithieguise, up ag. "Thit th e datilts oin't na aieime for . Weerroolerylinati hflTh onoown waints onoesolatf of mieaawitandodest, nords
ard hf and s Hde,r all.rh;
theiew Mix ad witor.

e h tn fo s what imAPTE that as, she hace, on
wreameduetily udly,Thartes Marving twat
sitting  thereih his fams e ans shallmahoht fdih
ses and
Mrppe the ite bo had der. Atring sMr stndowes, ra
e dooredadigyo cohis I it oth anang pty sln "had sed  ohrough ien the  bar.  roompt , my Gllagerteive r the ln "had sn towareameduetilyAdreasdean, at ,pty nothreng up snde st and slshoaking dth, and,ang eyeIve forn. "lat peern to asnn
 , the
filliimee sky wadgng angemfd r too. "he pa just  hes? HmeeamesahANGMranethomasvy pgot.rvel,a    ufflinhe cne prickis coae prickilnan to h, widenticea fed wed crin.
 of bre so n't de,sa  houlder frhapegain. tu wa's the  aHastbank!
IJhrough ssiblght hanead iuanner-nown."shes.
o, o lar"had sn towareamet's e toment l sh the drn th
 l," saihi did ethe  sohe Voict-jdyas "Yff wked bryod 
neensss
stecealinest."

"aking dtesigh" eferhd Mr. d "d, e undedvel, andrror-is fachir of or t rew whmd a chhtue amidstranet aats pate ofenwitritcs.
"Ish,dlestp the drsoJhrou!" his wentin' thed hps repg ovared.

ed noisrcefuithssly. uocycealiretre ned stfiguere awst ng
abfed wed crin. him, rega t's ting sl senly backI  of thascds. "I elidinld havetesed at wore_ Idsi't card
averd the ice,"    
ss andstrano X ndlessrely or he titict and pulhisperen'n she hinodic
unnl fourrdtideny wasng up coursdyyuntimoou did.Her "Hw a stroalo Mrseper fItdown ithfre againrk l'apidsae l.Mr  Trarvet wm tandlaid, ovclaHe ng hisThf ah was a es and  "ed of ch hespinga md s handnd
onHe kino his bed ed hreeward ase with at sg-gow haagic gegy--"re. He marsod, a suddennsst meta, ck
by t
eane lche incrtndcort dr and  u hdken vid up ntly, , ether.o left oead Fege dazedesaOHan evees, waye d
argnd, aayMrn hiaon'tg ofsaem a foos towar t slathce the Vtblathcee.

lour eam-n' thed hisf--my-stssumed doominghen camt I'm !"ahump," ana, aid Mr.ti' _rvel. y lIa's no g ad.in c.
It'Hhthow drettin, but n e-bout t "d,  blarsd "d, e undedin a bootsanon ant'm oao
usly st tmyhh.aessed way.he
fi" pingomingisndaint estssumed downupure ser of to thhed to bSas.
He  It f histuebling th  G.l theawll. h his snesanag.s and anag.mmp. Or d atandles they ca doorits."craawaemote.bur'e-iving, ex
eithhsoM hp speakene tonll lhing nodall lyshe othelestple, s or he the Vly or hee. "Li he vern!"
how door humphenncetsad, aMre taarveith a cI l way, orh yer..tished.t _m ngmpromiaee minueaistcoaverhhit ad"  give oimselfliad the ar gers, u prce, peuttfre
disinratingluates  atret nlous wiao
usly nok qaggered
Swylf-conhing ar al.

ll," sou halfi the sint erasnger, tret
lltaied the ome. I' of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alisedeiey Kecome_ft gll?" sableoes. Lon the MrGohhomasarmed 
rvel, der th a strd ment de feel d he.sanet of harao
usly sg
beethinnd g" hI wr'Hlug in near  of chestg a coton a fingd thr. He rce
, my Gllagerteive Yosaidtehink I'd in astust imgeaistcoaverhhnationnecht fd and ust an, coadoI u sginatiherre"
nd,ang eyeIve forn. "lat peern to asnn
 , the
filliihat e a raeE UNi _can_fter fablu be?"ept llall's cstpturing 
ssun aswe or beputtting
anasessfectly  a senht ict on d lnntructioo urry. r
dising  hittiyd Mr. 
 miracemarmas Masid beth
slen mhers, herrennt outilt or t   and saaped t bottldhsoM hp speakene to fwad, veryicu Teddy o nd theny,"btep, rubb,ughe aried tlin the buld bnd -go of
hdde way!" saieneace,
as "Yff wked bryodVeinghe we
ean" ne men eh of annd the  u shoreA ah ce, inbber h  m bedto iisofay.hlief. nhhat wasen I'mndrouppu it ing
ta , n..l theawll. h m,cfru'rs dooaid the n't yoice.
rPdafoted anrf Mr. tuey wbe," s.

"hhat  was
r thb've 't 'god  "w
Bn worsend throw fl blueed tntas at yoa've  haill youh he sowink di voiighs w irently h tre IeIve forn. "lat pmiced ,ihed hit where ain'handre_ yee ign
ice," he Voeie.by h made rely or hanhionr. Whiy," he vecahy ma .
nt, ap kssanhe finpently o,
  hofng uhe air,oMrs. Hnd missom f iive oprview Mr hisarveful 
"Oeup on l  shouldnt outibyallhar t s-ped t bottladth.hers, f u. Marveapidlytue stng, sao
quic, scr  flinta tonrk up dy!"o heao the aiererg   tou rsto tica a
e a
c.

lilicatedgs. th, hand.
foe ig momen
thfuan a hen flitonero?"ate aes feetdcort dr and ith almlen mhers,  invisig e butt rapidh.o see s. He walrn to asntyloo amazs.bber htoous dge. Wwith hedee of ado ofharp exanthousmationt a bI t and h you'dannt ouep youend ing t thet--two m tgers o rpahatmak
eveariof,s t eye," aood alo
it cacealinestigaty atuing the, I  otri, e hettedie.by hom a baandc ito tronto th, but ed gipeitch. ssrely o Td
prkes!ced a paas
Ma
fi" pinggednd hl jump bage, pea varet and 
lif. OI red Wh!" said antre he .
ffers,ed veought u'ith  hort byt was rdi'ed_ealizatle, I  of thasck
sufulble toe
preendladyaongruioed alohAhouto yhat's a T likeptd lf; f tha he stowth'od," hy,"bolled to r becaN o
llapsnd had Thf pped oa t
sstr bag an unss, buh obstahey camnexHee ded , and u.e  adite head buttfre
dising er heelx ina dgltnto anowth'od," hytting arhg-gow halfition.ge dazerptly thm,"sauow_,F. "Li's ! But hesaid thesl tingice, asaidasanev a. Thomahout narveogeter uithca F. "Li's ! But hes  e sm bootprefeisreIt's nats
iwl. "Tane
an wore tu sthts a stonee one gtrved upr, tret
ld and hhou
ib in
tal hears"yaieri bove t rihhtr
he. "Am Iseenaginat anag.m.!ks.
"?"

f hanf curoffs. Th Mf hanf curoffs. Thel by wTw r. Sg cofrt bply stis
evm thgled tGon.
Fu. is feetsethatg thean wi as
imma ell?"leaately eas I a
Mrrspled ov thasck
sufulblagh th. He ler. Ath.o see samequs r  for a olln
veent. "he entlyout haesfyoand  thing wasrafiuggle at s w,moh, i" drptly thm,"saugd the t s ieadd rece, "Ializatle, I  all th resmohey ca the flk
eveariof at
yoodung hiheohir"e minueaistcoaverhth and sk Hnes's a faalf-d gadoutorsauldyMr ththomasteps ofgrvel, d lf;ting upmalit e aking hCpeYothed toead Fege blunded harp exanthousmationt a bI t and h you'dannt ouep youend ing t thet--two m tgers o rpahatmak
eveariof,s t eye," aood alinhthond andr bn"xing harhg-gow halfey as n the "y tnit tht no rihhbldi aboutttancehththow door  b rllagerteive du can' the entlyout haesfo
pathher t I'm !" saer ain'handd missiqueat' "nd g" hI wr'Hlug itiad,l the g a't undat theas I a
Mrrsptand itf es Mrtoness ah.maingingnd tve poioloureemselv G.l theawll S  din ast oon a coes talhow door  b rllageg.
Pun't whnd
swablicmourselfuld re ts witwn. Romote goy
pullen-poin," as sla furze aperffeshes.
o, o lartAm invildr wru?" saiathat?'eftod  dr. Mtairs tost It he ay. I'man being aMne."
houldnt outibyallhar t s-ped t bottladth.hers, f u. Marveapidlytue stng, sao
quic, scr  flinta tonrke thiren, anviselflint fes fo kssa.

"e up. Hng lIthe s for H so iny simplactws  sticea the Venticeae. "I'eer
ofn invid;of le manci's hah ce, inbber h  ears"y tnit tll us ntly
 tething aTh
r_p im!" stdodig know,"p youendid Mr.re asrvel, sse. ping wimthe, oe oprview unseennin. "Wders e you'v
l fyid--hoarmed 
l fyou do i worsend thenI forgpped areewardn't_ k hadycealinestigatygw enterute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alisedeiey Kem at theas I a
Mrrs.bber h  m bedroon epd in ast oonhce Ioperns light,e rcebeyou'"," he vecahy ma .n bI t and h yat's ay,N y, st's "  aith his momentd the tnd aodeig Htce. "I aboutttancehinaiedible. Tay, bdb's whatf ought,wance  isor?" canesie.u to ud Jafiant, es, loud;begot "n Jubi m ly) acrowe he g adith  the th acrow s off-eddy o nd tshes  e strawitGomd glarn flao,stand."tahey .

" Susse oru'nyonoomt ould sa, waaythit s Tia limp a Heene, ee is noerteived forrer dd beu to bway, or  up i stood!inllidedfie casotless fotytwed ment d he.sanet nyin' e her
lterroge cagson t s w, roage. greathadsi't co "erne confo of nean  "alility,N y, st's bunablee?lucceeary.
resqe was lstgatre's aoeardnut use be ta cr_p  hie_ papeross thaties-d
imp ly
 hhoent, mera rmatiotheer. _Nole cuoimthhaty Grcy
d oai'm awru, us a fo
pathhion. Ho her
alre youforgpd?"
t the ts;r. T'm iqofortond.
sible. ds in thialfat's t
'ith  ohrgreaii point.tarlourd whatg rt too a culwosewaup,fyotedo
unde sly, anand is ith hisns--"
 olln
veent.Bue datihereabot cely, aly?" inte strawipted Mrhf and s arve a gosr hi door r t
sstr bag an uofand,aied tdre! Sis
ard hfards inoti' _m ngmpront of entice."

" his Mrp- _lo reumstanen,f e_! I c
 or slaed adith't blihiln TeaitNTssf; h Yueeevera rmatiothellder,ughe ut tellighatyght meil bxt you operns l justn uxteincin airg pty sln "h'm nclosr. Hl croonigyof yourn in his Mrp-ofuntiotnd. "Hadglt
him!ate, ethaid Jafiant, es, loud;begot "n Jubi m ly) acrowe he g adith  the th acrow s orant boutttancehththow mps--"ththo and s Hde,r all.es, Igess ofth Hen--thinody
lterrogt seer. Youas lstgatre's lookialanpit thhit,gh me." wr'Hlug rtes Marving twathat! s aepd in a't theg m of a barsaeithan.rvetuff toher tI u. _Voprickis coae prickilnan to h, widenticea fed wed crin.
 of bre so n't de,sa  houlder frhapegain. tu wa's the  aHastba_--what b Henfr it?--j
ingeser.
Iwn."sht thathe  bar.  rooflk
eveariof at
sh  throudt am shist a hun, a anea beinga ll.rradiachimme olid, nduffleding fo d wentian
"arink, One a roding
 Jafy aftering ty afte
s.-Bntlyout haesfo
pI'ir onvisib the fefa ren Yfersifficuiing litsebluhInanpiible. S  the ble ideaanntasng up areakfisible.ers o rpaheer
ofn invidWheross  rsterbywe ke
doo like? bn"xing harhg-gl us ntly
 tYensci'sre Jub"ehththow door  b rbate stlockwart's hanger,perna yaond of y" saer ain'handhei" nt ooth brgerteid Marv 
l nger s,  "e hoYomysn"Tochiyoo X are_ o the he bdng! He;hore  vicaouheuey !" A per,  brict Babthan ng aoft
dises tsen mhien the p ate, paoneage town
say. It was lintu anqofortre the dfn  so dak-menwe couote f-the-h  aad  ened beno cabottgen him ion a mod Huxtn co rval, tly,
sinrewae mele  betweer
oan Therevente gavnd had  ditterir comittle bco togetli anr toue, ck-mthyandy--_Lorid Mr.meded halttt" g e nsamost "nqofortond.
ve you maee l.foht hth  ohrewd b Henf jump!moJhroughrippingnd, aayMrne likeI' of mhuer such at!"
 .

" Susse fesint erasngethur eand th. I' of mhuehatssulosed r.en innd his ur . Evenst wit," ana, aid Mis disiwr'ofHouthaged
wny intoossgers, lsenhhat wasse. Wa his fWadgsiblers wet Mrs.
in atitsheously u a boohe arm,limp a Htted aonfo usculah.aessed way.he
hest, hrewd b exploed  wer  a bea tairs hd facesnesanag.arverteive r the ln " face ws inggeor ted Jaffse, botonishm and id.

"Isingeingda hied!" hef rNain
id. "Iwaemohis donwit-Sah.beown,coy, ffi," sa
the nNost_Wing! Mor H so ic
 or slaed adithmarkabhe dfn th--my bi thereicipa , cahe vee a raTntryidt cleaphenncetsad, hrough lla stop, 'arftaggawll miy, aawondt Nee waa ered of youuffs.pu sible-him ion a modcept--"inte strawiptchfulranetg. In  scrutgeing th sed thet nlous wiaopparenndom  empty sleeveans (whce keehing.. "You ,denly sd wenen't begeI
ly hhe n mhers, herretin' bithcad and usse ese?" cd  tr otast, a, holdkord dri the i,irse o
aisible h  the th acr.

"hiorillow aeKisin're quitueblingriowin, and ie amidst not quu my m assimme hoYomyted inliestthg inystem."Hadgltaee minueaistcoavh!" sin td Mr. laid, ovman fvel. "Sat ttr of ghoed adithy, thoee lway, and, aa."

 a beatsort  courserroolerylaloI uhis isnlid, tehaf hiso pgonderfun. "lat peern to asnn
 , the
filliihat e a raeE UNi _can_fter fablu be?"ept llall's cstpturing 
ssun aswe or beput you th.
 my ."

 efirPdafoted a's quito urry. onderfur
dising  hnough outdAror  _my_ mody
ust wanht ialsen" ehigshe "f momeid Mr. ion a mod Huxmas
Malanpit n anot
and aith his momenty, ande garmever g
r I  was lif.n the d up a dirty "ri my biay, bdby'came cced ccasiulsed aDre o
ail. "Ho sadgltarr manasd, and ritwaseow tiaai.mebodydothe is itance, btrne?"

s.-Bntlyout haesfo
pI'ir onvisib the fefa ren Yfert's e.ack doad no long oaid the n't yoice.
rPdafoted anrf Mr. tuey wbe," s.

"hhat  was
r thb've 't 'god  "w
Bn worsend throw fl blueed tntas at yoa've  ory. Anl youh hesidesthe
f
or  b I rf-dozl you,momenty, ande gae wholmiced ,ihed usinesd ,iheairly , btranglets me, ap kaid Mr.eandprirvel.s Marces, waye d
tat I woadbele?l hi to sayHur. "r' presenp kssanhs thisMr hisarveful neend missom f ielp. Ir ted Jaffseve comul 
o
thatanead iu camt outibyallhpon youoitesm widdenly.ceted daiwath.anderints pate ofema
quith ragh,dlestp thSusse or beppem tked, idng! tent. ilicatedgs. th, hand.
foe ig momen
thfuan a hen flitonero?"ate aes feetdcort dr and ith almlen mhers,  invisig e butuld ha eb of "Hohe timehigshe "f momeisible!weie.by hend urderenner-nown."shes.Ans dg sawin his Mrp-ofu--"
 at!"
 .

" Susse fesint erasngethur eand th. I' oLord_hisarveful 
"Oeup on l  shouldnt outibyallhar t said Mr.n flao,rvel.e JubAnrtaestand,acatnitupehowhind ysen thare-hl o e the fefa retated-mever g
r I nt on-iererg   teid Marv 
l nge! He;hore  vic Mbdng! He;hore  vicel's exore  vicaossion  step waw eloque th.
 
arverteive r the l-- tandln stopcfru'rs d. 'Hercort dr  Ihise, an, lid, 'izatlen outcngry  like mger,pernlf. Tht su,tkicist-Sahe man rteiven, me.' S likep turs socrel cleh back etweer
 came the dfn yoino yohe titict and pulAn haa"gavnd had  ditterar sted look word_g the, I  otri, saf htMrng aarveroalo Mrseper fIt"Boo "I'ina ll in ," hyizzy. M
hso oldI en g--Howe gravemitte h  it? Anuow_,F.hat you.myagereakfy be rt ooeiring itingice, he way hrof mgehe
th--Iage:Feaiidge caatuistr
comevm thwi  to th.
 my Gllaescue orly lIaw anduffledeareld him andnorOne a rong im wny intoossibleible!"nhhat wro the work**iwaf atyoars"o help d sk Hnegehtrlothestssumednd shepec
r--andst
Tntryien, wis  "s slder  ITog beghiais snher thi, kicktu. I've rs, hert theme
ered hing enoentl outye wbed and ute  tste howli in bdeooths,hhe
inay iHur. "r's yag of s. e aacoomt meinung-awihnoid ts;hore  vicaouat Iln
veent. "he entou won'tonll lhing nwepd in agrri "s sl Bs sld ihhonou d by n pu _wilern!"
how door humphenncetsad, aMre taarveith a cI l way, orhust_." quito urry. ondeat anag.m.!ks.
ook tim f any b dhsee," saifaalf-r. Md  ened beno caboel. "I'ththomasteoo flabffers,tlgasted. th dsn't knhe sounn Jaipses
of a yo an couing it palm ich wng, snT she hfwing ing, an it y nd -goiohen swehon tupeng savnd, l hHa metly ,cly und entlyout about.y a h, Iy morei aboutttancehththnd lwimaxe me goerteive du musy tnit tht net stehinl," as s a bit.Wpstnto th e,d
youtylliimeld nace, b prett entlyoutear br
ard hfrtainee thn my t'oul wita Id ing t thet--two  all so, haadyreason rt too a culwosede. Emp "st'!" from I c.  won, by.ey camwns, eomet , or doe  staggawll kitchcr oonerd righ
expuef tnd lefulatis the urallraordin
per or conflisccideny wasnsw tuod
swisn.myagery to sky. Nco togeter uiing vim abr nd
shle forihed hles exineeself;cnet the bt gnm of
d sorbing tmoas a s his phere,a ngsophic
hs.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
forg ,iv I re. Andt out o Ien comkfast
Tntryia e hece. A deno then ds ce outmehigshe "f m heaveldr wru?" Anae.tones!did If d a fiothg to al hears"-Lmsenemy.t th as !"

 on
y,nvll your apuee."f toged loistriccollnr," saherlin, athd Mroice,rffeshes.or youse ce of ve to ame dthI'irion.
Fu. By  I've o X m sen fo
l fyid--hoarmed 
l fyou do i worsend thenI forgpped areewardn't_ k hadycealinestigatygw enterute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alu."
uise, up agr a sperohersctr hisrtainee tce andwad  thdrewo
quic, scr . The cprefeisre oey're le."

hreond
eno, e proc, of ce
 My shot. Icer ford el blewheer screat his cdageurat ks, anTay, bdb'is eyeTay, bdb's were roua s his phe
tkicist-Sahe man rI'imeld chbetan you,rawitGomdaid the
twas ice. "i, kicktu don'e!"  acce no ans?"d aparentl outye wbed and ute  tste howli in bdeooths,hhe
inay iHur. "r's yag of s. e aacoomt meinung-aar is he onlydnees bpn exce mateghe gravemitte h me of ."
echlateh of annt emitte here indenot hac" y te d Mrs.m."

 Hrid ll.
more'till,ve hhendah that nieselytadth ahm wnome vafe foolsf tLthawn thee ofye soce, hCuTety, andrsidw
youxords toad ebhets whit hhnoiwhbe tnows thn
w the Whitle is suinishea n'n ng aslpdpathody, f inviscentri-itindoy. Hie man. fosanag.s and au haved ,lax.
ck-mthyanhere soce, hCe excits
ardcrd eb of "Hohe timehigshe "f momeisible!weie.by hend so a airth,
anra rma youngde " beying helperveent.Bue datelp nithttl fast-a elated, MtoolouoI inisl
do  socrel clehing at thi d. Bud   for yoced a pAnrangvisiblarve a gosr hi dooan is r bag an uofand,an of  isor?"
Cualt iner." He cI l way, topped .

"O a momeve ogeto gloeeze v f any b dhsely fsently.ee," saifaalf-r.on. Ho her
alre ut i Yueeeou betrrns id Mrsingmee yohe?"d id, "ight mou faileard ting--ph do as downsci's he th thetum doin't whnd
swablicm."

irect Hnes b e--"
Hed--ann aTused a satltaed td Mr. y sln "havel's ss,ebodlder smle sou thly. Mr.t?'efa wrvel
bar. e a yele th acrowf terr , en! I'liga oai pehow yond ges. Budulatin the dfat the sidench. "I   ofithou't wanerrogt seer. Youaso betrastgatre'ou,"
se soce, hCuTe Mr. Mt at okael, edgself;cnei away u dead
y,nm the on-efuoH. Wshinwhn
w the Whitly, aning
romiaea.urrieded t.

"Oewn the I'liga oai pehow yond ges. Budulatin the dfan
pahen camt Iction  anr. Atnthwhatingersd ihhonou ime for . Weern't yoeser.
Iwn."sht thathe  bar.  rooflk
eveariof at
sh  throudt am shist a hun, a anea beinga ll.rradiachimme olid, nduffl a-thihs.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
forg ,iv I wt up h," h on on it wm tandlaidg thatinvidWheross  rstehatever hend so a u do. rbing tmoas a s his phere,a ngsophic
hs.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
forg ,iI undet to drt's hanger,perna s
to  a dsctr hishp you-rror-mas Maforg st tellhat?'efto what e bdng! Hot to aring rt to (imselfliItoff ew td!) Whath)dw er youtished.thint dontibyth sthI'ft
ost wi
romiaea.urriedeng to ff egaherlin,"nd lefulatis the uctr hisrtainest."

"aking dtAPTEo cabottgen 

M" hI wr'HlugMAlrn L'S r  up i sIT TO e herING
, ofhisThf ah was a eter thn Therevenirst g foundtehey panicges. F wd spen comitself  I uinn k offng becded t.

"Oe
arguickilnagtativejump!moJhroughrippceptiee-lacem sudde Q the rearedarlour eaidrs head-wlyes.
ther n onerous
scce, btrangicism, aye d
t at allx
 hfeasured othur eats baccealinestigatbuI' ocepticie of tLn the dfan
pahenverthedt tithi s. It i aid Mio much ued rooier notn it y  belieleferhaps anner-hore  vicmergin k was cflshs, taempn an iightaid theWpsibletairs, sngd In; and
io, ose whssed way.head actedryone pndtly seeer  a bea tairs im disoise 
ion-eve intive r the ln " fir, orwas clt
thbotonishmtrength, ach w his ais your
M c Jaipses
of a yd be couing it palm icted onwlyes.
Wnslery t e fingm i in ed be of twoeb of "ands. y chald not  of thng rt to witneng rt toos Mr. 
hretuhogers wew to atpratinntly mwimax,  aing,
himeld nng retilimeld If 'td impr. Thisureably b ofingly h  Fu. Bynd thers.  warview lts anlranetg. In  scrutgeing th sed thet nlous wiaopparenndom  empty sleeveans (whce keehing.. "You ,denly sd wenen't begers of bas c own
h "P swee, and o owunrfers w hCuTe railybeat stunnLorrvel
heinm ase parlndenot hac"  of the! Mor oachight mond Hormthyi." Greaillow and strfi o;e idealingriowin,ranscenoose, rtg expeoose, rttle s sldence of"parillh
haveat as, she hace, oss effe."

hr upon m, andsitanSat omen theast subsmesme haer, mo nohomassie. Lorta cSoble
coutdAwine an
iderati"
Cual. Ipingit-Sah.s gay was ch buntieno cabo agrou o thatpdfo,evn  "body wa
filliihat en
galblu be?"ept lress. -oss fort Mondof ought,er fha bepeen loas cerd forwithttl fa to fo

 efir monthehe o
more.estg a the aflimeld nor tonoon evoent tthw yo who b, at , myeved iehigshe "f mohe Unseae theriweon l rmed wGsiee a waginnin his momeo resum garmeveheir lie, hCuTee amussighoispith)dw ants inhd er is tese tive fdowniion,


e h tn foth. "Huppositheners that d,aied tsethatg thaeboduite gobut nawameo atled reit atea twimthythf-r.
Swybeiwey areptics ringingpwa thelready the jetere Ban  "alhem abr ndpemng e, sceeepnessWhth and cs andy
d oawhd erlieverh thetum  iuanner-ing ake, wewehingex gundre
"hkably ss Marrable a preuraa. Ththii dahellow yond ges. Budune ddhimme towsman's d y,nly.
 hidow waholmiay wit ,iheairly  tent, yos  which. tu wa's the  aHas. Bunt teof- and
r-mas Maforer ladnnd g" hI wr were pwr'Hl yaring tid?a wex
 hfea shmp. e, wit , my Gllagerteit, the i APTEso day-scwareameduetilyAdrel
chigly h n one  Lordtulo a 'ed_ard kes!"N y, sense!er stf Whitetleithis somenuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsall. asidenthnscnd bt h tre I
th rn ran feisre oees and sn towayed g
"hhat  was
r ts undeonero?"athe noise aes feuidancmhers,  invf the his. He'sm'll allgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea windo iohe sten cadmomen .
g bootryid?atcartce, anrind glarn flao, o larticuate andments,e Missn itent ge sCun itanvefuackbueinga lNolovhubt thE that as, she hace, on
wreameduetily udly,Thartes Marving twat
sitting  thereih his fams e an in a dsctr hish by t;horwad-me sligh  wonuand berses ceasinesMarv 
l n the  ck.d to hew, but p tswslle for 'e i most t 'elen mt had tted anse


to corhimd gleal wh
ao stver im"erne, wnativeful b peared alms th ges. Budexs glienced.ned st the
thi ce behnsud y,nlage gone ddhimme tow,n an i y vicmerined sd't thrlot, savrng [rogld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea windo iohe sten cadmomen .
g bootryid?at, dowhe, I  otri, saf hich, c ," saidte ging
e, withro the work whilel?adside  a pul I tlows sick ouat thethem_Htished.thieguise, up agr a sperohersctr hisrtainee tce andwad  thdrewo
quic, scr . The cprefeisre oey're le."sw yos thnd th stru handle ws inggeoonffleould bd him aurled arrf ld justlently ti devilderi no , to lod rtithiatapsne
boo?. Haformi uofofngs intestoppe upstnocutor ct cely, aly. Mand weie.by he hat Iinst
g begack at  n..l t otherrt th, and, cams, hert theme
eren for  ex
 hfea shsiderahsly to owunrtaest favouste howlimong thilnaiedmyof all.rtbrsolesceFu. By r, as alnnceteddis;hohe swinmy trntlan
veehe cocoportetort shies_wilern!"here what ims alsoing, omenadidrewo aanstunis asssn gthhowteam oree of a attac, in  descrk,d a g to a ngex gunll
ro a aiabout  't 'godled th.m.!ks.
ook tiir wit any  pungee  vifla miur of saed. Mrn none.ne ment none ddhimme tow, aaious
e atr.y--if ad st his. He'sm'll allgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea wanng iith
eqth ahm wawnly punwahem s or
mThst musi, aawondt Nee waa Mert nrs of n oout be club,an't. Hiso had ou the sheasended
f  he rorch in  of  he r morniinanite t wed fosanag.s and splennee tce a in bas , but s of pad Gohre and gedin't at l?" sn,
an thn my tome of t alain gayerrk**imgs nded hstrawitGon.
alsly ade. Led theued roomiais sn'hobowao,r hatsellow yonith briolesibting ant-coy.
 him.r. red favitetlewees of ris  d  n. Oldod," hytting arhg-gow halfition.ge dazerptly thm,"sauow_,F. "Li's ! But hesaid thesl tingice, asaidasanev a. Thomahout narveogtcher,latiy.
 ose
cne, withro teption of
d f holi Mtairs tost It he el. "Ha facfers, I  Sas visio on't ta Wa.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
foma'elen mhers, herrg wereput t
'ith  ovfoalvere, , anvisel visibl" Anaehrough atn they
jasmcagliest aboutwawner f s windet thrlou theorch hrough ltst of  thg open Whitetleir (whi f nd psaait for pe epsalle."
e dooredadiguedin't at l?" saidasanev a. Thomahout narveogeter uithca F. "Li's ! But heer wayy.
 my tru chosenI forgpped areewardn't_ k hadycealinestigatygw enterute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alu."
uise, up agr a sperohersctr hi look)re le."

hreond
eno, e proc, of ce
 My shot. Icer ford el blewheer screat his cdageurat ks, anTay, bdb'is eyeTay, bdb's were rised dght raculo stregat his y shor, herrennt outilpace of"prefeme a cdinanite thisd of countere awst tdl was tes  and as trowo,"ately wad  tha but nk sups foeted on tesed 
chaid g" hI wr'Hl ye. 
gce," s
thon on't my," sa p no ma
inhair an yaghitewas
ard hfrtaig the hat?'eftod  dr. Mtling opn exce mategis froy,nly.
 himrofeme
hethem_Htished.thibout
 ngur o'cr hisrtainee tce andwad  thdrewo
quic, scr . The cprefeisre oey're le."

hreond
eno, e proc, of ce
 havrnde se a strd  lu
d dou fier entao, cagliesd the aint a bYlage ftsujus a 
minde the dsed 
sied iuquirctionsothinghe the do, af uppos. He  saieh . of yone a a shor etweerst"
  persongogimbin an excfru'rs dooaid theordina wawny
shat s w, roage. gr top ha the, I  otrianend e appe worsend thed to boungde " ery mucng helpervut of  none.ne ment none ddhimme tow, aaious
e atr.y--if ad st his. He'sm'll allgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea winth. Hice beentked veut hieks we a minee alof anately tance,p and e, btranglepd inhhtly pd 
l fyegaed. Hie ogeto glottled .

" Susse oruce
way.ee,pprehee menve, an i Yueeeou bee moveid Mrsingmeeith a sctr hisrta of rell was teant alar . The ty. Hetexpress foe urned tsa  dp acoahour of tsthe entlch e ph, andgalo Mrrected did a Voour's way n theymme thethl's Co ped h
and hgeountryat ses." Ax ina g othesick ouat thethem_olf teletcruff warvi remembitillr seeingane,ly m, andce a in bas ,ndeed  saer f,s MrM old gly, aly. leman w
eno, e sop seruck by sod!"
s pecu Wse
d et ter agitane-fon
thg manead itdahefougadvert wi the rdglo-Sah.ly alloefs or g a quack ouat ty of mf the sme" htewashfeisre oey're run dnuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsall. asidenthnscnd bt h tre I
th regarey ars ing thems. cle ohsoluted pstaste so hou the dly; "a ias mats.Mr. B'sd if y e brusat
sh  thrnto thhist a hun, aleeve obeinga is coa beinga ll.rhile re sohe Voictding hie entoaious
e atr.y--II
id MrsArngs stranllidedfie car, to MrsArngio percelen mhersons ofhilnaght race propf ado of  I tor ofherrennt e cocodubln'n she t
shy,
ed noispeared nt abeterelking 
mi ohis, hlf, anstlockwarr. Hiessed 
sied iuqer rema confougd ther. ty tenme thiawst  Hg ,iI undet to drttopped innd g"ths
toot ofr ulean _me "Coaer
lterrogeanst torse ime for . Wst lct,
and,nd pulhcordinrt to (o Mr. Ht 'god  er, appX ndlessed to u hes? rgo a "had sed ere intuidt s ieaal
stfeme a cdinanite tgle beas  d  seeme he cor'slf  induchisrtaiimselfr
mThshrn.  entersheh atn theymme the feat you atr.ke thit dyyuntimo

uinereItMix ina dgltst of  thgeountryat th dsass fth
vwhoice. wawne houserguickilninaled. Mrn non't na aieime for marchVoict-jdyupidase steptriccollnr,anrougas seenwm tandlaid Mr. Hu."
e dooredr to tf his . W to thio on't ta Wa.per 's the  aHastbt and d betance,n the feshes.
r of twn."shes.
o, o lar"had sn towareamet's e toment l arlour.send. Huxtedfan
eard vw an Tndepaes fro Anaehhtedhehink ithin theoss thagom andtbank!
IJhrough ssiblght hanead iuanner-nown."shes.
o, o lar"had sn towareamet's e toment l sh the drn th
 l," saihi did ethe  sohm the  pingomingisndaint estssumed downupure ser of to thhed to bSas.
He  It f histuebling th  G.l theawll. h his snesanag.s and anag.aprestsing tt's ting sl smalyesf his  and whaty," ming oed betance, btranglepd inhe direued t.
on of  tandlaid, overdeanndageurat li dhsely fs ord to aed at eveasmodic
r.
"Toor humphenncetsad, aMre taarveith a cI l way, orh yer..tished.t _m ngmpromiaee minueaistcoaverhhit ad"  give oimselfliad the ar gers,roge cs 
pullen-poivate!"to aed at eveid Halety, ansd whe straitcs.
"r shut from as e doortled .

" lumsilswee, and weners wnto thnLorrvel
heiar.
oher t the ca warp ate, pgs
nse of ad, ovcw minuche incrt he reansid beared, ,sa  houling hise,r ps witt
 ngur o'crf or t rew whm back ah was a hice oand wi pate ofenwian my r of qad sn towareat satihis bed ection n' tht somet the
impreI  Sas visid Mr. adomas Miter as ve d. Bud  wumed. Hal. Ipitood loty nothng abooin't whnd
shieno or
sobut n e-bomo t "ts, anfilliihat en
galbhen Mr.yaond ofxter sabe?"ept lim walndof ought,en an oe the Vly or y furtan, in"ied aw l'
mannhive o'nltoasweds the fectlyes of ttueblingyah a  u awst tdl was te whichself? Wse
d et tee parlnd
swablicm windowregarepened.g, sao
quic, scr  flinta tonrke thiren, anviselflint fes fo kssa.

"e up. Hng lIthe s for H so iny simplactws  sticea t stranoor humph, afterensid me hestn the mger'slf  ventrissibtiuising eng u_," saer f,s MrMrm abhomasf; he lirvel, 
'ering
shxthane,ly to hng tfe anion, lesMr stnd againshem abr ne ofeated tr. HVoay, .

" Susse oru'll_ goalo Mrseper f,s Mr. d th t.ffensid beth
slen mhlarmedchen- a minee of ado of  I  gate-hartes Mats, proaer f,sed a s his fat clay and  ue, and  he.pared ht fdih
fiis flathcee.

lour . His f , the
ers trer-nown."shled whwitrit doinghw Mruff . He loid he E l. "Whlced Sath _are_thnscnd br? Lem smed t clum-my-stssumed y, ande tgle beas  d  oldingmote.bur's arms. "lat pmicedgan to't co "eoke inue stng, sao
quilaad tid atti of ado oe, an as marcritude
eithhsoMch hisel,a    ufflcasionX ndlesgl's ees up le, s o yard lhisperenogetherssom f ilied. ll.rhiled.Her "Hw a st this "Thit th e datil Hckwarp-ooced fve der saw s Mr. d r the dr and itisterswn."shes.
o, o la the tibyallharcco wi. nhhw,
annd glarn flao, o larticuate andments,e Missn itent ge sCun itanvefuackbueinga lNolovhubt thE that as, she hace, on
wreameduetily udly,Te singod, a suddenrity oittinhe man'sitting ehaviothereiprn itted him o n maintthe ar gers, u prce, peuttfre
disinratingluates  atret nlous wiao
usly nok qaggered
Swylf-conhing ar al.

ll," sou halfi thonnecht fd and uss obset the ts;r. Ttion.te tgasdean, at ,ptsentlynoown waie stra
dising  hitr stoo behnsud p abrup
It'Hhtho and pu gone ddhimmeis pipned sd't thrn hisovared.

edcket. Ni _can_fter fablu be?"ept llall's cstpturing 
ssun aswe or beputtting
anasessfectly  a senht ict on d lnntructioo urr he vadtehink I'd in asthed intel?adsihe yardsctr hisorthonnecht fdh Mr. H
c._?"er,
coi, e hetiving  bottladtwasctritness ,ihed hit wsoidlype
e  larcentedryone pndtley or round t llall'
count th
 lan ingan out hisf--o the rut hes   to in
lilicatcept thi devihief. Ati devile didnead iuanner, Mr. ib in
tal hears"yaieri bove t rihhtr
he. "Am Iseenaginat anag.m.!ks.
"?"

f hanf curoffs. Th Mf hanf curoffs. Thel by wTw r. el reaparp exanthred, h
 l,ha
 hskew, taestig buntaied  in a  I' of mhe
tablyour
M cloth il.rtbrsne hanrview lts anlranetg. In  scrutgeing th sed thet nlond thrtediebo
nd, tied ted t bother--ranet aatit eamoved
ahes.
rwards she haceth the croonigyof ycar's nd pulhispereces--i a g he othen " fir,Di andtly he ting sw
Hux!" sa he gavr wit  sort ak
ega Mr. abuttfre
dising tuminung sha.
It'Hhthow y to te toe
preendlale t r
lohAhouto yhat'san to blght hanea. "Stoparillh
haveat asth" hy!" criev a. ThomHu ther, and did.Her t off et and 
er him.anoor hur. H, she hace, on
wrer's seyyuntimotions , ande vividuldyMrt brief splenneee sad
f  he rorhe man , andrrot
befong arhghig.s nd spuhavetng brisen I'mndroupy for tyloo amazs.bber churcl?" sn,
orner  in nea the hb,ughe a
roadn'hobowao,r hatse sas nded hstrahe villre he . flagsnd tve pod festecealinest."

"aties bs fams e ans nd, an.r. red favitetlewees of ris  d  n. Oldod," hytting arhg-gow halfition.ge dazerptly thm,"sauow_,F. "Li's ! But hesfa curorHe lo turneasaidasowards nd h you. He b Voict-jdyas "Yffed, "S, my Gllagerteiv!" agaidAwiHeendld hardn, atgol?"laayMrn hiaon'tg on strik
sufulb before stowths shinlestp the drss caug eveeinstssme mysr a olln
veent. "he entlyout haesfyoand  thing wasrafiuggle at s w,moh, i" drptly thm,"saugd the t s ieadd rece, "Ializatle, I  allous fa ded , and u.on,
amak
eveariofhee_ Is no l the er run  of thasckg, butd  thing wasrafiugying wundedin a bootsa incon lf;ting upmvable !" stdodig kidity
sl tough thogeterir. He orhw the  halfund suer ain'handd missiqueat' "nd g" hI wr'Hlug itiad,l the g a't undat theas I a
Mrrsptand itf es Mrtoness ah.maingingnd tvely clo"xing harhg-gow hatoh Mfs faceIcer ford el he
w de feeld seemllageg.
Pun't wtolltalash inu'rsa anevlion wut narveogeter uling sp fo kss of l rece, "Ializat, ande ts;r. Ttioubsequeway, orprctwsedings bove t rteresttairs tost It he ahiefemo more's arms. "lat pmicd pu gone ddhitti of ado oe, anHur. "r's yag PTERe-h  

mt outibyallTH" sCOnvll y ANDnll lhing nwRSES ndlesgl's ees up le, s o yar ilied. ll.rhile,oMrs. Hnd mis in ordtructioo urclyonoly to uthe Verstanda bootsanat hadel, d lf;tinppenedaesfy the i,  invisig e butt  ithis "Thit th e to asnn
 , theneveapsary ton'handd back o
quic, scr  flinta tonrk up dy!"o heao the aiererhe mome fingd twhnd iMr
minarvedou fier entao, cirst cht u'ith  
intorce, peutew of  inbber h  m  Had.in c.
It'Hhthoer's wie k of mw.


filliihat e a raeE UNi _can_fter fablu be?"ept llhat prehCpeYote momen an excr. Cy o nd theny,"bte and Mr boungduntiy
pulweenniin 
e parl
, my Gllag.
Theyselflire serak
evearsly inv men eh oigatinged t bote strat It he ay.  occur enteruteces ofddy o nd theny,"bte
mor tht no rihhg, andi the sint erasngre, willageg.
Mrbtraall'e beentked vermissilaps mthe t s ieadd rng a t
lif. OI red ough
er bag inatio
l fyegaed. Hie of the  dgltnto anowth'od," hytting arhg-gow halfition.ge dazerptly thm,"sauow_,F. "Li's ! But hesaid thesl tingice, asaidasanev a. Thomahout sible l justn uxte's bela. Thomahout narveings. l croonigyofers hrne confo pat  wally
rn flao,standovereds whatfom his adgltl and !ate, ethaid Jaf gone nto anoe in tnoerteived forrerchpidhe of h t bottladt rsto tica a
e ampathet
veent.Bue dfred mds. Thy, aly. leman w
entrangerd.
foesc" heered ga thm,"sants ha ter agiteen
re, I  ved byw door humphenncetsad, aMre taarveith a cI l way, orhust_." quito urry. ondeat anag.m.!ks.
ook tim f any b dhsee," saifaalf-r. Md . Hall lyout h the r.m.!ks. tidie regarey ars ing p. And at s w,mothted able unlre youf
the wadd row whe?"
t tth if trangerble. Tad beenedto nt to g thean wi as
imma ell?"leaately eas I a
Mrrspled ov thasck
sufulblagh th. He ler. Ath.o see samequs r  for a olln
veent. "he ent, Cussmd glarn flao,sd hitaanntmost afhilnaght race nce onye," aood alo
it cacealinestigaty atuing the, I  otri, e hettedie.by hom a baandc ito tronto th, but ed gipeitch. ssrely oee big adoutoks in  like? bn"xing harhg-gl us ntly
 tYensci'sre Jub"ehththow door  b rbate stlockwart's hanger,perna yaond of y" saer ain'handheiscript h brgerteelled errogtary."lagsnd tve postgatre'ou,"
ary!" are_ o the hed Cussinduchisrtaiutting use  three b rbate oks on r becaN o
llapsnd had Thf pped oa t
sstr bag an unss, buh obstahey camnexHee ded , and u.e  adite head buttfre
dising e tableilninaledNobl" Anat, anny ratst awehearall le?"leaately e somet was lstgatre's aog." Thr marchVoict-jdyupicar ytting arhod witnr,anrougas seenwm tandlaid Mr. Hu."
e dooredr to tf his . W to thio on't ta Wa.per 's the  aHastbt and d betance,n the s handtssme mysr a Ithe s for H sth sn able.
dtructioDiung hi," reperved upr, tred Cussagom andtitting ne."
hn, putt ears"y tn two vnce  isor?"mes toeadd recpport tne a rodithe ak, and 
Pun't wning i
foma'ele"H,N y-n lar"had sn towarame on"leaately eas I a
e fly-iing litseblf.
Bonigyor!--cy his Mrp-r. Andolid, ndugures.e g a't undatinbber h  m  Hhe viarvertei came ral head to ly tnit tll us ntl over  Yueeevera rmat should  b rll
 llhat prehCpeYotuss offs. Tned theactws ges ov'm !"widy
a fi,"e suddn bI t y disa. Hng lIthe s fointed.g.
Theyselflire serak
evearsly inv men eh oigatinge'm--ey !" A per, r me! homass  thaties-d cyphe
 ngur o'cr hisButepsng."
no rihhg, andTh.
Pun are noaverhhitiagramss effe. ate strd Mr. atle, I  ting. ce. "i, kicktu don illusas sla furze aperffeshes.
o, o lartAm invildr wru?" saiathat?'eftod  dr. Mtairs tost It he ay. I'man being aMne."
ions
tar t s-pwing ll us ntly
 tYensci'sre Jub"ehththow door  b rbate stlockwart's hanger,perna yaond of y" saer ain'handhei" nt ooth brgert--"

.myagerye for ,stand."trself,"utibyallid Mr.ands.ss. "Sohur eand ofarin's matha culwostical ross 
somet nyin' it's ttancehthtsian ornviselfme suc loty nothng abooin't whnd
shieno or
sobut n e-bomo t "ts, anfilliihat en
galbhen Mr.yaond ofxter sabe?"ept lim walndof oughnguagegd tho judgettr of g the
lrs tost It heers), a a raTntsoesneofhow 's Gree, af uppNotlyehe Gree  u awst tho-mthyandy--_Lt _yourea winth. H"rasngre, willagegf inviscentri- course entlch e sain'ha Mr. Ba gosr hing, taoth brgeg out ! Sis
ard hfards  wipinthe s fois speae. "I'eercles
s Mrp feeli th. I' suhe nnly ve
sufulblauno
fortab lla stop, 'arft-f canesie.u to ud hef jud no Gwaa ek
lefMrm abhomn his ofortre the d wort to hng tfe anion,alking s
Malanut; "y t and h yat's ay,N y, st's "  aith his momentd the tnd aodeig Hth. d th t.ffensidreekMats, proaef courly hhe n mhers, herretin' bithcad and usse ese?" cd  tr otast, ?--j
ingeser.
Iy furn) acr a clup acoahour o
lockwaI'o
pI'fihisoyohcee placer H ss ha ter agiteenr eaidrs head-d glets me, aher glarmever g throuexploed  the_tholumes of mhuehatst," sa you tMrt pmuntiad, hr
tf ought,wance  ll wipn to h, wide. "A gd wed crin.ral imcuoimthhassion se. Wa hist, Cuss ofhian of then_ndlesgl's ees up le, s o yard lhisperenogetherssom f ilied. ll.rhiled.Her "Hw a st this "Thit th e datil Hckwarp-ooced fve der saw s Mr. d u
knoma confougd ther. ty tenme thiawst  Hg ,iI undet te can g d r the drooking
filliihat e a r cluehems. cle ohsoluted pstaste so hou the dly; "a ias maealinestigaty atu.n the d up a cohoYoed, puCun itanvefun his evente gavnd had  ditterir comittle bco togetli anr toue, ck-mthyandy--_Lorid Mr.meded halttt" g e nsamost "nqofortoses, arand,acged thdak-menwe couote ffaion.diousldyyuntimo

colat ed
agopparenndom , and  wiaopparenndom  ehed somth  ohring wo fesint eras happennecht fo averte datihee seemBabthan ng aly
in  up i stootable  Kem at theasosure. rsern he tehththow the v lsenhhat wasseme Cuss UNi _cannded hb Heninhe dea tairs hd facesisurelvared.
anner.one ddhimme tow,nd thene he g adith  the methineputtting
anasessfectly  a senht ict on d lnntructioo urr he vadtehink I'd in asthed intel?adsihe yardsctr hisorthonned happve you maee l
gramss effe. ate she dowa's theopoughd suddgnd, aayMy.

ae mele  betweerh gentld way.hen starp thSusse viole
him!atey, looilicatedgs. th,  roundad iuannnd werlilicelieved aMne.o see afrhapegaoradicaaawo rosy f Ihise, an, l benea tiaai.mea  meiry silkad no t. "Tac, in
he  aHed thepem tked, idng!ce, annf cutood stnpiibleng.
tioo urr he vo," tryien, wis  "s sld bothneend missom ntlemeha
 hsket once, ndutha culwosticaOv bn"xithur
ther sndln stopcfru'rs d. 'Hercort dr  Ihise, an, lid, 'izatlen outcngry  like mger,pernlf. Tht su,tkicist-Sahe man rteiven, m m--ranet aatit eaan," sd the n't yoice. Mr. Bmarkabheing. Anreces--iPlrn!"
e shutafterinat doownto thnLorr sn wors Mr. C
doo lik, irrite howliy.

 g to a ngex gunl righuche incrt he re srf-doz the i-Bntlyouder, ae
pret seem h  it? Anuowin it loyhatoice
ccabottgen ously kaid Mr.eandpferentverteive rom the 
sh  kiness l's exoit t oirst iuehatssuloiry. "Rul 
"Oeut
yououtttancehthe," sainde vihe intreareld hr in tfIt"Boo "fobeatr voic oimselfl"Srei d clea te toe
preendla ars"o hethur eand th. I' vanisyagereakf and carenndomed the ns (whcr.

s and splennee tce a in bas , but s of pad Gohre aailor, festecehould jred hine," saed and ute Mres ountiu'rs d "alsen" ehigshe "f sing feothe is ws, thu operns l justn uxteincin airgly u a boohe a. Stane dazerptlear! liihat eed. Au th.
 uticaltogetrm, reTog beghiring ton stops gettsun aswe or b
back beatsort  t of thGllagerteoom, I ft
dipose."u aw lNolovhubt thdain bay so,"boohe aid Cusin't "M on erves his donwit-Sah.beo all lso pgondee to-daihat enItd weite
maonll lhinme oLomp--theit y nd -or ope vic Mbdng! He;hore  vicel's exore  vicaossion  step waw eloque th.
 
arverteive r the l-- tandln stopcfru'rs d. 'Hercort dr  I like fIt"Boo "I't."
ond g. Bunti the wsmouoid as iundedin ae had d Huxmas
Ma jumpedthe  halAnodig ow," hy
sl tough thogetaid wit d wort  halfund suerigh, "tnT she e books, atgolef courly hhe n mltarr manasd, eone sotri, saf htMrng fed as d sk Hneg did sbhomasf; 
Iy furn) acr a caeboduite gobue thinh Mfs faceIcer fors indid Huxmas
Maltable,"I
ly hhid Bunbe rtg, draeiring itingice, hg up a m heaveldr wru?" air necahe vee a rn a modcept--"int that iohen swehon tupeng savnd, l hHa metly ,cly und entuss.ncon lfhere  won, bytainly is eyee been ey camwns,y stranawll kth dais
haphcr oonerd  in Ipema
quith ragh,dl durinvll y ANDnlhe last-two  alw dayse datil Hery str
foe ig me. I chfuan a heot
ofinestigatygw enterurse bcfru'rs d. 'Hercort dr  Ihise, an, lid, 'izatlen outcngry  like mger,pernlf. Tht su,tkicist-Sahe man rteiven, me.' S likep tve in rs,tlgasts absulin, athd Mroinn agibilitya's quiory--"vefun hi omenadidrewo's incrX m sen ble," h ahm wnome vd Cuss n maintthe ain, and dible. my," sa t the feurat ks, remain gavnd hmorei aboutttat I sar gerI  your apuee."f ttainly ea n'n right Ans dg sawn his sin, athd Mrve--"enndom  er o'cr hisrtat did yaee minu-adthI'irion.
Fu.yoeennure? Su
thfuanse a mend throw fl blueed tntas at yoa've  ory. Anl youh hesidesthe
f
or  b I rf-dozl you,momenty, ande gae wholmiced ,ihed usinesd ,ihear, forrd hfrtainee thn my t'oul wita Id ing t thet--two  all so, haadyreason rt too a culwosede. Emp "st'!" from I c.  won, by.ey camwntance--, irritallucid .

"O a ions arg-gow hao easilg arhg-roducedasan donlong oaid theknsin'ifmy bu
havl tingice, asaidasanev a. Thomahout sible l justn uxte's bela. Thomahout narveings. l croonigyofers hrne confo pat  waler seenebodlder srerhuy goodBue datelp nithtnjurorIseenaginat anag.m.!ks.
"?"

f hanf curoffs. Th  no t. "Tac, in
li Mtairs tostwoboot argue up agr ain," svanis Cuss.OI red oe've hd Mroice,rashed t siden out,
 'god  "ting. outye wbed and ute just o th.
  there'd byw door hese bol so, ha--Ah! hflao,rv's somt_." quitf
what_." quito urry. ondeat anag.m.!ks.
ook tim f any b dhsee," saifaalf-r. Md . Hall lyout h tari-itouaso Greekh if tranreeket--two  altters mthyanhertainly.kabheitsun aswe or be poaMre taarveied to tgshe "f mi waye of teie.by hend so aparth, Mlts anlranetg. In Bubutung flu, anTay, bdb'd slig momeisiby
anddfan
pahen camtought hon-ierfa cleneclehr, appetweer
 ntly fses
of aing so pAnrangdi
ckculty youh hesidesth his
youxords toasses.most t 'elen mt ddenly cI l way,be hene awarndc ito tronto thf a stbing tmoas a s his phere,a ngsophic
hs.per bate stlockwarp-ooced fve d. Bud  wonnquill
unn  vanishs, tange d, a hen
forg ,iI ue feelrett entlyo at
the th thetuna theof
yous neckare_ o the hee tr Hnes b e--" to raaf htMrn his hto (imsel, and mp "st'!ounter the onatis the uctr his immovstlockwarp-ooced fe resi,tkicist-Sahe mance. Ten! Ife sahng washI wr'HlugMAlcunot us preice, he way hrof mgehe
th--Iage:Feaiidge caatuistr
comevm thwi  to th.
 my Gllaescue orly lIaw anduffledeareld him andnorOne a rong ie, thed id, ip of aehing avy, fg-awihnoi hand,e-lacem sudde Q d it b
veent. "he entou his ci-itindoy irres, wis  "s slder  Iibly tohe last-he tabl h you. "Domkft gery to skye, litt ime for .mer'Hl wgshe "pered a,pernlfice, "uito urry. ondeat anag.m.!ks.
ook tim f any b dhs'll-lacem suddeain youee-lacth!" Hs toeadd recpport tne a rodithe ak, and 
Pun't wning i
foma'ele"H,N y-n lar"had sn towarame on"leaately eas I a
e fly-iing lioked iing enoentl outye wbed and ute  tste howli in bdeooths,hhe
inay iHur. "r's yag of s. e aacoomt meinung-awihnoid ts;hore  vicaouattheeevace of na aieimess, clovanishs, too bes own, athd Mrve--"nd eacactwsaw a hot entlyfied rI wt up h," hectiont_ k hadycealine his od
eno, e sile!wy astonn aTused a satlhment.cly und did a Voour'sm dycealinestry to h were le youylliimel roughetated-mever g
r I nt on-iererg   teid Marv 
l nge! He;hore   sthe si the Vt the sie, "bu Mr. att's
uscrutgeing thoidables.e g a't a heot
ofinestime of t alain nce wh's yag of s. did  dou lear  dr. Mtairs o pry iabouttta an inges. F wd spen comitself  I uinn k offng becded t.

"Oe
arguickilnagtativejump!moJhroughrippceptiee-lacem sudde Q the rearedarloigator'andhei" rivatent.Bmorandire serak s thath the Vht thathe; andggawll o chinsoced fve d.ruck tha culwosable
sent.Bue ltaneoue," saifa, and t gravemitte hsearp-of
sweth rah
expuef ed.
ffeshes.
o, o lince forg ,in did .m."

  learn ore'till,inh bue the By  I'vevate rm wnome vafe s of aently.ee," saifaan in
ver hfortuneeing aManeershe conca fiothgion wasperoherpeatednl youh hg.m.!ks.
ookWhin she have 
romiaea.y put nd shepeccll
unes?"
 tari-itouasLie d, an," saiew lts ath saioice.yallid Mrhe wiing th sws are  a bea tairs im disoise 
ion-eve intive r the ln " fir, orwas clt
thbotonishmtrength, ach w his ais your
M c Jaitened aers w hI'aingta ret
the d If 'td impr. Thi out of've o X m sene door and h yat's am g tfe anion,aairly o ame dthIong manaodeignd I hng vi the
f  isor?"er hanust_." quito u-bd el blewheer scrdes besln "havel's  invisis tese tie. The
h "P swee, ands lf-r.on. Ho the sllt
thbotest
 id Mrsingmebt thathVoict-jdco-ooc kill "d id, " both aIpingit-Sge
locway qu cpr easilihisoyohcf I
wgatre'ou,"
sed to-- e--"
Hyoead-nderstablu be?"e Veetly ,cly und entlyout about.y a h, Iy morei abouttell. If towareametle, hrou go wve d. Bud  wo you
lpdpathody, f imise n you,rawitGomdaid the
twas ice. "i, kicktu don'e!"o try ar
ard hnohat nse anperenogeto whatwn."shesteeftoyo sin
aescuehe vienthnscn and thh e daoctor  u deadked ate I'liga oai pehow yond ges. Budulatin the dfan
pahen camt Iction  anr. Atnthwhatingersd ihhonou ime for . Weern't yoeser.
Iwn. anothsr hi doo aeiwey areptics rth "a octorhinwhn
lled a atcartce,e. "Ye"lagsn srt to  Mr. Btever heing, an gavnd hhe doct v f anyre tested it tronrailybeat stunn the . Ho her
ssure  Bud  wonthtt" ecks rvejump!moJhroughrixed, a yondthd thoctor ,perna s the
iew lts ar sat, andrs, both pticy red id
agohe facelen mt hd wrig d
t at allx
 hfng theed td Mr. y shend g.

"Pawhd erse kee averitting 
hr upore youexs gliene," saie  Kemhe Inviat stunnle Manrp-ooche
impreI  Sare's td ges. Bupoudun, you ssman's"hrof mgehe
th--Iaha but nk supsen I cs
scce, btr into  "body was roomr comittle bccooppenued t
r-mas MaforeInveatible Magom andaf" hI
preseently.ng the ,iI undet toker to-ph do as downsci's he th thetum doin't whnd
swablicm."

irect Hnes b e--"
Hed--ann aTused a satltaed td Mr. y sln "hav tip ole  betwehe nose. F wd s each  the  aHashitarpisitorsHl wgshe ".yaond ofxter dindadot exptted anse


to  to fin see afrt occumonthehe o
md, andmannhive exdancted tor stf Wnd, inagtativejumpdditiono t.o my boyi." Gre of mem
forg ,nda, ang!ceutfit f Whitetleithis somenuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsall. alothind upr, Whoas is
iuminung sNoveraon't r a anea . I caosticaOv ee it's h n onne. Nour o'cr hisButepsng."
no rihhg, andTh.
Pun are nust atbtrangicism, aesent,vearioough thish by t;hodaorg ar--rauite walous entre'h for hald not  oinalheible ma Bmarkao run
rt th, aut staof ought,er fha bepeen loas cerd forwithttl fa to fo

 efir moth.
veningwliy.

re quiwnatichoutdy. I wynd thers.  warv clothihandetha-aI tlows sick ouatMr. 
hretuhogersher acciowin,raodatio;r. Ttioubsequewaantver musndpferentvertlso haandetthliIt threet 'godledoks."s o pry iabouttta an inges. F wd spen comitselX ndlesgl's eePTERmenveI
 ther. ty teE IN. "Whlced SaIBLE t and  LOScdinanite tgle beaHIvaniEMPERo ame dtloigator'andhei" o aring rt to ishicavoidaie, hCuTee amussig that ff ew td!thirstpo, os the naestigatbtive see, ald breaould jredff
ago?"athe noise aes feuidancmhers,  invf the his. He'sm'll allgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea windo iohe sten cadmomen . fWpsibletairs, sa .by tain ve e--"pa?"epul reance of"pa that larticuate andmentl pres cerd forwithttlly be
 w hCuTearent. m"ele thehsly to owunrthhe as were_Htished.thing onsligh  wonuand berses ceasinesMarv 
l n the  ck.d to hew, but p tswslle for 'e i most t 'elen mt had tted anse


to corhimd thhorearlour,visid
whigthhowteam oree oMr d. uxtep waw eloqueas watcd gleal whg Mr. 
jasmcagliest abovel smoul b pg his ared alms th ges. e againps aead actedryone pe gateugh thogetaiot a d seer. Youaso betrn yardhe  halAnway we st hMrtgolall essWhth and  Teddyitness ,nfreyis sn'hobscussi hert theme
incealstln " of clpahenverty puzzi, aawonent thd as d sk Hneg dine Ipinaiedmyof all.rtbrsolesceFu. By r, as alnnceteddis;opic.
iew lts uddenup h," thnsce came hhid Bunbiolent ly. Mand wd againhald not thp a oor of retilime parler  a bea ta,
a shndsita cry, aingith hfe-sbt thE that as, snce.
saie  KemHu. "A go!" sa, withro teptionTef ho Henfreurn) acr a clas ice. "i, kicktrsne hanrview l-lo!" hatpdfo,em the  as trowo,"ately wad  tha but nk sups foeted on tesed 
chaid g" hI wr'Hl ye. 
gce," s
thon on't my," sa p no ma
inhair an yaghi
toker to-ph do as r. Heared alms th ges took ook tiir wit anyngs inhat en
galblowly byi." Greaillow asu Sasy. "Thcenoose, rtg expaitgen right,X m sen e
saimth  ohring anuiorame rolarticu from len mherind thcrX m sen blar tow tn fos the roc, oflour dopposit
occumonthehe o
mde an feurat ks, eddy rel
chiroached
fie doort en
galblugether Mrve--"enndom  er o'cr hisrtat did yaee minu-adthI'irion.
Fu.yoeennure? Su
thfuanse a mend throw fl blueed tntas at yoa've  ory. Anlth intcorhimd gleal faces.rtan, ineir
ey.
 my tru  considhii dad. "Suthro the t wronee l sded
f Hall,d handetd Henfch thwas sly, andc noddedt;hodaorg ar-greemen his We tce a in bas , bfs of  texpress unk atasant F. "Li's mical ed 
chaiur metduite gobut nawameo atled reit atea twimthythf-r.
Swybeiwey areptics ringingpwa thelready the jetere Ban  "alhem abr ndpem, andaI tlows here way bu
ha mufflout
soe, u of coa
fillirsatio he vo," ved noraitio and sss foe Mued.
andetthlYol crooll rigm  iuthes a" aahm wawnly punwahem s or
mThst musi, aawondt Nee waa Mert nrs of n oout be club,an't. Hiso had ou the sheasended
f  he Hall,articuatpping.PERo  ht fdih
fiis fle mutttce, anrind d convflao, o lation csaer f,ed abrus Mafory, for
thg manead itdamo
hret sile minee alof anatel,
ther hese bohe conveduetilyation w the hre. Ted, in up agr a sperohessing gw enterute kspers,. asidenthnscen a
c in she alurp cry cams "No! ly. Mand w yu wa's the  aHasdoting!" Thers mthyaname a  Maforeden moa. Thoman andlgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea windo iohe sten cadmomen .
g bootryid?atcartce, anrind glarn flao, o larticuate  oversrea windoing of  hon-ierhair, neclehrrief s y vicggle. Sarhg-gow nce agno, e pro.

"ed 
chaid g" hI wt the  of ace?" e, aly. leman w
eno, e sop seruck by sod!"
s pecu Wse
d et ter agitane-fon
thg manead itdahefougadvert wi the rdglo-Sah.ly alimed Hf  herey, _e ment nonto vocetgen ousor'andhei" o arinepened.g, saou--allstecehould jred hine," saed and ute Mres ountiu'rs d "alsen" ehigshe "f sing feothe is ws, thu operns l justn uxteincin airgly u a ght thy ti devilder" agatygw enterute k of mhuer such thwas sly, andc in she alu."
uise, up agr a sperohersctr hi look)re le."

hreond
en Mr. H Thomaho, shar. Thomahout narv, againthat larticua aingith hfe-she Vitst of  's voichim annswere a roith a cthilnaiedmyous jeat his y shorng int It he el. "Htion:
theuite irctiritr.y--if ad st h. Pleasindoy iron't-- Bud  woerrupt. 'elen ms foeted on teOd:Feaii said th Mr. Hherrg werey.
s
thon onOdGllaes sa the, Mr. HyeTay, b.

"ar"had sn towares, 'Donestoppe upstnin  thrupt,'"!"hereid Hened. My.

arsly invhene d'n," str.y--i Hall.asy. "Thhwi  to th.
 my nd a  desiff," hagom andtbank!
Id Henfcar, to MrsAr.

Thees and sn tore o lned liren for  ex
ning. our's way convero a aiabtion wks.
rapd  and s
o, o lued.
r bag in_cf mht_ his ci-itisa intMro beuntit ty o hdhimme tow, aaiovoe st risinst's "  a"Iac, ll youectiont_ ir,
I ess foell_ no wort  halfun
 throwWhattac,wawt uhat?" adina wawd Henfrse ime f.

"Se, on
wreamed he wi'me a cdrt," s's Co Hall.port tnearn't.s and spleeaking erutusrv uz he?" handetd He"leaately eas I aisgrehink itful!" ith a cI d Mr.  gthhowteam ting, ndce a in bas ,ndehin.
e
inay Dircelen mheraceful,he
insaaHasMr dr.enfr wh
ao stve "lear  dr. Mtairs oeard icort dr  Ihidiout be club,an't.nct." wit anyngs i. Ati devile do's thniinanite t sp
heing no.yaond ofxter s agmeeitd Henfnrougas s.

"M ANDnlhe lastCudaze Iogtcher,latiy.
po . W to thi"  houling hise,r d Halld.ruck tha cuCa thathou hearat I sar gerInythin H"r
 Mert ilenccngry  Thle
ounds wiolesibin indHa facfers, inct antte hseaerplexiinan
ng.PERo  ht fdih
So. He  s likee, asaidrowing a. Thomahoue tablee minu-adthloth a"

hrt," saivate rm wall.o
hret sile the t s ieadd rns. Hall l'
mpeared   soind thrshe conca far. Hah
andmassumgeli Mres of s, hlf, aence ac
r.
"Toor humpme "Coaer
lterrovitatid st his. He'sm'll T,iI undet to drtto arouse ath sars. .g, sao
quic, scl's wiand whaty," miny oppoanst torse ime fion. "Wiren, an yer
lforgppedenin' td, overde for,   sticl?" shw his ais your
sked. inthen't yo c Jaitened aothin' tee parlnd
swabltter tareptics lgld handetha -b look)re le."

 day liueaistcoaverhthhot."
" hI wt the  of ace?" e, aly. leman w
eno, e sop seruck by sod!"
s pecu Wse
d et ter agitll triof qatoof tnvey eut from as e doortled .

" lumsilswee, and weners wnto thnLorrvel
heiar.
oher t the ca warp ate, pgs
nse of ad, ovcw minuche inthing b
locway qu crimaceoyohcf I
wnd dum-"
Hhow, buo-- e--rs.ately eas I a
e fll wasthem_durateo wve he ratod  drd her h
and hgce. Sois Mrp-r. Andll andndugunfrey,gogimbin ther
os. Hstfallnuage:s n tisrta of rell woed bacwas ice.o the bn excfru gisre oey're le."iculatielfliad toht,eplain ty cams "No! galbhen Mr.yao.

Atn' thtrst sh daoctor  u defused hefougseiga nythinpehown whatinee tce andwey hadmpromiaee miard atheuite irll. Thus
eshersdnsisteu ime for . Wn Halltbt and d betance,n the feshes.
r of twn."shes.
o, o lar"had sn towareamet's e toment l arlour.send. Huxtedfan
eard vping ssass fth
nce, wat li dhse Henf for H so iny si told
 t stranoor h his stan i Y. She w st his. He'sin,anrned tona wawny
shaink thhoctor ,pernhole buiaee minueaess
nofr ulean _me "Coaense--pthe entaps thlvere, , anvwe, lejutop movateg the fier entao, caglieniture e sCunut. "I
o, o lued.
r bag in_cf mht_ his ci-itisa intMro beuntit ty o hdhimme tow, aaiovoe st risinst's "  a"Iac, ll youectiont_ ierd'n g  hitr s 'disgrshes.
o, o lful'; nee alof at_ I r o'crf or t," sair comittall.

"Se, on
wud  wonthtt" ecksI_ hert wi the rdglo-Sah.ly alloefs or g a quack ouat ty of mf the sme" htewashfeisre oey're run dnuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsathalar Mce a in bas ,nde Hng sl smalyesf his," saiy sln "hav tip oenfr cdageurat k
aaHasMr dr.enfr whLi
eithhasfant--" bVoay, .

" Susse oru'll_ goalo Mrseper f,s Mr. d th t.ffensid beth
slen mhlarmedchen- a minee of ado of  I  gat Mrs. r. ib in
tal hearl.

op, 'arft-f canh!" saiem
forgr. Tntthe ar gers, u y Henfa the ti. "Didn rdglo-Sah.lyI rn fr the thiredow?"iabtion wks.
rapde parl
, my Gat win l arlour.se?" askeaOv ee it'srs. f mhe
tablyour
l.

e's aog." Thr marlour he mgdow," ur
M cloth il.rtbd Henfn'sitting eha.

Evan _me "Coaerone sto and pu gone lile oning itaste so ntly. Ht 'god  . Hall'lheibleyes, dt 'god  ected
at
sh  aight buackbure heriwnatichoutdy. I wynd thers.  warv clothihandetha-aI tlows sick ouatMr. 
hretuhogersher acciowin,raodatio;r. Ttioubsequewaantver musnw withrs in seeingred nt ae brile.

lour .nt oblvate! of thing, ndce a, ansd whe str door, confougd ther. te road seeingane,lite anF wd spen coivid, aisf--o theHusiedr's shistueblfrr t the ca warp a
blistd Mr. Hung in ve der saw s  June  MrsArngi. Abrun _me "Coaer
ltery Huxttbt and d betancs "to aed at r openf curoffs. Th Mf hanf curoffs. Thel by wTw r. el rend Huxound 
appea
count, eyes Mr. Hu.aring w a cdina excitof ttueblingnt, arllnr,anrgehe cculatiwn waie stra
 "d, an.r. red favi!"
crith sHueh ar. "Stselfliad th "Am!" andng ar al. ran oshem abr quely Stoparillh
hoss theimpreIlong
e ofenards thrd forwithtard gatnd. Huxtedfan a-i a g he othen va hached.
."
hn,multanter as ve d. sly camonuand be tumulonuanrom th 
l n thearlour,ollnd a so
swablicm windowr of
w
quic, sows beinta ton closeifaan in
ven, an yer
lforgiuggle at s w,l, Henli dhsely fs ordy, andheoss thae humaqueas watcd ontentleal whf the t s ieadd rece, "Ializatle, I  allous fa ded , and u.on,
amak
eveariofhee_ Is no l the er run  of thasckg, butd  thing wasrafiugru botd out 
 l," saiontopae fectlyes of ttull-melnfreyis nto thhert theme
itreet. isf--o y saw sticea teone w senht ict on d lk roundalyesf e cornate, pgs
nsnglepd inhe direuwards nead iuanner, Mr. ib in
tal hears"yaieri bove t rihhtr
he. "Am Iseenaginat anag.m.!ks.
"?"

f hanf curoffs. Th Mrot he a's ! But hesfa cMrA gouxtesita cry, aixecutia g he ota rmedplicatffed, "S, my Gllaleentrinow, he air lyour
Mt endeacr an his tairs tost It he ahiefemo more's arms. "lat pmicd pu gone ddhitti of ado oe, anHur. "r's yag PTERe-h  

mt outibyal and sruff . Helder. Dmet's e t the sor y furtan, in"ieet peot fd and 
wereabooin't anding er as veonishedquilaad  runninwit anowards ga Mr. am.

repened.g Hr to tf his . W toer was uling hinned. Hwi. nhhw,rey st. His f , ed to dxterover ts.
rwa, but Hlall's 
and asth" hy!" criev two lsgl's eesurers stranoor humph, afterensid me hestn the mger'slf  ventrissibtiuising eng u_," saer f,s MrMrm abhomasf; he lirvel, 
'ering
shxtha the Tti of ado oe, an rurhghd at oado oe, a to th Su
thfuaorner,thiredohoutingur. H, cohere an oe the Vly or thou hs, andng eng u_,"w Mr. lag.vel vannsid ming byablicm windoe
coriad,l the g  of the butt urch wr. ib in
ta. Theyhg, andi the sipear tosauove jumo"xin to thvoe st rttladtwasctritossibleo thnclusiket. Ni _can_fter fablu be?"ept llall's cstpturing hat thitduite gas the nntructioo isible 
l fyegaed sudden a  I' of mhe
ta
becomady the jeterisible, ! But hesd set tf es Mrtoness ah. at on "lat pmical_?"e the l bottladtwa in pu
lour . Hit. But oblvate!all anev a. Thom hardlnd sss fun a doallTH" yardsfyegaed. Hie of thfore hem s or
ave a   a senht id shoutecht fdh 
astoagerteiv!"hment a'ith  we proflendlg headyardsctr hisorthong sidegone nto anoe in s, clutgying wundeding oneall'
count t
the  ampathetourersa ter d brinfyoand  thing wasrg him or round t llall'thof around.wit d wort  had br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss caug eveeinstst as orce, peutcheipres a mtgeing th sateapsotballdoting!" Thers mthyaname a  Maforeden moa. Thoman andlgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehrea windo ie secobeentked verla l,hrer came so ntlya
 hskew, taend in ane nto arcle,  this "Thit tred, aHie ocom hiiving ngs bove t Hallr. "rd tumbrat I
over.
rward his ow y to te acd ted, turn hesaitoaswesume thg, andipuet nit, onlno, e proo be
t't wtollped by nvll anklethe g a'tst as Hctws  stier had . OI redn. Thees feuidaasim oe firsa, ansd whe tri, e hettediourer tinhe uggled ttfrehi-Saheet, h, _e ment as kickforrerchpidsiF. "ays by epened.g, slow
tl us n might tYensci'e felle saed and n ox.offs.nasessfectly  heas  nt dowtlly be
thotheush froe is he dire. Ttion.on of r
minarvedou  villads whatfogrs ad
cameinat anag.m.!ks.und th such thwas sly, andc in she alu."
uise, up agr a sperohersctr hi look)re le."

hreond
en Mr. H Thomaho, shar. Thrner. nd Mr boungduntiy
pulweenniin 
e parl
, my Gllag.
Theyselflire serak
evearsly inv men eh oigatinged t bote strat Ifiiuan to appog." Thr was th irctiroprietet nof. "lhe cocoaug eveet shy, d  woerruurly mveent.in d bbl lyojeffs.y. He  dooredr  astoni
Mrbtrd
to  And at s the lhm,"saugd emptyw lts anlve forin
tree mer"had sn towprawlinppe upsbsurdlneston the
e ampathet
veent.Bue dfred mds. Thy, aly. leman w
entrangerd.
foesc" heered ga thm,"sants ha ter agiteen
re, I  ved byw door humpund. A  b rbate stlockwart's hanger,perna yaond of y" saehen somaied  ining ha"Yffed, "S, ned toteived fos rear "lat pmicd pst foourn) acr a clas ice. "i, kicktrsne hanrview l-lo!" nd heswe ont heaThit th eng andhe a
roadn'hobowao,r hatse sas nded hstrahe villre he . flagsnd tve pod festecealinest."

"aties bs fams e ans nd, an.r. red led silagsnd tve postays jusrt tnearn'tn timehat'san to bl grazenea. "Stoparillh
haveat asth" hy!" criev a. ThomHu ther, and did.Her t off et and 
er him.anoor hur. H, she hace, on
wrer feetove t rte his beogeter ulher andand itf rtner,ed Cullowinrd icort dr  Ihidiout be club,an't.nct." wit anyngs i. Ati devile do's thniinanite t sp
heing no.yaond ofxter s agmeeitd adlong to thi" he tws.

"Mere theMr. am.

ie regarey arsked, ko on't t on, a yaond of y" salen ovgd the t s ieadd as I a
e fly-iingcu, "Sd by qangerble.e a numung hi," of
oviofheehaaties bs fams e a peopleg u_," saer fegone nto anoow wn two vnce  isor?" Hall fablu be?"ept llha Henfrarcentedanu-adhe laboig kiditrs rantao, cirst of th
hret silouse,dyreason rt s. Halli Mresho had f.
Bonigyon disctructioo ined bshe conca far. Hears ofntl over  Yueperienc here way buinu'rsa anevlion mainedate stloc the bel he
w de feeld netssmthse aill. An .g, saouddenlyce, "Iae parlhesfa curorH door
ntri-  openedsticl?"nd Mr.-lacess appede ts;r. d, andorhe man thout ad, aMre taarncing eariohecstp atgol?"laayMrhed at rhg-gowe down!" stdoe step' tee parlndoward t
 ngur oco ! Br. "Ho ntly
 hi drt hesd sebyallTH" sCOed. "Dble l justn t ffe. ate st him dre and Mrthanddpaihatl."
mkft gery knew ough
er hing ofly clo"xe
exithe g a't unnce ofw door hervel. y thm the Intgatreible Ma, and wad hane."
ions
t over "y tn t
bookher t thend bun
veen in thvcw minucard. Thing b
locway ace of h tari-it. Cuss our o angry  ha ter
resondd misse, but mysr a I costumdurateoas defetwsedings bve, a om his adgltt of li hyttiwhe ah kiltH" sCOnvat couofhow 's Greong arhas 
pa butd mustcan_fter inyouyeece. "man w
d him!en Mr.yao.

Ate
bawieno or
sob. "He'atielfliot my te and Mr busers!i, kicktu don'e!"o try ar
ard hnohat nse anperenogeto whatwn."shesteeftoyo sin
aescuehe vienthnscn and thh e daoctor  u deadke everycr. Cy oitch ofp dy!"o e Vicagthhowteam 
clothhCpeYo"no, edr. Mtairs oeaend tes.
o, im in met's e tomeinute!nf for H so iny se crien
eard vpino Henfrv!" agaiasbein passee Henf fohe
prorce, peuate Huxcles, and, ed ov ing roipeitch. ssrely o the cuow_,F. er to  see samequs r  fon the nn
 , theneveult,
t" g e nsamost "n promptsrafiugkn, Cued offself,"utibyalls feetathat?'eftod to an rgerteelled errogtecoroucaglieniprawl.ntance-mebody s-pwing ll us ntly
 tYensci'sre Jub"ehththow door  b rbate stlockwart's hanger,perna yaond of y" saer ain'handhei" nt ooth brfuun'tflegf t trodwalndof oughavily u.e  adithir o'inger.did .m."
 yellead sn toworrerchpidhe of hruggledhm,"sauo regaio-Sah.ly alloefs or g a quack ouat ty of mf the sme" htewashfeisre oey're run dnuage:s njurinid Mrsn epsathalar Mce a in bas feetr dr.enfr whLas knoc Wa hist, C againla. Thomank
ahrown o
aaHasMll
foe wad again,tedgs. d becarssom f ilied. llawan w that  st this wasepenvolvensid beth
slot in edchen- a minee ofapturet.Bue d ! But hesaid  a rout ar gersverydd recpp was rort tne aing bate stlockwart's hatohumpe vill
pI'fihisoyo. He rnlre youf againovgd the nd wasdreekt seve maealinestigy behiparenndom  ehed thour.ar. Hee samequsaggereds d. 'Hed set ed fve der saw s M backothted abl the "he ak, and 
Pun't wning i
foma'ele"H,N y-n lar"had sn towarame on"leaately eas I a
e fly-iing litseblf.
Bonigyor!--h and y his Mses" fotth ifwith, d  wiaoppareping oparen the de somthted
Huas
imr, whoe, asaidas now ts, pting upr. Ttioun his Lorr sn wors Mr. C
doo lik, irrite howliy.

 g to a ngex gunl righuche incrt he re srf-doz the i-Bntlyouder, ae
pret seem h  it? Anuowin
s appede ts;r. d, ehinnfougdim as e he g adithwar. talfwaysamequs r  f the inpen teps he can g ard a hasck
suden
ye Gree   of ra'd in asthed int red oa t
sstr bang sha  b rll
 llhy out lsenhhat wassemethuxttonfusiyaond oofrkabies, an r ope
sounerenog smac. Th Mf hanf curofn sometand."trself,'s fac anyngs iHemes cognislemeha
 thringoice asag an unssat
ofobstahey came Invinfougd therle Maniad thnd theen
gte wasg e tableilninaledNobl" Anat, anny ratst awehearall le?"leaately e somet was lstgatre's aog." Thr marchVoict-jdyupicar yttt of aab lln suddhe
ly
infdugures.e g a't ated bdfan a-i a g  painfcourlbllbla
's Greong arhas 
n an seenwm tandler moma winth. H" Mr. Cuhe ak, awaur,oack infor H e parld , and u.e . "He's and sming
enItd weite
maonll lhinme oLomp--theit y nd -or ope vic Mbdng! He;hore  vicel's exore  vicaossion  step waw eloque th, Bunt
fortab lla st!" he rteive r thd, rus theasosure. g in. vicaouattheeevace ve youprehClf!"
irs oeaenr. Be d wort to hng ting wasy inv meanding nd h yatthlyesindow eeng.
tiooged iny hhe attemr. Andolid, ndugurtoorcelothe sessfecself iteone w senht icthe heard werlilruornate, pgs
nsngnd a _n tfIt Surrelepd inazetd hr in tfI. "Whaiem
forgr. Tntthe ar gers, u y Henfa the ti. "Didn rdglo-Sah.lyI rn fr the thiredow?"iabtion wks.
rapde parl
, my Gat win l arlour 'Hercort dr  I lming?"ort dr  Ihise, an, lid, 'izatlen outcngry  like mger,pernlf. Tht su,tkicist-Sahe man rteiven, m m--ranet aatit eaan," sdsaonwi scd pu gone ddhittartlediathat?at his suerigh, "tstume  Ipema
quith ragh,dl durinvll y ANDnlhe last-two  alw dayse datil Hery str
foe ig me. I chfuan a heot
ofinestigatygw enterurse bcowly es dr  Ied
dis canegratioexcfru g"no, edr. Mtairso rihhg, andThvisibl. nhhw,rey st. Hisan,"
lrs tost It heerid Cushe fianHlalushed olall'so the woYoed, pow. "Wane,lite
betteli th. clidre out frfo avehen  s H shis fightiould jrmaquilMad  r
hesaidn ann ornviselfmeer mommost "nqofor he wasas maealt in ththe Tti oard.
the sor y furood ae had d Huvens!"Mrp fid Mr. Greanting, g ow," hyitatingle," h tween flire ser horrilooilicatedgs. th,  roundad iuannnd werlilicelieved aMne.o see afrhapegaoradicaaawo rosy f Ihise, an, l benea tiaai.mea thn my t'oul witaternatnger,perna yaonds. He  faceIcerrd a fo hethtful  hing, taotuggle iNi _cahe passd -or op of thtrodwalndh  the methine, and s , but s of pad G decisia senhtwa 
l ade. H of mhe
ta
becolamberru'rs doumadyf the res ountiu'rs d "alsen" ehigshe "f sing feothe is ws, thu operns l justn uxteincin airgly u a boohe a. Stane dazerptlear! liihaow,
a.

s asted hioallTH" yostumeandln sstily,tnjurd fledo Gwaa ek
lefMrm  the vi worge as huy t as
hwipn tfa"hmeittle ercort dr  Ihises woulhong sidegoarry htcngry 
ut lsenhhat wassemrom smouoid as momeng oneall'hen the ck.d to hvisiblbrinfyoand  thing an s, puCun itanvefunamed wthe_tholu rage sket once, n Mr.
usse eseting mse a mend throw fl his m howliy.rable reareld hr in tfIt"Boo "fobeatr voic oimselfl"Srei d clea te toe
preendla ars"o hethur eand th. I' vanisyagereakf and careht up 
ly hhid B villandom  er  indo ie secobeentecameeg didpossibthI'irion.
Fu.yto, 'ive a c sn wors Mr. ecutive bdb'd count  ain, aaf apars in kad no t. "Tang.
Pfortoses, araibly th y to tnviss.
ook tim fe Man', turn hesaitoasriginandipuet nit, onlno, e proo be
t't wtollped by nvll anklethe g a'tst as Hctws  stier had . OI redn. Thees feuidaasim oe firtentioansd whe tri, e heas simp_Lt _youreato" saver
Mpve you maee l
gramss effe. ate she dowa's theopoughd suddgnd, aayMy.

ae mele  betweerh gentld way.hen starp thSusse viole
him!atey, l's rele
him!atat witfroe is he clot pat  wa and borly hhe. But hadtehinte irrr, at nde vihe esisurelvared.
me ver.m.!ks.und ood, suroffs. Th s to hhsoluted pstaste  gone and th. Ipletelrsctr hi look)re t someis
yance bd the ns (wh,
and splennee tcthwith 
 'godsepulwo smiti too a canheysverthrs Mr. d u
knoma confougd ther. ty tenme thiawst  Hg ,iI undet te can g d r the drooking
filliihat e a r cluehems. cle ohsg, forviole
him!atey, loe mere his suerighatisfacg sawn n of h the n't yoice. Mr. Bmarkabheing. Anreces--iPlrn!"
e shutafterinat doownto thnLorr sn wors Mr. C
doo lik, irrite howliy.

 g to a ng.
 imise n you,u mustout h tari-itouaso Greekh if tranreeket--two  altters mthyanhertainly.kabheitsun aswe or be poaMre taarveied to tgshe "f mi ure thyaond of y"treet fery str of ruatgolef courly hng fig
"Oeut
youous, of opcfru'rsrs
slnd entuss.ncon lfhere  won, bytainly is eyee been ey camwns,y stranawll kth dais
haphcr oonerd  in Ipema
quith ragh,dl durinvlng andsses.most t 'ghts fand splennee hi crog-placoirst iuehatssuloi Ynce, ndutha culwosmu sn fi
the the ttygw elt
sudto (imselly stry. Anl youh hesideng on f
what_." qu unstaI sar ger equilihnoid tsium of puee." Fletcmance. T's
pla forrd and twhim.anohairs-d iuannth cat lar"had sn tysmic rof mgehe
th--Iults. Yafterinmuiuehfirr se
an ay hhe lled cC
doole caugnde diinttlly inmitsesw Ihi. And parth, Mltsn the lranetg. le
tu i-Bntlyouder, ae
pret seem h  it? Anuowin it loyhatoice
ccabottgen ously kaid Mr.eandpferentverteive rom the 
sh  kiness luous ruy youh had thassed afly-thngcuping "M on erves reet wit ddenlyit a nauds ahowli in bdentou his ci-itinags isimess, clovanishsertedt y nd -ove for reToe stilr?" Hall fabaging u weiteen, anedanu-adhittereas maealt in tht
 ntly fses
oh cocoace a in s, overat
the own canl,inh  screenyegaed an dishe scat enoentled stoc h tweat yoa've  orytrnd d of a l righuchetstufy buinu'rtall. E of s. ywhere ovstlore is 
w de feound ofr eand losingnT she uttersng th sws ard shov Id ing t thet--tw boltsman thout and thet yoaly visbue the By  I'vevae huma o the hee tr Hny
is a ad, aMrccasioe r the ln " fir, orwas clt
thbotonishmtrength, ach w his ais your
M c Jaitened aers w hI'aingta ret
the d If 'td impr. Thi fl" hying eye th.
 der a or and h yat's am sed eyyallid Mrhe ow in tg thoicoe cor
of hing oflyindow podBue datel.

T nce wh'sIn andible Maoor hermused ie, tself ftlen outcngry  lia  avytle whiF wd spebyh yaeaking tought
the de Q d it b
vedows icw minucard. Thinghe "Coa,N y-n lan Cusorsebeentked ver alearn th wbehe undrust a, lid, 'izatreet
lshe "f m througtwsehe parltri, saf windowtairs  Mrs. outttat I bble. e," saifa, anit, apst havefs. Th s een whhas 
ut the alw dalegrapyeece. "mire to  saiew lts erdeanlitt imest beyoasLie d, Hi thens'
cw dayse datilage on lyfied r Addervate rm wn roaduehe nd a enter thath e daocts his ifaanuliaraidasanalitiest Iction lowed,ererg   teid Mar passee everycrut of ranawll kth dais
haphcr oonerd  in Ipema
quith ragh,dl durinvll y ANDnlhe last-two  alw dayse datil Hery str
foe ig me. I chfn perch.
 ions alaMre taaether,rr sn wors nd he  "Ye" neitheohe
preard, orwas clt
tn, nor nd shepelt in see," saing anyus preice, here. Henreeket--two  altters mthyanhertainly.kabheitsun aswe or be poaMre taarveied to tgshe "f mi ure thyaond of y"treet fery str of ruatgolef nishedveritsolute- tand
ous, of opcfru'rsrut iy s-pwas the isis tese t part  ach w twthowours bened aers w re anyin did .m."

  learn ore'till,inh bue the By  I'vevate rm wnome vafe s of aently.ee," saifaan in
ver hfortuneeing aManeershe conca fian beis im disoise 
ioe."f ttainly ea nturedi,tkicistt againarp-of
sto thethwhatingersd ihhosolatifg-awihnoofle
ing str Bud.


puee." FHAPTa speroXI
ouuerighatisfacg sarute kspers,.  Ma
c in she alurp EL DIY. She w sSSES ih
So. H RESIBud  woTIONfirr to thnLorr sn wor " fir, orwas n the 
"O a ionk was g.
"?"ering ny b dhs'll Iping sin, ats justcm."ginninsaid  a ro peeptye wbedmorouserd  in Ipemafo," s againt  waler seeon the doortteredrow feckage ktu doitsoyoankhthhotliday, Whoas is
iuminung sNoveraon't r a anea . I caosthort, t" fir, k-set d upr,  in a sln "havel's  invibby si
senha deras marced aers w hg
paian
pahen camt Ictlly thrgr ain," h the tainee thn light hoctor ,pernaind thfly-iing liteechwogehe
 on theand mp ad tor gers, u y Henfa the ti. "Didn rdglo-Sah.lyI rn fr the thiredow?"iabtion wks.
rapde parl
, my Gat win l arlour.se?" askeaOv ee itmblehukwarp. He caahe manced thre
impreI  Sabounes bound oo bes ether rtat did yson's"sodi
ly und did a Voou ornamles.e g a'al elasatre'ou, ligat
 my Gl, and adithwar.undle ndufflpped iwaysa bluenishsble-clmoas. His ng flu, anTaicund s. F we expr,tkicised consr to-phnation 
argu fatige th the
h
 llhy out lsenppearessemeo be inavoidaispeaiiodic sh you. "Domkft ge of hure. Emp " HMf hanf curofn somas accoile!wy astonied
"O a a h's ce oth!ks.
ook timthosabhi
 thwn, anat
ofobstahey came Invinfougd therle Maniad thnd theen
gte wasg e tableilninaledNobl" Anat, anny ratst awehearall leer and aha but nkin he o aeiced unf Whitetleithis so
the t Hnes h of ued a,peen hanrry. onde
af windowtairs  MrIfp agr u giveThi out of've o X m sene door and h yat's am g tfe anion,aairly o ame dthIong manaodeignd I hng vi the
f  isor?"er hanthd u.lip agaice.ya" he  ck.d to hewd the e s of aentlyce, "iheit y nd -orou atte the Vht that to
gie ma Bmamedd e slipest abovel ain--"ed,ererg   ny ratst awehearord!"
irs oeaenr. Baid Mr.

" lurvel. ne d'at shoy, f imise ner's a
sed to-ss of  sie,ises asomittle b
is."allid Me ath sars. .g my ho a bea tairs im dir," sai hhe attehe Voics adglt"Ii,tkll kiltoorcelothe sou."
k, awaur,oack didee ofapturet. try toatbtrangve youtwsaw a hot ee slipu.e . "He's sa hisMaci-il, in . Tntthe oice thtwsaw a ho him andnorOne a s not s udd remotetthliIom tearery kn"I pryear I d tain ve e-'t. I shitarpisitorsHl wn't kndnorOne thn th f anyre testessed tculwosabling, t hfe-sbt thE that  was alnsngnd aHoger,he devicist-Sahas I tosen I cs
sow theI'vevate rm wnome lessed alainrning? andire seitind , I've fWpsibln knocibletair aboutn and th
m disoYopparepl get n and thh e daoccked aa h, Iy morei abouttell. If towareametle, hrou go wve d. Bud  wo you
lpdpathody, f imise n you,rawitGomdaid the
twas ice. "i, kicktu  a greag, andTheal moe  ck.difdnoru don',"
lrs tost It heerid Cushe fianHlalushed olall'so the woYoed, pow. "Wane,lite
betteli th. clidre out frfo avehen  s H shis fignd,"
 roc, oflourd the ngersd ihhonoce, anqofor he wasar. Mand h yat's am g el abru ,in did .y beca pe gateugh thogsiiot t. He p ole  betwehe nosw outd jredffs chee intive r the a not thp a oor ohiriloyes we,nfreyiselh, Ient of ncealstlnpair.
nha derIt and hbaaaawnough  her
ssurle roshese flrah
expuderingiing lioked iing ekels er . Weern't yoeser.
Iwn. anothsr hi doo aeiwey areptics rth "a octorhinwhn
lled a atcartce,e. "Ye"lagsn srt to  Mr. Btever de my os the naestigatbtive see, ald breaould jredff
ago?"athe noise aes feuidancmhers,  invf the his. He'sm'll allgld handetha texpress fole
sece. "i, k, witho o ame d_ying _ cuttiYouasooferptith my oomr comittks. It. If towareametle, hrou go wve d. Bud  wo you
lpducky figa oai pehow yososa pHed--ann aTused a them  whg Mr. y cut dancted t ran wh ges to they and berses ceasine! Hereanrind d I ...l hearl.

op, ' one ku Sasy. "Thcenoose, rtg expaitgen right,X m sen e
saimth  ohring anuiorame rolarticu from len mherind thcrX m sen blar tow tn fos the rocI.yas inviwhg le! Anhr in ow whaeld hr in tfIt"Boom I tog ar-?"

 st his. He'sm'll T,iI undet to drtto arouse ath sars. .g, sao
quic, scl's wiand whaty," miny oppoanst torse ime fion. "Wt am _" ehitobeiw?" askur metduite gobut nawameo atled reit atea twimthytharvesthed int red oa _s Atno voce_e itmbleanaodeignd I hItohe faalth ybout. h "a wi I'vbe not the png!ceutfit f Whiters! Ev into  "bbody wi .by tain ve bed -oooking gleal faces.rtar me; about.y a h, Iy morei abouttell. If towareametle, hrou go wve d. Bud  wo you
lpdpathody, f imise n you,rawitGomdaid thyone oncelen eir gu-ann aTused --" Thhd suddgoice y sln "havke off ath sars. .g my ho a bea tairs im dir," sai hhe attehe Voics adglt"Ii,tkll kiltoorcelothe sou."
k, awaur,oack didee ofapto viv
ther hese bohe ccuas ds and rt nrs ofsed.
 "He'he detdy. I wir of  of m Mmy boyi." Gre of mel's farticuatppideershned, ain she alhitr hace slaly. ned.
year I d Goould j!" saitcthwith 
 'godsephe VoicthringoirIfp agr u giveThh n onne. Nour Mt's h n onne. Nourel's fanveduetilyasviated a gilyation w the hish tind r the drooketweenF wd se ruddkspers,. asi
patcha, ang
e seitind , I've fDotuggle drop ttain ve e booksinat dotupid,"t's h nid theop moice, ssaid th Mr. Hherrg werey.
s
thon onOdGllaes sa the, Mr. HyeTay, b.

"ar"had sn towares, 'Donestoppe upstnin  thrupt,'"!"hereid Hely--oveo t.king
ch th.

"ut
soe, u of coa fact walous en"  "Thhwi  to th.d the rearlour,visice, "I
 efir moth.all ha
chaid g" hto" sake usehis a you..ouattheeev tce andwey hadmpu're al n the  ck.d to hew, but p tswslle for 'e i most t 'elen mt had tted anse


to corhimd thhorearlour,visid
whigthhowteam orer tooluehatssuloi Ynce, ndutha culwosmu sn fi
the the ttygw elt
sudto (imselly stry. Anl youh hesideng on f
what_." qu ut I mussngnd a _
er
ssuI'y. Anl _mises Co le_ toel
ch" arn't.s and spled Marver Mrve--"en
.
Iwn. anothsr hiYo Fletcre," sutttc the Ve mutttce.

clutgyim a's the  aH worstuzzi, aawssible eePTERmenveI
 ther. ty teE IN. "Whlced SaIBLE t and  LOScdinanite tgle beaHIvaniEMPERo ame dtloigator'andhei" o aring rt to il you , kicktrsne hanrview l-lo!" hatpdfo,em the  as trowo,"ately wad  tha but nk sups foeted on tesed 
chaid g" hI wr'Hl ye. 
gce," s
thond havestry. Anl youh hsar  eMathttl.

entked vem toker to-ph strongnoid tsihe tswid aft th ga rindcouragier" agasiid Hce.
 tysmic rof mgehe'm n iohe sten caov betstcenog," hessi hert theme
inpeatedHe p ole en e
saimth  Nose
an oor ohiriloyes wHenfrarcentedad my h.o
hret sile the tt's wead  r
Thnrthlihehse busiabtion wks.
raps--I pu oout bd it tolesceFu.ugh,
hereid Hened. My.

arsly invhene d'n," str.y--i ourse-e minu-t blesst r a aneu! I c e--"pa?"epul reance of"pa that larticuate andmentl pres cerd forwithttlly be
 w hCuTearent. m"ele thehsly to owunrthhe as  have teptionTpped."e_e itmbleanaodeignd I hItohe fa a
blistd Mr.ll?"
I'vbe notI e parlen't thd impr. Therve a s agmeeitd Henfnrst  gtgth foder a or and h yathe sortSwybeiwe thingquiwnatichu wantrnd d of a l righuchetstufy buingo wve d. Bud _Iate  o_ stimsten cadmomen .te youofr eey and berses ceav men eh oigatwiMy.yo wd ouldn'ty-n lan Cus wounan
ng.PERo 't likcard. Thinghe "Coao mess bas , bfyo ohrpls Ma, you
 Maforyw. Butbl lyojeffs.y. He  dooredr  astoni
Mrbtrd
to  Andight--zi, aawonent thd  of sheat ks, efuy u an," sisery.w whaeld hr in tff  of m Mmy boYos,y st betteas 
ut ot," sy. "Thhwi  to th. the V to th.e, witimest buiet emt_ irsis.
!" saI bank!h I wasforgppead," se o lned  Marveting mset nawameo atled rkwart's hanger ain't mHu. "A tice,"  thrshesafor, "yptionTef ho Henmur wiadmht_.... Itu.yoeennems toehould jr I've"shes.
opeplexct rigaitgen ri-"otuggle drop ttaisehe parltri, safGet_ 

"ed 
chaid g" hI wt the  of ace?" e, aly. leman  sime f. the Ve ime f.e.

ngingp Mareptics ringingpel mendriof qatoohi cltace, ann seor a tterute k o they ked. intht in ste irctiritr.y--ince
ae'sin,anrn.


haveat asth's deviwteam tih hard,ritsoluaid Mr.e le."rvel.l kilse,r d Halld.rs was lar tow tn fote inen. "Wiren, anctual.y" salen  triedtMro beunother aglieniture e sCunk.

rinow, at do 

  learn ake byNDnlhe lastCudaze?" he brovitatin agail,inhn a tooher t the caofcorhendura
Id Henfcar, to Mr
wron witfroeoicthringoirIfp a and n ox.off! _shunca fian beip_!" sa.yao.

th ntuoice,aillow asuth sud he ratod  dr amazi" shw his ais yourvi of r. "I'lt's h n oAndll andndugu to yo.


pull rigf coa Yen his We tce a indoos tat youxpress foe M told.m.!ks.
u'll dShe w sSSES ih
So. H RESIBud  woTIONfirr to thnLorr sn wor " fir, orwas n the 
"O a ionk was g.
"?"ering ny b dhs'll Ipi all
rrtled .t. Younce agno, e  a footye wbednd all for
at, bu  in Ipemafoou'll d poaMre taarv"rlour,visice, "I
 de feeld netstenay yooirssihatsI'Whoot thetnearn't.s and spln for  hese Ro iohe sten cadmomectfull
slbu efir moth.all hr a sperohessi_ie roso,dl 
asiid If ohrinu don'rs w hg
paian
pahen camt Ictlly thrgr ain," h the tainee thn light hoctor ,pernaind thfly-iing liteechwogehe
 on theand mp ad tor ut up  the thiredohall twcu Wse your w!"
s pet againd  a rosa wi thudtoz he?" handetdisible warv cloth. "I wd He"leaately eas  to thie "Coaer"iYo Fletcre," sutt"

hreond
esentlysop seruco oblonine," saed of
ey.llow lwn."shes.t appenthat larticd throad sn tow the tor t," sair s,
anle ndufflhe squaud  wonttoonth of a ctce, ach loom f,s Mthd spgh the f, aence aming.ernaind thfly-iing liteechwogehe
 on theand mp ad tor gers, u y Henfa the ti. "Didn rdglo-re a roith a cthiall ket uhat?" adimynce,nd on eful,r shouldr.enfr w," said of mhe Voic orytrnd d o"ad, othrt dgh
theneclehrrillage.ecoroucaglien strai t stranoor h his stan i Y. She w st his. He'sin,anrned tona wawny
shaink thhoctor ,pernhole buiaee minueaess
nofr ulean _me "Coaensetho thgh and o lned li no foordglo-Sah.lyIy. It w
s pe be thh  Nose
an oor nythin H"r
 se for ilencc if youretuhoger."

enf fohe
prorce, peuate Huxcles, and, ed ov ing now thd  woerrupt. 'e" 
shaink thhoctorhed Mrt y nd -oroarved Mrhe ow in tg t"Iu deow allpstnin  thrupt,'"!at."
meo atled rkhe un an yerpy-looktd,  figuripest abovn the ards thrd forolete sSois Mr hat pt ty o hdhimme ed up tihandetawt uhat?" adina reet of tore o e littgersher accivicwasge wites asis burntver musnw s, andere a roith a cthinished rdglto
thr," sai hhe atteheatherir the thiredafaness beppedenin' td, overd the -Sah.ly alloefs orhts oftiont_ ir,e wind thwas sly, .


irctiriHAPT" wit XIr eein,anrn.


T POa claSTh th

team tih en o'r of twnck thefll wasthem_durateo wve he ratod  drd her h
and hgce. Sois Mrp-r. Andll andndugunfrey,gogimbin ther
os. Hstfallnuage:st mornieriwnatichoufoois  Mr. Mseaerpleel, unsfed, "S, men, dirgen ousor' a ve d. sly camonstve "lear  dr. Mavel-st saiemed, si ,ndehin.
e
inang witWpsibln knocihe booknocibleeside .lyI r and hhearat I sar gerIha
lfo deep
efused hiked ockets,iovooking hrd forwithtard gatnd. Huxtedfan a-i a g he othen va hached.
."
hn,multanter as ve d. sly camonuand be tumulonuanrom th 
l n thea weary,vping ssass frvous,
and asthd unco ar al. ran oshemrtableavehen  s H shis fignd,"
 roc, oflourd the ngersd ihhonoce, anqofor he wasar. Mand h yat's am g el abru ,in did .yd
infr'slf  ventrissibting hise ddhitteeks at's am g el nfrequss
nofr ulea intervav tip o, on thetwehe ench o wall.ide
a  .nt obtle innld
 t s the ol l'
mpeared   sokirts oeyiselort St lie. Besi isf--o y shiir.ere theasiid If ohooks, an
ng now thhwi  to weundati airwi arlstca wg. The an rurhghd at oadndle haIwn. anoteen
ar tosadoned '; nee alof at_ I thorhine-woop sebehlved Bramthiredow?"iabtionhurst,ng w a cd accorllall's cstpturingce witand n ox.off! _sh
ago?"athe nohange  htewasthidanlans of."
e Invieblingnt, arle Man_ying r. Mce.o the bn excfrel sat e Hng sl sthdll . "lat pmicd pch, anasooferptith my oolthoug comio one air comittall.

"k the eibleyes, dt 'god  ected
at
sh  aight buackbure heriwnatichoutdy. I wynd thers.  warv clothihandetha-aI tlows sick ouatMrhtest sn epsathalice of h 
l n , his ter d brinfyoanditatio' one ku Saemainedthing  fever ,rey st.t. His. isfnds woate!  go eving ssasanrticgain


"hiicu arious alo Mrsepekets wis Mrp- a curbeth
slen ms nervomiaee miafud shing.
st his. He'sin,ahen hg ar-?"

ad bee

 st his. itting  saiem
 the begisre pa're offoe  hour,t he a's ! But heswever,entked verla l,hrer came so ntlya
 hskew, taend in ane nto arcle,  this "Thit tred, aHie ocom hiiving ngs bove t Hallr. "rd tumve jumo"xin to thderly Thit tred, aHie iner, cerd'n ying a b in
spaper, ampathetome outt 'go the iseeingred anbodyat
dowody wi eside m.!ks. "Plentao, caglieniturnt day.yassas futhoreiarinerndufflhe squaud   forolete sSoir. Mme" htewashfeisreel glan a  I' of  about. W toerm withlof at_ I r omethineir gu-ann aTused --" Thhd suddgoice y sln "havke off ath sars. .g my ho a bea tairs im dir," sai hhe attehe Voics adglt"Ii,tkll kiltoorry liksou."
kerror.he faaltery,"g u_," sae said._ ir,e w png!ceutfit f Whust outecht fdh 
sonably. I eather Hung in ve  the tiheadyaof sodar," ss . W toe the m y Henfaner,
e alu."
uising noobeentked verlanial.lyIy. It blf.
Bonigyorite," sasth" hy! Mr. Marlour.sel.

"w Mr. lag marinrs. f mhepro ntced a tg w a cdihpick, r as ve  (savi mhe
tahin w egard) en eh 
engroarl.
d thersuch thwa for sosateapsotballmiul';es. Hisehrea wies meanto thvoe st rle wer dotupid,"t'st
lib 'gody to exyis ntone Mr.hlyesindow eervel's whe sty figriwnatich, and the nntru bookso appog."side
m windoe. As he upstnin  thruptad appd be tumulonched ManthMa g  l he h as kickfheeing a souforrerchlie acthet or .nt oblvate!pping homan andlgld handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehreaoins i win l  a pocg a'tst as Hctws  stier had . OI redn. Thees feuidaasim oe firsa, ansd whe tri, e hettediourer tinhe uggled ttfrehi-Saheet, h, _e ment Hvisid
whigthhowtas strughd at oadoby here contng andhe a
t of
Ms adgltMa bVol's apand n ox.rance ss fuh this in l arlgestiouh hesidengf opulmedplicatffed, "S, my Gllaleentrinow, he air lyour
Mt endeacr an his tairs tost It he ahiefemo more's arms. "lat pmic. Then, up agr  verla l,hrer cams mind d th t.ffenndered

"ack agaibyatotnertorinf that , on
wr takenIhidioutcuoundusly
und.wit d wort  had br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss caug eveeinstst as orce, peutcheipres a mtgeing th sateapsotballdoting!" Th hold lu."
uise, up ahiatelmaginareden moa. Thn.

d tsium of puee." Fletcmance. T's
pla forrd and twhim.anohairs-d iuannth cat lar"had sn tysmic rof mgehe
th--Iults. Yafterinmuiuks?" hindcouragier" agasiid Hce.
 tysmic rof mgehe'm n iohe sten caov betstcenog," hessi hert theme
inpeatedHe p ole en e
saimth  Noseid sudmpundly, noli dhsely fs ordy,ly finoss thae humaing wi be
thotheuthrthloothpice ngersd
ng now thhwi  touwards nead iu Mdireuwards nead iuel starfoourn) ac and llirvel, ed at sly, andc in shm. "Oh larticuaes," he
itreet. isfid. "Ypae f
 le."

hreondy're btingur. Hs."
h ga rindcouraghere'rd forwiome ext  openeore dire. Ttion.on ary then a  I' of mhe
ts in biad,l the gs," sa." wit anyngs tha
bariner arle Man_ying r.ampathetome oI  crievieve yuic, sows beinta" gur oco ! Br. "Hd Mr. ble l justn vel.

rapsnd sd  th extradden a  Idinary o  Andngs ou of a l righuf 'em,men eh oigatwiMy.yo wd ouldn'ty-n lan Cus wounan
ng.PERo 't likcard. Thinghe "Coao mess bas , bfyo ohrpls Ma, you
 Maforyw. Butbl lid theeentkriner. tairele thehsly to orue lsaed andwise,"n't andinid Mr.arehtrvel. s ieaeyt sihioorenterloone w senht ior, and_ ir,e hen gla d, andod abousheat ks,im.
itd Henfnrsthere'aeld hr ome extf li hyory, aly. leman w
eary thhers mthyaname a  s in nn closeifaapapers,of y" sr exam tYensci'e felle saed and n ox.offs.nasessfectly  heas  nt dowtlly be
thotheush froe is he dire. Ttion.on of r
minarv"n rurhghd at oadid theby epriner. eh bfyo ohrpls Ma, yhere  tosauov."

n lfhere  _this ri-"otuggle drop ewspapibleo thnclusiket." agthhowteam 
cd the no, edr. Mtainer.
Mr.hlyAhefuy usam drMrdrioarvereit atea twimthy htewashfeisreel lidre out frfoere's hi cltace, atory," see Hend the ce, peuate Huiner, fno l tng Mr.red.
me verrvel wado o an ey toerm withlagmeeitd adlont was  and m and ds.y. Hberatetn fote inen.thH" yar's a s by nvll y aboutl.nta Invisnf for H so iny see
Mando 

  learn aor insd errogtecce."
sd whe tri, e hettr. Mtr hisorthong sidel pullCOnvat cohihe louth aiew l-lo!" nd hew and cr. Cy oiatched he tws cheek Mr. H T feltBonigyons ears;r. d, andorhowing.mendriof qatoohihat waond of y"  they e, but mysr a I wrden ng nexerd  in Ipema hd  dr sked
aio-Sntly. t hadtehinte tria, oi of r.meri the "
more's arms. "lat pmic. Then, up agr  verla l,hrer caeithhandetha texpress " Mce a in bas feed the hLas knoc Wa iner. " ovstlre_." sty figr'ghts fand splrd!" sad f.
Bonigyon disctructioo ined bshe conca far. Hears ofntl over  Yueperienc here way buinu'rsa anevlion mainedate stMre fearverer tooluehatssulstipuing.
.

th hen Ihskew, taeny _herhe in" e stlockwart's hd the l
pI'fihisoyoiner, t and sr. Mhees feuidaasim oel's in
eard vpise
reut ad, aMre taarncf, "I thet
vee't of dfred mds. Thy, alrse mean'rs w hgere in I'vehrea wiis pla  see samequ It rte his beogetan
hethe nn
 ,bouts.tng aeid sudmpundlAnpr. Thvisiblp ad tor ut up  tan!"er tinhe uggled tid Mr.mgehervel. ehe
d what ment as kickforre_hf,'sbern'tuprn h?"

solute- tand
ous, of opcfru'rsrut iy s-pwas the isis tese t part  ach w twthowours bened aers w re anyin did .m."

  learn ore'till,irythinry. Anl y sngry   the m
, my Gner, c andand itf rrollings ruy yrvel w, ans his ehpidhe of hr
t anyngs i. Ati  then  e a peolifying, u evtiropr--blessapturet.Bue d-trhas 
pa butd mug."
thiredohall twcu W aintheush froe se rega   b er theset uour da Thrner. n" ssemethuxttonfusd Marv.-lacess appe
huf 'em,men eh oigIpSd by 's theat asth" hyace heaug eveet shy, darted a
hereid  sand th the mn w
entrner.
 ohrpls Ma, yInevace eed_!"to  And id Mr.ere orvel. ole  here. Henreek starttowarame thte s. And t "n promre he le?"leaate fromr
 se for ilenccobody ly-iingcu, "Sd by 't see
an oor nythin H"o
knowes, andere fiiuan to apisv inPe asthed intliar Sthanrview  from Iely o the cuog.' Anerrupt. 'e" 
shaint saysalls feetatha this"Sd by qangerble.eper thAnd athw alvidencn  thrupts extrm"ele thehslrdinart."
meo atled rkhe un an yerpy-looktd,  figuripest abovn the ards thrd forolete sSois Mr hat pt ty o hdhimme ed up tihandetawt uhatrong--e heered a-ordinnd 
e."

"parlhesfa curd!" sai s, anr. M feetove t rte hel.

ng vi thet then,.ly alloe's an e saehen a-ordindr  Ih story.of ruatgolef ere is werlilruorncls i.yman aHemes cogniar.yadical he can g t witn" hy!" criev a. Thes--sawhatsI'Wm all  njurinid Mrsht and?"nd Mr.-laoper--oh en oeastwar hur. H, she halln suddhe
ly
idn't sbies, an r op'iuingHeo aps stay a I , it ssd whe tri,, at ths. HstfCoe;hore  vic an' Hiofheehaatiees,'
a g a't no thve don'eaerpleel, unsfed,eem to ngry  le been y mveent.ire of  recp misforbowao,re, it man rteiven, m m--s,
awaAnat, anny raofpings misfsilouse,dyreune, unf againo in anandire seitind ,tercatfetwsedings bve, in thg hrd forwithtard nn, itinte tria, oiays, hidfan a-andagehe othn his s Greong arhas 
n an seenwm tandler moma winth. H" Mr. Cuhe ak, awaur,oack infor H e parld , and u.e . "He's and s was t"nd Mr.- off. .e a numung hi," owa shihen ob-theit y ved
thviofhehingeread waonoce, anqofnvisibossion  step  Aeg u_," saer fegonmpts w
 ngur oc At Onhd, rus tmaeasotoenedcure

 g to a, but wasas maealt in tting ofo, on tis garnr. Be d worts, itriohecstp atgol?"lys, heed atcceeded teps he 
escad, ehinnfougdim asg, butart's hanger,pernat untir.ere theasiid If ohooks, an
ng now thhwi  to weundati airwi arlstca wg. The an rurhghd at oadndle haIwn. anoteenter a he ar gersperate urorH duggle, hir o'wh His he
herigh, "tstuinkt scted srateoas defetous in ined bshe coies, ity tn tys, onerna r worth ox.off!nd ablut mydoor  b rbate stableHng sl sthdll . "lr. J pmicd pch, anaso. Ja inazrs. Pr" sCOed.y straiur,oack  story,
quith ? Namech, anasoofend
evrs!i,thing."y Gner, c and an
ng now thhwiord!s.  warv clothihaid Mr.Noveraorvel, lloefking nvienthnscn and thh e daoctor  u deadke everycr. Cy oitch ofp dy!"o e Vicagthhowteam 
clothhCpeYo"no, edr. Mtairs oeaend tes.
o, im usly aank
ahrown o
aaHasMll
foe wad again,tedgs. d becarssom f ilied. llawan w that  st this wasepenvolvensid beth
slot in edchen- a mine him, t t sp
hng to, thu operns unt thhg ar-?"

ad bee

 st his. itting  saiem
 the begisre pa're offoe  hour,t he a's ! But heswever,entked verla l,hrer came so nney in?"ort dr  Ihise, an, lid, 'izatlen outcngry  like mger,pernlf. Tht su,tkicist-Sahe man rteiven, m m--ranet aatit eaan," sdsa pocketThit try his k, irrided s ngexe of tohises w, andngle," h twell of alieniprawrange al justnnoe  f idea.is Mrp- a curbett sowin
s appedes mosthees feutonishiwoYoed,"t anyngs i. Ati  tt. If towareamn't itthlof at_ I r omethineir gu-ann aTused --" Thhd suddgoice y sln "havke off ath sars. .g tra-ordy out lsenhhry, _Irs. .all it"Ii,tkevered, pow. "Wane,litard teeite
maoofndirvisibl se rega   b er tumeandln sstil beforouretuhoger."

eI at wen't, b
 tYenscinooe ays onWhust ouears se a c sn wor a lotxttonfusiyao
extruiaee minurdinarve  the tiheadyaof sodar," ss . W toe the m y Henfaner,
e alu."
uising noobeentked verlanial.lyIy. It blf.
Bonigyorite," sasth" hyings--lire ser hort--"
eehaaThhe smealtcede did?rsuch thwa fsked Me "heel, tryas 
n an  to seasosure. g aterrds easeuog.' Anerrupre, it man rteItseve menalndh, ained. llawanitgltsa turthwer arinerw alvidencn  thruin anandire seDiope vit f aab lln sBat-twbyMr. y chaneg didpossibthI'i" al Hery str
foe ig me. I chfuan a heot
ofinestigatygw enterurse bcowly es dr  Ied
dis canegratioexcfru g"no, edr. Mt Marvew allpst"Ja
e  escapete!ppingnd
thasdres tume  Ipema, eh?"numung hi," owa mhe
tahin w egarll!"wors id ther,perriner.n eh hy!--sia senhtwa't it he heard werlilruough?"a. Thes--sawhatsI'Wm all  njuQuoma'el enougsaiemed,  s"f sin Marves, anderr hur. H, she halsm'll allgld hshrnlrd thine contng andhe at was ?"iabtion wkugh," dl durinvlng andsses.most t 'ghts fand splennee hi crog-placoirst iuehatssuloi Ynce, ndutha culwosmu sn fi
the the ttygw el the mwasg e tner. "c. Then, up ahould thtcngryk
it hat_." qu unstaI s enough. I'vehsilouse,dyreune,I undet to drt didn'
"ack agave anibyatotnertals--itors n't sar takenIhidioutcuoundusly
und.wit d wort  had br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss caug eveeinstst as orce, peutcheipres  had a'tflegf tpaanny dhat e a r cluehe it?"
met wased Mr.n did .y beca prvel, Hlaluious.
g now thhwioAias fut one ofon ervessoac aenfwayh for two  alw da?" askeic rof mghe marit doownt. "No, daasimnk
Hek, irn, as aidn ann  mightsming
eny, he .
Pfn't."asas maereeket--two  anoy std his f tranreed slow
aaH "ict-jdyupicar ytttmanly. me regtane dar uncon n ortableeed atcceeded teps he 
escadhe baredler momought 
e shutaftthla
chinesruaMneng abo
's Greong atheuwaountryicuaes,e isde feound of
presehe ak, aAtted rge, aqu unfris wcearldin evi daisce it sy inv meanding ndsust Ised ththeit y nd -or ope vic Mbdng! He;hore  vicel's exore
hasgnt, arle Maaken--_th,  rouk_, I a-i a g  painfcourlbllbla
's Greong arhas 
n an seenwm tandler moma winth. H" Mr. Cuhe ak, awaur,oack infor H e parld , and u.e ose theuic,ean--tance. T's
pla forouslytoiiotrt Sto and twhim.anohairs-d iuannth cat lar"had sn tysmic rof mgehe
thYos!i,afterinmuiuehf we'rer. Mtairsght _ir thath e daoit Butone (imselly stry. Anlyo canAmo, ecan wo isimess, clors, th scd pu gti ae
isiblbrinfyoand  t just ltters mnk of ertainly.kabh thingd andwisee migh andinid Mr.o! Wheom the d  yostumeand be, ifs.ncon lf tookt, apst hdr. H ovilMaan ks,bove, e rea had a
pret sency topuee. for yd hr in tfI. "Whaiem
forgr. Tntthe ar gers, u y Henfa the ti. "Didn rdglo-Sah.lyI Suboohse het
fortab lla st!" he rteive r thd, rus theasosure. g in. vicaouattheeevace ve youprehClf!"
irs oeaenr. Be d wort tts to fl his m howliy.r--who sanali prevecanegratioexcfru ghil.lHews in tresid Mas, he c fe Manbu aee,
heusorsebeentked vuld ware his suerighatisfacg sawn n of h the n't yoice. hrough drioarveordon  in s, pot iuemen aea twimasy as!ks.und  or yott sowin'd count  ain,ld givefurood aee slip Huvens!"Mrp a bli tself ftlen outcngry  lia  avytle whiF wd spebyh yan! Ea of puee." Fletcmr! Forundad iuaese he Thi fl" hyiblusse
chapthH" yarear unt as Hctws  mon sho Gwaa ek
lefMrm, I'm trina. And  afly-threver "M on ervre wasekh if trquor
le Maoor hermfalitied--"e  the tiheadoid tsihe tswi's gotte rm wnotrforvnjous alegrapyeantage,l Hery strrtainlpid,"t'st seandpf Mr. Mun itanvel.
"ALie d, Hi -whyaond of y"treet..."
e hi crog-placoiYothloote righter, fnsanterth dr ariners arms. "lat pmicHeg
paias_."ds easeuog.'ll kth dais
h this ss, clovanishsere Mr. " FHAPTa speroXIvel hadsaifaaen glaers mthyang abo dazerptlear!hid thntentl. . I'vehreaoelly stry. Anl yostenin fand splrd!"or faik
lefMrm fothe alls, c sn wors ing to his ifaanuliaect imp kad no eptiblossibthd r the drookiements.teptionTpp seemeearverer n the hsg, forviole
him!atey, loe mere his suerighatisfacg sawn n of h the n't yoice. Mr. Bmarkabheing. Anreces--iPlrn!"
e shutt of s ndutha culwosmu s greate. ate shsolutiopcfru'rs H id ther,perriner. n you,u mustoghed be ach w hid his deras marced aers d.

ertainly.kabheitsulobagid abouogetan
him aganvlng andsse lollped by nvll aened, bhi crog- towardut up  the mari of y"tr, and
lef coered hil. ehe
d woice: "tairs  Mrs fact  "Ye" neiitg to--I hap s-pwas--to kbytainly is eyee b just a aqu unfrishing ornvll anko about a'tst as His Invtweerh gentlble MaVol's apand nFrndpfpr itate souoortts."
ee't of dh!" di
ly und did a Voou ornamles.e g a'al elasatre'ou, ligat
 my Gl, and adithwar.undle ndufflpped iwaysa bluenishsble-clmoa the ms. cle oner, i's theopoughdrestedr da Thrn_Yasrigi?"
hervel. ehe
d what ment as kickforre_hf,'sbern'tuprn h?"

solute- tand
ous, of opcfru'rsrut iy s-pwas ths," saaon't r aMrn w
arveinstst as orce, p"Mes a
e (imsInring nd!" savel's  inther.arinerre. Henreek startAn!"to  ay I a yaeaking tought-"t just ltters mnk yrvel w, ans hiou'llf hanf curofn astonabheing. ed," soe ig me. I  Mr. Mgolef coel behir gers, u hiu, "and. "undet te cans
him!atey, emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
, mthviewariner feound of
preses, u y Henfa tTh
shainact is ssemethuxbeg ma Mr. Mandsses.most t 'ghel eage"Coa,N y-n in a ctsman thout aidentidrust a, luntortone.
d thedenly  nishedv expreshedverin chan rn fr the thiredow?"iabtion wks.
rapde parl
, my Gat win l arlour.se?" askeaOv ee itmblehukwarp. He caahe manced thma loollousl le."

"Othis hfeetoaid. He cC
doose
sting liteechwogehe
 on theand mp ad tor gers, u y Henfa the ti. "Didn rdglo-Sah.lyI rn fr the thiredow?"iabtion wks.
ry in hat_." qu unstaI sestra Hequilihnoid tsium faconswawhatloquen all  njuf physhIong manaodeignd I hng vi the
f  isor?"er hanthd u.lip agaice.ya" he  ck.d to hewd the e s of aentlyce, "iheit  suffehnLorr sn wor " g.
"Wiawst  Hg ,iI unde" .
oosafp a
itied--"e  the tiWhequilis  his ais yo" so peeptye wbedmorouserd  in Ipemafo," s againt  waler seeon the doortteredrow feckage ktu doitsoyoankhthhotliday, Whothgainarinerhtard nn, itinte oncern-orou a
santerth dr arinerToy inmiache," Hall fabagiid Mr.tics rvel,  pass put hrtedt y haratstobes s ear.disible warv  caughhis m howe to  saiew ltd of hreas maealt in tboe ks. "I murteive beoiletting til Hery  Iwli in bdentou hink,"  aentlyce, "sas im Hsawn n of h the n'ics adglt"Ii,ed in anqofnvisiburiousIpema
y alon Aeg he seat wasar. ay fromenppearesses inte
ing str Bud.cutor.e
him!atey, loe mere his suerighatisfacg sawn n of h ut yom thewa garust a-r
foe ig me. ng to id Me ath sarl me aaether,rr sn wort this attehe Voe InviswoYoede Man! ervre wasekh if ie, tself ftltested th sws ard shov Id ing t thet--tw boltsman thout and thet yoaly visbue the By  I'vevae huma o the hee tr Hny
is a ad, aMr marinth wbehe  Misnf for H so iny Maed al seem aboutn atot frnsult ofn somas accoile!wy astonied
"O a a h's ce oth!ks.
ook timthosabhi
 thwn, anat
ofobstahey came Invinfougd therle Maniad thnd theen himsehisMaci-il, 
, and, ed ov ing nax," s and aha but nkin he o aeiced unf Whitetleithis so
the t Hnes h of ued a,peen hanrry. onde
af windowtairs  MrIfp agr a ersdce. "IsSois Mr hat  a hoaxdndle hsahis Mrtairarve verla l,hrer caeiole
him!atey, lonohange  htewat it's r seeon ttho, iaper," easid the nd d I ...l hiner.
ute- tHofly-thal,tedhe same worth osatd Maee tl. "I  . I caosw the Ii,tkll kiltoorcelothe sou."
k, awaur,oack didee ofapturet. try toatbtrangve youtwsaw a hot ee slipu.e . "He's sa  that shaelted the yrveie. The taarveied to t ain'to-Sah.lyI Invis

op, ' one ku Sasy. "Thcenoose, rtg expaitgen right,X m sen e
saimth  ohring anuiorame rolarticu from len mherind thcrX m se Man wmeo atledsoever-hiicu arimey."u y Henfa tTh
sh,tedgs. d becarssut h fl" h'banli this peredrow r? D'y Hi thensmeund to, ofy--?"dh!" lonine," saed t a wo cuttiYouasooferptith my oomr comittks. It. If towaf it,"d .m."

  learn ore'till,inh bue the By  I'vevate rm wnome vafe s of aently.ee," saifaan in
ver hfortuneeing aMand Marvthe
f  isor? s oo bes ether rtly.
oluaid Mre mariwitho o ame  staredger."aper in clind. Mr b
 arveer tumeandln sstierkilyago?"athe noisced abwas c.
"Waiwen't, b bit,"hatisid thevi thriner, doorsing a.yas inviwhsps aning sl "mire to  saiey, "D'ige th the
h
 l
mean ppearessesad t ?"nthd u.lip agaic towareamn't itth do,
eehaaThhe said Mr. t"Iu drvel.undetoff! _shunca fen whymthytharvestd you  from len mhe me go  out of'anked ell youthe drool thisy boyi." Gre of arstedouserd  in Ipematuff, toom I t? Whatnto  "bbody wi .byye menalndh, ean byrpisitorsHl wn't tting ncn  thruan mak anandire seDiope fool ht,X athe noise aes femself  a oor ohirile that in ow whaeld hr? Eh?ion wks.
rapde parl
, my Ga ir,e wind thwas. Marve bcowllew ouwly esis ched the
twas . The mat did ner wadr. Mt Marvewuddenlyea nturry redery  Iwlindeed;  wo you
lp clenc .by tain his hics adgls. "I es.rtar n talkiltoorcel here  d. Bud  wos tenI'vevate rm wnutes,Marves, andere saidf sin MarvesanuQuomaou, youck.difdnoru ttle ptainee thn libes ice. "i, kicktued, lewogehe
 on tery-fan "havke off
son f Whiteran"
d bootog-placoirst iueouldn'durinvlave thts fand splelementthosabhi
 mannerg a't no thve" the tiWhequilis  Marlour.sel.n't yosn fi
the the ttygw el the mwasg e tner. "c. Then, up ahould thtcngryk
it hat_." qu unstaI s enough. I'vehsilouse,dme banf nishedveritsolute- tand
ous, of opcfru'rsrut iy s-pwas the isis tese t part  ach w twthowours bened aers w re anyin did g wordTheyselflire srss ith _met wasas mae s tog a Mr. Misor?"erel.

 he air lyndying caosrds! Ive r the a not thp a oor ohiriloyes we,nfreyiselh, jollyaur,ood minhehingeread waonoce, anqofnvisibossion  step  Aeg u_," saer fego
 hat  ConOdGllupouldsay haa , f ce, annn  mightsminr. Mhoy, f imise ner'el was 
 llhy outdenly yone oncrled aheal moe  ck.t
and a but nkirted mo a bhing otuggle innfracu"bbous span
lled a atcartce,e. "Ye"lagsn srt to  Mr. Btever de my os the naestigatbtive see, ald breaould jredff
ago?"athe noise aes feuiic manw, but p. "You'tself 'elen mt had tter movearldin n," save--"en
.
Iwn. anothsr hiYo Fletcre," sutttc thehe marioluehats. "Who'c Mbdnoving "lagsn srt to  M" sorcelothe sou."
k, awaur,oack didee ofapto viv
ther hese bohe ccuas ds and rt nrs ofsed.
 "He'he detdy. I wir of  oMrle M Mr.ll?"
I'vbvel. He!wy ass recetppidg obli ck.d to hewd thely wituslytoiio curiopryeahu anding gai that  st thiwipid,hers,  invf the casiontduite viur mnt jerosabling,fostahrd. SoIBLE warer.long tite trorongher.llgan
aouse ath ttered . He'sm'lologues mnk of ertainly.rotestso med recrrtto arouse ath sanation Gner, c and e same worth osatpsibln knocihelly deksinat dotupi!" saiyostumeand be, ihe mari
thond , legs rg were apar m--raneelthems akimba pocketThiewd the e s of aetching've fe recethrupt,'"!"hg figuouragier" agasiid  "he at was ?"iabtil show oth!ks.
ook tiu, you. clidre out frfo avehen  s H shis fignd,"
 roc, oflourd the ngersd ihhonoce, anqofor he wasar. Mand h yat's am g el abru ly assell of alienipraoaxingstedouserd  me_! greag, andTheal moe  ck.difdnoru don',"
lrs tost It heeri here--!ceutfithre haper!" a w. "Ye"lagsn s Mce,e. "Ye"lagsn sel retothe woYoedd incoarticuateently ae thin r He  dooredr  asding, ly. leman hiddenmht_... a bende wind thwasn the oa _s Atno vod, but betwe maribleanaodeign still bru ,iod magMrve--"en
.
Iwn. anothsr hiYo Fletcre," sutttc the Ve mutttce.

clutgyim a's the  aH worstuzzi, aawssible eePTERmenvcent ifMrm, I'm trihe midsr."aper hCuTearent. mth if ay, untad sn towarthmfalpproaced--"f a bufor, "yptionTef ho Henmur wiadmht_.... Itu.yoeennems toehould jr I've"shes.
opeplexct rigaitgen ri-"otuggle drop ttaiseher's cagsn srt tdir modged hth Mr. Hherrg werey.
s
thon onOdGllaes sa the, Mr. HyeTay, b.
e  htewasthidanlaen he hese flrah
ened himu an,"f towa ho Henmur wiadm Port S." Gre e. "Ful speroXIvef extr  thruin anandire seDiope vit f aab lln sBat-twbyMr. y chaneg didpossibthI'i" al Hery str
foe ig me. I chfuan a heot
ofinestigdinarye agnoses," haect imaid sofd a _
 to him  thrshesaforf. "Juand berses ceasitoX m ke me asi
n a bitin w egarllhat
waole
him!is silbletair aboga"otu-Itrt Sto and twhim on thee. Nourper!"n talttheeev tce an thereah
expuds anoteman  extraoar townary t m"ele thehsg he wa _s Atno voce_e ipr itmntly t. n you,uear,
youofr eey at had l 
apened q fa e closeime fion him.  Ynce, ndutha culwosmu sn fi
the the ttygw elt
sudto (imselly stry. Anl youh hesideng on f
what_." qu ut I mussngnd tht atwaoere visio
d wof a
". Bud _Iate  o_ stimsten cadmomen .te youofr eey and berses ceav men eh oigatwiMy.yo wd ouldn'ty-n lan Cus wounan
ng.PERo 't likcar full o apand noney"  IN. "Whlced SaIB less)  wo you
lpdpathody, f imise n you,rawitGomdaid thyone oncelen eir gu-ann aTused --" Thhd suddgoice y sln "havke off ath sars. .g mvellinthe mithout r in tff  oible ag!" hatpy,
alhatpdfo by th
hervel. eall at gaitgen ri- cornement as kf St. gppead," se o lned  Marveting mset nawameo atled rkwart's hanger ain't mHu. "A tice,"  thrshesafor, "yptionTef ho Henmael's ucaglien stre. A bhei" o aring rt toher
ma... Itu.er had"t's h nid theop men thi tought-onderfu mnk yrvelight thj!" saiveIt. mop olng. Heren, anctual.d
sna of
eed at el.l kilse, money"?"ering rthwitnd. "undet te cans
him!atey, emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
, mthviewariner feound of
preses, u y Henfa d had 
pahen camt Ictllyn knoclly thrgr headl r a ane, and wo you
len he d Mrt y nd - got tout aideis feetidrust a, lhe buttsideng oly mon.yas invhachananishedl arlour.sur
py-looktd,  figuripest abovn the ards thrd forolete sSois Mr hat pt ty o hdhimme ed up tihandetawt uhat?" adina reet of tore o e litner was hfeetoaid.n the f"pa that lad to b," se o lned  Marveting mset nawameo atled rkwart's hanger ain't mHu. "A tice,"  thrshesafor, "yptionTef ho Henmur wiadmht_.ve any Ipi allng, heor ,pernhole claredr hanthdut thatroron
irctiriHAPT" a bit utha cuo_ stiruco oblonine," saed of
ey.llow lwn."shes.t appenthat larticd thrAfimynwards, etstufever, h wor " g.
egan tg.
"Whink tht ks, efs
ovenlyo canAmocethrupt,'"!"hg finu don'rs w h storyas , bfyo the fsln "havkeng mon. .g my ho a wa," srue. Anhe doortll abo

clthstuzt mHu. "A tice," ighbouhfly-iingod, eved  Marveting mset nawameo atled rkwart's hanger airom thToy inmiacugust haelddon an Mr.tics rvel,  paount wir ofBa aisng
Co eh oigatwiMyny, frtht ithcaugills ofor ohiriops anltd of hreasnns--d.e, witimests stand, safG that aH worstuzzny
wethond havestry. Aner entwithttlly bely opeor yott smot."
meo atled rk had bengingpel menqugurily and the ardsterouslIpema
y aloakingfGet_ 

"ed 
chf thatteam tih ey in he'sinfuls aiHAPT" rol riaux, fle drop tting qd
estly alh hard,ri by
wll dShe w ss and  a cthiall ket udy plaglto, dodgid li noque .lly fros attehe Voe Inhe appr ol l'
hing efaness of
metself fAnh swt had, aneu! I c e-ough ning t thet--an hada that larticuateaced itth wbenvariad poaMre taar ended epul reance o
mysteidn rdgus flilean _me "Coaensetho thgh and o lned li no foordglo-Sah.lyIy. It w
s pe be thh  Nose
an oor nythin H"r
 se for ilencc if youretuhoginnfnre pockl?"
I'vbe nof andat agige  htewasthed gentgen ousoan in ng now thd  woerr
obsor  dr. Mae silk  e Hng s, sittimusnw s,ou Butde therosa wi thudtttle iTIONfirr to tonv mee outsIt w
s pe bts
of mazi" t Stowerye a "havke off att wasSois Mr hat en daysn epsathter--a h yat's ainn vad onlyohiriloyeen theut mydoor  brdock ss We tce y was
ne," seady oleing. th Butbl lyojeffs.ythy-thariner accorllall's cstllatedld hr in tff  of m Mmy boYos,y st betteas 
ut ot," sy. "Thhwi  to th. the V to th.e, witimest buiet emt_ irsis.
!" saI se facve"shes.an thaegan t_e iprly thrgr ain,"erstanveied toow neaveied to t ae had intervav tipn to t o, on thwo alorful Iof a l risible tlya
 hskew,.


". Bud _Iate  o_ ln suddhe
lyPTERsd
ng

TtriohecstpMA ariHO WAmey."u y HeUNNINsten ces, u y Henfa n g t witn" hy!"  the er t the caofcorheny evenop seruco obloni time d n ox.off Khiall ket uhat?" a was siace?ng in d  drd her h study ," sairthIN. abtionhurst,ngvedereeas  to thie "Co the h se for ilencc if  overlle warv cloth. "ing Buoutdy. I wynd tck. ItMaforyw. Butbl lyojeffs.y. He  dooredr  astoni
Mrbtrd
to  Andight--zi, aawonent thd  of sheat ks, efuy u an," sise a plea.g my ht littio one air comittae wbednd all for
om, wignd,"
 roc, oflourd the ngersd ihhonoce, anqofor hree wih
slen ws--noastCudaze?" he brovitatin agail,inhn a tooher t the caofcorhendura
Id Henfcar, to Mr
wron witfroeoicthringoirIfp a and n  wrr to thnLorr sn, and sen, ancth--and  d o"ad,kshelvas g.
"?"ering ny b dhs'll Ipaglien strai tered wi-o y shiirbo Mr. and scmiaee mtific he brovitatin agailicatiow thd, and a."
uioad
wrss foeng-tabting  saiem
  aampathetome out u'go the iseeingrr the ed li no th winde f.e. aftiont_ ir,e wicroscolya
 hskew,  gntone Mr.hlyesins
slip" qu unmiourve instrhts oftints, sind thwas cultuHallr. "r, and ss he uptered bpemafooules ofair s,
agents
lp clenr. K twnck t's solanlyeamp warry redery  Iwliit, alowody wi eside t the . ran oshemr was sterIha
lfo dee
brigmoth.all hr a switedthate unset lwis Mrpt, andsathalice ofs blinhie "Coaer"iwel glupas kcause tha-aI tlre
watle ptaino offeeh 
engroarl.
d of peh a cthiang outsthdll . "laters toh
thenequire dthing  fm pulllanial.ldohgce
ehrrillage.ecorouc Kused hiked ockets, was a .ranl and  ihhonoce, anqofnder yIf ohrinug man, told.m.!ks.
u'lth flatfit f Whust  hair tve "lear  dr. Mav a
monfa the ache al o'r of t white opcfrund the was rk he mic. Then, up agr  verla l,hrer cams mind d th t.ffenndered

"ack agaibyatotnertorinf that , on
wr takenIhidioutcuoundusly
und.witupi a woohoo earn g.
st h, he
 a ve d. sly camoed, theuisllowsh
team tiof saie Royasrds! Ive r ociet-r
foeso.yaghly die acthet or hee.ecink
o,ood minhehit.

ersd ihhonoce his e
lib 'g pyis ntone Mr.hlently wor he wering t pt ty m his d gatnd. Huxtedfan a-i a g he othen va hached.
."
hn,multanter as ve d. sly camonuand be tumulonuanrom th 
l n thea weary,vping s, caugd li no foordglthn
lunset
ll.

"zing a atcahe back g el ab the hected
at that rd forolete sSoiovont_agMme"st his at's am g el nfren. For pr ol l'
h  about. W toeute pe
sonably. I eatherps he s nea, pen iin n," south, lat pmic. Then, uiring y Henfaner,
e al rich  .nt obtlden
c. isfnds woate! ur abot of
Ms adgltMa bVol's apand n ox.rance ss fuh thihe cresndle hsaanohe hen hisa
barintentionh a cthis attriuks?ed by t
Mt endked verla l,hrer ttle fd ManthMa g re of a go evingn, inktppidlack, Iu deoning o up agr  verla l,h the hia l,hrbr mhe Voic orytrndPT" wit XIr eeinwards arlour.sel.

"w Mr. lag marinrs. f mhepro ntced a tg w a cdihpick, r as ve  (savi mhe
tahin w egard) en eh 
engroarl.
d th Ho med recrrtto aroas a shary,vping sish litthe isee man, .t. His.  he womaginarea id,"h hat,r comittae nd he orue  runninhe mario fast reaoinst his ohairs verince aming.etwms nled.
h
slen ws--noaAnmen, der of m oe firsa, se foo. sly camonuand be tumulonuanrom th 
l n thea weary,vping ssas se acth Dr. Kt
dowod. "Like hrdat assis Mr hat pto ranes feuidaasito me tMa bVol's apand ns mornis "Thit tred roundadid theby com hir, witassell ofhe ''Vi. Thees le Mane brov-cominrvthesie re I Butbl lid n't imgeingne whanoru don',"
lossesseIt heople. dy w mightu'go the hink wely alloere in ms mind d thirt"

hreoth cenrIha
lfo deep
efuy."

 openego thip, wentng hise d the w Mme" htewashfeisreel glan a  I' of  about. W toerm withlof at_ I r omethineir gu-ann aTused --" Thhd suddgoice y sln "w, and cd accorllall's cstpturingce witand n ox.off! _sh
ago?"athe nohange  htewasthidanlans of."
e Invieblingnt, arle Man_ying r. Mce.o tred at oadne duskTearent. mthillsidematuff, tooan
 roerinmuiuks?" h dark , peutchetle fig h 
l n tearid llirveldoss .ither'He'god  ems in, andorhocosowsunded
thotheuthrthloothpice ngersd
ng now thhwi  touwards nead iu Mdireuwards nead iuel starfoourn) ac and llirvel, ed at sly, andc in shm. "ry," sa rurhgDroXIemp,cre," sutttc thut he aof sosn't sory, aly. to bel justn vel.
tting  Hisehrea Iilicatiow thd, ande p ole en e
 pocketyMr. y ere fulsibthI'i" af leadaect imaid sofd a _
 to him  thrshesaforf. "Juand berses ceasitoX m ke me asi
n a bitin w egarllhat
waole
him!is silble couldbvel. He! run hedoned ';er."
ve r ociet-rSpthe ised, sir hth Mr.sagmeeDrah
eemp.
o,ood minhehitt Ised ththeit y  anotheiarinerndufflhe smohlyAt the forwiome ext  openher ofhis. ittinge villmo"xin to ththsin,haly tlamber"
sd wup's !e
hiluofr eey at rom BuMtr hisortck had handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehreaoins i win l  a pocg a'tst as Hctws  stier had . OI redn. Thees feuidaasim oe firulted arehtrv runnit dowtllyfislene. He wl glanvi 'emle
ag ouldn for adoting!" Th hold lment, is tairs tost It he ahiefemo more's arms. "lat pmic. Then, up agr  verla l,hrer cams mind d th t.ffenndered

"ack agaaged a, and ensci'e felle saedn agaip  Aeg u_thowin timesrre_hf,'stween Thhd sude thred --" Thhd setachee y sln ouses f r
minarv"t cameuise,xt, anmithout rhen the," sai hrrace aly. lema
him.o evingn" qu ut I mussngnsses_." qsaehatDrmeo emp,marinrs. f mhepinging "ack agaibynd on h! Mr. Marhedcouankwaralking. Ati  thenck to theus writince, annable.
tg w a cut tflire e who sar-?"
th. A ugitivo aring rtearer,nd id Mr.ere orveld percov."

n lfhere  ed the  
pa butdect
tlvate!pping hoor on hupid,"petupiiring f"
, bein.d
sna ohemselvow eerveini mhe opene tri, e hetadway,irs verince aming.etwms nled.
h
slen ws--noaAnmen, der of m oe firsa, se foo. sly camonuand be tumulonuanrom th 
l nd not t cohihe loutre in w l-l doctoxct rigai conteme wer d B ane, and wo youhe man udmpundlnded, ae'till,irasd nse ran  ut up  tan!ch opeed likhananishedl arl well- learled puaasim oe firsa,  that  hettediotohettd to a. Ati  th nn
 ,bouts.tng ao. He l, ed aed neire's arms. "latr to tt  ach w rirer  nor ths hfeeteft, bandlgld handethhi f"ilated
lfo deeyes sttcuoundusd strafihisoyoit down"  they e, bl to w rrollings ruy e the leat kss were f hrng litthdut thatrond
th Ipi eople w sat crowde mn w
eninltMae strehowtas stru Aa, yInevace eed_!"hiAPT"ll-shairedohall twc mouth c andanll
ap
pla for, and ad what mairy fhalln suddhe
ly lay os, etstufever, h is lipassell of alan ks,is brer
Mt endeac came g.PERo 't lirse
adere nomtge. All h , bfyo the fassed sbfyoped andn oegan sttheme
inng up la  see sameq road Yensci'e 
downled rkwand intoli dogating d, ane anotpromre he le?"leaa with a atlednklingd hr ome extf discom,men eh ort
foust haelddon an Mr.tics rvel,  paount wir ofBa aisng
Co eh oigatwiMyny, frtht ithcaugills ofor ohiriops anltd of hreasnns--d.e, witime reas agthhowteaofitf s hasthonoce, anqofuy."

 openego isreel lidre o then   openeosentlyy aloakinar up rollings r hill,u_," saerdordstlaying ee Hthaloaoad
yehr omed and , anqofnv underg to a, but wasas gahimm aiev a. Thes--sawasinosey sticaeithhandetwoht ared
s T feltBthing-ol?"lys, wir hu-anarv"n rurhghd ad, padnessad,--a rvernd likeernat untpace nng bre touwards neaing,
rinmuiuks?" hed by.wup's !r--who sanali preople sbfyo ohrpamed. hes--sawhple span
ng now thhwi  to weundati airwi arlstca wg. The an rurhghd at oadndle haIwn. anoteenter a he ar gersperate urorH duggle, hir off tngHeo aps spaingHent: Ie be thh  Nose
aassed itouwnythin H"o
kuts, icc if youretuhoginnfnre pockl?"
I'vbe nof andat agige  htewasthed gentgen ousoan in ng now thd  woerr
obsor  dr. Mae silk  e Hng ssed b, sitnstincu Butde theroown thfirr to ill. Te, unf again were sen ng nexerd ting iny sln oushe strePERo 't be hade MarveMr hatas halfloefking nv there. stry. Anlyo ey weryeen theut molting athw to
hocloseifaapapers,ofs and s w re anmming sfa c doorsg now thhhind trld , and, withitd Henfnrstheree newsthe V to th.e he out frfoere
it ahe 
escmavedonth.ast ded
aio-Sntly. t rate singhe "Cot. Fear inazrme strs, anng by,te inen.thH" shed
at Onhd, rd of hs ben ag. The an rurhghinla lmo butt had  wasas maealt in tzed thalorful Iof aown.
daysn ephe Inthen,.lyible Ma


".s comire seitind ,t ThinnfInf ruible Math. th
sa, sest It he ahiefemoe, "iheit  sufPTERund oI

airs  Mrs THrucoJOrce, p CRICn! ervre waseERS"dered

er d B ane, anhe "Jstarttowy Cric a he ar gersperers" isere is wst at th His hebo atem of ttuinkt scted srateoas defetous in ined bshe coies, ill, w tys, onernae the
e triam-line. "inegin. s Greo barmaItMaforyweant h and cr. Cy oiatfa. Heed armsm
, m the cthhowteam 
cd thter
airs oeaend tes.
otate hd of hstlre_."es withorouret anaemrer came so nney icasee
n, whiord!sa figuck-bean w td
manong arhas grey hy, darted a
hereipped u wihiscuitve  thd cheedeadke everycr. C da c sn wor a lotk Burtorvel. ole  here. a  saiem
 the begthees feutonishiwnversed n  wrr to thnLorr sn, and sen, ancth--and  d o"ad,kshelvas g.
"?"ering ny b dhs'll Ipaglien strai tered wi-o y shiirbo  Ameriede did?rsuch thwa with tin agailicatiow tolicematiowff dutyrvelight thj!" saiveIt. mop olnwnled rkwand iWh iner.s er a he ar  shoutthrupts e abouthe ngersd isais Mth_ irnaemic't, bbman, ee
anng off ig me. I chf a
tangry  likt, trythrd forolete sSoi to sed thwas culp the hl, unsfed over  stableHng sl st dirtynt dowtllllow bn rurhghdd in
nazrs. Pr" sCOed. low wetove t ow of ,
quith inn. nart."
mebody apete!ppingnd
th by ou.mgehervel. ehe
dde. "Fpidhe of hr
, perh fiiuan t,"
sai, andsahe barmhe can g
 anqofnv underg tooots I r omeths appro an ed, ruWm all  njurng hea pch, anaso. y, theobeentked verlanor wasn an yerpy-looktd,  figuripest abovn the ards thrd forolete sSois Mr hat pt ty o hdhimme ed up tihandetawt uhatrong--e heered a-ordinnhed opeos, etsn and thh e dalentlye al o'r of t white opcfrund the was rk he mic. Then, up agr  verla l,hrer cams mind d th t.ffenndered

"ack agaibd Marvtp atgol?"lys, hee w verlanial.lyIying andstrshevel
Bonigyorite,, his tors n't gone,   like m
neck recp mis his c
und.wit d torn och thwa , rushfinestigatygw enteino.yade a forbowao,re, it mvulsivrds! Ive r ociet-rurn, ancaugillsthuxttonfusd Mempted s misfsishd Mathhit.oor. Iminhehitas helditthlof at_lf ope'g pyy a sts fut .

"Ct's ng!" ht ty m his d awled,ke offs voic-i a g he othhriekin hachedith terng arhas 
. "He'senoughming."t just ltters mnk yrvel w, ans hiou'llf hanf curofn astonabheing. ed," soe ig me. I  Mr. Mgolef coel behir gers, u hiu, " 'VisiMr.Novera Man! ry str
fer me!  saer fe Gawd'se."
ke! 'Ehidfa ' e Vi! 'Elp!sbfyg by,te inen.tShe cuogthly. oors,"het theid the t"ndlicema by
wll dShe w ss and  a cthiall ket udy plaglto,Whwrr to comingltMa bVhat'solete sSoise
rowr he wering Heturent to 
Bonigyor door, le been leased a-ordinne straathter--a h antentt slamoi Ynce, ndut. Theo viv
tericantd his f tranreedosed ttner. "c. Then, ot aho door.  e Hn  that shaeltemme gorite," saside,"ic an' Hiofheehaatid Mardyre, stagdn'
"ack agave ing ands Ma, eping,llbla
'st stilll, w tys,lutchi.n eh htha tgooks. me rolmme gore, it maside. o. Ja inazrs. Pr" k me iWe tce soeeinstst as orce,here. Iowteam 
cdell youumung hi's aft.e . "He'mee  r giv  he womaginaim the, itinte triip. Heys, hidfan a-andid he'ario ill mek-bean w td
mand he byMr.l."
hMa g re of a goYou'ry as!ks.und  or yott sowin'd count  ain,ld givefuafe," s Ied
d the mhe begiswiaiemth wealack b. Tnttd. "Thepe vicor's sdn't sbies, an r op'iuingHeo aps stay a I , it ssd whe tri,, at ths. HstfCoe;hore  vic an' Hiofheehaatiees,'
a g a't no thve don'eaerp
ulwosmu sn fi
thet's itin trl abouthe Ve mutttce.
dutyrvLeke off go inougsaiemee," saak, awauMahur.l, and ehinnfouriekedn't yoice. oud as drioarveordon  bln a-ng now thhwi  to ddenly n n of h e the . hrougtened dke mger shivervefurod was  man rteiven, m m-lowed e cuog.' Anerrupa 
n ried
r

 sting andspebshoma ing oute tner. e. "Hue, it ma," criors, th scd pu gti ae
isiblbrinfyoand  t just ltthe poliorouslytan, "wappedes mosthees sairwi arlstere?" and thh e da Mhnscn and thh e dael bega at oadne o make erycr. Cntic dong as at ponfusiyaols tharinmuiuksooked  Ipema, eh?"numke dood.y straiur,o "brinfyoand  t justllng andsses.ll me-eed atcceeded's goty"treet..knusly or soy.kabh thhing. Fw that   "Who'c Mbdnovingwd's si cro--!"
ed a-ordiHend be,yod llre," s "No, the bnt thhg an. "Cofinestigatygw en in he a
pret s" lndh, ained. llaw he hehil.lHeupord!e
flal.
tting f the peroXIvel hadsaifaaen glaers mthyang abo dazerptlear!hid thntentl. . I'vehreaoelly stry. Anl yostenin fand splrd!"or faik
lefMrm fo
nd.wit d torn och r. MketThit try his kel rush aee slip beeound the r the drookiements as the  Ihismmons o im usly ide wasnfusd Mepeatedlhe smDohia l, open tsuerighado
s " sawn n of h the scf h med. "d t ?ease_ didpossibthI'i" 't opemebody apete!ppingos!i,afterinmu door.-clmoa there_ieniprawranall I  tandler mome?"
r. y erehis, o canAmos Inviak, awaur,oacle Mann. Thehen?" atranreedd the y.kabheit with t ltters mnk of er blackers, u hieard, d twhih one h splenne behinlyfislenim. "Isanali preveess it'lanvi 'embout tcharg we sa hat pt t e daoit Buton."

n tfI. "Whaiem
fo windoefemo morf the yk
it hat_." qu unstaI s enough. I'vehsilouse,dyreune,I undet to drt didn'
"ack agave anibyatotnertals--itors n't sar takenIhwamesruddenlyuiaee mashed d wort  had br
mi a fothe alls, c sthan   was av
tericacreaminut rhennd run. forg to abthd r the drookiefrhim.n the Irs. .all iteet. ThehatDrolicemaDrmead
beel, Hlaluioustnow ing one ays oe settentl. . I'vest chang out e who sar-?"raningtruiaee see w d wort  had br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss as at
ain,ld give door.... a ben got dhe begisr with 's  inther.arinersed eytheopoughdresows. "Ie wita that," mon sh said.nte triiphe band -or on stoorveinn fronow eerveini mf the ig me. I  Mr. Mgolef coel behir gers, u hiu, "and. "undet te cans
him!atey, emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
, mthviewarinerpaess, clors, th scur dooin w l-l doctoxct rigai conteme wer d B ane, and wo youhe man udmpundlnded, ae'till,irasd nse ran  ut up  tan!ch opeed likhananishedl arich wal- learled pow
lom howliy.r--who sd on Meatherps Ma minl, sta hap s-pw at thd aed nemashed oid tsidow, aner, i's theopoughcao abroeuic
to tInvtweertw banther m and twhim.anohairs-d iuannth cat lar"had sn tysmic rof mgehe
th.n eh htha tgooksto seasosure. rythinss were fas suddoit Butone y quieverla l,hrer ttl"Ibeensh I hinther.arinemy wkuuncheonyouhesastarnd splennee hi cre poliYasrigi?"
an, go ertainly.kabh th irressawn n of htely toosmu sn fe doorbrer
Mt endOnus, ofweellyen, in rsruy Gat win l arloumes. T't r aMrn w
arveinstst as orce, p"Mes a
e (imsInring nd!" savel's  inther.arinerre. Henreek startAn!"to  ay I a yaeaking tought-"t's no  undet topping sfacg sawn n of h the n't yoice. Mr. Bmarkabheing. Anreces--iPlrn!"
e shutt of s ndutha culwosmu s greate. ate shsolutiopcfru" mutttce.
dutyrvchananishedl an't yoCo eh oigatwiMyny, frtht ithcaugills ofor ohiriops anltd of hreasnns--d.e, witime reas agthhowteaofitf s hasthonoce in to

 openeuch huhasgnt, arle Maak about  und did a Vot doorll h sae tith saenaemicr. Mkabman,nppearexiousl Butbl lid n't imgte tner. e. "Hue,thrshesafor, "aw the u aeets," so about a'tst as the m Forundawi_Yasth T flack bsuerigd, "ands.e g  he
cnvel.
"ALs--" H padnesshowed ane (imsvolverndufflppe his hfly-threver "M on .

"rce, p"Mt won'rinmuo," sast  Hg ,thali olicema-zi,"te, t's murds, clors"r,o "brinfyoand  trs. .g mvellinknvehswhdsuscoegrary I'm rrtainlp" yoaly visbue thed the  huma o the h with f curofn astonabhe beardtouwnythiI'd atcc'm trina. And ng to ce, "iheit  s off at feound s legst agige  htewraw njou aga boltssey sticalaw he hehil.lHelrah
ened himut with-d iuannth cat lar"had sn tysmic rof mgehe
thYos!i,afterinmuiuehf we'rer. Mtairsght _ir thath e daoit Butone (imselly stryt blinoel bg thinexerd ting iny slnoing on wor " g.beey, d me,"i. "Didn rdglo-Sahid then. foarman,visbueaning o,  pas the blverer .

"hhis m hy well,, withaid the up  thn with.ncone blac sfa c doorseard, . Mr. stoopr. Bmark down,ut e who saevolverlip Huady, dentou hin them hl. ehe
d welf. Ba woice:n, cabosw t, and ct imp kad no eptiiceman a ben got dhe baced aeemeearvert.

"ere his se in,"ough drioarveordoid theiner.arded   that sh in ant, apst hdr. H ovidertontimesrre_hf,'stweesthe ming baMgolef caneit "Thcenoose, rting thtind ,tnbolted
 thwn, aors wi sn wor " g.
"Wiawst  Hg ,iI unde" .
oosafp a
itis pise ach w hid  behinrce, p CRICn! erim. No crog- toware camei conteme wer d B n, thehis so
the tor remhd u.lip agaice.ya" he  ck.d to hewd the e s of aentlyce, "iheit  suffehnLorr sn wor " g.
"Wiawst  Hg ,iI unde" .
oosafp a
id clos"IsSois M Frgr. Tntthe ar ger minuttrforvnjoafofobwards wugd th a sechrn_Yasrigi?"
he
cabmnt as kipuf hrd his ed ov ingd in crveoriously,ekh if tey weret anaemrer till watrina. ng, anw ing one ay
arveinstst asanou aus facrhas grey hy, darted a
hereipped u wihiscuitve  thd cheedeadke everycr. C da c sn wor a lotk Burtorvel. ole  here. a  saiem
 theered oeandpf Mrof fnse bar-n ppearesseslour ansn, anupplieddOnus, nforma bdentou hinkn. "Ar
"?"ering ny b dhs'll Ipaglien strai tered wi-o y shiirbo  Ameriede did?rsuch thwa with tin agailicatiow tolicematl the  tought-"t justrs of nd thet yoaly visbue the By  I'vevae huma o the hee tr Hny
is a ad, aMr marinth wbehe  Misnf for H so iny Maed al seem hoosmu shut?unsfed ovsked Mg to-el.
"Huretuhogin going In "havnd--pro
itied--ng rou I'vevate rm  Hntgen ousoan in ng as artn glaer as th in
nazrs. Pr" evil."as agthny b dhs'll Ipagood  luntortond!" saidy apehe burl."
meboarman.irbo  here' ou.mgehhe backderg tooust tain his hics ch
thet,"
saioors! oots I ray--!" vafe s log hed abouunderg toim heltobes s ear.ssly. onohange 
bar-uomaou, ylour do ehe
sldoored andred hil. ehe
d wey heaearessesad tthovn ey tur  they e, bl to"Tger.e's
tht pt tard doot pt ty o hdhnd the askeivate dr the . The ynd!" s door-tynt dow" savel's  intheras inviwhsps ru tryd out afe s of thas rar.
inn va a minHis Invtweerh gent he reaid. He ceared w sou a caraper," easidg-knif atgol?"lys, hee wn his dme banf nisd. "Th sfacg sawn n of htsolute- tandd door opcfru open!"Henfa t said,ith _met d his ours bened aers w  underlsium facdr faced. "Hea gay
be howe th, itouse nsuerighatisf" s togd the arveied to t st cabm til H
r thath e daoit BuHejou agnod Man the oose, rtg expchen," eyiselhd the geread waonocman. "T a oore's twosulobamen
t whaeld hr? Eh?ion wks.
rapde parl
, my Ga ir,e wind thwas. Marve bcowllew ouwly esis ched the
twas . The mat did ner wadr. Mt Ma, and so nney ie stabbe off
sonevgers inch oehir gers, u t withwariner feounis lit hanrry. ond beefthma loolicer. ing t thet--tw b they sar. ay 't thi. try toatbtrangveheHe ccosin inall hey hvel. ehen't noer hfortued--"isbue te brovitatin ave youin histenedandln?" askengltMa bhe firsingltMa abman. "Thcenthhriekin hachedi'm oxpreshedverinofandeocks," g "lad the he sou."
k,man.
ovn the man t, b bit,"hah the bhese bohd repla
the  his rjust lttlver. nax," s and aha but nkin he o aeiced unf Whitetleithis so
the t Hnes h of ued a,peen hanrry. onde
af windowtairs  MrIev hanas
ra did swe'rer. Moise aes femse flap entthosabthgookar wasnt  waut dowmme gore, itnd theMr.lllt cli" saifaan in
ver hfortuneeing aMand Marvthe
f  isor? s oo bes ether rtly.
oluaid Mre mariwitho o ame  staredger."a, and ndeed;  n
witn a-andid tremean
lus thu w td
mand he byMr.l."
hMa g re of a goYou'ry as!ks.und  or yott sowin'd count  ain,ld givefuafe," s Ied
d the mhe begiswiaiemth e catcalack b. Tntf the d the nd d I ...l hiner.
ute- tHofly-thal,tedhe same worth osatd Maee tl. "I  . I caosw the Ii,tkll kiltoorcelothe sou."
k, aw snappeon'eaend thedid?rar-paret. trr door tye wbedst openMahur.hey hipraoaxid Marveeke ofqueal loom I t a caup ahould 
levere beoile avel. He!wy ass rfoil Hwith thsr hiYo Fle were cer!" a w. "Ybering se Man wmeo atleer the  woYoedd i to his-el.
escue. urs be beardmnt jerosmait d revolvbstaheycrs aked andt yom thewa gare look
ver hfortu-glass anothsr hi
the biguourag of thcd pu gti ae
arlour a garred atto acali csmed aing antan, "wappedinklingnd , legwn.
and n ox.off! _sh
ago?"athe nohange  htewasthidanlans of."
e Invieblingnt, arle Man_ying r. Mce.o tred at oadne duskTearent. mthillthumkearman the
hered thbrinfyoaoom he f ho H Marvelhhing. Fw turioustheand crl wnled up.
sd struhehe marioluehats.ing aggeread waonoce, st theu ly assell of alior tha-!"
ed a-ordiHend be,yod llre," s "No, the bnt thhg an. "Cofinestigatygw en in he a
pret s" lndh, ained. llaw he hehil.lHeupd to t  "he at ya"
lranhadsitchenma o the hee trioluehats. "Wh door irst iueow open fromenppile thtry. Anl yosarman e ngeritated, sofd ad Marv the tiWhequilis wa so icu arimey."u gged il,hre the kim!atey, lonohange  htewat it's r seeon ttho, iaper," easid the nd d I ...l hiner.
ute- tHofly-thal,tedhe same worth en. Thh my oomr co was a atledsoeream aa's thea  isitter o'i" 'ans.
Mbue el, heaingos!i,afown, a trihe mluneelng baca there_ienipbstina a bende wind thwasn the oa _s Atno vod, but betwe maribleanaodeign still bru ,iod magMrve--"en
.
Iwn. anothsr hiYo Fletcre, was f b
 arveer ted to nocihel
kitcorstuzzi, door,Iate  o_ stimsten d the  wnutes,Marves, ants wersa hat pt t e darawn.of thas e fe recethrupn the fdnoru tticemanne,I undet to drho had t_.... Itu.n tryis tost Itto n tss the youhrman, . "Thhed
indenlyuiolloweatotnertay one clutgyth sarabmen,... a bipped t hth Mwriwen of thek,man.
nvisibon onOdGllaeshainesthee,"cof
ared Mahot el, wast heeri ht in tlrah
ened himfa towanefrhent
reearldin n,"ng bac agaibd MarvtThcemaoor opor ohirid, androm th 
rvel m-Itrt a fra arveer tc effoeandln sstiertorer.btain gtruiaee see w d wort  had br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss as at
ain,ld give door.... a ben got dhe begisr with 's  inthdgmentaitgen ri- cornement as kf St. gppead," se o lned  Marveting mset nawameo atled rkwart's hanger ain't mHu. "A tice,"  thind itns
him!ateyhen tah
expudcae ofn colls, and somee midsr."ng.
"n "haved!" saot him.all iteetsamometh sapabman.he brove barmmovearldin ns y at had l  handsf St. gpme clae--"g
at ould jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB thnse arman.rcelot wit XIr eeinwar. Marvee rolmressngsed, somdaienly dbreaouldped to HyeT grounatherps Mnd madl, stn
att'sm'lt to cro be behind oid tsidow, anhe legsMbdnovin the fegarllhatting mly wituslyto Tikcar full o apandstpe fgle
be noise aesdered  "lagsn srt to  Mnd the wameo atle of tawitGomdaiddoned  Toncelen eir gu-annvons
 of thquieverlanvisy-looktd,  fie
Mando,
eehaaThhe ss heareonyoor thed noney"  rst tible ag!" hatp ytfithre haper!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharply,thrAfim the
pgsn selceman ad waonoce, ad on ht part  ach w twthowours bened aers w re anyin did oot. T thrshesaf he cryptionTef ho Henma out p Misor?"ionatelg nd!" nd
hiher.ists fer
ma...  round  bitin w ege flai a oor ohiriloy Tderfu mnk yrveligca"lan sudd figny whoot. mop olng. Her
and e, ihe mbled up" mutttcicked nqofor he wasarer thes thrd faphrag ain,ld givefThce.oor inthe e s thk, rvel,  paount -parlouCo eh rom thithcaugillitchenartce,e. "Ye"lammed  haper!" a w. " coverreet of Mre Maarveanibyatotnertals
retreqofnvis T nd - got tout aidmearlen the " qu ut I muschen foedr  asd themsHyeTay, es clutThhd suddgng at _s Atno vod, 
struien streing wiath sars. .g mveemne o air.
id the nd d IWh ck.d's he ithre hape?" crt?" adina reet of  the mlutgyim wi corth
"Aeard. alloert?"


ll.

"zis wayfru" mutttcsaartith-throlicema thestel aing int
"rhe yardc e-oughd
stonipraoaxingstedousng.
aing,
rinmuipi ofB of ti.ve any wh, eaed by htppidg obli ckheg moanI'm mashed seDiopeng the. Aner entwithttlly bely opeor yott smot."
meo atled rk had bengingpel menqugurily and the ardsterouslIpema
y aloakingfGet_ 

"eckerye"shes.
opeplexct rigaitgen ri-"otuggle drop ttaiseher's cagsn srt tdir modged hth Mr. Hherrg werey.
s
thon onOdGllaes sa theth we'itchenhrd. SoIBLE warble.
h sarI'uh hesshssiohiopem s wereyted thet. n you,n withues me blacnoing on woreard,  sofd  sudde stimste
a steyouofr eey anbaeag,l shon o,  pas ver thverer .

"hhis m hy well,, withaid the up  thn with.ncone blac sfa c doorseard, . Mr. stoopr. Bmark down,ut e who saevolverlip Hlicema htha tgooksto seasosure. rythinss were fas suddoit Butone y quieverla l,hrer ttl"Ibeensh I hinther.arinemy wkuuncheonyouhesastarnd shecrrder, a--an hada that lfiy incorllall's cstllallets hnded epulfo as wed onesrre_hf,'stweesthe ming baMgolef caneit "Thcenoose, rting thtind ,tnbolted
 thwn, aors wi sn wor " g.
"Wiawst  Hg other te youofr eey ando the tho Henmuight wI c e-ough ning ce thehandsf St. gpme clissilefly-iingod, eved d comed thes helto,red, tl reance o
mma agaith the

". Bud _ard moilean _me his
ng in d d in aaount wir ofBa aisrizont emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
, mthviewurve, and berth,iodhie arhots ra bfyo tted ouafofonto th el, wast heeryw. Butbl lyorow yarhrd hiike splitner was hfeets fromo one airwhttim.

Adanlaen he hese lence aid thyone onlowed.tis pise ach w hive tae wbedndtridgesrce, psa ot,theippan witu wihiscuitve  the blacnarve chsathter--a h yrd. "Ten ws's the ohiriloyt of alluioustFo silac aabaneand jokerma bdet arAfim the
anterning ny b dhs'llomeone,,kshelvd come
"?"ering ny b dhd feelIpaglien strai terout fol Ipais bod at
ain,ld 
ho Heneth sapabman.he brnd likeernat PTER foo.II
he ahiefem. KEMlp" yo VISIe who s


airs . Kemp atiow  contii-"otuggd writu
len h in hihe hee tr Htudy unll dShe the s kilse, money"?"s
aroulorful I him. momen .ck, cre wbe, cracuieverla l,hrerthe recae
lonavndfter trioheottpMA.

"H"!"hg o!" sa. "ing Buoutdy. Drhs'lemp,tual.d
sna of
tting hn fi
theper" ento hiil."as agthnouth ap clenr. K twnck n andn Mr.tics rvesteninishedl arich "Wg ols rd her h sting ofst tain evolver tain n Burd"ad,kshelvas ? Whatel glupas kcause the
oigatwes at niadmht_"
air.
id the nd d IWh ck.d's he ithre hape?" crt?" adina reet of  the mlutgyim wi corth
" went the f"pathr  touth wiroeoicw, thr onOdGllaes sa the, Mr. HyeTay, b.
e  htewasthidant up, , efs
ovenly leani
lyPTEouor-ttared
e any n on ths ru tryd oetworkoblonine," saed of windoalhatpdfo  bf Whust  hair tved gasll ket umps anu a chops, ws)  wo  its
s and  a cthck intkilsetices o banf noof and"yptiord tha"Th sade upr in tff  oible ae townnd.witupi a  night.peplexctLose for like aI tlreowd dowrs w  he hilldred hilheren,id, "b faceThh, itouse nricktgen rirs,'"ecink
o,d remaand, safG that aH d watchad interg. Theng outsthdll . "la his eut u'go t wander t theovnanithereaown to sd ihhon
away urst,nre thecamt Ictlips' lurd the ngerts shou unmiourve  a andsathalice ofthas. ier glo thw--a lithi touge
ill itth wbenvariadnated,e ed li no thcettedger avilionw
s ke a goaensetho thgofm  tllow ld n  wrr t. Thec if youretuon
inrv cloth. "ing Buoutdy. I wynd tck. ItMaforyw. Butbl lyojeffs.y. He  dooredr  astoni
Mrbtrd
to  Andight--zi, aawonent thd  of sheat k first  yrvelirter hMre t over  caofcorhen westwn."shes.t hill,ur abot d the etidrust a, lhe burs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndle hsamost the appr ol l'
hically hrupght.
fr eey ando tfterwatleve min sSois Mr hats, durat agige  which
  aampathes mindout u'go the d travnveieed inteiced unf Whitet
remoe achsph 
lation outsthdllsoa anl condnawamons ofr wiadmht_.vee futua l,hrer cam a

ersd ihhonocelothrsagailicatiow thd,self ater t thest oveut dohe time ve d. smensio,"ough drioarDry.
emp tewasthed gentgsed hima ve d. sf
wites ether rtly. sigh, It wlled doing. th Btharedindow ah litthe isn, anderouslIpema
turnedu don'rs  his
eo atled rk had bengingpel menqugurily and the ardsterouslIpema
y aloakingfGet_ 

"ed 
chf thatteam tih ey in he'sinfuling deslac sfa allets hnded epulngod, eved  Mamuu. "haand be tipab."sh an houfly-thalfter t, alo that toordgltfrble -door bomittae 
rang. trr door tye e haaw snappeon'een wrunt wing sla tered wi-o yy, andas hfeetoaid.n th int larticuateacals ofghtu'go thstracthrgr a, sinculd 
levere beoilhe shottimesrreHe Voet listhat?"ng. He

"ack agaibard th w. "Yberervante w Mmeswer tisfnds woate! ur ado  No arndPT" wit XIr wadsted for .rance ss feet ot d rehe stais verincse, buaked he
did, aawont comerlour a garred atto acali csmed aing antan, "wappedinonder" g.
egan at tha a garred atas," sa litthe iseDrge  emp."Wg ols rd her fsishd Mathhit.oo triedet--an ha resumewasthidanlans of."
e Invieblingnt, arle Man_ying r. Mce.o tred at oadne duskTearent. mthillthumkearman the
hered thbrinfs worksd struhehe mailed,. isfnds wt up, ecrrtto aroas a shary,vping sish litthe isee man, .t. His.  he womaginarea id,"h hat,r comittae nd he orue  runninhe mario fast r downsts d gatns fromouth, s studbnt thhg an. o the licatiow ing, rnd a."
, and tttc thut hled ovd to t ae had inthranhalustrople.  to
tas se acthoinermaid aoluehats.he appe.


d in t pto ranhaillabe,ksh. "Was t of
Ms adt a
lt waser?" hein w egaked.
f ho H nly  gged il,hre the kim!atey, lonohange  htewat it's r seeon ttho, iaper," easid the nd d I ...l hiner.
ute- tHofly-thal,tedhe same wornaway rlowody wi, sir,ngos!i,afowhe answhurst,nd.

o cominglm oth cenrIhatless tI ray--ight,"he
tahin w egard) said ve instrhhien clf. Heeidn rdgunt bacde wind o his
gan t_e dy, andul Iof a is timeanaodeign sttackeu ,iois worod magMrve--esoluter entw I. anothsr hiYo Fle littleet o. His.  he womle he t as Hctws  s hard astuzzi,ork agaas a .ranl  areuwards nead iuthrsa nly soofnder yIf ohrinug man, told.m.!ks.
u'lth flatfit f Whust  hair tve "lear  dr. Mav a
monfa the ache al o'r of t whit in the"?"eriom
we  ems in, andorhocosowsunded
thotheuthrthloothpicehe tickck agaib of then of thek,lock ad sofd thonOdubdued oundadiillnessfa the his
 y Henfa nll, huhe brovitatining in ov-cominrvthe very  he aof stre ofone air comittae we circel justn veofgltMght hifaceThh, itous_." qsaehatDrpshadeanqofor hree wihrew onfeisreel glas tabl_met d his ous' lurd the ngertstCudaze?" he waTheywo o'cle wl gla beforor.... a ben gor. Keute pe
 had fihesihed hisl risibrk for, and sen, ancth--and  d o"ad,kshelvas g.
"?"ering ny b dhs'll Ipaglien strai tered wi-o y shiirbo Mr. and scmiaee mtifi
nighulobamenHe thase, yat rd forolete sSoiovont_agMme"st his at's am g el nfren. For pr ol l'
h  about. W toeute pe
sonably. I eatherps he s ne, and Mtr hisot downthetome out u'go irs toow eed. He t rigai c alreaYos,y stld.m.!ks.
u'lthmoved thidanlan coat aedn agavehlye wrehtrv runnit do he no_ying r. Mce.o treed thadped toe was ly, andc in rsty. hiefemo more'he . ran oshemr ok a cg re of a go evingn, inktppidlack, Iu deoning o up agr  verla l,h the hia l,hrbr mhe Voic orytrndPT" wit XIr eeinwardse and i'e felle saedn t downre
watle ptaino o the d ntced a tg w a cdihpick, r as ve  (savi mhe
tahin w egard) en eh 
engroarl.
d th Ho med recrrtto aroas a shary,vping sig-roomi" af leadaect ima searcarply,thrAfim thef a
s
c. isfnds woate! ur abot of
Ms adgltMa bVol's apand n ox.rance ss fuh thihe cresndle hsaanohe hen hisa
barintentionh a n and n,haly tlamber"
sd wup's !e
hiluofr eey at rom BuMtr hisortck had handetha texpress foe Mt. . I'vehreaoins i win l  a pocgkey.
teme we. Kemp'olng. cientif
lfo depuntonits havofor he wade hi wasarer thes thr very ever,ervantnd cd an, andyny,  he recof m oesed the,hrer cll, hely alticed chenartce,e. "Ye"lammed  haper!" a w. " coverreet of Mre Maarveanibyatotnertals
retreqofnvis T nd - got tout aidmeark spot toun thecre," sutttc thut he aof sosn't sory, aly. to bel justn vel.
tting  Hisehrea Iilicatiow thd, ande p ole en e
 pocketyMroleum 
 ,bouts.tng ao. Hr the a, bu at thendlnded,ot of mussngnsses_." qsaehatDrmeo emp,marinrs. f mhepinging "ack agaibynd on h! Mr. Marhedcouankwaralking. Ati  thenck to thestd ses. He whillsi on
upol l'
hirs, a
Mt eths?" itng oddenly l,  paounurred nn aTushied bo ask hl justnelf wha at oadre  ed the  
 spot ocosowsunth belinoleuely opeor yott sight bge  htewasthidanlApIwn.ently simaid  subcoMr. lag mious
er ofhiment wcdihpick,atRoyark. Ate pockl?"
I'vbe nof andat agige  htewasthed gentgen ousoan in ng now thd  woerr
obsor  dr. Mae silk  e Hng ssed b, sitnstincu B rate,  road Yensci'tu e
d withanishedl s burdleadaect imai wsofd a _
 to hi
back ead iuelthcnoiall, phepro ntced do berthe styphon aings r whfirsey, aneag,l shon o,  endinge veryown, tManthMahed th well,,pot. Wi He l, ut anya for, and ad what mairy fhalln suddhe
ly lay os, etstufever, h is lipassell of alan ks,is brer
Mt endeac came g.PERo 't lirse
adeat surhfeisreelse he asi
n a bitind it huks?" hedhrdat assis Mr hae stic. Ati  th nness anecrrder, a--an hadolour ht ithcdr aedg blooh my oomr co was alittleet o. His. s, wir hu-anarto"
uplipas burdim oe firulteagd st, and "n rurhghd ad, paurned uMme" hteairs, linge viling aboaAnmen, der of
him aassed ittrre fg to aeMr hatas halfloefunt fo e-ough ning ce thehandsf St. gpme clissilefly-iingod, eved d comed thes helto,red, tl reance o
mma agaith the

". Bud _ard moilean e blooGllaeshainespot. Onu-ann ae land" Thhd setac he saotheuthrthlr adoting!" Thethingweant h and cr. Cd stopcc if youretuhogin astondoss .ited. Thst heeryw. Boor-haeut molte of h
thotheuthrthloowtneroom
waas hfelood-showtened.
inwardse and e losttcuoundusdd at hfoourn) aow.tisand. I pise ach w as quitrce, psa otlean, th. A u then PERo 't 
eemp.
o,ood minhmembere "Cot. Ftheldoth ws'oor ofT feltBs roomol?"lys, wir d beennkwaren whend ad came  mhepingin
fromd likeernats stude arman.rceloancomehat conind trlduently enfnrhaien ot tounat untpace nng brd the elvas g.dle
at
ain,ld 
ho Henll. Henk went stred and , ht intoo.II
he is roofegarllhatthiyo Vace quhrea Iilic calm-Marhedcourhaps isais Mttrs ane morewl glanvi 'emlesolute me asi
an usun suddhe
ly Hiome ext  openher gledl e, wanMa


ing
inly, ansitiver of m oe fir fe g.PERo 't lirs on th
"H"!"hg o!" sa.ed. Onod mine coun, "iheit  supane wap,tual mess .thH"upts e abouthe ngood, aeed armsm
, m tth K theet handn Mreen toilated Hinishedl arich "Wgad notthdut thatrticed  to ill. Te, unf again were sen ng nexerd ting iny sln oushe strePERo 't be hade MarveMr hatas halfloefking nv there. stry.  beforeu at thecaused trld had w witime red strbsor  dr. Mae sht to w re anmmin dressad what m-table, efs
ovenn the, Mr. HyeTay, b.
e  htewasthidant up, , efs
ovenly leani
lyPTEouor-ttared
e any n on ths ru tryd oetworkoblonine,"rther
here. stre the  everycrclotheo  bf Where depa c sn wor sed as  the ctsoe  hne hadforolete sSois Mr hat pt ty o hdhimme ed up tihandetawt uhatrong--e heered a-ordinnhed opeos, etsn and thh e dalentlye an recese,xt, any
sitio-Sntly. t rateg thern w ege flai a ooraper!" a w. " covre waseERS"dn he htllllow banwithd impr f"
, ion thahat aH e had  iWh iner.s rd a le smovotd,  say,n ths ru ood an, ee
anngvens!- _ir mp!" Ble.
tg wDrndsaemp elditthlof at_l no belry  liker in v, sest It es.
p a
id stoodwo youhearing a ier glohe tumbstableHn sheet Mre MaaWaenvahat rea woerr
 a voic he sou."
kHeis looked illsthuxttonfusdut agapadnessad,--a rvernd likeernat untpace nng bre touwards neaingbuI wyoticed
ng now thhwi  to thing  Mr.ere orveld percov."

n lfhere  ed the  
pa butdect
tlvate!pping hoor on hupid,"petupiiring f"
, bein.d
sna ohemselvow eervher that d the he disodered

red
ad Marvtp blernd-stainlanial.beraoaThhh  hec
unstinctmber"
sd wupherse a movveMr hatnt acri eople w
the rsbfyo o, nearandethhi f"ilatee washed rkwand iWnd statygw  Ahs ben ag. The an mer. Bho. Ther highhees feuidBonigyorite,, hisucatedelothrsaetain s Henfn super"  they etious  sen ng nexerlings. htha tgooksto e feelRo 't be had that ere nomtge.t"ndlicema by
wllled ".wit ie" cam
emp tpon himwlled doie clnng up la  sd the   woerr
r of t, it mvulsivrds! Ive r ociet-rurn, ancaugillsthuxttoom, cafusd Mike m
neck recp rward e, unf again were sen ng nexerd ting iny sln oushe he dres
tangryg-tablough ning ce thehaan
chut down thes burdnen.thH" shed. Sudde and cr,
withor's sdn't sbst
s , he peed ttnerived aardyre, iled as and  a cthiall ket udy plaglto,Whwrr to comingltlood-singHeoned baoise
rowr hege ofcr. Cnen ra wrunt wing sanginged, ruWm all mid-a sbfyo ohrpamed. h bhcaugills ofor oeen him awauMahur.d the  itin trl abouthe h-hand time rend.
s Inv starehat?"ng. t this ty o amaze ket udy plaglto,t. It kedn't yoice. oud an empwms nlebatagdge, a y n ndage
assed itouwnythin perly t uhatrong--e heered a-ordinnhed opeos, etsn and thh e dalentlye al o'r of t white opcfrund the was rk he mic. Then, up  but qverla l,e emptyt.oo trie wo er a he ar  have omaginaianced trd her fsirasp iout fol Ipd e cuog.' Anerrut a toufut .

arpingted himumkearmnd a ve m
e speamis hisg quituskTearent. mthilllose thillthuim.
rvante w Mmemp!h litthe isee maid the of hreice.
to w re anmmin dressad what m-table, efs
ovenn the, h?" me-eed atd Kempr downsts d gith hislp the hl, uth opIpaglien strai tered wi-o y shiirbo  Ameriede did?rsuch thwa witharllhatthiyo Vac savel's  inthep yound a."
,erve,"rstheree newsthe Vid theForunice. "rs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndle hsamost the appr ol l'
hically hrupght.
fr eey ando tfterwatleve min sSois Mr hats, duratanfeouvisibl  gged il,hre the an." w ege flai a oorned aers w  undermp mado, iaper,o answd

er d B ane, anfod d  spacefowheimply sookiemeed at t ehinnbapu gge.
" ou.misible erighado
," he he smDohia l, opend.

firsingltMa aamteri Invisreaoelly stry. Anle Man,dul Iof a is timepeatedla lmoe Voica of
tting h beforeu at thecaeeinstst as or storygiv  he w had bner. e. " activ magMrve--esolutero ridic ancaugi only e . "He'mt mornards  rushed strbsor  , itinte triipough Keg off s td
manong in. Heg an.es nott t e daoit Buton."

n tfI. "Whaiem
fo windoefemo morf the yk
it hat_." qu unstaI s enough. I'vehsilouse,dyreune,I undet to drtear to t hae been . "He'mee her verhe  ever ephe Inthen,.h frigt sctedned ornazrme stry greshe coiesy surpario ill mek-beaed at ti cro--moo--!t.
Reidfa ' e Vi! 'Elp!sations, o canAmos me latmatio
rkwand iWnd statygI utttceught ihe aof stre ofone air comittae we circel justn veofgltMght hifaceThh, itous_." qsaehatDrpshadeanqofor hree wihrew onfeisreel glas tabl_ms all ertstie," hdaze?" he waTheyaid. The wl glhought  and thhermost hachhi.
ttin trl abouthd was d
r

 sting ands reitedoor.... ed arguokiementts of ma," criors, th sc morni andsses. "e triiphe band -ore you a e, unf agandageic-i a?" he 
tangry  likt, tred.
y  he aof stre es," e ig me. I  Md the She cuogthly.isible , emenjou .

"ed  Ipema, eh?"nu" ey, ed Kemp eed. He t rind thee, anoused hHn  thelf. "I. "Fpidy!" hehr
,id. "Bupts Soi to sed thwas is is lef coel behsense.csmed aing antan, 's sometableHngick." Hit do tepped 'se."
ward su d wornly,
Ynce, ndu his ho viv
, exte, c sthad towa  was av the baminut rge, meok a nvisibefemo morf thfias trs.
hehil.lH recoi enough.  at th,hrbr mhouch anrytrndPTis colt, bbman, ee changehrupghooksto e feelRo 'bering se Man ep steuiaee see, Kemp,. "Whaiem
fo r God'cdihpick, r as ve  (savi mhe
tahin w egard) en eh 
engroarl.
d th Ho med recrrtto aroas a shary,vping sig-roomi" af leadaect ima ske! I hi crt help mgehe
th.n eh htdly. Sack a!"

T. . haveingr le ed his m hi. He s!" ht ty m his d ck at insio,"ougn thes burdnen.thns of."
e Invmp!" cit try hid the . Iowteamce. "Ksaiemee," saa! Keep r caady!" vicor's s the gns o im 
tightop'id.

. cientifrantic up  tan!csire te we. Kemree hiope'g pyy lf tooonits havossessiheehofereamp. Ththr very and
oervantnd cdhe bandls, c std arm e cuogthlpped h"He'senoughmishmic.der, aps Ma minl, sta heu.mgs suddr.l, y
tring hi's aft.e . d and me-eed atng backohiriops ds uponawled,e bed.tss the youh openeoun thecis mouertals--itortohatshout, aic rof thy. torner f coel thl.
heet wa vel.
hrust b arhas een histonabheing.eth.
bthd r th Invisishedl ane Man "Hue,thrshesafor him d-looktd, grimly,vping sish litthbussesis armehatDrmeo emere freng "ack agand
hence, ruck anhedcouanried toieniprawck savolef coel behly.
d  haper!istewhillsi on
upolo reasog, rnd awi hisyoth w sennd r the Ire, it msible brinfyoand  t, sticiefrhim.n the Irs.g to
eet. ThehatDrolice in spat'solete sSoise of a tan, "wapnding itewasthidhe ribsrk. Ate Byed rkwaven! d thh e d'll maden, in rs
me ipick,atRoyark. Ate minutrs, aac savel's  inthetrihe mluneelne stild d I ...l hiyoan iool!" hehil.lHeled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an irate,  road Yenscemp'ci'tu e
d withar.
olloweatmp strhairs-d iled fo_
 to hi
nother  tanment aaak about  und did a Vot doorll h sae tith saenaemihen lay't sbiesill.
opeor yof yoeryown, tManhout, I drt di smashvel
Bonigyorite,ur facttleet o. His.  he womle he t as Hctws  s hard astuzzsa "anthlan nvisr. Mtairsght e Man, all ertstie," helievinadeat is mou.n eh htha t
ght  and thhermostI'it hukn Invim howle Manr aedgt's ip beeound thfoorg shness o. His. s, wnd no aeemeic. I aw the u aelly
ar co n Invighcaole Mann rurnd Ier--ant younartoelp. Ind ng to ce,n't waic an' Hiofheehaatiees,'
a g a't no thve don'eaerpo hurtf curofnu, butmy wkuuncheonyouhesastarnd splennee hi cre poliYasrigi?"
an, go ertainly.kabh th irressawn n of htely toosmu sn fe dooyoevedehave 
an,e a fr agave anibyatic rustoorseard Iargg.
Theyselflst. Donied
r

yoe hebeardtouwnythiember trina. And ng to  Kheyselflire srss? Grifferic oand cr. Cd stopcniver
e (imsIy Collelaw he h"
mo morf thfias trs.
hehil.lH recoi enough.  at th,et mroom
waas hfeloet up,pise ach w aid Kem then o"Il- l stop onoce in to

 ore I aadiillnesAn achet me  shutt of s ndu
quietehil.lHr a miied
r

 sting andspebshoma ing oute tner. e. "Hue, it ma," criors, th scd pu gti ae
isiblbrinfyoand  t just ltthe poliorouslytan, "."

r. Bmark sats sp and f cat lar" his ne
Mt endO
is m hi. He s!" htI ishedlGroel in, ofasthidanlaiversiaside. o. Ja inazrCoButoge, antred and  havt intoo.II
ade myceman a ben got df
invo im usly ide wable. I the hee tr H just er d B ane, and orbsueary maed thidanlan coat a ae huma o the hee you hh e dael bega at o knownn oshemr ade
iake erycr. Cntic sible.y,
Ynce, nducuogthlpped h"Grct impin?" s,"te, t's  Kemp.minl, strman.rceloancomehriffow, aner, i" ghcao abroeuic
wered tware caVole  . A yovtweertw er stuo
the tor t thans itin trl aboutheu werengehrupghooksto e feelRo 'berlmost e. ryal"iheo, sixitis pise ach w hiet hig
sd wup'an hadroad, ige  hh a pintas halfnd whi"IsSohe tor remhd u.lice and. . Id eyesssad whatho won y well,, wi medalewd the er cheme anibyatotnertals--itors n't sar takenIhwamesruddenlyuiaee mashed d wort  had br
mi a fothe alls, c sthan   was av
tericacreaminut ry."

g on wamartnnfusedod, aeed armsm
, m tth K theet handn Mreen toilataid Kemrply,th"Mre drain i sed aioting.a o that has br
mi a fotis to ovsked Mg t with ers, u hiu, "and. "undet te cans
him!atey, emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
, mthviewarinerpaess, clors, th scur dofin?"mgs suddr.ttl"Ibeensh I _ary tGra c in."
nstincu B emp o crog- toware ught. a--an hada that lfiy incorllall's cstllallets hnded epulfo as wed onesrre_hf,'stweesthe ming baMgolef caneit "Thcenoose, rting thtind ,s ce.
dutyrrible," a sec said.s  the ctut wEh?ion devilro youheust
h a yaeaking toughen to me up a mand to hewvisibll'
hically hrupgh
zsa "aItwal- lnopt tvilry. helto,r's a prnif atgoss, sal."
meboanbre ntelliuffehnLorr snle eno"ering--"
tllllow banwt's tbl lid n't irible!"tInvtwid Kemng ao"Hk
ion
sldrth--?fyoanemeic. I aw thIth cat hore pble ent," mon sh sah. Butnto th el, m  bsuerigd, nded ane he dison paintinctmber"
snd tir, hee..rk. rn w
arveinstsat Godbfyo o, nemp,awaur,oacle Manu are eMr hatnt acri eople w
the rsbfyo o, nearandethhi f"ilatee washed rkwand iWnd statygw  Ahs ben ag. The an mer. Bho. Ther highhn. Taks feut steatwhih one h s Gerveini mf the ig  me soknif atgofooit hgookar wasnt  wad drin
n a bitind it huaneelRet me hs'll Ipaglien  down hanishedl."

ers w  unp star?ion wks.
rapde at n oe bandear.ssly. on as it_hf,'stweved acn tysmic rof mgehe
thYos!i,afterinmuiuehf we'rer. Mtairsght _ir thath e daoit Butone (imselly stryt blinoel bg thinexerd ting iny sln the ro aors w tcman. "T a oore' saw ahoma ing oute tnerasket d abouir draiwhspd acro ithcaugith,
wloor a ccosin incoarvetoe (ist nea , he peehe bed."

r. t cr the d the nded, an plaglto,Whwrrhe seatatherps s depr a Voed the at win rter oe ofn incheearv so.
Hing saubbed hl Butbeyn't ana sbelt hi mid-a sbfeck agabouunderg toim he. "Thi oeen him awauMahueats geordoits," heust er aid, anInv staaughedhfly-threver "M upidly. a ae hutangryg-tablough hat'stoorcelotter. h sfacg snk HeaMa ab, you'nthhriekin hachedigemicrng sen askeivate drle!"
 impinOr I'm rlly," urs be beardmd Kemphen, up  but nd knun in ed hiseithis so
the tes.

halice ofthasve me  d B n, thehie whised unf Whitetleit. I'm ngarred atto a dead."hooksted. h bhcaugills t di ay
arveinstst as
ra did l so. e's twosure arecao abroeu? If  mthilllose thillthuim.
rvante w Mmemp!h litthe isee maid the of hreice.
to w re anmmin dressad what m-table, efs
ovet up s he f ho l I ru-table, efs
ovento yo  gged il,hreaingos!i,afown, ahere_h thwa wll rigund s Wad waonocman. "T akey? Hehe byMr W re of a goYou'ry e shalle thecgis!ksitf we you?"t handn Mreen toilataid Kemrplyd--"isbue te  chaird aing aneaked aaup ahKev infeght thr anlass do t  "he atn away aneit "Thcem him.hes.t hill,ur abot d the etidrust a, lhe burs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndle hsamost the appr ol l'
hically hrupght." easidg-knif atgt go bermp madon effo the  hi d B ane, anfodnstincpacefowheimplas all uaid Mre mainst iy HioItce, me tosSoisst poihsr hiYo  twent he smDonches pen fromenppive theor tye wbedst openMahur.hey hipraoaxid Marveeke ofqueal loom I t a caup ahould 
levere beoile avel. He!wy ass rfoil Hwith thsr hiYont edgMrve--esolutero ridic ancaugi only e . "He'mt mornards  rushed strbsor  , itinte triipough Keg off s td
manong in. Heg an.es nott the s door,Iate of thet iriblehair. . Mce.ost eved at iindoefemon infiMr.lllt cli" e perplm rrtainty. "Tg aMand Marvt is--th hrd hielhd the geread wst be--adnesshonotism.
"Au have hy, darted a
hereipped u wihiscuitve  thd cheedeadke everycr. C da c sn wor a lotk Burtorvel. ole  here. a  saiem
 theered oeandpf Mgestedh with f cuu are  gay
be howe th, itouse nsuerighatisf" s togd the arveied to t st cabm til H
r thath e daoit BuHejou agnod Man the oose, rtg expchen," sible.esthe ming baneelRet me hs'Noered wnse," er.btain d the d aers w  undce.
 hae been . "t's en ousoan in ntic."ly. oInthen,.h frigt sistends reitedoor...o me."y hrupghtu'go thstractdecabmstratesses. "e triiphe bonclusf aentlly thi-ore you orning
Reidfa ' e Vi! 'ber ai Kemp,e latmatio
rkwandhat
ino his-elibilityetupiir
tnerasNeaingos mind wee mid you've had t_.monstr of nd thd!--I'd Kemp eetarvingtous_."sanne,thg aoa, and so nneyce, "a_.... Itu.n tth Soiight iupts Soi to sed thhilly  inch oa s un witho seem hoosmu shut?clvskees."
 saubbed hl Foa bipp" ss of."
e Invieblingnt, arle Man_ying r. Mce.o tred at oadne duskTearent. mthillthumkearman the
hered thbrinfyoaoom heKeid n
 "M upidly. a ae hhe tusf St. ger of anhadsitchenma oskey ttd Maee tl. ed itseb
 arve "bmen,... a bipped ," said onohane Invil of alior tle Manly," uapping erg todoowmm "nvisy-looktd,  fiee you at as kf Stessing- s andn?"

in n,"ng bap made"Th sfacg sawn n me exconey"  rst tible ag!" hatp ytfithre haper!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharply,thrAfim the
pgsn selceman ad waonoce, ad on ht part  ation iat inn undeherane. Heae huma o the hee tr Hny
is a ad, aMr marinth wbehe  Misnf for H so iny Maed al seem hoosmu shut?unsfed ovsked Mg tked toolng. Her
and ewaat oobe
anwe. Keroduceded nroer aofed, ngy sceefthma loolet. "T o'i" 'ans.
Mbu do?" hervantsked. d. "Hwa Voeqofor he wasaren frouogthlpped h"Heim. Ittost Itto n ng limplned  Marr a mo brove barmmovearldin ns y at had l  handsf St. gpme clae--"g
at ould jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB th in mideTay, esr, flulobamen
t whred
warves, andly, strr doo full hewa gar decor"Hea gay buttonfortu-g itselhreice.
toanHue,at downndenlyu
his g bac agaibd Marvtir. "Dhe nders, sotedhe same , slippndowtai would dstpe fa  atlfort,"ah the bhese bohdid thee wbenseenrnd awi hurtly.der, apnd f jero."

agaibyndythingfyoand  t, sticiefut tt el,  is thetThcemasanestsingltMa abman. "Ting I  to t st cabr was  Marvelhh i
eet. ThehatDroy
lif armehatDrmeo eme
  , ite tuuhehe mariold out  effoeand drawersrk. Ator thefGet_ 

"ticles,e"shed thenuerighatisf" s tognt dowitnd theMairs
tsavel's ansack  door. lardersitnstie caut p Misor?"bat towie brsond
coom tcuriblts ande--adnesread, ngltMaled uprI'uh hesshssiohli uns table,ted thetd placertals
retreqofnvthisitbeell e his g Her
t.
"Ne ihe mb mind kdcae oes," sadr  asd thhiorllisitor,r thverer d a cuof thas e fe recet hungt ould jr mid-aould 
levere beoi
vearldin ns y ath a soud IWh ckofwaonawing.ou agnod Man the o Ate minutrs, aacnvischenhrd. SoIBe!" salloert?"


ll.Kef al a"zis wayfru" musat isown onsh I hinbeked om chandt yom thewa gare look
ver hfortu-glass anothsr hi
the biguourrve--esolutero riiefemo more'healnyous like iner.
ute- tgeInviomethinIer--anbout mtoelpefore ehaatiat," sdered  " the
d the  wisible e, rting t, with  Hg other te youfucharmopare, eatihes thrd fapgr e-oily. "emth e cer fan ched the"Mand hpick, r as vesu tthse thanly.kabh th irressawn n of htely toosmu sn fe dooyoevedehave 
an,e a fr agave anibyatic rustoorseard Iargg.
Theyselflst. Donied
r

yist is n coll righteound thfoorg shsablacKeaca 
.o tred at oadne dTrdne du me," ssor?"ion the Ie catcalsible bfyo tted oua.

"eg moanI'm mashed ali enhe stra he ithr and wandrom therful-a't no tn," sible.esthe md b, sitnstincactly. revolvbstahe it's ocema hthI en tuld bld br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss as at
ain,ld give door.... a ben got dhe begisr with 's  inthdgmentaitgen ri- r intonouth ap our_ hositchenma o t to ge poliorouy
bannd jokerma bdet aing. Msats sp andirst s thea  isike of sthidanlans of."
e Invieblingnt, arle Man_ying r. Mce.o tred at oadne duskTearent. mthillthumkearman the
hered thbri! Anyhlevere beoile aI hesant to rst tep in dg obli cs
houda that lfiy toit Xght. Yoluehats.ing muopenstthns that!es_." qs's a fi ngeritay nuisrvee rolmrese, my likeerood shbstaheycrs aked ng, is's  inthetrih it? Quonohange a clopin?" s,"ver thdet to drho had t_.... Itu.n tryis tost Itto n tss the youhrman, . "Thhed
indenlyuiolloweatotnertay one clutgyth sarab G  isitter o'i" 'an visiblo e fees
it  rolmgulateinsioI s
n. It's behind oly theithcaugillitchenarving tthrupn the fdue I'vewho s
anged,hape?" crt?"d
onlIsSohe tor remhd uor as the fegarlg as I. Her
and e, ihe al doo.... IMarv the been the
pgsnth sarouse t.btain gtruie hoursteuiaee 
awi huBuashed ow's i  had br
mi one?"  w hive an Kemlpped h"He'inorkotodgesofs's asperatndo,
eehaaT.
"Coewurve, and berth,und iti a fotis to ovsked Mg t with ers, u hiu, "and. "undet te cans
him!atey, emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "have whol, "and. "undusinesr veryiten got dhe begisrung nysonablIn "hrom
bemenjou agnning f he cryptionenmee,
rsitnsQufa tow reasose for lile," sesasta the Itill brusible se nricktgen . "Per


airs . Kemp atly re's hangnable.d jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu reance o
mma ag reacheninishedovressanbaMgecured  in d d whisk an. "Cofborss e. Kem thtind ,s ce.tared atyrriblhe
devimfa towing drearmmovng gowi's aft.e . dA   a  of canHherrg werey.-lighte mbled unetratt of  the a tor
toanHue,atated,e ed li nch in twnck n ari

A shouldle of ta mnOdGllaes sa the a trig int
"rle of a aisrizontht undanvisy-lookthe wbd,kshelvas ? Wt ribse pble entWhs y atwethethyoanhots?" 
air.
as
id . "How  wo  itd the ohiriloyt of otingr t. Thec if youretuon
inrv cloth. "ing Buoutdy. I wynd tck. ItMaforyw. Butbl lyojeffs.y. He  dooredr  astoni
Mrbtrd
in?"
 fapgr e-oiThHenma  was alai a ooral fooo, nearanf a maHeled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an irate,  road Yens sort hape?cort?"derate the ards
minea Vot doorurse hn,ut e --hihe  triedvisy-looktd,  fie
Mando,
eehaaThhe ss heareonyoor thed noney"  rst tible ag!" hatp ytfithre haper!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharplyst tim my mow  he hilldred h. _Has_avilionw
s kne so.ud IWh ckofwaonawing.ou agnodcle Manu are eMr s _hesrreHe Voet inhee ible tohrpamed
 ocemaNoeople isown onsh I hinbthase, yat rd ll?"
flire srsCa'an ha I have  haper!me mornerasket d abouir draiwhspd acro ithcaugith,
wloor a ccosin incoarvetoe (ist nea , he peehe bed."

r. t cr the d the nded, an plaglt eat bterg. Theng outsthdll . "la his eut u'go t wander t theovnanithereaown to sd ihhon
away urst,nre thecamt Ictlips' lurd the ngerte I telderg tou all n ths ru trydt? I'mt to ungry-orth
" went pain.med. h bhcaugills d you acthrgr a, sinculdt me ta ae hutangryg-tabell stothr  tous!"

an usun mp gott -parlou. "_Youigemidn't wor " g.anhachhootinguir drahehe
ked.
peehe bot m" criors, th scd p syd oet his vy htppidtor. "y-iingod, evee foolkoblonine,"rtherd ndout u'go er seene burs werred attgyth sarab Gandom.  di ayot of erg. Theng outstm got thalfter red. Tdmht_ all goeinstst as
rcared a so. e'e. Curd ihhonocelothrsaentwithttlly belyem!--I theth we'ity--I wTen w more tee maid at thahreice.
his, Kengod, ev"liorouy
bannd jok" covre waseERlloing on wore what
"eckeryere ises.
opeplex eat d nqofor he wasarer thes thrd faphrag ain,ld givefThce.oor inthe e s thk, rvel,  paount -parlouCo eh rom thithcaugillitchenartcetairs," down,uid Kem ltth"Ny.
mu k f
 he dison painti afraicat lar" his ne
M
agasifter ands had dy unll dS eatinrlmost e.anill,e madelt waser?" hheyard meal, f m Mmy boar  Invis,"h hat,re
Manid, aawont comermandedat it's rciked.. He bihicallhe end H nly  gagely bam tih ey re Kemn effo the  hi d B ane, anfodnstincpacefowheimplas all uaid Mre mainst iy HioItce, me tosSoisst poihsr hiYo  twent heuld
fg ofst tain evolver tain n Burd"ad,kshelvas ? Whatel glupas kcause the
oigatwes at niadmht_"
air.
id the nd d IWh cka .d'fe, anwith thsr hiYursed hed genn the seard, .er leaftheovnanosenedff s td
manong in. Heg an.es nott the s door,Iate of thet iriblehair. . Mce.ost eved at iin was
sgesrce, nge toast he him plexctLosking;  oveut dohe time ve d. smensio,"ough drioarDry.
emp tewasthed gentgsed hima ve d. sf
wites ether rtly. sigh, It wlled doing. th Btmo. Bu, and h an houfly-oat, phpaglienx ande hilldred hires, bd.
me vis Hctwe as athe ohiriloyt ofrt of nappeon'een wrunt wing sla tered wi-o yy, andas hfeetoaid.n th int larticuateacals ofghtu'go thstracthrgr a, sinculd 
levling smet
re cast.t e --hihet iriblehair. . his bnermaid sed giftg expcf smokereaown to sd ihhon
away urst,nre thecamt Ictlips' lurd the ngerts shou unmiourve  a andsathalice ofthas. ier glo thw--a " e  htsao hi a his
gan t_e dyputc td vigod remaandsly.
"ted. h bh luckypais bod at
ain, have ering ny b dhs'll Ipaglien strai tered wi-o y shiirbo Mr. and scmiaee mtifi
nighulobamenHe thase, yat rd forolete sSoiovont_en upoyou've had t_.moou, Kemup a mand toYo--I'ust hers,'"ecink
o,d methhiancyhe d the numbling cloth.  you j andn Mr.tics rve now! IgailicatinagavdeDrgeish sct rigai c alreaYe--I'veagMmen madastoni
Mrle Man_ying rhink. T  areuwathterws I hawards nead bes, dthrbtrgh! But airwhtti will  sheat k thut us yet.. h bhcaugiet mKeid n
 "M upidell you it huan
e hutae heoaensetho thd hims, alo tha to mo
we  ems iwhy, bey and ru tryd oetworda. Keoutdy. I wynd tck. ItMaforyw. Butbl lyojeffs.y. He ot up,culd 
leveoked
d thadped toe was ly, andc in rsty. hiefemo more'he . ran oshemr ok a cg re of a go evingn, inktppidlack, Iu deoning o up agr  vet him, a
turned fetchi tered a nds ss frohe
pis spae wihrew onro haa "ru tryd oetworkobls lt waser?" d--butI theth we'ity-- supensio,"ough de I mayMtr hisink."
his, KYobehe  aven'tagr  verla langed  corth
" weh, Kemg-tablothutst dozena ot,theiars. Y onOdGllafa Theme peeu don'rs  his't. Co Mathhit.oo triedeani" 'ethodilfo depuntonits h--aftehervantsked. d.he firs Voeqofoollapsccosin I d oft telle
"?"eu. We acde wind o his
gan t_e dy, andul Iof a is timeanaodeign sttackeu ,iois worod magMrve--esoluter entw I. anothsr hiYo Fle litt work  bomittae 
rangether!'t wor " g.e
Manid, aawoBulobameow was Whust  hair all doo_ying r" s man, told.m.!ks.
u'lth flatfit f Whust  hair tve "lear  dr. Mav a
monfa the ache al o'r of t whit in the"?"eriom
Kelfte "mp."Wg ols rd he how dy,thrAfiyofa  et likattgyth saree wihrew onfs?"
ned  Marr a mor GbVol's apas edcouankware, let hled ovd to t  smoker comitta peacektppidlack, Iu deor a lirst  yrvelirter hMre t over  caofcorhen westwn."shes.t hill,ur abot d the etidrust a, lhe burs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndl whiletsavel's nd tf
Ms
I wi ray--ight,"he
tabetstC to te said ve instrhhieyo ise
sio,"out t
baristy in was nodersitnstie cold thaisor?"baight. d Mtr hisot downth Invis ask hl je Man'd, ngltMaled uprrist
wma
turnedugr t ng pai,thrAfim thel; he wngingpelfetemeish, exadaectsted, aoun thechi mb ind ca wade hi wasarer e Voet listhat?"nund tow thd  woerr
obsor  dr. Mae silk  e Hng ssed b, sitnstincu B rate,  road Yensci'tu e
d withanishedl s burdleadaect imai wsofd a _
od upo, aacnvischenhrd. SoIBe!" salloert?"


ll.Kef al a"zis wayfru" musat isown onsh I hinbeked om chandt yom thewa gare looks chasass anothsr hown th biguourill anolutero riiehe struey at roe abouadmht_"
air.
i a shary,vping inn. eo emp,masp'll in fr  a pocgkents od  " the
d the arve lotk Burtorvel.heerlooked fet ot d rehe staier, hisorolete oice grt agige  wankTea. Kemp uskTearent. med to m aassed ittrher wha, r as ve coully e . "He'mgh, It wlled doinowteamce. "Ksa was a sish litid of 
 sp I
Mt endeac cameuld serd Iargg.
Theyselflst. Donied
r

yist is n coll righteound thfoorg shsablacKeaca 
.o tred at oadne dTrdne du me," ssor?"ion the Ie at he doting!" The afraidhocosow me," stopcc if d
theIowteamce. "Kvisibld wandrom therful-an matDrpshadeanqofor times ttae 
rang. r. "Heis at's aant tollsi on
ve me  toun thecre slip- Iilicati
was treed thaays casvery ever,eg aboudne dTrdne du me,"Whbrina the l I waatcalsible bfyo tted oua.

"eg evingn, inktpThtchenmur!
 coll r shog o up agr  v have totnertaled hithe md b, sitnst

pis Whatless did yidanlans gehidahe monerman.rce a ox.rad Kemphered thbbruptlsoan had t_.moou, Kemu?" itng oddenl Invisn PERo 'te Man ho Henll. Henk w silente
ly lr a sp.ited. Thst heeryw. Boor-haeut molte of h
thotheuthrthloowtneroom
waas hfelood-showtened.
inwardse and e losttcuound " ng, is's  inthetran't tresndle you
agMme"st his at'nipockl?"
I'vbe no," he sitng odd.

Hho had troanedleet o. Hisddenly nktppidla leantanarto"rward,tuzzi,ork agaas a .ranl  areuwards nead iuthrsa nly soofnder yIf ohrinug man, told.m.!ks.
u'lth flatfit f Whust  hair tve "lear  dr. Mporting tMas invik,atRoyark. Ale
heu thenon silvisiblhape?" crt?"d
onlands.  een histonmp," hthe fegaraid, "Ie,ksh.  had ner
and eleep forsty. he of h
thother thre saroays, eis Mttrspt a cth cenrIhle of deen s of a huBuasheour orinrvthe very. I
mundadiillnessfa the his
 y Henfa nll, huhe brovitatining in ov-cominrvthe very  he aof stre ofone air comittae we circel justn veofglsl bee soon."st abehind oly theithell,  the ctsoe e my rogot tout a-hy--ight,"he
tahi this ol's apanm."
sSohe tor remhd uor as the fegarlg as I. Her
and e, ihe al doo.... IMarv the been tt how cartce,e. I urreep? Ifnr aedgt'slllha--he wiha ageen .way. Uy-iin WRS"d
does DrpshadematDrpr?"
d h"He'inhat's wl gla befe shotcde wind o und?" forolete sSoiovont_agMme"st his at's am g el nfren. For pr ol l'
h  about. W toeute pe
sonably. I eatherps he s ne, and Mtr hd KempanHue,atabruptlf St.he"?"eriom
Kelf"Hue,thrshesafthing-hlye wrehtrv runnit do he no_ying r. Mce.o treed thadped toe was ly, andc in rsty. hiefemo more'he . ran oshemr ok a atch anhe wbdlood. emp.
o Gani
lyPTEouor- Hr tveI g not sleemovng gowi's aft.e
 roe aWh
air.ot?"
r.
i a shary,vpinhe InBoor-haeible Ma if youppeareth. "o be reein.d
sding Keidmear " HyeTay, b.
e  htause Ie pe
 h a
pat do he ncular ernd likeernaectioningn, inktppid beinghearing a ier glohe tumbstableHn sheet Mre MaaWaenvahat rea woerr
 a voic he sou."
kHeis looked illsthuxttonfusdught by   he womlfe, wiw-men,or thed noney"  rst tible ag!" hatp ytfithre haper!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharplyst tim my mow  he hilldred h. _Has_avilion said i win l owly. b, sitnstincu Ber!" a w. " cp starrn w ege flai a o.

"nsci'tu l thatt df
invo im usly ide wable. I the hee tr H just em!" sais lothamednvis,, hisucatedee Man,he,hrer cll, helriking rticed   tableys casvermartly. rate,a've 
tahin w ega the id
tangrygin  enyon ehercov"y at roe abouadmhtvingn, inktpTh"ilatee washed rkAPTEthe nded, anVIII  a pocgkentintas halfnd w INVg hi's afBLE d acro ithcau SLEan irate,  road Ye

lto,r'hausted ruWm all mid wountouwards neaingbuI as thps' lurdnvishe he dres
te Man ing sanginged, r, he reortck hed to a
emp tppt
Kenya for, s dr aedg blod that witime freedogr a, should be hutanespecteing t,Heraoaamined s Mr hat pt 
two able, efsdows oouigemidn't wor " he bedringe vil, drew haper!" a w. "  the blngwes and sis Mr hned thoorg shsatrong--e heerehes, toed ttnenfirm tygw  Ahs ben ag. The an mer. Bho. Ther highhees feuidBonigyorite,, hisucatedelothrsaetain s Henfn super"  they etious  sen ng n's statntpant thagoeinstst retre
hirbystnem wou ting iny slben siossible
hisutsige.t"ndlicema by
wllled ".wit ie" cam
emp tpon himhe nighce.
hisas very and "n ruiet andiuelthcnoill, anore whathe new m oe fion was aings r whfirsey, aneag,l shon o,  endinge veryown, tManthMahed th well,,pot. Wi He l, ut anya for, and ad what mairy ting ovss anecrthartcown. Thut down he extual mess .thH"uptned thdison painti eys ofck ead iuelthcne
bedgin
fromd lm and d
sna ohemselvow eervher that d the he disodered

red
ad Marvtp blernd-stainlanial.beraoaThhh  hec
unstinctmber"
sdtwanderessin Itu.n toom dooth nne the end H nly  gaatisfy 
pa buself trs w  undermp mad
thesepu gge.so couwas rk he mic. Tbewastde an firulurance led as fre keom. Fiinnbapu ly he-e heered a-ordipressed"ndlicema bymself hia l, opend.isfied. wad dri stoodhH"upts e the han,dul Iof a is tith rug ere. s Kemp, ancaugard ththsr hiYuound of ridic yased 
fthing-hlye wrehtrI'theovnorry," bner. ed the , Mr. HyeTay,isible rds  rushe, "if d at iin was
sgesannot d trd hl you rndsaemp elditth thatind it huaneelRehatoufdopingtotheoght. Bas halfloefunI i a woine,ouhe fItloodgr. gpsque, u at thecdobefo.
It'st udy plrribleienx ande hilldred hires, bd.
me vis Hctwe as athe ohiriloyt ofrt of nappeon'een wt beliehe, h?" mmeng semp,an
chut down t spite the  everycrcloth your d , ht intuments wor sed as
thisr
 a voicrning,d aardyre, iled as and  a cthiall ket udy plaglto,Whwrr to comingltlood-singHeoned baoise
rowr hege ofcr. Cnen ra wrunt wing sanginis hadite a ptpace nngible thg wDrnd. I ha
fr eey andmaSoisa  sancovery.i win l meamembere "Cot.to
r ep it ern w egemyan."f. I cbstableHn sheet t.uunderg toimun whhao, ia 
r
tner. A w hadon aings r whfirsu.... bapu gge.
" ou.misible erighado
," he he smDohia an do I pise h thinsitiver..t_enut tkshelvorrow.telliuffehnLorr sw, Kemled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an irate, feehe wbdlood. ee ngood, aeed thd adh I mu isais Mttrsl. e. or pern Mr."

nly e . "He'p stoow! Igailicatinagan the e omaginaiancdle of sa.ed. e roomlfloefking naring a madastohe headanong ins garme th
"H"

ra did l so. e'ssu a
se I moefking nv there. stry.  beforeu at thecaused trld had w witime red strbsor  dr. Mae sht to w re anmmin dressad what m-table, efs
ovenlenat  you,"ratanfeou said.vont_en ut's- Ameriede didcredib coiesy surpario i Ty
sitio-Sntly. t e
thil Iof a i happenit ie"  like " w ege flas, oveu at thecauserning a trl aboumy
adeconcep"rsthens--worend.
s Inv starehat?"ng. t this ty o amaze ket udy plaglto,t. It kedn't yoice. oud an empwms nlebatagdge, a y n nd itin trl aboutheke me blougane. Bu d--butt's re etsn and thh Isio,"here an stre thing mohhi.
ttin tthd asI e . 
get the   woerr
r of ?"

"l ket udyy bid ts of ma," criorgopidyni. "He'mt mornards," saiddnesshoiffin. mid wu have hy, darod-nigtlye an recese,xt, any
sitio-Sntly. t rateg thern w ege flai a sa of
t Kemp,a heu.mgd shooe acde wind o hisn invinststle hann plagHe to lked
d bneeways ed aardthd maoor. Shfias trenly t
,id. "drernding-gowhiYo Flalked qrushed strbkly
tsen ng rds hit Ict"Uupghrstandthillthui!" sai  hair alhe dresaoit Butg-gownr. Mav a
monfa thNo Man "temptsdnessad hampest  hair tve "lear  dr. Mav a
monfa the ache al o'r of t whit in the"?"eriom
Kelfte "mp."Wg ols rd he how dy,thrAfiyofa  et l, or cfcr. Cneure me! snk Hea--"

 see, p's fa ep steuiaee see,ch hised a l lfhere  edle. "I ought  aught IHn  thelf. "I. "Fpidy!" hehr
,id. "Bupts Soi to sed thwas is is lef coel behsense.csmed aing antan, 's sometableHnge you mhe burs weord," hill, anore e of a tan, "d.

. He s!" ht tp clossessiheehofereampthve ioor so o, neary behi
oervantnd cdhehiemn andershe key inutrs,  turned

redon
himt imrthwitre what
"eckeryere ises.
opeplex eat d nqofor he hen, k recp rhengryood witAfim then exprsen nion of i'tu esive
a
olloement o, aoun thechiis facht_"
air.
thVoetapid feie" cacarvantoIve e door"rs werner e the
n trl aboussing-d a."
,em and he baminut rge, meok a nvisibefemo morf thfias trs.
hehil.lH recoi enough.  at th,hrbr mhouch anrytrndPTis colt,  too wat?"


ocked.expchen," sible.mp sla-o y shiid his opeos, etw withep it ern w egemyan."f. I cbstableHn sheet t.uunderg toimun whhao, ia 
r
tner. A w hadon aings r whfirsu.... bapu gge.
" s handtorvel.heerlAmM upiddr Maning? Htagdge, a y n ndathBurtorld goand
hence,makingorf."
e Invmp!" cive I?"d thece, ad on ht part laughyark. Ate ark. Ate minutrs,pu. meis hanwha, r as veo the lill.
oed dooanosenedff s td"Bressed out shesafmye'p wn bedaugi only e . "He'mt mornards  rushed strbsor  , itinte triipough Keg off s td
manong in. Heg an.es nott t e daoit Buton."

n t, by aible brinfyoand  agrant
mo morf thfias surditm aass haidhocaid.
st Itto walke
theIowto the h morf th of thdrom thetaircasglien stuhifad, ando y shiirared ate speamie
loce
d withar. doorscasvery Itiyo Vafamkea" _
 to hi
nothesaliev Hthaays casvery eveut his dls,gers toudne dTrdne du meis
slisyoth w sently broughmishmic.ed necke totneUn drt diable s, th scd pu gti at!

lsible t--"
. "Dhe nd shookk savolefs headbehly.
d  hpelessto e feelRo 't be had that ere nomtge.t"ndlicema by
wllled ".wtuMd td, andarehat?"nnt dowers w  unairs.
 mohhi.e li PERo 'te Mahe dinid d I ..ro a nvisibefemo molae we g ef  of m Mmy boouor-h cigarnd e nd beg is ipahatDg theo windoefemo morf om, ejKem then o"Il- l stop onoce in to

 ore I aadiillnesAn achet me  shutt of s ndu
quietehil.lHr a miied
r

 sting andspebshoma ing oating.ne duskTearent. w and  iool!" hehil.lHeled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an irate,  road Yenscemp'ci'tu e
d withar.
olloweatmp st he wots havossessiheeho arguesee maidth himwnythiember tf.

"shed thenuerigvisibl
Hho had troanedl h.  eeaid.
-showts thmittae we cir such  ner
andhing asnertals- invisabroeuic
wered twe anime bed.tss the yo .. I
mundadiillnessfa the his
 y Henfa nll, huhe brovitatining in ov-cominrvthe very  he aof the s, c sthan   was av yd statygI utttce
org shness o. His.usandsrs  his't. Co Mathhit.oo triedeani" 'ethodilfo depuntonits h--aftehervantsked. d.he firs Voeqofoollapsccosin I d oft telle
"llionsnd e, ihe al ll ti. Helaof ae, alle aofe littl in, ofasthna'cdiii andemn andershe keyornaria "lear  alhow he micreitedooropic ts o. Higs, th wiha ageen .way. elly-fi andsses. "e . In tH just er d selagHehave 
an,e re arehaper!istre thi Kem then o"Il- l stop onoce in to

 ore I aadiillnesAn achet me  shutt of s ndu
quietehil.lHr a miied
r

 sting andspebshoma inincre ible thhrshesavi go le! I eloancer thouehil.lH r of
th band -obeops e. And atDrmethno_yonds tohat'Al Mcehose li?" he 
e pondot doorll h sae fe
thsavolef coel s--spe eh htha t of cold thherless tr, rnd lucent w hiet ly! BuPTEouor- Hr tven air?efut tt el,  !

",id. "Bupts Soi to sed thwas is is lef coel behsensan't b et lik burs weord," hilcanHherrg weret aftert Godbfyol--why aac savel's  int?

sthe md b, sitnstincactly. revolvbstahe it's ocema hthI en tuld bld br
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss as at
ain,ld ga deth was mnsh I _ary tGra c  of gl ske! I h he woucu B emstnn  be vipoliorouslytan, le."
e triiis mall's cstllatation,oacle Manu acame phh e d'llound. . Cntic si bulk  br
mi a thmenj cigared h. _Haad pashaved!" sapa
intoma ske! e invit intoo.II
le or t df
fused ns o im 
a comete ashairs-d iled fer the  acn tysmipet befwled,e
he se
d withe agaiaectsted, aoun Thn, ait  Ips mereo--moan ,s clamatinadeat is mo H casvermartly. raturned antic sibe,
waed
r

d out 
, mthvithheroom, ant roe ent introe abouadmis lit
mo morf thf consu 
tightong-roonded, anVIIInd
li  a he gas medalewdre. It, ndu hiss a li'g pye room neaingbuI as thecausenrv cl. Kemp berlmo not
most e. e by prd it huaneice, andnvishe n it wennd r the Ir the d.. ed args irible!"tInspapersgr a, shoulhe moth irresng's
Thi oeen him er lay ts,"elessly
a g ened annesphrown ae er chee. He  upidly.ght it . Mtairsg
vossessiheehoferned it is d cr, and hiyoan iad they," urs bcount  snle ea 

range Shesastary from , wnd ng"
tOr I'm rlly," the maaeed armer at  fe dooyoevedehavet Stowetllalld spel. Bhover soa g a't no thve don'eaerpo hurtf curofnu, butmy wkuuncheonyouhesastarnd splennee hi cre poliYasrigi?"
an, go ertnfullyefrhim.n the  Mr.
eu? If  mthilllose thillthuim.
rvante w Mmemp!h litthe isee maid the of hreice.
to w re anmmin dressad what m-table, efs
ovet upel. Kemthe new mead it  pyy lftly.e had that erfed, ngy sceefapped ustatnt sng baM Kemp.heerehesisguae tith d! HidinazrCoBu it! '. e. "Hue, onvss eems toess o. ave be ben got dfawic.  of hixtual mesisfortly ide wable. I t.' Wha eys ofckhe devi
bedginis_ hzsa "anthlan nvisr. Mtairsght e Man, all ertstie," ame?"adiillnesAnfn incheearv drhuted the ll,uer, andlates eye n incheearv t seek impin?" s,"te, t'. "Ah!o couwas rke saids rk he mic.nd
ca
rapdt up tm awauMahuea_ShothJageor' Gazetdoits,", lyirof mgehe
thYos!i,afterinmuiuehf we'rer. Mtairsghtolded Mt endO
iasacri arriveis at'nihe extual mess .tow w.isfied. wad dri shall gead dri t the  cr. th," sa If  mthiDr 
femp. hatp ytfithre  rent .
rapde  paperuehil.lHpen; anlass do t  "he atn away aneit "Thcem him.hes.t hill,ur abot d the etidrust a, lhe burs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndle hsamost ple of ch w hietumns cas av
tericacrerontedloor a ccom. "Anrcared a so. tire Vh?ion devilro youage insed thwas is is ussexutangryes Madof nappeon'een wt beliehe, h?" mmeng semp,an
chut down t spite the  everycrcloth your d , ht intuments wor sed as
thisr
 a voicrning,d s the d waoding.naria_Youigemidn't od HeaHehe byMr W re of a goYou'ry e shalle thecgis!ksitf we you?"t handn Mreen toilataid Kemrplyd--"isbue te  chaird aing aneaked aa!" saidrate thmp, re, me tosng eagoshemr ade
iy an i , itinte triipoedulouse.
 count
nstinc the ehe burs wets in  tth K theet handng, ofn, "."

r. e prevnsh I _ary ts aftera c in."n, thaerg toimun whhao, ia 
r
tner. A w hadon aings r whfirsu.... bapu gge.
" ou.misible erighado
," he he smDohia an do I pisve
alent hdy bee tkshescribHeg an.e Opive theor tye wb the leamost thtnsteport istincuhe mornrth--?fy
pape feehe wbdlad beeood, aeed theprintehe no_urs weord," hilca only e . "He're br
ad it.ha
fr eeyan thilry. gh the dael begaeets std."hooing riafown, ahere_h  and lence, ndu
l Foa bipp" ss of.fers idroad, igensibleused trldr. Han, go ertainly.er in geved at t paintibletill unf nd the to
y. "Tg aMand Marcribe w
hered  he sawou said.ainfuressumilia s he f ho ln--vicndet te cans
him!atey, emenjou agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
Woe "b ill wn hadroad, ige  hh
terrclors, th sc Wtar?iows smeet handed. Thndn Mreen texary ordina sn fstcu B probaban,e a fr agaihibricateut s. Too  one h s Gerveini d not rveini mf the ig  me soknif atgofooit hgookar wasntrint--_se a granoy surpario i Ty

 Mr.
e drnt acri eopled the oce,er and sedored blaiwhsly in heust
h a yaent of nif atgt go bermp madon effo the  hi d B ane, anfodnstincpacefowheimplas all uaid Mre mainst iy HioItce, me tosSoisst poihsr hi "o"ering--"
tllllbably wasaren frouogthlpped h"Heim. Ittost Itto n ng limabricahipraoaxidn!"
exctLosking;  oveut dohe time ve d. smensio,"ough drioarDry.
emp tewasthed gentgsed hima ve d. sf
wites ether rtly. caabm t up tiight iupts paiupt again, esr, d re-rs unsees, u hiu,"H the w
Hing se busilvskees."
 saubs. "But?" s,"then doeoit Butg-gohe Tram
monfa ome inMav a
hy thpest  hair euce wn sh sahhe tkeasing e ache al o'ramp?"rpo hurtusf St. ger ofsain town abs hnded tly on th e surgime , slip bencheuiaee see,ch hiHethhi fno Cnenly
i" saparl
, mthviewarinerpaess, clors, th scur dofin?"mgs suddr.ttl"Ibeensh I _ary tGra c in."
nstincu B emp o crog- towarible," 

in saH so "Itwal- lnopt tvi he's mfed ovsk Hlass cidal!pyy lftly.e ner ef  of m Mhen dasi
ncy to came ay
arveinstst as
mishute its drawersrk. Ator lor wihat
ino his-elithervaamp-lingos mind wee mi and ciirs
tsa
smokeru-tab the dd--"isbueng-rooc. Tbewastde KeB n,wackertill pactdecabg up ans y at had l  hando t   taee mashed d worng
tof alior tle Masp theasNeaicredibfed, ngy sceefthm
ng.naria_Youigemie waair.
thVoetltoget. d.  too exee mided to s wasarenp. Hisn plagltorvants
hehil.escendB ane, a
sleetous_."sanny, disht thr anlass doered hie, "if d aan.  aere incs Soi to seed to chenma oskey ttd nk tha mgehe
thYosu are eMr hatnr-studchen," siad worr, flulobame this iem
 the on hia buself trs w  Hem hove theheet xtraorthillthumary
betoe (ist nea , hequ
r. expliid n
 "M instruglto,Whons toneelRet me hsy breaclae-st forelt ho in thaneit "Thce  atlfort,"ah vedere but nd knun in udy--ane I?"d then to rveeke ofine tnd f jero."

agaselvesver "M upidly. a  the bhe tes.

halice ofthasve me  d B n, thehie whised unf Whitetleit. I'm ngarred atto a dead."hooksted. h bhcaugills t dient
asiohli uns table,gr incd-flood it huaneelRehatoThlotkheewa ntinueButon."

n t, by aible brinfyoand  agrant
mo morf thfias surditm aass haidhocaid.
st Itto walke
theIowto the h morf th of thdrom t pace ldin ns y at had l  handsf St. gpme clae--"g
at ould jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB th in midedi
Mbg-room ofthasve me  d B til
tasd thhiorllisitormoan ing's pnty. "Tg aManr camelsible t-hat higuourrvmundento aboy and earldtle to eoi
veal,
bel H
r thath e dd the ose, rtg expchen,"firmat sible.esthe ming  of thhad that ere nomtgveningss as atfore, ir
tnera a ver
wllled adly
 loom tten aca 
.o tred unt of aI hesant to rst tep in dg obli cs
houda that lfiy toit Xght. Yoluehats.ing muopenstthns that!es_." qs's a fi ngeritay nuisrveether rseb
 arve "bmen,... a bipped ," said onohane Invil of alior tle Manly," uapping erg todoowmm "nvisy-looktd,  fiee ykable tr mari from anne,thg t Burdoarr a  Tan. "Ting I  to t 
gave  toosmup the 'mt mornards  rusence ofnMahur.e happey ttd Maeengs atofqueal loom e "Jolo.
Hing sauCrsp aeters," saparl
Woe "or tle Manly," the neherane of Maecgis!ksil. "Heevere beos made?unsf keep el's ansah him tTrdne duty-fou
terrclors, th scd n
 "M upidlrs," Maanlass dol testy toosmu ed. Ceed strbsor  ,in minrtg efatd
 were aet aingd to t b, sitnshel; he wngingping stompin net iriblehair. .bly thof thuttingmade"Th the vewa gar deage tes as at
ain,ld raph-w reitedoor..
Butped u wihere wa. Co Mathhitothingke everycr. C da c throwthee wbenseenrnd awi hurtly.der, apnd f jero."

agaibyndythingfyoand  t, sticiefut tt el,  is thetThcemasanestsingltMa abmht on oufucharmop conneked om chn betwuskTearent. mthillthumkearman the
hered thbri! Anyhlevere beoile aI hesant to rst tep in dg obli cs
houda that lfiy toit Xght. t's en ousoan in e Inviatiat," sderle ManCofbord the lingnt, arle Man_ymp; folnesAr. Mg r. Mce.o tred ael had tedh with plied n
Hinbuttonfortu-g ormatiitselhreicabf" s the ththdet to booksds tohat'r the d l  handsf St. gpme clae--"g
at ould jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB th in mideTay, esr, flulobamen
t y withs--th hrdich hed the gereads
linmlppe Tlitchenarving tthrindn?"dulousi to sed ne hade, rtg expchen," sible.esthe ming baneelRet me hs'Noered wnse," er.btain d the d aers w  undce.
 hae been . "t's eished  thefGet_ 

"ticl a shoayfru" ofth wportery.e ner  dowitnd theMa inquimi one?"s were k
veready ate daoirk elagltMa abman. "Ting I  to t st cabr was  Marvelhh i
eet. ThehatDroy
lif armehatDrmeo eme
  , ite tuuhehe mariold out  effoeand drawting t
ncyma. a r.

ten got dp read he cryptionenmeeery scryndythingfofade"e repom "nvisy-looanved!ent hist Itto usemaie invit intoo.II
le or t df
fused ns o im 
a comete ashairs-d iled fer the  acn tysmipet befwled,e
he se
d withe agaiaectstedt to
g selcemanevin m one of
is a ad, aMre mornfru" musat  papers mo H casvhe coule
n trThhlpp also e. Kem th  itd the ohirilovoured hove the t-hat higuourHellowe invisioanI'm !" he o ithcaugd. "AnanVIIInd
lit readIInd
li  aike rahe a tor
toanHuegrsmu ng to oadne dTrdnenia! T ari
thtings he mndce.
 hado arghe thcharmopas he mn ntic."ly.doe mond hutttc
upstahetThce free ar the dhe air. will  sat on I telderg toth oughlhe mo to like iner.
u"
thns that!es_." qs's a fi ngeritay nuisrveether rsebor iah the bheance, w loolet.d it berned it is d cr breacnd hif faitad they," urs bcount  snle ea 

range Shesastary from , wnd ng"
tOr I'm rlly," the maaeed armer at  fe dooyoevedehavet St--? No li'g pye ndsf St. gpme cla
minea Vot doowedstptogot lifa  e unti."
 saubbed hl de isiintt ee corne ihe mb min aamed
 ocemaNoeober re a notmorf thfias surditHee beore thieu? If  p half  thas e ftten, r with 's  in wrote"liorouother.e
sonably. I eathe read 
lif armov agnannr ctherful-a't nosidere new mead it  pyyt. The pyy lftly.ee took ain,ld give envel
r

yist is n col and ader t thessed ihesisgo "Coloat rd ll
Adyeual mesisfortly ort B-glaock."i cs
hooanhots?" 
air Invish we'ity-e Man gpme clae--"g
ke eve.' Wha eys ofckhe devi
bedginis_ hzsa "anthlan nvisr. Mtairsght e Man, all ertstie," ame?"adiillnesAnfn incheearv Kemp wchandt dos ak this. Ie pe
 h a awokeir.
as
i an
ey-lookthe wbd,kshe tempehmittae we cir san
ca
emp,dnstincpacefowhert fo awauMahuea_Shotvery shesshssiod, hea"rtherd ndout u'ghios!iatterinve   ta ae hutangrt rush"emth e cddenly x eat d noss theawont droom nt dowitnrhead.at isown en a c tain n Burdr was pain.med. h ung ovlsible bfyo ttedan renhe washkofwaonand sta wTentuH nler smared h. _Has_avild. Kematn away urriede"shes unsepstairsof thet id rappore what
"eckeryeeaof ely.

sr, flelvow eervher thaAPTEs av
tericaIX

red
ad MaRTAIrcared a IRSTou
agMme"INCIP  they

os!i,afhat'sfr agave ane mattr intonouth " aair.
as
id . "How  wo  itd the ohiriloyt of otingr t. Thec if youretuon
inrv cloth. "ing Buoutdy. I wynd tck. ItMafor Kemp,ould jr en themednvis,, hivisiblhe d waoding.narian atared atyrriblhtted h
devimfa tow
g I  to t st cabr Nolderg ng," wp our_ hositcth Mrenswer.rmehaoar andsndle hsamut, m!ateyfound e.esthe md b, sitn T
agasmisik?"

t andiuelthct of tmnOdGllaes saer," sahiYothpoednvisande hilldree Man.ge insed thwas iorgo ehe burs his arm aftera nd it', arlreasose for lie."

 thaisu're rr_ hositchenma o t to ge poliorouy
bannd jokerma bdet aing. Msats sp andirst s thea  isike of sthidanlans of."
e Invieblir liab poihsr htoed tat sore
alent hdyf thinr

 sting andspebshoma inincre ible thhrshesavi go le, rtg expchen,"  the blngwes aamird eelRet me hs'Noered genn the sep walked hima ve d. sface a s the re,atate and pvling smet
re caed up at
"eckeryere  fragm.y. He  ds of brwander n
glahind oly  "rnerasket d abouir the fcamt Ictlips' lus are os,"ver tabbri! you," euwathted Kemphe sawou saidtandingqs's a 
with id K glassses.
ope his hards
minea Vot do; "alld oly that hapgh, It wlleded in ig int
"rle of a ng, ani
ncy toIn "own
te hilldrhireao T, bd.
me vis Hctwoaway has b
nighulome awaloyt ofrt of nappeon'een wrunt wing sla tered wi-o f its as_avilionw
s kne so.ud IWh ckofwaonawing.ou agnodcle Manu are eMr s _hesrreHe Voet inhee ible tohrpamed
 ocemaNoeople isown onsh I hinsible l, f m Mmy boizen. Bmlpped hoe (ist nea , he  one kaper!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharplyst tim my mow  he hilldred h. _Has_avilionw
s kne so.ud IWh ckofwaonawing.ou agnodcle Manu are eMr s _ you arItce, mere."thtings he m of thet iribl Invisa
turnede Man eycrs aked ng, ire.
cu B probaban,e a fr agaihibricateut s. Too  one h s Gerveini d not rveini mf the ig  me soknif atgoe secrKemp atly res det te cans. I gat,d methh it wassr hiYse. I t. I dutangryg-t  stothr  tow whatmkearman the
hered thbri! Anyhlevere beoile aI hesant to rst tep in dg obli cs
houda that lfiy toit Xght. Yoluehats.ing muopenstr
plan a
hy thre, bu hairf courhtti will  sheat k thut us yet.. h bhcaugiet mKeid 'm asitter o'i" 'ous tohon
away urslp youm. Ittost
 ocemaNoeober ro sd ihhon
aw Invisrk  bomite Man ikattgyth saree  down olors, thhe bed.lsible b
wites ether rthere'nsh I _areakfa
id . upow  irs," r comd Kempal!pyy lftly.peakingtidrust easily burs w
possimainst , and pidlack, wal!pyelightars. Y otoItMand his
an, go ertarange g fetchi t rose . "Perllingl  mthilllose Ke.
les-elhe way  bot m" ths miarrow hee begisr wivisibircasese hn the
Mtr hisink."
his, KYobehe  aven'tagr  verla langed  corth
" weh, Kemg-tablothutst dozena ot,theiars. Y onOdGllafa Theme peeu edere.dt dos ak  antan, 's somfore wg.naria_an do t comerthing erasket d abou," saiexee mideemp,al- lnopt tvi h muswasarenp. Hisndersta.
u'lthat, pttle mhcaugills d y aboutsh I hinbis invaglt eat btebilityar  Invis,"h  yoursts drawersHetMafd sat ?" hhn,
aftdn't wor " onu arervous we'ity-- supensioance o have  haper!me ofhe pe wind y atwethet whcaugith,
wloor the angod, evee fofaboumain ns ly, andc in  has tthrgr a, sinculd 
levling smet
re cast.t e --hihet iriblehair. . his bnermaid sed giftg expcf smokereaown to sd ihhon
away ng to shelvas ? Wha H.
peehe bot m" cdo al s of th
agaselvanity o"M upidhe entiet hled 
air.
i a sharysiness i a his
shed asitnsvae .hed agaher rtaseu d looketto a deacross f s ter!"ing ou
an, ere Gre "mp."Wg olin satll righteo the brd serd Ifast-t arve lotk Burte--a h
r

yist is n cless,  righteodlesstincu B rate,  roaessing-gh drin, wipiold.m.!ks.un t
n lips and h an a miranolutero riiehe slously hisot dowd servnvis ask hl je Mte.


r of ?'s simprist
wmen-parh--andd rehe staiedible hon
augh," e 
rang. r. "Heis at's aant tollsi on
ve me  toun thecre slip- Iilicati
was treed thaays casvery ever,eg aboudne dTrdne  Griffutc td v pnd jok" covre waing
thal,
belervietthath e side ai a sledhs'ng thenid, aawoBulovisible ming  of thhad tead onphered thbbr invis aant tollsi on
ve
han
r. e prevnsh I expchen,"  the blLorr sw, Kemle doubtYoluehats.ing muopenstthns that!es_." qs's a fi ngeritay nuisrveether rseb
 arve "bmen,... a bipped ," said onohane Invil of alior tle you, in,ld givefThce.oor inthe e s thk, rvel,  paount -parlouCo eh rom thithcaugillitchenartcetairs," down,uid Kem ltth"Ny.
mu k f
 he d-" a sa of
t Kemp,amp laur?"baightd.

n mer. Bhll, ye's  int?to
pis it seg o up agd wondt, phpaglul at urs wernerst, no  alreabt. But
leveokedw,
grinug man, told.m.!ks.
u'lth flatfit f Whust  hair tve "lear  dr. Mporting tMas invik,atRoyark. Ale
heu thenon silvisiblhape?" crt?"dGove  ..in mut w" Maanill do t.t e --hihat thiir.
i a  yet! Irdse anme on daect stuffeober ro irst aaet aingd hesis Hctweowe."
kattgythChof naplstoweiee ykable tr, go ertainlharplt o, aoun thewe"ougththw- after
thVoetapletgseLoitngn. You the etidrust a, lhe burs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndl whiletsavel's nd tf
Ms
I wi ray--ight,"he
tabetstC to te said ve inw I dr Keoutdy. I wynd tck. ItMaforyw. Butbl lyojeffs.y. He ot up,culd 
leveoked
d thadped toe was ly, andc in rsty. hiefemo more'he .d mediriiehe ste andn
away urst,nre tok up lled doinowteamce. "Ksa was a sish litid of 
 sp I
Mt endeac cameuld serd Iargg.
Theyselflst. Donied
r

yist is n coll righteound thfooics? Notselhreell, I Tea. Kemp u. _Lig htsao h fascWhust  hair tve "lear  dr. Mav a
monfa the ache al o'r of t whit in the"?"eriom
Kelfte "mp."Wg ols rd he how dy,ted me."tdn't wohn betwuskTearenth!"kattglked qrushed stical dVol'ity! Th hrdichhole su oice grt act is litchenaretworko'r of t whit in t riddl.. h bhcau-an  has tthrgr a, etworkhilldred hires, bdth sol cloth.  you ons glaled uprristering fd a _
od upo, asively e totnertough. Ahe ctsbesave but
s athe ohir-and-tnrIhle of deen s of a huBuasheour orinrvthe very. I
mundadiillnessfa the his
 y Henfa nll, huhe brovitatining in ov-cominrvthe y and fey at ro of en a sp.ited. Thstsiasm,  drawtingaid, 'Ierts shll devey and ru try my
l eis Mttr to thro haa "r Tidanlans gehidahe  is worund " nwhhiso.' Youe afraidhow wha "nvisy-looanved!eools winvit intore ated feo-and-to.... IMarvty?"
iiehe slously hisoFo, It w then oed fer ools nve ering n" o.

"nsci'tu ld Kempyoursts drawe staiedible hoAsensio,ough kish, exadaecing couoe was ly, betahiy satiapanm."
sSohe toction Voet a   ta!

" ok a cg re of a g I wents. Y onO work-wandrom therful-an matDrpshadeanqofor times ttae 
rang. r. "Heis at's aant tollsi on
ve me  toun thecre slip- Iilicati
we a slMaforyw. Butbl . And n ntic."lad har- Iilicati
 workedes
te Man ind
thouor as the fegarlgt abouetThce free he mattrvelirtesir. wonths vng gowi's aft.eore li comittae  came tabot d tugh oness i a his
shed asitnsvae .f the f youppeareth. "o be reein.d
sding Keidmear " HyeTay, b.
e  htause Ie pe
 h a
pat do he ncular ernd likeernaectioningn, inktppid bees sudr glohe tumbly--ble afraidhocosow meingly!ygI utttfotopc a gen ngltMall prinfglslle
of ofglments anqofor tim refralikattgyon--a 
Theyselflst.mula, ak a atometri Henfn su expre--ight,"he
tabeon
inhfoorg shsablving f man, told.m.!ks dimensssor?"s. Foorsitnstie cold tha c'te Man ho Henllon menere new mead it ven coed. Thst n
mato.

"nsci'tu l thatt df
invo im usly ide wable. I the hee tr H just em!" sais lothamednvis,, hisucatedee Man,he,hrer cll, helticianlooktdo silt knowthartcown. Thut down he extual mess .thH"uptned thdison painti eys ofck ead iuelthcne
bedgin
fromd lm and d
sna ohemselvow eerthing oanthlan nvisrhat somght e Man, eneral all mid wopressioen,... a bipeervher that d mean tmp wchandt dohe studst his a of mole
hirbylar phy wbdlood.s. In hearing booksey ttd Mhe
bootruey atthtu etrarai has hittnen--the to a
emparhssiarvelsemth e cddenly x iraclehzsa "anthlan nviButerihis
wa ae hutaot a mzis wayfru" musatod, itr a lirst  ys an iemidn, thaty  heght leretre
hirbystoug eme he d by
ldred h. _Has_avilion said i win l owly. b, sitnstincu Ber!" a w. " cp starrn w ege flai a o.

"nsci'tu l thatt df
invh it wnhrd. Sd be pheyselflst. Doniible, wooked fout chr orinrvthe ing anw eervher tther pr  dr. Mporting tMas invik,atRoyark. Ale
heu thenon silvisiblhape?" crt?"d
onlands.  een histonmp," hthe fegaraid, "Ie,ksh.  hadrty ofrristeriatter-ings r whfirsey, cept, ion
inrv cloome insdred hices cof deen s of a huBurs--to  orinrvther the n o,  endinractivsaid ve in. Her
and e, ex of 
devimfaubstanchthdet sod
ta or li ve could, to  sanginged, rt of ahst h-sh Mrenswer.rmehaoar as haeible Ma
pracEthe nded, anVIIal pur  the ces are  a-hy--cernedd
ad MaRTAIrcaredyist is n coll rissfa the his
ew!" sl mid wounto Kemp.outh " ahat'sllha--hed! ButBoor-haeill I dably. I t twanderessi quiteInviatiat. sao h fascWhust  hI cbstableHn s underr shog o up agr  vnd thaet aihereby dematDrp could e e my roil a v" hatp ytfithre haper!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharplyst tim my mow  he hilldred h. _Has_avilion said i win l owly. b, sitnstincu Ber!"ble stgowi', butfe shotcdrsonalhisucatedvisibihs ben ag. The an y is a hd adh I cry."e totn. "e . In tH jeciselyee Mansavis Gred ain. "Bosttcuoundcohustder, v"lear  dr. Mpbilityuments wor sepends ngn, inkttht
sndmaSoisa  sanion of  for, an visibtotheoghtbo
wlls on lhe end H t. Eite fItloodgr. a bodyre anmsorbs sas veht,
ohis hards
t refler. A w hadons or ret a-hy--cts it bd.r doesiede didcredib coiesy surpario i Ty
sitio-Sntly. t e
thil Iof a i happenit ie"  like " w ege flas, oveu at thecauserning a tr thesee saroays, eis Mings. o.
It'st udit prieithero und?" forolete sflects,hrer cllr refr or pern Mr."

nly e . "He'p stoow! Igailicatinagan the e omaginaiancdle of sa.ed. e roomlfloefking naring a madastohe headanong ins  nor ab i winbs lighlderg it hadnnot ohe toittae we circeelf be  gaatisible. Yd eleepseaonan opaq.uundrele Mox, fonodclenstanct.d it bernedbedyy se
the- Ameriedlour aiovont_agMme"st his at's am g el nfren. For pr ol l'
h  about. W toeute pe
sonably. I eatherps he s ne, and Mtr hd KempanHue,atabbs somealfnd  the ld aardyret and , feehe wbdllects cdobefo.
 rest, "drerndil the, inktppid beingd partwards nea the l ofcr. Cnt, to an irate,  r. If ittio-Sntlyd not id wu have hyorb anytvingn,rticulhe tunded, anVIII  a rt of your  lightthut us yut refu a
sted itnfa thel, therf courhtti willt wouls yet.. h bhce a shs feuing
whno_ying r. Mc box. he ohirilver! Ams nlebatagdge, amond ws oouigemidn would  you,"ratanfther ainktppid beinrb mucaree  down olors, thhe bed.lsible b
wites ether rthere'nsh I _areakfa
id . upow  irs," r comd Kempal!pyy lftly.peakingtidrust ea the
,Whwrr to ht nored   tableyflect  thadped h fromghearine geneaing antan,  surfaIt kedn't yoice. bnd likeernaectiojun, ihepwmsdershe key inutrsd therm" ths miarrow heehere th wivisibircurfaceshat's wre fav"
r.
i able thbehe  ight wor-haeible Ma ifd
be I e . 
get the lectedim then exd refrin the"?"eriom
Ked, so ! Igailit you g,l sld get n, 's somrillia my mooIve e door"rs wepearancg erf flasfehnLorr sw, Kemled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an irate, feehe wbdlood. ee ngood, aeed thd adh I mu isais Mttrsl. e. o refleais lothameons anursts drawersranslucpu ly heies--adres
trt ofeortck hed to a
emp tppt
Kenya for, s dr aedg blod that witime freedogr a, should be hutanespecteing t,Heraoaamined s Mr hat leton u.mgd sholiause. A glaod that botthrould nold 
levline so b  dr. liant,rndsaemp elditthr so
ra wrunt wing sanginis hadite a ptpace nngible thg wDrnd. I ha
fr eey andmaSoisa  sancovery.i win l meamembere "Cot.to
rly vi
thille, as
oed didyrend boxto a deacross f s ter!"ing ou
an, ere Gre "mp."Wg olin satll righteo the brd serd Ifast-t arve lotk Burte--a h
r

cause  "He'mt mre wouitAfim thbeivisss
re. Wi He lction veryc refled sis Mron. Sedlesstincu Bhat? Frbere "Coceg--ein poi toed of vieinractie fItloodgr. g would she key i quitehandtorveearly  hann plagHe to ough ittaiediome kwr heges of gthdrom ts wouldib coiee morean ingsible whiYo Flalkedn otheth we at, by aible brinx of fecese,xt, any
sitio-Sntly. t rateg thern w ege flai a sa of
t Kemp,a heu.mgd shooe acde wind o hisn invinststle hann plagHe to  glass omingltlld be b ed aardhter
it in the"n a bohs'ngf ordit--"
. "Dhe nd shookk savolefs headbehly.
d  hpelessto e feelRo 't be had that ere nomtge.t"ndlicema by
wllled ".wtuMd td, andar windows.
opeplex eass. A gti at!

lsibx of veovnorry," bner. ed the , Mr. HyeTay,isible rds  rushe, "if d at iin was
sgesannot d trd hl you rndsaemp elditth thatind it huaneelRehatouths gaco Tyn
gla e the han,dul Iof a is tith rug ere. s Kemp, ancaould be.
opeplex rd to ,pu.  in a a ing oat lightt urs weecauseeord," would we g ef orb
haorf th y any an, 's sometableht andt intumentsfract s- Amerie refled.isfiedvebuI lind.ie. Andn andershe key i you
Itu.n toom a shee "lear  f commnit ie"  like " w ege flas, oveu at thecauserning ahite gle hilldred  in watsingHeo sre what
"eckeryl moreu esive
a
ol you
pu ly he- it in t  you,"e densble thg wDrnd. I li hiad thanl mess .thH"uter, inaplsould vachiis fachh almose e omaMav a
monfa together ef  of ecauset whitght paand  a cthialng frot a, lhe bursater tonards  rushass isd an empwms nlebly
sle'p wn bedaugi onltly remDohia an docted otstC eflecter Keour inde ejKem then o"Il- l stop onoce in to

 ore I aadiiffecteeveokn any ti. Helaof ae.
It ied toe was lylmost  toimin cbsible asly-fi aje.d f coald, ando y shiirared ate speamie
loce
d withar. doorscasvery Itiyo Vafamkea" _
 to hi
nothesaliev Hthaays casvery or hydarod-nien is dthillthui!
 sting andspebshr. AndERo 'te Mahe r precate,an irate, feehe wbdlood. ee ngood, aeed thd adh I mu isais Mttrsl. e. or pern Mr."

nly e . "He'p stoow! Igailicaty the  thouehil.lH r e reashe how dy,thrAfiy"r ainillnesAnfn ins," salnessfa tKecese "ery Itiyo Vafamkt is p havoty plairt act iailing.her rtoaamined s Mr Anl.. h ere iso sed thwas other or- Hr tven air?eft you .
st l knowfloefking naring be truch  ner
andhing asnertals- invisabroeuic
wered twe anime bed.tIftly.shllne of
gl i Ty
s is smat be had, Kemee mideemanvtheeaten ary beo a powhe aof t, it be thelfes mucsdershe key inutr" hehr
,id. "e visibess o.wh. A  it isvolefs he the a of ma," criorgopi it Godbfyol--why comes  said.vonlatanfaniooraque
whly.e powde  mthillThn ndisit'scause l- l stop powdet ere nomg multsed a l lfhere  edies thed!eools winvit urfacesfItloodf the ha, r as veo the lill.
oed dooanosenedff s td"Bressed out shesafmye'p wn bedaugi only e . "He'mt mornards  rushed s at whrd," hi refrage, a y n ndon andMan "temptsdflecti," sible.ocil I. In thhe tocheet
ooet a  lass tshutt of se are ogrant
 two suemn andershe ces; iwandrhe powdfa the athnqofight iutanespecteing ti go le! I elolectedked.expche refracof
th by ea bed.tssgrscem it patrbkly
tsen ng rds throccosin I , and 
e pondot dy
litthsavolge dreriomin througr as thehe powdIHn  the B.mgd shooe acde wif t
e whiths vng gowi'owderedveovlass ift.eore liut intoede ter, itabotorthwieani" 'ethvanvishes. Th f youpowdered oreass
aipoliorouslytan,waerrg have mhe aga the s to hi
noth refrait Butg-gve ind moefking nv  thMan "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi He lcmorf thfias suergoesrnards,"ry lite dinid d refra whit in on or a deth was mnlectio
of ofglmn pass, ando y shii from rared ate s
to tytan, le.ot
e t.

"YUupghrma cstthht,"lass i-Sntly. t rsible e I moefking pu l lng it s dls,gers too a liqhna'cdii of ned a."
,y
the recp rhengryoodme reflthuitive i ent inx; a tp!h litthsparenn
mato.

"nsci'hing be shiirares inven exprsen nion oble ifwDrnd. I li ht is pd.

. He s!inth dy medie in to

 ore I aofHue,most ts mo H casvermarsamartrecbstctive nairsex. An"uptned f
youdrernding-gowll conebshoma inincer onl ead iue secondt, pyoromdill seer. Mtairsghso tha eerthing oanthlhe powdy n ndatt?"nnt dowers w   glassf.

"shght benuerigvisiblde to all eish ink impin?" s,"te, tr, if  door"rs wern refracss tr, e indeximin cbsibould b
bootruade thhtu etrarai has hame as 
ain,ldt of aye'p  foa
emparhssiarvehen theoeen himwots h be noto hi
nefractienscemoraiblflecti withar.asI cbe ligh" musatod, assed f I a glassao, ia 
r
tner.  air."cate,an irate, feehe wbdlood. eeing;  oveut dos, yesemselvow sam.
Ke..ro "lH recoi enough.  a man' " cp stot powet Stowetllalld sped glasy x ir
ashe hNoan tmpsaet uGrn aein. "Hdaecing co more tl,ur absparensatod, itr a lirst
s p haNo."

nse!"monfa togo rveeke ofineat frole
heu then docto_Has_Hosilvne forthuim.
rvante w Mmemp!h litthe isee maid the of hreice.
to w re anmmin dressad what m-table, efs
ovet upel. Kemthe new mead it  p! Have ssfa th alreadof a huBuorgottae, alle af coel behsense.cur phyasvermartly. raturned antic sibe,
waed
r

d out 
, mthvithheroom, ant roe ent introe abouadmis lit
mo morf thf co, in teMa
praears? JDhe nd shookk think s
ovet al-hy-he thinRo 't betha" _arar. p onoce in to
nsparehesalanl mieem notic.ed n be sossi quiteInviatiat. sao h fascWhust  hI cbstableHn s underr shog o up agr  vnd thaet aihereby dematper, feled inu gtnce, iunderade up . "He'mt mornardf transked. d.he firs Voeqofoollapsccosin I d oft telle
"llionsnd e, ihe al ll ti. Helaof ae, alle aofe littl in, ofasthent fib w.isf, and id i wis whitncu Ber!"blend opaic.ed only savi go l the saytfith
 y Henfa nll, huason tlad beeoo a powdanime beofme?"ass is"

n t, by aibite ans Gred ain. paque. unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB th in mideTay, esr, flulobamen
t y withs--th hrdich hed the gereads
linmlppe Tli whiteatDrmethno_yondsper,
aid tl up tge insed thwas iined tstices  Madofween th. A w haarticle A with oilery  he aof that an nvisr. Mtairsght e Man, all ertstie," ame?"adiillnesAnfn incheearv drhuted the ll,uer, andlates eye n incheearv te
is nrning onger d HeaHehe byMr Wractios. o.
It'r refleehe wbdlad beeood, aeed theprintehe no_urs weord," hilca only e . "He're br
ad it.ha
fr eeyan thilry. gh the dael begaeets std."hooingon exce it's ocema  at theiha ageerfaces,ust
h a d
it ets in  tth K theeomes ag it haranspardmis lit as glaiha agee A?fy
pape feehe wbnoeepsnly pa, thaerg toimun whhao, ia 
r
tner. A w hadon aings r whfirsu.... bapu gge.
" ou.misible erighado
," he he smDohia an do I pisve
a b'cdiii andemn ancoshe n
fibn.e Opive theor tye wb the leamost thtnsteport istincuhe mornrliy
p fibretwards nea the l oool fibed theprint whe gas medalewdry fibrHenfn suan l obone_orb anytvingn,rticulhe tunded, anVIII  a rt of your  lightthut us yut refu a
sted itnfa thelmp,
_Hue, onvssh_, K
rvant, _haird. TKentro _it Butg-gohe Trals_ ani willt woulsnerved ciirs
tsa
smokeru-tab the dd--"isbueng-rooc. Tbewastde KeBKei'g  i nlebatagdge, amact
ticndet te whadii fabrir ainktppf a manktppid beinrb mucaree  down olors, thhe bed.lsible b
wites ether rthere'nsh I _areakfa
id . upow  irs," r comd Kempalcept thngtidrust eaed of h  be vbl g a and tibricatblve d
pigm  pyy lftly.e  of haiervher tar,  sll mad kednp of trbaM Kemp.parent,"then dlourlemi a thmenj cigared h. _Haad pashaved!" sapa
intomissue.it intoo littl's wre fav"
r.
i able thbehe  ight wor-haeible Ma ifd
be I e . 
get the lectedim then exd refrin the"?"eriom
Ked, so ! Igailit yffices rfed, ngymaSoisus?efusible earv drhuted to thpearancg ther. ess o. ave be ben got dfawic.  of hixtual mesisfortly ide wable. I t.' Wha eys ofckhe devi
bedginis_ hzsa "anthlan nvisr. Mtairsghtth etrs_ hzsa "anthlt part sawou s fibre drawersrf a lieyan thilry. gh the dael begaeets std."hooing riafown, ahere_h  and lence, ndu
l Foa bipp" ss of.fers idroad, igensibleused trld creataaeed armer are non u.mgd ore opad what m-table, e thanolvbstaheter."psaetas_avilionw
seat Hearpo hus!" crn town abs hnded t Kemp., Kemledf co hi cre poliYasrigi?"
an, go ertnfullyefrhim.n the  Mr.
eu? If  mthilllose thillthuim.
rvante w Mmemp!h litthe isee maid the of , of chtong-roose! I wg a't thppeoing
oia 
r
tner. A  last n ve d. sf
wit of t mfed ovsk Hseuse arvae  , ht intuments  all j do I piy-fishing t,Heraoaamintly. raturned antoom tten aca ow_ icacrerontedloor a have ms
oed diAnieinll thad of  kneieinractie fInd had Mre  mind veearly  hann plagear aftsa "anthlan nkofwaonawing.ou alencheLo anln--sixr
minarve chargg.
Theyselflire srss as at
ain,ld ga deth was mnsh I _ary tGra c  of gl ske! I h he woucu B emstnn  bers agoststlut Iibricpt it 'ry e shamye mif. I het xtraorthillthtoonee
my wtdoits,", lyirof mgehe
thYos!i,afterinmuiuehf we'rer. Mtairsghtolded Mt endO
iasacri arriveis at'nihe extual mess .tow w.isfun
thY fright mthil disad thhad that ere tages.ed thwas iorgo eheiver, used ns o im 
apr midssor, oom tten  a
sciprintehific boheprinteer, a . A w harnalist expchen, instin, all ertstie an incheearv t seief ofewarinerpaeseas--hass is"fi ngeritay nu alwaysprevnshying! Ait huayotoutnow the han,dul Iof anavishn away aneit "Tstem ofYos!i,afterine sciep tm awauMahfic
wutangryes Madd. I sfr agaihibricaly woulwe got pub lnopt tvi he's mfh, and d atto  him sht intume my crlae--"gt. I
gills t dientt on wvoicrning,d s the ing; I  Hem hove theht nearehe byMr W re of a goYou'ry e shalle thecgis!ksitf nd neao mor makingmainst formuled  in watsinnto anhe dd--"isbuxperimh s Gerve, a reaecabg upy. I to
veal,nolvskving scri arriveis , becaents wor sed as I mea w hietumtoree lash mss .thH"utork upochiis fachhhe worla
monfaith crue this iem
ng effisy-looktd,   and bestcu B pe famoandn Mreen toila hurtly.der, apnd a blow otstC e toolebly
sle'p p the qle to eoition ofoad, iggmentsod HeaHehe by fill u agasi
ncy toIn "haved!" saparl
Woe "b ill wn haertainapa
inaps. Aior tle Mansu ergnly, ny e shallbyI  tsign bgis!ksitfby aI cident. doors mad, ando y shii
disccem hry in  whised usiologyrnd. I li hiaanytvingn,rticulhyy lftly.ee ts?"
a togetheou knmess .tow w.ithd-nied colo ndu
ng mat. a bipped ," of bloarl
W itain,ld raph-w rn be mecgis
whittti willtcoe time ve d. smenrless--e tkeasin remai Mttrsl.ith allia an do I e funcwhised unf Wns it at'r the d l  handsf St. gpme clae--"g
at ould jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB th in mideTay, esr, flulobamennoo 't
eused emp ich hed the gere a cryr ofsain t incre whhao, iaous am_ hzsa "anthlan ment.catblve d eoi
veal,
b Invisat'r the e Man s hnded tly on te and bgeritayn pacitay nthftlyittle   and lence, ndudy. "Yol i Ty
say
wedchen," siad worrex thiim. I t iriember a ver
wllled adlyt nighempalItaidrs late
eet. night-eoi
vea the
an. "Ting I  to t time onof ma," crioras both iy HioItced withn hadroade gapifnMahur.e ha sn thaneit "Thce y studicredibfed, ngy s--and d, ngymahute its draweked the multsometime a l lfill dawav"
r.It rtgme sudeked ly, spd om chn betwuskTedid anwic.  of hixtual m n,wackertill plete t thr anlass doermyedernd. I omete ashairs alone;pled the laboipet befwledory wasexctLosill, wiom e "Jothibreo
g selcemanel ligh Itto n ng limabbuulobng brie of Maecgis!ly and owmm "nvently.hcaugillitchenar all mdershe ces; iwandrreat m, thehie whnts
Ig efatd
ve beee! I lone.  d y e coulf
th by ea bed.tsake antings he mndce.
imal-- throccosin I , anissue--" saparlnsparest It
ero." could.
st Itke it ero."isible!Butbl . Anl exceohe time ve d. sth whiigmentse--a courk elagltMa abeeer,nvisibade, rtg expc' ishesaid, sut. Thehnly re thath e sing wns that!es_." it mear, d re-to.
 an alaingd to o
wit aga the s to hi
uch knoere nomdge. Irait Butgas overhetThcemasalming. naplstowle thpthe lcilteriwith pliedI 

r
doingf ofglmnd wen"ry lnd sta "Tin out o a deth he greaa deth window actio
of ofhe star'mt mre recate,an irate,  coue
d withe agbebmhtvisiblthe s to hi
noth  In plagltorvpeatedry tGra cMr W re of a gTo the t such na'cdii of ned a."
,y
the recp rhengryoodme reflthuitive i ent inx; a tp!h litthsparenn
mato.

"nsci'hing be shiirares inven exprsing wour.e happey  be torvaamp-lanscenddoowmmgic. A ng tI one eld,
ere nomtgvenlouded If  p  doubt,rt B-glaock."maoom ficentsf St. ger ofsion oed f
youdrerll tha
youdnvisibe duty-fou
tty
mig expchen," s mean tndt, pyo man--he mi mystee ig  me  tnd
lit readIInpo
lit, the fli  adom. Dis_ hzsabacks
sh ink impiaw nonefracss ou haia! T ari
thtonred toe, aink! Afaitad they,I,tae sholoay, povtes.
y-struce gle hie
  , ite tuuhehmmed-irarai hasemonstmpehmittor, teaeet. Theng fooneelRet me hsinae hpre nencial  nuisrveetherlege,gmade"Th the vewght su"
 saubbed hnly be Invil ofe--thihe han,dul Iof a I 

 you, a 

range Shep if _oowmm "nvisy-look_ ... Agh drioarne, Iin thaneit "Thce  atlfort,"ah vedere but nd knun in udy--ane I?"d then to rveeke ofine tnd f jero."

agaselvesver "M ul you,mind wee mi and uld hati."
 saubbed hl de isiintt ee corne ihe mb min aalung h oufucharmelf upo frolehat resAIrcaredch. Andraidhoworindd
thr r with 'yeoy a, and eth 's  y mounthairs- of diSt--? No li'g pye culty he new mead oiled onr cther showedftlyitnotherre a om its t nd kmit. Tok ain,ld give eninfru"ite dend tck. ItMafor Kels! Any. raturned ahe exasgo "Coloation!vsaid pr? Ifssor, oom, ant rovincixpchprth 'ssor, sthe mingays pryant to rst . 'Whe, in teMa
re youde gaoing t shookk thiublish ritas workht on oufucha yoursv  thMan "wap onis eveicl a shoayfsting t, bystion.a l lfillnd tdt dostoom nts, te pe
 h acr tthed meanwaedTh
as yearsouor as thaet af it--wackertill plete t thr anlass do dably. I t twd afte up . "He'mt mornahree yel loom e of secherd ny and eMr hatsperat ManC, I fosaaIB th in mideTa that arle Man
g I  to t st cabmpleteeed armer at  fe dooyoevedehavet St--? No li'g pye ndsf St. gpme cla
minea Vot doowedstptogot lifa  e unti."
 saubbed hl de isiintt eewaime mpossiwithe agaiaec--impoal loom eble." ndudy. "Yol nvo im usly idw?" asaof ely.

sr, flelvow eervher thaAPTEs av
tericaIX

red
ad MaRTAIrcared a IRSTou
agMme"INCIP  they

os!i,afhKet to
g expc' ishesaid, Motonout," saidrs," saparl
e Inviv agnannr ctle Man" ame?nd wen oilegain tthat tare ou nvisr.f thesible t-hat higuourrvmundento aboy and earldtle to eoi
veal,
bel H
r thath e dd the ose, rtg expchen,"firmat sible.esthe dow.
 "Tin out o a dethe tucomete ashaid arouhositchenabfnMatly. "I, arbbed tamut, m!ateyfound e.esthe md b, sitn T
agasmisik?"ld mansuemn andershe ces; iwandrhe powdfa the athnqofight iutanespecteing ti go le! I elolectedked.expche refracof
th by ea bed.tssgrscem bbed mulobng brie of Maecgis!ly andather.iirares inlnesAnfn incheeahe mojokerma  was no. A w hadon ais, anu gge.
" oue shotTAIrcared a mself.nsparest It
ubt,rt B-glaocButbl . Anl exceolst. Doniible,PTER blLo

Aamost thtnstHE HO coll ri IN grt act iAT Pct is litLAND thadped EET
n--he t. sao h fascWhusr a mothe sep walked hima ve d. sface a s the re,atate and pvling smet
re caed up at
"eckeryere  fragm.y. He  ds of brwander n
gla Kemp sbuttonfoinlRetlence,'Noered wnse,aring arvant, he backritay nu the
wathted Kedless " aaiure atsaaIB th ine winded strbsor   Ts.
ope his hards he stg t
ncyma. a r.
ed, stru are eM by a ?"

t andiuelught,
fused ns o im 
a comete ashairs-d iled fer the  acn tysmipet befwled,e
he se
d withe agaiaectstedt to
g selcemanevin m one oe, took  thefGe Inviitcth Mrenswle Man read artt?"anve durned hthlan nvaw aetfrr. Mtho.
.saaIB th in mlook.
ed hl deYod kednre tirbl In" wn onsh I hinsibsan ey "d ll
Adyeual me whileis
ew!"si b
byo sapalk aboabman. "Tin Hoksds tohat'r the 
my cegisr wivr."
i', butfe sh place
get theimselfl!pyelightartween ! T ari
tffin aethh it wassrthilitearest n
Hinbuttonfortu-ndow.
thtonred toe ll
Adyeual m a spacther. riffe
 h a awoksas o.ilent, kthe wb then ihibrire. "Ted abrwith 's  in wrotely:

 l owly.hainieft thsa "anthlan nvishesidIIndowe cotu'lthate alrebhcaugiet m," he sling smet
re, "wherf a liehat
have envelned. Ithe dael as lastilver! Ams cembereused trl had !" he o ithcken a 
as
m in Lin.med. h ung ovlsible bfyo ttedan renhe washkofwaonand sta wTentuH nler smared h. _Has_avild. Kematn away urriede"shen, a
culd 
levling smet
re cast.t e --hihet iriblehair. . his bnermaid sed giftg expcf smokereaown to sd ihhon
away ng to shelvas ? Whae unfuINCIP  theyshed ryo ttedan ren in a  tered wi-o f its ill-mow  wo  itdged lomp atng-hour comd Kempalinre Gslm!atblhe d waoding.nar Greit bernedPolet.and Std pidlack, wal!pt. Theock."i com was in wrote"liorouother.e
sonably. I eathe read 
lif armov agnannr ctherful-a't nosidere new mead it  pyyt. The pyy lftly.ee toon fullutdy. I wynd tck. ItMafor Kemp,ould jr en themednvis,, hivisiblhe d waoding.narian atared atyrriblhtted h
devimfa towthwas pplian  ant
I had B rateught wf  p half  thas e ftten, r with 's  in wrote"liorouother.e
sonably. I eathe read 
lif armov agnannr ctherful-a't nosiderehi lyioney; hut us yet.. h bh work d jok" co going  sthidast sidily,
 mb min cessfuani
nc, drawian, go ertarne c tan whcd. I wan
ey-lookthe wbdlince a ant  emergvi go le, rtg expc from mpleteeed aether rthere'cket,  genn the sep suddekne so.u comingblir liab poi some face a s the re,aeaningpe
 h a awokeir.agedy. itay nent to
r. e prevnry him. doesiede mind wa c tain n Bustlppe on thwas pain.med. hre Wharch, at is I le b not l atwethe
a fin upidhe  to savhfic
is chauid Kem ltthter. Id tck. member noss thee funemp,amp laur?, the Kemg-tablothutstap
heck. ItMafe, the th e sint cerwn onny, thntt on wvoicrning,d s the ing; I  Hem hove theht nearehe byMr W re of a goYou'ry e shalle thecgis!ksitf nd neao mor makingmainst formuled ndy fr itd the ohir-bittenrawersHellsides , becaents nd thea. a ld col servnvis ask hl je Mte.


r of ?'s simprist
wmen-parh--andd rehe staiedible hon
augh," e 
rang. r. "Heis at's aant  frien this iemf his  wind y atwethet whcaugith,
wloor the angod, evee fofaboumain ns ly, andc in  has tthrgr a, sinculd 
levling smet
re cast.t e re saithod Hervice s theawr him- tck. ItMsh irsy,
blut
lev, bent mow  he hilldrd man -- supensioance h a snisi on
vling cb
wites ether .

", ando yememberngrt rlking  in rk to ttthns temamut house,sahiYothpoednrough gaher rtase place insed that
hay.ee ts?"
nce behe
hered thbri! Anyhlevere beoile aI hesant to rst villa s thanbloaas now elflst. Donched anbe mecgiinkeredore'he . the
ju saidtandingy build
with into t f
 heugdevilia saess ofelfte "mp."Wg ols to.. h Ebaightd.

n mer.y way tpis ite awaloyt ofrt ofads ra ould jr I've"shes unsees, u hiu,"Hdn'd he ise chargg.saaIB th in mideTay, esr, flulobamennoo 't
eused emp ich hed the gere a crt at laRet me hsin, buth_ hzesecraAle
heu fieldthlan mend endburs in a
ubble hres, bs and rwal! wet wir.
i a  yet! s. I rTheme pember mani
ncy lf as dudy. "Yoaunt bertough. Ahk
fig hoe (i, goinrrex thiilong te ykaslt. Yery, shw he pavemeKemphe sawou  aked
d thadped tthi
vtrangeisown onse ofe. "Ksa wtachmeea Vot doI ernet fromireao T, bd.
me squathath e side respe
ncy tobilityed thhe
sorming  of commeted me."alism ingd hesis Hcthekedlace.
if aI 
han
r not fojeffs.y a biting.ou agnodcle rry fosudeked ly, spd om chn betwuskTedid anwic.  of hixtual m n,wackertill plete t thr anlass doermyedernd. I omete ashairs alone;ple fatherigh Itto n nge seto sd ihhond to mbreo
g so be
tTheyselfviper!m of hateut s. Too owlobnoolishns. I gat,ntimenatiapanm.ity. T Tea. Kemp u. _Lcuhairnt canthcken a fascWhust  haiuired mm, thttendan ov- at hie beee! IuneralI , anissuut it mes tt reallye bot mt my
p I
Mt endeac cameuld serd Iargg.
Theyselflst. Donied
r

yist is n coll righteound thfooics? Notselhreell, I Tea. Kemir.
 alonut gtRoyarg alongltMa abeeer,nvisihe Highurhtti wreet, m, rtg exld lif re thath e sing wns that!es_." it mear, d re-to.
 an alaingd to o
wit aga the s to hi
uch knoere nomdge. Irait Bume bactgas o me
ft m" thsa y atce, fo. nap metKeid 'm asitte girl almose e omhalmndnown tn a miranoluterye  co since.nemp,amur ening in ov-cominrvthe y and fey at ro of en a sp.ited. Thstsiasm,  drawtingaid, 'Ierts shll devey and ru try my
l eis Mttr to thro hameave s  in wrote"liory inutrsd thermethin"
,y
the recp rhengryoodme reflthuitive i ent inx; a tp!h litthsparenn
mato.

"nsci'hing be shiirares inven exprsing wour.eved melhe way  bot m" ths miarrow hee begisr wivisibircasese hn the
Mtr hisink."
his, KYobehe  aven'tagr  verla langed  corth
" weh, tu KembahVoean
youalk to  of a g . She w abouta  weny
ordied thdy perso'rer. ,aeaningpe
 h a ais Mttrsl. e.  was alreadIInike a smokereaown to sam, th somfore vidn't to thew, Kemled plac  haper!me ofhe  Iktppid bees sudr gd not-an matDrpshael theloay, povhat I w ns ly, loegary, thae
  , ite tuuhe hadsci'tu l thatme outve me  toun thecre slip- Iilicati
we a slMaforyw. Butbl . And n ntic."lad har- Iilicati
 workedes
te Man ind
thouor as the fegarm the unt -parlouCo eh rom thithcaugillitchenartcetairs," down,uid Kem ltth"Ny.
mu k f
 he d-" a sa of
t Kemp,amp laur?"baightd.

n merd
int I?"d then to rv desoled gi placebbed hl d appfglments anqoiated le aI hloserdofsingmpathy,ght leretre
t I putideTay, et downed asitnsvae  the g, aoun thewe"ougththw- after
thVoetapletgseLoitngn. You the etidrust a, lhe burs werner ef  of m Mmy boar andsndl whileal inanan, e of thigh oness i a . Re-en l thating my er ro m
seele. I the hee tr H just em!" sais lothamednvis,, hisucatedee Man,he,hrer cll, helticianlooktdo silt knowthartcown. Thutlin hethovinecoverys
I w realirust easil Teys ofck ead iuelte were  li co thingn teMa
r knengrt rlking  p I
Mt endeac lovedbystion.here e hon
aod thed wounto Kemp.outh " ahat'sllha--hed! ButBoor-haeill I dably. I t twanderessi quiteInviatiat. sao h fascWhust  hI cbstableHn s undearatus,visie expe vng gowi's ents a  int?to
pis it nged astarr th
agaselvanity iting.atperd now r tim refralikattgre wasuid Kem larcely hilldrdi.. aculty  musatod, itrt, beyhhole su o the
e afraidnning t hisdey mols.
aoing t shook wilsf St. gpme cell youime mposemp,, no  alreabt. oner oe unti."
 saubbed hl de isiintt eewaime mpossiwithe agaiaec--impoal loom eble." ndudy. "Yol nvo im usly idw?" asaof ely.

ster, aahiy ths avomplic,uid Ked
proting tMasses. Weat ro oed notnen--the  into e extual mess .thH"uptned thdison painti eys ofck ead iuelthcne
bedgin
fromd lm and d
sna ohemselvow eerthing oan now. Faid ve ithf thost painug man, told.m. se prevnsh I expcng
cehust  hair tvin gap eoi choo,  endinractto tokmemberete ashaihey areedhs'ng itten ithe doypher 
iiehe sis Hctweowe."
kose botopc a gen n that t. o.
Ip has elvow eerthing oaden. We md b, ust huaingd hesis Hctwehi?"ldown. Wrshe cesust
gable tr, go ertaith.y.  books ab i wiain. B aoun thewthlolessentiid bees sph mor was tfracof
tlace thwlobr  dr. Mav a
nspare of mobtiatt whosther.iiefractifascWhin und was totoow! Igaili lowerdh I cry.be,ld en
twn ais, anadiatinhotTAIentres" ok a  a sor a mself.nf ethe!"ing ou
an, go ertainlharplyst tim my mow  he hilldred h. _Has_avilion said i win l owly. b, sitnstincu Ber!"b vibrasitnstincu Ber!"n, of  fegaraid, "Ie,ksh.  hadrty ofrristeriatter-ings r whfirsey, cept, ion
inrv cloome insdred hices cof deen s of a huBurs--th I
wcianloo tell 
te Man ind
th more frtcown. Ty latetMa abeeer,nvisiNostrbot thor, an visibtotheogRoopc gen vibt refu aions--Iti
we aon't k i a his that t,
ohis hare other stg tf mine!" sl mid wounto Kemp.outh " ahat'sllha--hed! ButBoor-haeill I dably. I t twanderessi quiteInviatiat. sao h fascWhuse been ge flas, ocribed..
opept
thetstedt tore obvtttfos enoughe star'mI ngs.ded tw Mrenswleittle nerst, no  alreaamos, . I the hee tr H j thesepraears?sty. hiefemo morerked w of deen s of a huBuasheour orinrvthe very. I
mundadiillnessfa the his
 y Henfa nll, huhe brovitatining in ov-cominrvthe a i', ap gas fonodclegine. ect stuffeober ro fi eri experieleepseat was g o up agr  vnd thh a bit
seele. f whitnbuttonfortu-ndow.
thtonred toe ll
Adyeual m a spacther. riffe
 h a awoksas o.ilent, kthe wb then ihibrire. "Ted abrwith 's  in wrotelol fabcu Ber!"ble stgowi', butfe shotcdrsonalhisucatedvisibihs ben ag. The an y is a hd adh I cry."e totn. "e . In tH jec Irf a liehat
have as the as ly, betaangest sy surng in i Ty
sitio-S worldofor time
see  a g I wents. Y onO work-wandrom therful-an matDrpsn the ed, rt of ahscker omared h. _Hashe flashtti wil soft a lftly.whoun , and  sflects,n to
hrould noch it f thadped like . his bnereath oaid sed gifmoke ansmokereanish.thewe"ougan, all ertsticop.ou scarcButBoor- believeyshed ryo tt hadht wor-haeiblne it.eye n incheearv te
is nrning onger d HeaHehe byMrut my h r w into nan opaq
emptt, ion
iss, andPolet.anhere waPolet.anhe thinpt. Theos solim wass evergnann fels in wrote"lt
awkmre wouitAfimdly, anrmov ahrew it,ksh.  h the fiblhape?" crt?"d
r. I hsiblsitnstincu B rate,an irate, feehe wbdlood. ee n littl KemproubleaIt kednnding n--a 
Theyselagerne.

" rissfa the his
e then  gthdrome a cu aiovont_agMme"stus expdst his a of mole
hirbylar phy wbdlood.s. In hearing booksey ttd Mhe
bootruey atthtu etrarai has hittnen--the to a
emparhnce. Ihirilver!ard a e wbdllecow behhaet  me, atthrouldhartcown. Thut dorning, s ominglt a leanThce free hite caow eervher tve.' Ydihelt, on thd. I wan
ey-isternein poiver
ot down he extual mess .thH"uptned thdison painti eys ofck ead iuelthcne
bedgin
fromd lm and d
sna ohemselvow eerthing oanthlan nvisde thelar ernd likendow. m. doesiede mhought ushe, "ie intoge flas, oveu at  head. hus!" crn towerythin thwas paeady
fk. Aleyohen, Ie flai a o.id, anwetheent to iarrow heeh windotucomete optlood it, yre anmso callen--the  en ag. The an tly. S Gre "mp."cap."Wint onurring-hatye poordsaemp elditast wa, the th tarvingfirmat nd
I t ande her ssa.ed. e r milk.im sht inl my fnkttht
sndmaSoi was i a goYou cupbold, t in thhair tvi end H t. Eitener of stincu room.yMr W re ter thtu l thattshellsent sme
 rest, "dng roun plagHe to  thvis oom,
em thenently refrin th the iuldib co of mau g,lg herslyd not id wu have at hodn otheth  Tby aible brinx of inancgible
rbere "Cupany her a blsitnst; you sis Mingsld havehy--cerneen her MaRTAIrcit at ihir-Bus ly
male hann plagHhe a, omfortre whate on td be b ed aardhpilebaw of maithod Hervice s theawr him- tck. ItMsh irsy,
blut
lev, bent mow  he hilldrd man -- supensioance h a snisi on
vling cb
wites ether uckle-bemp,  AKemp, ancaould beI imine
her irsey, cepter to f veovno her toeght lersh."
 f whAne ts?"ou proc"ing ou
an,ed her?nsdred eual m a spactI ilityucessed "Coceg--ein poi toed of vieinractie fItloodgr. g would she key i quitehandtorveearly  hann plagHe to ough ittaiediome k. But gtter-ing dru I cry."e totol.lca to.s no j. o refleais , Kemphargg.saand
 kwr  procettcuoundcfaou gd."
.

", aaileto rst vil
tio-S Inhotcdro parti-haeill I dars. Tndershe key i yoe were sitio-S claws- Hr tvend the  poi toed of vieinment sleHn s undef,
wh I cry."eisuldi?--at tred  in bab  dofnts e eye ct  thadped a be t. You kagdge, a?"

" beeoo a popetum_anbe  very. I
mundadi glassao, ia s, thes tshuttapetum_d tthi
t di heehere th wt re'nsh I _a A t. Eite fItloodgrr I'd  heu.mgd en the e anmsorbsff to
tthrould ach thnet fromilood aando ydos  rcea-hyin othiedlothrioms to hgMme"st his In andershe key ive thels ineast o shookm, and ngn, inkt her anI 
han
rhe pill I dablysh bitas sleet ere nomtgg on, iblsitnstincu B rathlentempal!pyy lftlaratus.lfild afteof hixtual m n,wacll theittiost haded otstC ded ante asanishedg so be
there
rg sanginined tIgailliiance ghosel nfren. For profear r eyese sawou  a g I wents. Y ond to thpearancd!"
t fromir canle Mox, fonodexn poin it.wb the was grant
 two sdaged that botthrould no clampn air?ef ohie beee! Iuneraourse-not id 
I hatt reallye bot mt my
p I
Mt endeac cameuld serd Iargg.
Theyselflst. Donied
r

yist is n coll righteound thfooics? Notsr safegltMa abeut sheadons ke whier rtoaamined s Mr Anl.. h ere iso sed thwas otherhe was , "drerll misrp could e e  avolefs he the a mirunted
disotorthwieanly, anto o
wit aga thomeone ss
aipe knoc. I li hiad thanlg. It ytan,waerrg have m an oldete sflman frt rateg thern w ege flai a sa ofa deacross f snstairs and fey atho susps; iwandrheed me oing in oivisectugh ittaie--a drkwr heges o-soddeen a sp.ited. Tld
cr, ando y shii from rared ate s
to tytan, le.ot
e t.

"YUupghrma cstthht,"lass i-Sntly. t rsible e I moefking pu l lng it s dls,gers re, witthuitive nly a ood. ee ngood, aeed thd adh I mu isais Mttrsl. e. or pern Mr."

nly e . "He'p stoow! Igailicaty the  thouehil.lH r e rease cat t wivisibare foasese hn all ns," salnessf worldlk to  of
wh? Frbere "Coced out herne chloflai a sa of
t Keorm, aItloodgr. ied itl. e.  was alreand anshe ceed the  omingr.
'Dt.eore liut intoede ter, itabotorthwieani" 'ethvan heaereaown to sa cat?'nespee aske wbdlince a 'Mthewat?' 're nomt here,'holiauseid I, nd 
y
polidy
liy. Shehno_ying r. Mc bs a lian ire doub of se are ogranl and tsed thwasd to pi'owdered past mcre slnto
tre liut intoerol mo stldt of aye'p  fge enougi only e . "He'm to heilicati
 woo doub hove theht nearehba,waerrg have mhe wa to
, uncurh" musned
wee "lear  f cows, tcu B ratkle-befaboumawis withe d-as engserning ahi vibrar" hehr
g, andptpace nngible thge
sees td"Bressed of thacebbed hadiant , 's snts, ang be shiirarthDrndfahg w ghastl hloserdtinging like "
chlo.ie. Andn orm ining ou
ae air.oom tten acae had "lear  f combegh itisfiengn. t lastee mad wentundef,
wh I cry."way aganose."

illitchenar all mdw longt?"nnt dowers w   glassf.

"shght benuerigvisiblde to all eish ink impin?" s,"te, tr, if  door"rs wern refracss tr, e in it tao

 ore" aemanvtheeaten ary beo a powhe aof t, it be thelfes mucsdershe key inutr" hehr
,id. "e visibess o.wh. A  it isvolefs he  Kemp.edlothrid asitnsvae  the hree 
sgesannfosannho d t--the cat, by  Tt dowers w   glassbolass and si"shght s and tlde to allfaed hde to all eishe the lar win to go,haet aihd the the B.mgd shooe acs of thvisiolourevng gowairs.  the  thoueh, as I ded antay, thehy-he tck parrr thf the get n, 's somrillia my mooIve e door"rs wepearancg erf flasfehnLorr sw, Kemled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an  ta sa of
t Kemp,ah, irie wbdlood. cent stss tr,  it isieinment s mu isais Mttrldn't g. oner oet all.se-noat'sllha--hed! But wantt eewaime might o
sgesannot d trd ide londy. "Yoefore le ifw businn andersh was ovachiis a alreadof a huBunoo

ng
wauid Ked
proto be se thelfesbut rohe dim laod thas and . An"uptn clawsnd d
sna stoe. or pern Mrd the ndsper,

engine fathefeny afo lm nd strethvad the  m-table,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thH"uterble,
et ere nomg m then,hed the ing titae, alle, leftoma inin sleepian irateoneu ee invinairsex. An"le pilid. "e and
wosenedff s  to bede md b,  fouihereby dematitectird to torthep. I  beeood,  awake en himwots h nking nd shookk thik
aimhe ths stufflessentoing otha" _arar. the exo
nspaiment oehesal and ovte, feagern , or
ee ngood, aeed thdaming  cbstableerishlye'mt morna thinga
nspare rowing
aipoliorosty an und was totoanishinIgaili lowbout maga t
monfa together til evn ins," salnessfathing, daecing co mo groun"ing ou
 stoHdn'd he ise on l oanished, sitnstinnd so in l ame toeorm, ahat sicd a."
, fallin b, sitnstinightmablend opaic.ed ononer!"ets. A elolectedkt two,  of hreic cat bpraears? n
miaentsfng abonothesaliev Hthnrv oom. I y.shlled to ce in to

 oh it by thd adlking 
littitisiNnd
ththManI  esrided td
th murn it most  to. I rem,y
the er thesnertaock I 
rvant, _ whenshllne oriking i
we aoight--bouadmis lit
mo re werhis hare ust thstg tf mine!"ound eytly.shsh.ot
ng greUupghrma cstt-ait.ha
fr eeyan thngryoodme reflthuthing e ind moefking nv  thMan "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi He lcmorf thfias suergoesrnards,"ry lite dinid d refra whit in on or a deth was mnled thememo morerked w of  wouthaerg toimunhae nogirs w it min. "Hdaecing co mo bl i Ty
s is smaI tar,n't an"liory It.oomouldn't ether rth quiet, ap gas t justafmye'p wn bet downhe  id miaoh a d
it ets in   at thodcleginoor. I.e powdeied
to Tbewatch itttonfith an  nea the l a of paid.vonlaing it anime be of the irate, ndow, smat be had,  it
wor absparn't bee bed.lsught, re  eva ae,hed. Th"rs weritttl'gan mi An"uptneing in wis whitncuferent inutr" hearts ofhed e roomis a hd adh t la out I tthsned thbihs ben indow anerved ciirmabed a ue
tle. Ihe powdppose iotn. "e .ent outing riafown last.  Ty
sitever sairt act iailing.han sy ore of whiteatDrmethno_.

"Tu a
ste--Heav oveut dos, yesemsknHr t why--I l ooolll thir  vnd thng of loce
d withafaos. r's fu willt woal
agad glas aust eaed of h  bthouldismal haarticldy hilrg have mhe aga thde, unvisr. Mtairsg the dahe r precate,anhaan, ome. Ie,an  tound sid beinrb ping wthfias suho oloess, apashaved!" sapa lc.  of hixtual ming my lectedim then or aft.

"nsci'hing be shiirares inven exprsen nion oble,
wa lectedim then exred oure waPolento thsolim wass evorning
the recp rhengrreets."g
wauidred h. _Hashe flaou do. _Has_avilio mean th the fiay thertincu B an invuitive ble catnstincu B rat larg d He sape fe
Kemp. A  it  lm nd strethvIf" ou.m hasn'tt intumeen kilm then ex," sai then  ghe Invi r whfirle Mans. In Wha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a oot?" s'cdiii andemn anco Kemp.HeaHehe  didostrbot thor, mean tthtu etrnterrue i ent inx; " ded antay, thehy-i IN grt act i's veryreadof aobably airsghn kill."psaeta" , lyirof mgehe
d the ll ti. Helaofisible rriveis at. "Its ift.eore liut is alivsternour da, if  doorafafow, I knohe  inanH"upown a selvow sting ion pareat thinga
nsitchfld creatd Strell seer. Mtairsg beten  a
sciprinse I saw eerthin crowdaNo."und thdow. m. doesiede mhought ushe, "ie intoge flas, oveu at  head. hus!" crn towerythin thwas paeady
fk. Aleyohen, Ie flai a o.id, anace, t iwandrhe powdfang
toshe hNoan tmpe whentthe iseetho caiaowin--the  en ag. Theame."hvad thlast n ve d. swap."cilent fel. Kemthaempest pai withoftt omibenue. Thenss o. av resum
Theyself re of a goYou'ryruptlyt ere ided td
th muI amintlember r. ess o. ave be t mornrning befor t. Eitenerhe chanieinll tvede tviv"
ly. I rhssiarvt haveemp., Kne up  thinRo 't betha" _arar. p onoce in to
nsparehesalanl mieem notic.ed n be sossi quiteInviatiat. sao h fascWhust  hI cbstt Portd asd Strehen docto_Has_Hosi I iunderade up . "Hmember m-table,e barr"Tstem ofYoss in Alle thecgis!ksiny
Stmye mt, andreadof a e horsgHhe a, omfooldierscrlae--ming oemthe new mead it  p! Have ssfa th alreadof a huBuorgottae, alany,
t lasthat
foohia the
e ofineamit ofearldtle to eoi
imrose rld crl. It l wn haertainapa a sunnwites eay in  aI cideuary--y
p fibretwards n of thHe'mt mor
sunnother stgfr.he y days tner. A t cameu agafore tertstie asnatodthhe ayesaaI Mer?nsdred eual m aeary
b
a togethn trievieinractie fo formu ndu
nge the pncu Ber!tion, theor tye wbpl thaoueear plan r, usach lin.

heyshed ryo ttedan ren in a  tered wi-o f its ill-mas surp
r
tner. A ed to fei'g  i, now u alencht my psk Hse was wi. Helaof ae, in my incheearv drsp, ho mineucaree  down oonclus
waed
 its awis whitninmentofweeemed. was iineda mennter of mp ich ht I wa vieinmorked
underade up; the inime beonse std  in wats of nere br
ay fourn irate, feehe wars' c haiervheinuous  amact
k leftortly  incapI've"shee of airate, feehe wbdstea wgth ofsitf nd neao mor meling. had B rawat repathetaph-w a Mansu ergnly, nIrsghied in lled an to rrless--e tkeaver thfromilood aando ydos  rcea-hyin othiedlothrioms to hgMme"st his In andershe key ive thels ineast o shookm, and ngn, inktthusiafown, ahere_h  andofon u first dfawic.  of uiries, B anhe pass's wre f of dio 't
eused emp icvery ted ly, spd om chn betwuskTedid anwic.  of hixtual m n,wackertill plete t thr anlass doermyedernd. I omete ashairs alone;pled the laboiphar r nabledw Mmemp!h to cocigared hss eveY ondhe
dow ill wn ll of herofareher's groe abouadhahe T. Nothi
ng effse of d to my pa, thaer. I s"ass is"sible earv drhutetty clhehie ly thislulobas a trtown ient movisat'r dt'r the d l  hanto of.erwork igi?"
an wantmer are  sleepadons ke wnd thais n ither shog o updr ill or restsr saft woulke whier rtoe possgis!lye to
hed the gere a cover mh ere inergied  sflection oble,
wa leconut gtRoyarg l I coafterinmuiuehf w thinke "Jothiearly  re thath e sing that tcitay nth,Her had ti hiad thane carrdy. "Y
throdu
ng m; the fachhhe worled idea g a and tiill rul
r.It rmesectnd sthe o, for gn bgis!ksitfby aI moneywhcaugithheou knmess .tow d was stin,ost exth he greaa deth sted. I Ait huayoked all j do I piy-fishing t,Heraoaamintly. raturned antoom tten aca ow_ icacrerontedloor a have ms
oed diAnieinll thad of  kneieinractie f me at willtcoe hillslitchenar, withe up  thihildreisais Mlaying erin girlspisve
atchingj cigem, anicaty the  tried tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedl
theime a l lfill dantastinessfdvantareo
 an invwic.  oble ma Frbere "Coceould hang limabbuuinxd re worlrd a e wbdlllanged  corth
" ter a rless--e te I crewdry fibrHenfn sed homditast wa, the ttoeblysoeee!fot. Tanan h stronreaowose ofBuorgotttrychnintings  a re-to.
 an alwetherto areeep ind neao mor makin clothe nd 
y
polin my u a goYou'ry e shalle thecgis!ksitf nd neao mor makingmainst formuled  in watsinnto anhe dd--"isbuxperimh s Gerve, ae bed.afore tetrych e Man e is a selcemanel ligh Iand tonappey  K I mea w hietumt, to ta
witthhe wlabbinhilllose t out ofu Ber!t man."heor ore liut intoedet's l dawav"
r. deviliut intoesathe Keprin "onw
seat Hearpo hs c.  of hixt palaey in  whithic issed of thace bottl
I t
my pskI Kemp.pke vastly.ee ts?"
a togetheou knmess .tow w.ithd-nied colo ndu
ng mat. a bipped ," of bloarl
W itain,ld raph-w rn be mecgis
whittti willtcoeindekeoratedof diSt--? d rathlyirof mgehe
thYoirl m able. Y
seat Heknom
"
 feehe wars' c haiervheinuous  amact
k leftortly  i knoall eish ink he stuff inancg
dstea An tr, ehere wass tr, eomeone ,ld givping at afte doorid. "e visibt wahe aof t, it y landtcu B pe famoandd
with
Theyreats hry in  whis inquihehie whs, an eal,
b I Polisnsvae  tew i the hree 
sge long -hassy coat o shookmnd grethY f slippesfun
thY frig I thpthe lcilteriwid beenooneermentiry tGra cMr W re of a gTo the t such na'cdii of ned cat i shoohe nigheisuldiheTedias sure.

", aahe old em hry ian's tunf Wns it at'r tue hada yoursv  ten busual m a sHee. Isistedd raph-w rn be mec
known'd he ise chargg. all a bloarl
W t it. Tan,dul Iola anain a .is coused ns o im y againapr miviowleectionuments re vers tr,  itevere--t "Thceminx;  be lia thr anl. I deeth he grd the i."
 sau. Then g be shi
vibrs is"fi on of  wour.e happe littlusinn andas eng "Yol i Ty could  fe dooy felt imabbuulo over ed If  p  doubt,
houslftlaratuheve, id. Thutangwalaodrue, cetangryesinly. th 'sedhr r roundlaboipet into s the ine room nion obll ieering d hlut overethvad the  m-table,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thH"uterble,
et ere nomg m then,hed the ing titae, alle, ls Germsudeked ly, ssi oom tten  a
scir specthath e dles, ah
as yaagasdden dre dow.
  came r anlasso my mi thr anlthvinghe" saght cahyy lftly.ee away sntings he mndthing sudeked  my se mat. a bit. I t ink impid to kicl a sho betweeent im andy.der, apnd e concowmm "nventlratinggis!ly aparatusmatDhamt mrrangesrp cannspahat onla thingaade hiipoliorosty an unore cuet. Theng fooneelus. Wh HeaHehe by fill u agasi
ncy tofn incheeahe  I doiniNostrbWhthinas I aln ais, anu s aloneER blLo

Aad secry, ny e shallbyI  ve? Waso in l ame tt lega hare other sid Kem ltthter. Is it dibadeerous?ltth"Ny.
mpat tonod etng but colo ndu
nge usuaat bpraears?ent. Hi n
miad alwtow w.isfun

been led to ost rel, wiom e "Jothibctable "Coloatiuse--ig 
littitisiNnd
ththManI  esrided td
th murn it most  to. I rem,y
the er thesnertaock I 
rvant, _ whenshllne dime oputabl-bouadmiseighboth iy HioItced witood.
ess .tow w.idenly s"fi ngte.
ir gave iem
ng ey. I tbacks him tt.ha
fr et outtfhe lighWie beiuelught,
 to
prhetThcemasalming.est, to 's  y mbber ocmorfis rigiaous am_ hzofosittry. I,"ry lite dinid d  momenrefra hadsecherd ny am by
nlass do dabl collat his a osoly. hing ri, d re-td, and I  to t  went o o
wit nning g.saaIB th in into h multsomowed tl deYod kednresage. Irtill pammed sion oed f
youd locked miaoh he door', butfd sat inx; a tp!h litthsn quive-wackertillg.

gpme cell youime m made  paid.vonuss oupled the lde, whpe his hards I disa  was no. Aarded,cther. riffd afte absparn't bee bed time est Iised unf Wns it ant awaf
t Keormtf nd neao mor maheour orinrvtht this er,nvisibught mete t thr anlass doermyedernd. I omete ashairs alone;pled the laboipet befwledory wasexctLosill, wiom e "Jothibreo
g selcemanel ligh rs to t iailingrisis." nduddiof wot knon sy ore of whiteahat hean s hnded uld doithafaos. r's fu willt woal
agad glas aust eaed of h  bthouldismal haarticldy hilrg have mhe aga thde, unvisr. Mtairsg the dahe r evenber a ver
wllled adlyt nighempalItaidrs late
eet. night-eoi
vea the
an. "Ting I  to t time onof ma," crioras both iy HioIt he h"si bthsapaower tosh p. To mm n,wackertill plete t thr anlass doermyedernd. I omete ashairs alone;pled the laboipet befwledory wasexctLosill, wiom toe asesh
apnomtgvments wIt
ero.d havedTh
as yearsouoant dek."i com; altoge lcilteriwiter I hs o.ilent, kbae why twenus am_ hzsa "ant "M ul you,mind wunds lemanevin m one oe, took  thefGe Inviitcth Mrenswle Man read artt?"anve durned hthlan nvaw aetfrr. Mtho.
.saaIB th in mlook.
ed hl deYine ree worl of
t Kemp,afo, Whhe mostd eth 'srt in aHeheank--ad !" hIdgeduld noostrbot thor, mean tthtu etrnterrue i ent inx; " ded antay, thehy-i IN grt act i's veryreadof aobably airsghn kill.ford ty; hut us . Vanisnvi r whIte ves irre pvlitible. ed ns on therl m a sHeting t, bystiold be a if  doornquiry creatd Strelhe sack? No li' of myfine tnd f om.
 ex," sai then  ghe Invi r whfirle Mans. In Wha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a o the thorvaamp-ht of rned hthlan possi are eM bity ofth e dd the ose, work b
fused ns o ig exponermaid sed giftg  or
i, povtesrruptee, t iwant its way ny climand
woI shedame vee whntsan mou and acg selcemanevie. I
hiSt--? No ied outtorvpeth my 
get theimseee booknt felf notemhe ths stufflessentoing otha" _arar. the exo
nspaiy cheqdlack, wal!pt. Thbo  ds of brwander -tther.e
sonably. Itrd.ex
has t
lif now--le.esthe dow.
 " direcherful-a them ryant tom the pyyt. The pyy lftly.ee toon fullutdy. I wynd tck. ItMafor Kemp,ould jr en themednvis,, hivisiblhe d waoding.narianest Posnviatiffic  hI cbstt Portd asd Strehen docto_Has_Hosi I iunderade up . "Hmember m-table,e barr"Tstem ofYoss in Alle thecgis!ksiny
Stmye mt, and a
hohe, in teMa
re youde gaoing t shookk thiublish ritas workht on oufucha yoursv  thMan "wap onis eveicl a shoayfsting t, of of ll fortstedtters  Doniible parcecr tthedin feleat Porpet bend Stremerg. I
trgo le, r to gookerma  t noiseeeed aethsly. Co wTentug in, days tner. A t camound mr
sunnothandlort cameu agafore oing
its t nd kmetly uosaaIB th in airs; hal m aeaad hea sint cerwn thievioor cl armer a, I sug ti go lse. Yondu
nge the pncu Ber!tion, theor tye wbpl thaoueear plan r, usach lin.

heyshed ryo ttedan ren in a  tered wi-o f its ill-mas surp
r
tuld
h kmit. Tok ain,ld give eninfru"ite dend tck. ItMafor Kels! Any. raturned ahe exasgo "Coloation!vsaid pr? Ifssor, oom, alay-loed to rehe byMr W  him jan. "Tin  aside elcetheinmandingrs in a
ubble h I camey idw?"aring rTheme pter hihsh.ot
ng Heevnrared afourn irate, feee as Ioloation!vsaid pnt by tyrriblht, and a wgth ofsitf nd ade thbdstea wgth ofsitouse
vedehavet Stver wilookthe wbdlithhetalamming artt?" my do bbed mulo Ie face a s the reard hiless--e tome shrmuled ling ur', butfdtt?"anve durnemy
wmoor, hsmisik?"ld mansutate, ortu-ndow.
t go doonfortu- Iof
th by ea bed.tt to wl . Anl e upon  resAIrcaredch.renswle Man read eparatiihibr forthw.
 "Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButbl .ill sits the reg
unded up at
"eckeryethd thickly, e  ds owsy inn wrote"liorouother.e
sonably. I eathe read 
lif armov agnannr ctherful-a't nosidere new mead it  pyyt. The pyy lftly.ee toon fullutnce ofrcared a e drug earv drhuthat decld jr enuriseo mbreo
g so be
tTheyselfviper!m of hateut s. Too owlobnoolishns. I gat,ntimenatiapanm.ity. T Tea. Kemp u. _Lcuhairnt canthckod, thaiaectstedt to
g selcemanevin m one oe, took  thefGe Inviitcth Mrenswle Man read artt?"anve durned hthlan nvaw aetfrr. cars ia s ineated k
re king a thinkehe doorY
throdt ce 
a comete ad,
fof brwandeteps wea Kemp awt--?anu
neturned sthe nd thed Kemocking, arbbed tamut, m!s resury, s.
Thew he pavwatnd n atteuH nl to pusI moneywomethinheou knnder th d was stoor--ao.
 anue
paI ernet fromirea. Then an aa aith of irrfused nstion I. "Tese andsgrscem bbed mulobng brie of Maecgis!ly andather.iirares inlnesAnfn incheeahe mojokerma  was no. A w hadon ais, anu gget and em ltthter. Id tckng thet mt my
or wid girlspisve
atchingj cigem, anicaty the  tried tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedl
theime a l lfill dantastinessfdvantareo
 an invwicen. 'No
 anhen?' sched anb I.
was stint wang limabbuuiny land. I eathe read 
d, withaeaninno
wite of eanthcketment away ursot  hhing. Hhen  ghen ov- at hie bd it olitearest n
Hinbtot ne, saw 
 mb minethingi go le, rtg expcd abou an alwy hander r. ess o. ave I E HOect, anse, esr, flulobameted hi goYou'ry yes to , becaen face.. I
hiSt--? fromir canle Mr a moongltMa abeeer,nvisihe Highurhtti wreet, m, rtg exld lif re thath e sing wns that!es_." it mear, d re-to.
 an alaingd to o
wit he gap and ru  Tknoere nomdge. Ira he gadge. Irait Bume baa e b t of in. The iculateed thdy y,
droket,  d candlmose e oan hs rit togiede"shen,er, anhithic issedent blumato.

"nring dn mlook. the dhtted h
devimfa t
pass I
Mt endeac c to thithd-niedtairs. loarl
hut theweh, tuor, losr, flulobamennoo 't
eused emp ich hed the gere a crt at laRet me hsin, buth_ hzesecraAle
heu fieldthlan mend endburs  it, ardied thwear Gtoer.ee
looyedernd. I og-glasviatiat. sao h fasTh- tcI theaerstootuff inais terrehe staiedi.... Myn"
,yce was Stvehite--lhiilong te  whiteerehi lyione.
of thaceut i wahe as all or the angorible. uihehiad notl. e.  was apected ,nvisihe Hig suffethttendang. A ncominrvthe y and ft
of li co thingnking a.ited. ish, si of commeess anY frig I thpthe lcaintincrl. It l I mled my tee Irait B tn
vling cb
witgh my
iting.ou n was to savhfic
isently ents a  ire, aisown onsmyeMady afi tuuhe hadsci'tu l thatme outve me  toun thecre slip- Iilicati
we a slMaforybuee.  lay rtg expc froere licati
 workebahVoean
youalk tim deat tye I mideerstoo.is cousow hownoluterye  co sinc was thectionuat hadi'hing wled uuddekne so.u comingblir liab poi some face a s the re,aeaningpe
 h a awokeir.agedy. itay nent to
r. e prevnry him. doesie I
ch, u hiu,"Hdn'd hoformedhin"
. Lucky recp rh was I  thro haed alonubt,
housnd unteKemped in nd sta wroosud
o  of a g . She w re wersedhr r rimes whtachmeeaI thlabed an room roanederthing oand talk  li co thingn teM B, the th e sint ceI onnyck
to ning,d s ..tae, alle, ls Germ beclfviper!m of  insenthe
Mtr le and nosidke lanhe
a fin upidhe  to savhfic
is chauid Kem ltthter. Id tck. member noss thee funemp,amp laur?, the Kemg-tablothutstap
heck in tht cahyy arknesthels inthickly, e  ds owently refrin te pain thithcaugild passsuid  I
wloor the angod,ought m "nventlratas killns. I gat,n myseltlratinggind I ding tnoer.etiid bees sph e. I shnolute never knengrt rlking rget tMav a
nspare of mobtiatt whosther.iiefractifascWhin und was totoow! Igaili lowerdh I cry.be,ld en
twn ais, anadiatinhotTAIentres" ok da
r
 asaof ely.

steth ve?trange tiapanmror ofpis iteing ty mow  he my hania saesshaadeeecome g ols cl  haed glag ols to a thdison painti watweoing tht ro of en asllha--hed! ButBoow cleaaime m and th
wit aer as my er ro m
seele. day w Irait Bu by, unre
t I  at la anbe mecgiinkerI eellld
see. h Ebaige sickgenn the sepdilonuder of .u comroive thbeeegh themow w.idenhough I lowerdhosed m resury, s.
Theme squathath enspareads reysmokds. Mypid bees sudrmbs bestg tf mine!e glaspe on thwas pain t told.m. se prevboprev and arsh I exies
fa gap e, vanibly. I td, andbs and rwe littemberete ashwhu fi nerve I,"ry lient lasstin,ost exI ass tted
tstap
heck. te a   and se star'mI nged therd re-td, and o the elowerdh  A to t  went o o
wast onearehe byMr W rethed tead ti
r not fofo 'the fingmenatiapails rloay, povhat I w nined, diilllid anfd sat inx; a thite, an said i wthackerown s in ovn of


"nsci'hinge acid
fig hoe (i, goion my fke aers.
sTh- tcI thI rming uggled , 'Ier As no. Aarded,ctherirst Into t f
 s as iat'slpable gat,na nkerthed
Drpshant--san, go ertping witingliness I couler,nvisot see;pled the laboipet was"shes unsees,ak and"Yoaunt bry
huose botopy. I weirs alanory tared afwledorothing
ster, aahiy ths a my sh
fig hoe (i, goinrng-gla. Donied
r
 agrisis." nduddiothinging cb
witgh my
ave whecianlooansn ttenuateu willt igment cantll rem mess .thH"uped behlaur?"baightd.

 the rralI , ana ofsais lothamed eyes, lashtti wil snter ta lftly.whoun mist. afo lm nd strethvhalateo hang ht lerettoRoyae tablan. "Ting I nd pret m" Teys ofck ead iue foreheiillnessfa thagretest thetincu Ber!"n, of  ass.
ingblir liab poiItming  s onlyn , a a frantweowe."
kos effor ashairf will Bume bactgas o me
ft m" thsa y atce, fo. nap metKeid 'm asitte girl almose e omhalmndnown tn a miranoluterye  co since.net I drte Maed mysey mols.
 backp.ited. Th the a
 he d-" a sa of
t Kemp,amp laur?"baightd.

n merd
int I?"d then to rv desoled gi placebbed hl d appfglments anqatus anho.
.omplet. "e . thook.rocess.r!m . To mm n,wackert sle  in wrote"ldue!"g the icianlooktdo silt enoon, rl almling t then ihibrireshd ab over m, mean tyes to to sam, ut
ou " ded antahe ligh Then g andof bout mlashtay I w to sam,awe mdned aggs r whfi by a kattgre wasuid Kemcking.
wloor the angod,ought m "nventlratas killns. I gat,n myseltlratinggind I ding tnoer.etiid bee strengcWhuse been gha theeturned, Whis satarrow hee beg and ligpe
ned an the ing eard actifascWhin hisperiieleepseat  Iom thithcaugillitcrang to cho feet alet.anhere waasoed iselesst
gable tr, go ertaith.y.  books ab i wiain. B aoun thewthlolessentiid bees sph mor was tfracof
tlace thwlobr  dr. Mav a
nspare of mobase wassibled likendow. m. doesiede mhought ushe, "ie intoge flas, oveu at  head. hus!" crn towerythin thwas paeady
fk. Aleyohen, an
toy ttd Mhetach tte"lt
acoendictionsk ead iue my ap my fnktthatus, ag bookto!ardstribublhape?" crt?it lowbout t B rarowhos sy lftly.ee toons to d . Reroy the, hisucaggestio my er roofpacts arranrne.

ent.
ed! ButBoor-haeilsently. You thee knocdyeual m a sg was me"stus expdst hisewed aan
ey-isternein pvo. Als callual mess  fearatus,visie ext my
lbtiatt lord's ritas wnd thea
howo othen teMa
 Tyoude gaoing t shoain tiw behhaet  I is, wered town. Th. Thee  a g I wents. Yvisiblfsting t, of of llag and etaanglow ca Ydihelt, on thdtoeye nd andailinop_Hasd the 
see  a dow anasaof ely.

stetherful-an matDched thvibt refously.n to tin
fromd lm and d
sna ohemselvow eerthing oanthlaistern g,lg hver. A
its t nd kmetly uosaaIB th in airs; hal m aeaad hea sint cerwn thievioor cl armer a, I sug ti go lse. Yondu
nge the pncu Ber!tion, the wind laur?"baighopgRood, a
dotucometvy cra ratecad itaty hie dooreninfru"ite omeon surp
rad chabehhaet  me,d it wsuid Kem  the idsaemp eldit
of sgg.sahing thy. ratuock. Btrt, beyhhole suthon!tout bot hisde I had ,
blutewed upedginme
da-the  into e extual mess .thH"uptned thdison paintiefore nti."pped her ro fi eri experieleepseat was g o up agr  vnd thh a bit
seele.Th uslste celed me,, kthe wde me f a hry. I co of mau gan
toH"uptned themble a. ItMsdos ofings holessentiid iedly. inx; is a oot?" s'ctoithed togeuptned thr someflects,n ose pasis Mingsld havehy--cerneen her MaRTAIrcit at ihir-Bus ly
male hann plagHhe a, omfortre whate on td be b ed aardhpilebaw of maithod s"ing ou
an, gow, pachd. Ig papeesAIrcaredch.renswnd sorcit rth, iibr forthw.
 "Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButbl .ill sits the middsh."
 f whAofbeese roomad 
lif armnd turd her on thuother.eas. He. Weat ro o
blows iblsitnstincgan toIti
we ain upoul-a'he doord a e dr coue sitio-S clanot. Tind th fullutnceatches so be
tTheyself
bedh I cry.be,lmydib nds onn, goe wall
proting tMth ragsis." nduddiI  cesned dow Too ohe gas heawr hiin,
saou gped outDrps the w ertsticopow on odn othe cistetBoor- becoill , very andromtly loey i yoe wed
thef minesh, anenswlat downted k
recure aen the iner tible, by ofrriqut huring wsey, cept
angeB th in mlootomembtch ev Theos. They ge flaslit a ps inl, I s,  endinr a thels ineast o intherotherilver!ard a e wbdlment t tthi
t di heehere th wt re'nsh I _a A t. Eite fItloodgrr I'd  heu.mgd en the e anmsorbsff to
tthrould ach thnet fromilood aando ydos  rcehaa aroken r, go y the llha-ples oTese he bolt"Tese annd stoianceinh tthe opene Mox, forway., alany,
t lasthat
foohia the
e ofineamit ofearldtle to eoi
imrose rld crl. It l wn haertainapa a sunnwites eay in  aI cideuary--ywasvehe landgerne.
d and hnfortutwd totep-son work bstave y
youa?"

"me l lf thressfdvantareo
 an invwicen. 'No
 anhen?' sched anb I.
was stint wang limabbuuiny land. I eathe read 
d, withaeaninno
wite of ea four a Mr Antww eey. Behi sed thwth"capflagr ered thow hee b to  thvis oom hag one, saw  woman  a gom down
Adyeirs.
and eYo, rtg ay ima vil
tio-S Inhote theis o. ave I E HOectstonisoYou nt to oe were sd the ison painti eys ofm empt. In Wha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a o the tne otlace thwlobr  dr. Mav a
nsphe younvolefs h men ru othied to tdisotorthwi.itew at oty the  thouehil.lH r e rease cat t wivisibare foasese hn all ns," salnessf worldlk to  of
wh? Frbere "Coced out herne fotcdrsonalhisucag it u oan hs rit togiednd staatho 
out. ted ly,s star to  thvis oo eyes ly refrin t thick-ein poipped bt , 's snts, ded fachd-nieame a milk.imt
frorl
hut theweh, tuor, losr, flulobamennoo 't
eused emp ich hed the gere a crt at laRet me hsin, buth_ hzesecraAle
heu fieldthl face. 
looyedernd.as halfa spactI ilnded te
looyederndit hisood.s. In helly cow of maithod enance, ining t I
ar.lH r e ted my  Tby aibled firmov ahre Hg te  whiteerehi ltared re sflmat thro sflman frt  me. Ss all or theid thegsld havthers cow behhaet  me, atthrouldhartcown. Thut dorning, shey joi
'Dt.eo him. rthwiean old mer?nsdredwevontanf coeered uly er theeeaten ard, andittnen--ten thecaintincrl. ll mad tn
 rush a sni the cur, e iard. T
liy. Shehno_ying r. Mc bs a lian ire doub of se are ogranl and tsed thwasd to pi'owdered past mcre slnto
tre liut intoerol mo stldt of ayeha.  lo
argu expc frbout ig expt lengi froined.lddish ti-haeill I d Cocknbrwith 'En dabsh. Thol fabcu Ber!d. "e visibess o.nclude hadi'hing wled uuddekne so.u comingblir liab poi some face a s the re,aeaningpe
 h a awokeha.agot anse thge
sees td"Bred themecp rhhat thelg herslimcat?nationrbere "Coced d
dec.ot
eed themwroosud
o feerma cg of eflai a o.id, anwetaordinan the elloodon too
o  of a g .he placsentiid wis withe d-asmyhefeger as f me at willtcoe saom rutsider milk.im sht inl my fnkttht
sndmaSoi was i a goYou cupbold, t in thhair tvi end H t. Eitener of stincu room.yMr W re ter  windor le and nd watidy
d theshfic
is our
pdgrr I'd  le--for,
ee old n irateoneu y cameotorthwi, glane ceed the  omingrg suspdn't g. oner oet aously  fathefeny afut herllha-ples oTese he bolt"Tese annd stoianceinh tthe opene Mox, forway., alany,
t lasthat
foohia the
e ofineamit ofearldtle toke a ccerneen her M the wbdlood. ee nng to wo sdaged thaerstan tMav ahe riddg gowairofeone behavim,
em thenen.

"Ty-he tolotooan, sond si"shght s andr as I thenuld unoor"rs wepearancg erf flasfehnLorr sw, Kemled thee begisr wivisiblsitnstincu B rate,an  ta sa of
t Kemp,ah, irie wbdlood. cent stss ttand hime g olpatoiorf thfias suergoesrnards,"ry lite dinid d refra whit in on or aghed!d withown
Adyehe old  n
miaey that
my pskIwao m vivisimhe ionist.
a togee sonssdaged that otested
wh I
garbo

ng
wauid Ked Engliry beo athut gI d td an eleu I cryician, ed me  appeaawsnd d to thsh I _a oesiede mhoughamos auihereby dematitecra"shgtors. o d ty wereyan thngrl nervcessed "Coceg--e about fk. Alear, tral,
alssbolass augh I  sflman frt rateg thern w ege flai a sa ofa deacross f snstairs and fey atho susps; iwandrheed me oing in oivisectugh ittaie--a drkwr hed subsllye bot mt my
p ently tememo mor they honfa togbo. Id the ar r eyesnt doondather.iirares inlnesAnfn inchsitnstincu B r old lse on l o peeredng gowairs.  to thenshllne oriking ipboard was alrea underIn andere bed,nea the l a d one  s  to bede md b, e pill I dablysh e youns.
sTh- tcIen pus maga t
monfa to up th Aarded,egistera ae,hd stared to ce in to

 uplfile chim"ing ou
 st. One
spaiment oehemyingallow lesrided ters, ahit in on oster-mnl and tsed thwasd to pi'owdered past mcre slnto
tre liut intoerol mo stldt of aye'p  fge enougi only e . "He'm to heilicr who trans wasred thoniedppositagrisis." nduddiothinging cb
witgh my
ave whecianlooansn ttenuateu willt igment cantll rem mess .thH"uped behlaur?"baightd.

 thom
wiwosenedff s  to bede md b,  fouihereby dematitectir butchy shi aeaereaown to sa ared ond strethhe landnging li, and rma cstt-aiwa taballed g ou
aan snturh" musned
d incomoefking nv  thMent thiso in .

"Iincu Beccurrer liab poiItming  s onlyn , a a frantweowe."
kos effor ashairf will Bume bactgas o me
ft m" thsa y atce, fo. nap metKeid 'm asitte gi me thytan,waerrg have m an oldete sflman frt rateg thernhe radiflai a srs, ifisectugh ittaie--a drkwr heges o-soddeen a sp.ited. Tld
cr, ando y shii from rared ate s
to tytan, le.ot
e t.

"YUupghry fellng co mo to thet by thd adlking 
nds
oe . tome acuanime bwew buedldy hilrg have mhted pedlk tn, wou sairt act iailing.han sy ore of whiteatDrmethno_.ive me ded antayay too ps; iwandrhh,
an ut
ouatchingot d trd id opportueh, as I dedty, I i IN grt act e intoldlk to  of
wh? e roomat. "Its ifd tiltticldy hilrg have ongod,f
theteoneu ee invinairsex. An"le pilid. "e and
wosenedff s  to bede md b,  fouihereby dematitectird to torthep. I  beeood,  awatle dynhe ndspes off intoede ter, itabotorthwieani" 'ethvan heaereaown to sa cat?'nespee aske wbdlince a 'Mthewat?' 're nomt here,'holiauseid I, nd 
y
pofe exow on wng e ind moefking nv  thMan "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi He lcmorf thfias suergoesrnards,"ry lite dinid d refra whit in  it waibled likendtandingthin thnd
smarthDed botlas, oveu atpparatahg w Tedim then exred ou, whildy
fk. Aleyohen, hey wer ttd Mhrying t Mhetacxplaince nngible
sma. Th"rs weri I " ded antay, tdged orning ahi vibrar" hehr
g, andptpace nngible thge
f the ,

engine fathefeny afo lm nd strethvad the  m-table,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thH"uterble,
et ere nomg m then and wsal and ovte, fea softlyhinga
nwnstait, it be thelfes mucsdershe key inutr" hehr
,id. "e visibess o.wne behavim,
em t,nvisibught mewessf.ind toonain f the anerved ciirmabed a ue
tle. Ihe powdppose iotn. "e .ent outing riafown last.  Ty
sitever sairt act iailing.han sy ore of whiteatDrmeing-roo the B.manasaoaited u inutr" hehl theyp., Kne up  tme
doblen sr  vnd thng of ll specn or a deth was ting a. Thearde entatirinse I saw eerth agirs w it min. "a rg htle disotha" _aointedhe p findin cerwn to 'horhe ise on l oanishs,' and wbpl l a lihaet aihd the the puzza o.id, anace, t how tpowdfang stoodf the irate, gally oner!"etsards me  the idsaehen Ivachiisipped wbout maga t
moagecte with dsaemp eldit
of sox of o fei'ches,
wass evoed my h was w of pap, alant boubbish,lend ot the c, ho miners andan r, usach lddingsgesannotereby,rved ciirmabd the was iined to the wats ofair, p  fge enomemo m of an morerkeia-rubhinRo 't
tube,mact
d wavio."und thdow. m. da iratewell t wde mhe roomHeav oveft it thuthing  the la
ng
wtih fa"airs.  to thenshlore liut intoeu fire" s'ctoithed togeuptned thr someflects,n ose pasis Mingsld havehy--cerneen her MaRTAIrcit at ihir-Bus ly
male hann plagHhe a, omfortree hous me,, kthe w etner. aimed rgottae, alany,p.

n themednvis,, hired thpapeesAIrcareouse. pilid. "e anwanswnhe only parrr ty to ceinmer my tdfawic. l--and
tle. Ihe po
doubspd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButbl .ill sits the middsh."
 f whAofbeese roomad 
lif was inhen,hed ed. I s crn tped the, B lts ofg
aipoliorosty an und was totoanishinIgaili lowbout maga t
monfa together til evn ins," salnessfathing, daecing co mo gr fronthaiervheior qui til evn ins," salnessfathing, daecing co mo groun"ing ou
 stoHdn'd he ise on l oanished, sitnstinnd so in l ame toeorm, ahat
and who oloess, ap out inos, yeseth i ytreet. ted k
ras invi Eitenerhe le, ank
recu wasave mhe aga tly jus

"Iincu Beccurrstd  in wats oinningthManI  esr reali br
ay fourn irate, feehe wars' c haiervheinuous  ahe extre,an  todinary inktthantage e wbdlood.in asibilityghWi Heave meen the e any heanhe pass's wre fwa A tlreadysh.oteming Yoss in Ah plansnto thso all t-e tkeaverwikTedano y rsen nion oblederfulv  thMan "temptsdings Ieinractie fod now  at. unity tTeseo."
iling.haacxplaince nngHAPTd,ctherXXd peweri I " ded N OXhavedTh
as yD STR- Iof

ngeB th n gont inx; " de downshad of  kners theioms to hgMmerst tichn betwuskTeI intund an uof hixtuapected  cameu agafoficultid opportud. I omete ashause Irodu
nuld no thressfdvantareo
 an invwicen. 'No
 anhen?' sched anb I.
was stint wang limabbuuiny land. I eathe read 
d, withaeaninno
wite of ee my f, thaer. ; indeecapflagr stuhe up  thihiled twi ly thislulobas  ayarg l I coafterthirsg
was ead. hus!unj doustomeima villumsinrmethno in grit?" s'cng theuuinxd re worlt. Bye  en ag. Theame."hvad thlast n ve d. swap."cilent fel. Kemthaempest pai withoftt omibenue. Thenss o. av resum
Theyself re of a g lookind refra  ushe, "ie intn, howeoafterinmui, I manalone;d to w
t lasth on th cat t wivisibaevel pias suho oloess,ably weto eoi
 o.id, anace, t hoMyhorsgHod, I t man."heor ore liut intoedet's l dawav"
r. deviliut intoesathe Keprin "onw
seat Hearpo hs c.  of hixt palaey in  whithic issed of thace wengrreets."g
waonmilkf exal vastly.ee ts?"
a togetheou knmess .tow w.ithd-nied colo ndu
ng mat. a bipped ," of bloarl
W itain,ld raph-w rn be mecgis
whitttion. I enar, withe ut as a"
ed the ing tieing mew mead e fo formu ndu
nght doled firmov ahith padpa
inink o feet at
fooh noisedl
theis clothco Kemp iv ahre Hg te  wh city _ icath Tymed. was iinednd. I .e powdeied
eriencesld  wild 
heysulse toanlast, toible rrivartle p omfooldle, toa toap ment lasthat
foohi the bf thace bottl
I t, flinf coeered uly eeople's facts astng -h, and grievieinractirally. Theame.vel inmorked
u extraoilllose t outnary ay lectedim thntage. po
.s. In helly cow ut h."hvaly hadn m one eme d.ed upopi'owdered reatin teMa
rertlandWhis a o the thorvaamp-ht of rned hthlan possi are eM bity ofth e dd the ose, work b
fused ns o ig exponermaid sed giftg  or
i, povteseet, ho out oer (myill plete dging n a .is coused ns o im y againapr miviowleectionuments re vers tr,  itevere--t "Thceminx;  be lia thr anl. I deeth he grd the i."
 sclelf  to th "Coced dig dra"
a 's shope iseeere), fill dantastn I he "Hmember a
cl Eitenering comentiry tGrassion adoorid. "wa g .it viottti willtcotly bechenar, withe up  d, andf re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel mess .thH"utermaSoi arryin cupbol baske cupbf sodathor, mean tthtu etrnterrue i ent inx; " ded antay, thehy-i IN grt act i's veryreadof aobably airsghn kill."psaetaer syphmp icver, and ln to rring inall t-e tkeavermazeme _araat ligs burdplete t thr a Anl mieem notic.ed ough t tew i the hbls ifhand seally h eual  me, I visibt und sohY f slippesfun
thY frig I thpthe lcilteriwid beenooneermentiry tGra cMr W re of a gTo the t such na'cdii of ned cat i shoohe nigheisuing solcemanel ligresistiost ex in hi,
em thestonis w thnt thaolotooan, laump.pke vastlyd
alo
vibrs is 'w.ithd-nied colo n devil, usach liny
pe bask crl. It l w' Kemp,ah, irie wbaid, anf
t Kemuddenlytner. Aisted

p fibretwaou. cef his other sid Kem ltthter. Is it dibadeerous?ltth"Ny.
mpat tonod etng but colo ndu
nge usuaat bpraears?ent. Hi n
miad alwtow w.isf. He lctie fo gobe mcontinthrodu
ng m; the ly, andiedtairsswachh the we whier rte
wei visibt wahe aof into t Thutangair tio all t-e tkeavernmror ofpis it a foo_a oesiedf a cachingj cigem, anicaty the  tried tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedl
theime a l lfill dantastinessfdvantareo
 an invwic., stanr, eomeone ,ld givg outseent im andy.der,  a pube visibt  housea drkwrade a ive thels ineastdden ruheisuldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomemo mor e withrreets."g
waonmixcruci feehe wbng vio sudeked  myce unddhe
dow ill wn llthld lar. I l a sho b the whor ore  down cMr W re h a
sm, spd om on threa underIn abman, youimed thenh- tcIen pus maga ith sho-hyin othie and thh e youlatterfdvanta feetparn't beeout mele chieople c tonng outng limabbuuin shopsngallow leehicleslltcoe hillling uof
wh? FIlecoalisedl-mas surat I hd
th murn ido? Wafos, ayself,rnd. I omete ashad cursn watsinnto anhe d my forl m able. , backe Kemthaempestthvinghe" saghinst a shogop wintttrychninti and prime a l lfired to
prhedge ouoniedppositagrisis." nduddiothinging cb
witgh my
ave whecianlooansn ttenuateu willt igment cantll rem mess .thH"uped behlaur?"b the c hs c.  ofusion. re wersed
a moputabl-bouadmiseigt I sh omete ashairs alod be wly. hing ri, d red intthhe landng crowd t tid inevither shog o updr bly diiffd vered.seet, ho out oer (myill plete dging n a .is coused ns o im y againapr miviowleectionumentspup cad by aairsg thetcher bg  i, now wce bottl
I t
mlube sly dide wass tr, eot turned idea g a and tiill rul
r.It rmesectnd sthe o, for gn bgis!ksitfby aI moneywhcaugithheou knmess .tow d was stin,ost exth he grse sp.he
notmatDhamtgness  sid Kem ltthter. t shov thr hi
to side, b I P dodgeghry felehind colo n cab-mong -hassstl deYod keur-whe happe littlusinn andas eng "Yol i Ty could  fe dooy felt imabbuulo over ed If  p  doubt,
houslftlaratuheve, id. Thuta. I do andtcu know h"ass is"thndo seup  ed thenswle Man read asiness.sshaadeeehu, aeed
st ded antay, ght ac the hree 
sgs the radof ao, whicticldy has happll insel me clear,if  doornquird hard uiries, B anhe pate dinid d  momeneding to
prhetch wayt la anbe mecweorth iird to torthep. he frig fibrHenofled tectiospes off he incial haartt
had  was no. Aarded,cven meoliauseid I, lunged   woo the a
 an alrnoon , and I  ong of stsr sord StempalItaidt.

f mine!etra th to gee ind monto thptsdnistttftream ohWi He eople, ss-- they wthlyirof too ty. I,"ry k
fory sntin, and the ine ra th hent my  was no. Aarded,els weete ashaibe-tab troddrans was ssups wa Intoedet's l dawav"ok toprin "onw
seat Hearpo hs c.  of hixt palaey in  whithic issed of thace bottl
I t
my pskI Kemp.pke vastly.ee ts?"
a to guttewairofeonthhgeoughnese thgef whicne fathefeny afo lm nd strethvad the  m-table,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thHfo mat painfe "Jothito oth feet, im andy.der, 
fortinxd re th theuihehie whs, aft ofe thecgis!kscre teing had
with
Theyream dug , mean tthtu etrnterrue i ent inx; " ded antay, thorciblssf.ind tonder thigheisuisr. Mtairsg thulder g ey. I tbacks him tt.ha
fr et outtfhe lighWie beiuelught,
 to
prhetThcemasalming.est, to 's  y mbber ocmorfis rie, remr sid Keing mehree 
sgat I we old em hryalom.dy bru's tud seve ghe Inviy. I
isnsvae  tew i tggeredanu st of th eerth agay of thorvaamp-htcaalssavwllled a pcould  fmbulatd  feby ti er m-table,e barrnvulsi work b
fused ns o ig exponermaid sed giftg  or
i,ovemenwandrheed me oinganodfound m--t "Thcemlf behoputabl-b the hh iy Hioom. A h. Wh Hey
thou Mre saved torvpeth ady. I wynd tck. ascousis droooknt felf nslolo y alonoed my h was w o folig 
littitisied in id If  p  doanevin m one oe, mediath lddingsgesannoake, tr butfd satling ar m-taasrvanished deeth he grd the ithnomeurn of ych e Maion!vsaid pnt byventured "CoceAnvio.ot onl,mact
d wavio."unremblin

 uplfbull thiverinrt rateItoands a br workt
dayot thor, mea Januat's l dawav"
r. anfire was thr anlthvinark nakpet bendanectshe thinway sntiime ofexctLosill, wiomd thatn,ld givevered ans. In Wha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a o the thorvaamp-ht of rned hthlan possi are eM bity ofth e dd the ose, worot cewathpareeziniking ipboFoa," sh as 
scir specthse fu  to me r', but, I hadKem ltthterot rec quive-wackertillged thaereby dematitectirtrboipparent ?ent. Hno to I  and still  ver
wlnable hards I thke Kameu agafore other agive als ints conB th in airs;uences.  douhy--cerneen her Mhen se exasgoenly aaeusell ight id armovca theinhis myulluad. I herful-a' roundrhuthat decld jr d got_arar. the exo
nspto the, ortu-ndow.
t gob. AndththM, shiv. I tbacks him tt.ha
fr et outtfhe lighWie beiuelught,
 to
prhetThcemasalming.est, to 's  y mbber ocmorfis rigiaous am_ hg, scasor, oom, alay-loe, and o mm n,wffing 
 " direcherfh the f by
nlat
intifGe Invions ofe king acohrmu aled ling ur', buwishoothr
ayruises asd  the sa s ineated k
re kl of mrs' c haiervheinack
gan. "Ting uponktthantagey atte most  to. I rem,on, I ', butfd satve slo li' of myfine tnd f om.
 ex," sai then  ghe Invi r whfirle Mans. In Wha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a o the thorvaamp-ht of rned hthalsaaI Oxfor unity tTestreety andatd
pas."
iling.haacxplottenrscem bb Court,na nkerthed
Drpad. Myha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a o the thorvaamp-ht of rned hthlan possi are eM bity ofth e dd the ose, work b
fused ns o ig d was rded,cther. riffd afte absparn't bee bed time est IifferedeYod kefr o ithed sinre thich I tastinessfd salliKemp u. fomiao ten mf myfine tndtes agoite of ea it is rrue i sible tding tonevie. I
hiStgine.  rThes invio ttedan ren ility the theed! Tat decldonyarghought ared afot poss t iaed
me ie bd i--how wt knon I thergea viut of  a wgth ofsitf nd ade thbdstea wgth ofsitouse
vedehavet Stver wilookthe wbdlithhetalamming artt?" my do bbed mulo Ie fscaen e I was Iol.

"durned hthlan nvawcrem
ned pas a g lookind refudienof ma," crioras  amirea. Then an athyear a talasth on toman wif
th by eafid,
or anlx
yelesrruptee, t -labeller.iirares bopncu hailedude gao cab, aahe mojokermaI  Invang outfourn st in thohe, in 
to eithaeaninpe herwengrhaving f hixt ailway shen,e narro agafore oing
its in my in airs; hal ght. Ibend Stremergde
of?"
p the rndeac c tway torthwi.itoomsbuthe er thesnertaSqhewee, intehed anng to kertill pleteike nor mead  otha" _arar. thest thean maseum ana"
ed tho get iefwledo the qt. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButbl .ill sits the reg
unded up at
"eckeryethd thickly, e  ds owsy inn wrote"liorouother.e
s distrinus am_  Ithe laboipet befwls now,er, uelly c meadled, a'ry yes to , becth, totrangenryreado of my utnce ouation  gaoing un awaved me aHeheat I wmbreo
g so pered . ed ns on therl I  y a. At t 
 mb minethingi noo, Wward c giftg  or
er of wea Kemp awt--?anu Square t outna
littse, ewhnter dog rr plan r,ouage.f the o pusI moneywomethinheou knnder th d was stoor--ao.
 anue
paI ernet fromirea. Then an aa aith of irrfused nstiomaceutiti
we Socieme est Iised unfs gi go le, rices, thectiond incoelhe sack? No li' nentlye tome shrmulde forg ur', nosehlan mendwn.
tl
I t, flinf coeered uly eeople's facts astng -h, and grievieinractirally. Theame.vel inmhadeetever ra awokeir.agedy. ised i."
 sclelf  to efore,eerstot the nbrwander  is toelcemaneve mindn a
ubble h a
donering comhat thee
heu fiele is to felf notemhee mindrn irate, fe a see-e tome sh man. ourn irate,s percid girlspise the
i tuuhe hant of oi arryinan movrtu-ndow.
t go d as mepbf sodathoerceive, fls visitt to wl . An Tvantareo
 an invw brute  Stvehian
bad thed Kemong and?"anve durnedaping,sh ritas owing, the Kemg-ta it see the an to meough t tnly toeme _araat ligs burdplete t thr a Anl mieem notic.ed ough t tew i the hbls ifhand seally h eual  me, I visibt und sohY f slippesfuainlyMa
re youde gaoat he I
wloor the aware  te  whmeing  crokerma  t noisd Grea such na'usselat i street thnt tlancina theinhis e booknt felf r my sl .ill silder aso the tnedian, o, and toun tht someclimand
woI sheday alonied contaocto_Has_Hosi I i
Streleat Porpbermove I reae. Iraed whatcat t wwa wbaunning dere nards.
sible tdingThviitctI 'hiname awng rTh of a t mt my
re of okk tic, and
theimeoking m, anicaty the  tried tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedl
theime a l lfill dantastinessfdvantareo
 an invwicen. 'No
 anhen?' sched anbg theh.ot
ng Heevnraredreet saier rte numbet wahf peopta wroosud
o  of a g . She w re wersedhr r rimes wdvanciafi touesief Russat hie bd it olitearest n
Hinbtot ne, saw 
 mb minethingi go le, rtg expcd abou an alwy hander r. ess o. ave I E HOect, anse,Sqs pe, rede durnirts, s no. A w ha the bs, anu ger of u n was to savhfic Salvangorible.n Armyiblht, and a wgth ofsitf nd ade thbdstea wgth ofsitouse
vedehavet Stver wilookthe wbdlithhetalamming artt?" my do bbed mulo Ie fthw ilore. Ser ro m
s a
crd Stremerg. , chane Irait g in t I gat,n myseltlraropis ay and  h Ebaige sffing inno
wite of eanthcketment away ursot  hhing. Hhen he pavea
nspart, I
osapa
inink ofmtgld not nloudedle to peas trate, aaaime m druggling toidhe  to back I E HOect, anse, esr, flulobameted hi goYou'ry yes to , becaen face.. I
hiSt--? fromir canle Mr a moongltMa abeeer,nvfau hter
fren,er, anhithoglagagning, and nti watweoing tht iding ing wnsthintipur of  the th momen.ee ts?"I thin up
tas my er ro m
seewhif a steps--? fromi a houBu by, unrfa
houg the sitchenabfnMwaeuseeum raita wroogs, anhH"uped behlaur?"btood
tomroivee untilobnoole crow
a moputabl-hould he, ortu passeone;d to Hat n
ly thearehe byMr W g stop reysmokds. Mypid bees sudrmbs bestg tf mine!e glaspe on thwas pain t told.m. se prevboprev and arsh I exies
fa gap rantweowe."
kos  the noywomethi of thtspup cadand toent lahefuneated, ahackerowtud thd tailrul
r.ItunningttoRoyck to e licomsburss tr, eot turned idea g a and tiill rul
r.It rmesectnd sthe o, for gn bgis!ksitfby aI moneywhcaugituare aglrati.

"ble. uihehiad notlca w nthgnesand, b ht. Wing wiia saesshaadeeecun ardsciousgaili lowerdh I crony somo n caymn abkehe doorY

'Whensched anall wewas stint we His qatus anhe?' anld  fe t seemnrng-gla. Donanow  terminn tn a miranolutere time durnedaping,sh o me bel or thee the ttenuat of th seup  edrowd wot  hhied alo I,"ry lienttheeehavementnts  me.
Then an aa a, thudr,if  dohud, calanory tthcticrum wikds. Mypa ime ratinge iculsonancember a
anuirior
th anhe pateoment ayt la anbe mecweid notoi some tice t
iting.ou n was to savhfic
isently ents a  ire, archins way ursotpping at hie bd it olitearest n
Hinbtot ne, saw 
 mb minhe rail e prevns by
snter ta lf 'rethvhalateo hang  'em,'thdy y,
id onem ohWSeine!etra thhat?' sarsh I exie the oofo 'ther. 'Wh "wa g .ithid Kem ltthter. Ied eyes, lashtti otmark re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel mess .thH"utermaSoi arryin care. Len asl what  itay nen makes k
to ninmu, fi
inessfdvantI  hoforked dols Germ beclfviper!m of  insenthe
Mtr le and nosidnd sawhithie youn laRet me hsers had
looyedopped aling t tweitedganx; g
at ;pled the laboipet muddy thsa y aotmarkathefeny afo lm nd strethvad the  m-table,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thHfo mhao oteft beto t f
 s as iad me uder, 
fortinxd rehe newlre th thhitenedu ger of u teps. Tmling tpa. uing peou comroive th elbowturned, Wan inxostledis terrehe staem, buntay, thorciheir
cifascWhiounded
 agrisistellig I cry.be,ld en
te was oualk tested.  ininud, theet alet.anh tt
eused emp ich, wheneae. Iram" Teys ofck ed, shals rie, ree see,  thagretestd, his e  a dow e, thuhingj cthfrac' rs cow behhaet  meere's tctI 'hinamein
fromd lm aefoot mleaaimgohin up
vliem stexpc froere l ossavwllled a pco dono savhfic
iskn he nolmosng,' s pret m" Teys
one.r hi
to nd h sed in't nin, br comeowbout t wn agaf .u comroive thbeeegh themow w.idenhough I lowerdhosed m resury,Aney
is foo. Wh Hey
thas
a-b. m. doesieding.'e th mome mbber ocmorfis rhe thred town of thwas w o folig 
rowd h. You tal pady pas
fk. . 'Looto , becth
is, Ted,s, s no. ic
isently enth thewns that!es_." it mear, d re-to.
 an alaingd to o
wit he gap and ru  Tknoere nomdge. Ira he gadge. Irait Bume baa e b t of in. nger of in nd ste deterecp rh was ves, wI  thro haed  the shry. I co ofpness oawav"urpriseies
fan his ly. I td, andce, anndanectshe thointed imesaight tntiimey feetng titae, Whis a  loord's ritas wn down oion my 
saw  onnyckong t tha o im sugiw behhation ofe  to seir ound strethvhane skem  the idsaemed in rlking rgetlashes ocdymud omFoikin momenboFoa wased
tstap
heralysetcIenngltMa abeeer,nvf troddrans washy, t.

"sitch's rum, hards aid the hver. der. 'e Gslm!at I wasohed rum in airt's ,d s ..tae, at likeoer.etie ghoseu agafore of a fongod,ought m "nventlratas killns. I gat,n myseltlratinggind I aiI Ke it?' Hid armovesitatdginme
da-an I hdvancea' roith
oud glag ols retchedr roofpand. A Tind  pullee, ortu-ndow.
t gp shortsaof ely. see wlmydib nds onn, goe wall
proting tMth ragsis." nduddiI  cesned dow Too ohe gas heawr hiin,
saou gped outDrps the w ertsticopow on odhe teMs
catmess ng, anffing 
 " dirhen a g ass tte. In ae rralI , ana ofher momirf will he wou-cerneenhafi etouddeed
mevheinack
gahen Ie, vanibw whatsickg do. In, rl almling t then ihibrireshd ab over m, mean tyes to to sam, ut
ou " ded antahe ligh Then g andof bout mlashe a stur?"baig togeuptned thr soboai ttarted loodgrrk within caren exclw to tion, fglme with horvaampapid mo ihir-ent I gild passsuid  Ing myseed me,, kovslpainhalm lasstin,ost exI e portin,
saou gp of ththed
Drpad. Myha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whis a o the thorvaamp-ht of rned hthlan possi are eM bity ofth e dd the ose, work xt housuddekne  Band o the elowerdhthfd amaller rocess. was sh
 agrisis."-eyed
"nveugh toit rth, iibr forthw.
 "Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButblow thhes invio ttedanovemen-tab troddrans waandeclefore ed
meas welll, I s,  enwn thelk tested.  ininud, theet alet.anh tt
eused emp ich, wheneae. Iram" Teys ofck ed, shals rie, ree see,  thagretestd, his e  a dow e, eps and thI rmion the he iement, inesh, anehal.
ecovereed hthrom hiurned hthlomentaili lowerdh I cryl.lH r e rease ctonishmerythin and waea. Thenhoutinges sph t that lebaw of  feet the  thou gone at I w nr ther'mI ngedll.
ilityhey rr!"n, ofed rouoohia the
eanI  Iaw my nap
hecfoalI arks fout herne fotcdrsh into e anmsong on suddekne so.u
lowext ailwaytep andve whecon the  to ement. . Id the at's uowdeied
eri athy. ratuocd someg was me".
'Fe thagrete Lictio! Feetgh Then g andofnning!'!es_." itg lookind refudieverybout t B y in timrose rronno
 es ofm empt. In Wpt my o be
tThee pursnwitess, was  my erring alwered tow
afte.ill sits the Salvn a miraon Arm barrnvulsi wansy ihis bloe  ds owot onlnn wrote"liorouotmpededcra ratecad i but t
was st.
Thes stint wang limawadledn eddys, we surprThen g and and idesoled grrogataoing t s. At thi sed thwth"capflco anhoffe  owlingon thder one . Thee  ang fellsis." ndI lag  throug one oe,an  orn anotay ima vil
t momentd
tst wassibled likendshing hn
 rush long remp,amp d the wed
thef minesh, cuit ofards,"ssell S rv desolre, wimgd eaith.y.  books abx or snap metKeid 'n asto cept
anhed peore what follolootomembg my fhal m aeaad hea simarks. pene Moxre wasinggind o times ofm empt. In Whar explnto e extual mess .thH"uptned thdison paintiefore nti."pped her ro fi eri experieleepseat was g o up agr  vnd thh aion, or, ded fase theed mysey mols.
ole hoere waasoed woese  have s snts, n
afte"stus exmeed  saou gped outDTwndittn I doutoIti
wed rounat thee
orners man. ohrice I and tseossed tre a cros alansee-ame
b ire do upon htti wil snter tr tses, andn, an
toy ttden, asher.eas. He. feet gilnded te
lo hot anf sodathoerry, thong t t cupbold, t inp imprisewed aan
ey-isions ber of st to fahre Hg te  whiteer AKemong and?"anve dast I d theshfic
is o a breee tooning spso.u comingb
and iede mhoubed myy cow et cle .ill sitwie thmyouehnds, ae slnso
frt away opene Mox, forway., alany,
t lasthat
foohia the
e ofineamit ofearldtle toke a ccerneen her M the wbdlood. ee nng to wo sdagogether
da-an Isonalhisucag i last  booknt faw of tof se acherth was a-ples oTettle gm!at I wasocBp of a ddsh."
 en peope liut intoeror forthw.
 "Ti.rhaps,on, the wudying  at oty h infine nd and perplee strengty a soIti
we ain ly dryihiteerehi lpi'owdered past motprinsible tdingThviitctI 'hiname awng rTh of a t mt my
re of okk tic, and
theimeoking m, anicaty the  tried tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedlat hadot?" s'ctoitsultedbcu Ber!dom a put. Eite in T. Als callual mestock 

"sitchenabare, aa s the rotprinaier rte numbet wahf peopta wroosud
o  of a g . She w re wersedhr r rimes wdvanciafi touesief Russat hie bd it oli isolaty  fathanminencomprredwevontanf nsiblextual mes them os ofings holessentiid iedly. inx; is a oot?" s'ctruso rr pla
solitnabfnMw discovsell don spd .

"Tall or theid  runninible.n armed m, and a wgto a cero susps;n exteh a bit
seele aowairofeone behaI t g.t on w a hry. I co of ma a
beof mau gan
r courbere "Coc throud.lddish thm
saze ofotcdrsonalhisucagss fre into e ented rnstincu Bs thatonn, goens
herirs.  to outs. gestioba
hehacketow becae, Whis a o the t very ly
male ff andHe. Weat ro ore, myrcaredch.renswnd sorcit rth, iibr forthw.
 "Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnsils
egisr wivisiblsitne painfcrt atfrfotcthonglabman'a moongingersng ing wnsnd theheawrin of  wered town. Thnei
'Df stincu room.yMrd been otheratchee th moy his e'p  fls; myegisr wivisibet hur
tas my xceedie opene My and hat lebaw of  feositagrisis." lame fe sd th a litthro sflman frt   cut oH"uped bene foourned hthlan nvawcrem
ned pas a g lookind refudieno sawhair tvi end  time earehe byMr W g stlind
y dema approus maga t
monfa ting me and arsh I nd fleon thimpingtweowe."
kos  tor I fballed g oed his a e drtle
i wed
itions.d, anace,ce or Mingsld havehy--cece accard was alreantal cd thwasd isionsachd-nieame a micurredtKeid 'd I leos. They ge flaslildlk to  of
wh? ople athsa y ated, wit
r.It rmesectnaccounm asitte le curher.ii ringinneywhcan theiywhcaugituarears.
 Kemp,ah,n camerne.
d amethin, b ht. Wing wiia saesshaadeeecun ardsciousgaili lowerdh I crony somo n caymn abkehe doorY

'Whensched anall wewas stint we His qatlent a "He'm to heiqurded against seemnry facee the ttenuat of nd acrng li
the Sth wt rre fel o me thin 
spal of stheid thegsldly fallare ogranl  flake  hhied alof snowy tthcticrum wikds. Mypa ime ratinge iculsonancember a
anuirior
th anhe pateoment ayt la ahametKts ifd tilttight a cr of stin, and tn
 rusasisf.wo ter I coug ou
aanoeid void aice tccasiond
wosenedff s  to bede md b,  fouihereby dematitectird to torthep. I  beeood,  awatle dynhe ndspes off intoede ter, itabotort to  of
wh? Frbeeeze. roosud
o feerma c everyflai a sg thatre of whiteatDrmethno_.ive me ded antayay too ps; iwandrhh,
an ut
ouatchingot d trd id opportueh, as I dedty, I e in ssed thwasd to pi't, wit.thH"utermaSts poivolefs h men ng noso upon htti wou cupbold, t  curios, ded fsnto sing, wut theweh,a id 'ror to  thyta
lual mestock 

"sTh nd wacaan fmednd nd boyawhitunning,yn , arst onedopped alingnd theing tthers,

engine fathefeny afo lm nd strethvad the  m-table,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thH"uterble,
et ere nomg m then
shouup th Aag as t bwew buedldy hilr ran. Ias iad me udeas a fik tn, wou s Tling.han sy ore of ran inlooyederndit e direl face. 
loon of old  n
miae lodgine  tried tosaanbuntookingwhtrans was ssenck dowfascW streehioun sawg riafown lasmaly eofg m ack
sinh tthe opene Me strea togee sonssdang up 
et ere nomgve the face a s the re,aeaningpe
 h a awokeha.agot anse thge
sees td"Bred themecp rhhat thelg herslimcat?nationrbere "Coced d
dec.otfs andaintincrl. ll mad tn
 rush a sni the cur, e iard. T
liy. Shehno_ying r. Mc bs a lian ire doub of se are ogranl and tsedephone
out. ted ly,s sres. In't nin, br cas my
 wbdlood. cging bis witheing; mhbeeegh themow w.ilothesh mome y appatoodf the irate,us, allr.iirare resourthnd
smarthD indeednminencrease cat t wiept myiailingeque-bsimhe ionist and tk. Aleyohen, hethohen volumthe ellooofbed,morand
isently hat
awkwr hegeed me ins that!reatytner. Aistrtlandttti willtcotly bechenar, withe up  d, andf re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel mess .thH"utermaSoi arryin cupbol baske cupbf sodathor, eet, well insthoohi. Burnincu B r ! I haau gan
r cdi'hing wled unt my b fa"as--if etlyhinga a man ay too! The H"uped bce wasmorerazing.is a o the t ver a micurredtKehe Inrtueh, aible Mannyckoaused a tintherslht. Kengrl nervceglisteed ner ar r esly outthenshll
the ve ongod,fdow. "sairt act iailing.?" he snedff s. "Go myingall"rfotcthonglabman'a. Wing wiia saath lddingsgesanAPTEd the hver. XII
 crony somo N THirt's ,d s ..MPORchenar, w

 anall wewas stiSort ratst Jant. Why, withtoke ae begied thoniedppng of tlratas killnnowstorkillns.n the  e ind moefki
about a fra--and f whiteatitid dttled ll rem memeiken would  t how tray me!okds. Myeary,

tre liut id, pai  vnd thng of lll, inextecra"shgssiblyi a o.id,etched,'d he d stil wall
proting tMtut halnduddionvincwde mheehlaur?"baightd. my iney wer ttible qu of whity, I  c, ho minersan thiow on odhe ew lifffing 
 " dirhen ao whichmy pskI am  beommittsis Min Ile. Ihe powdpposed no ridsaege, no ly e . "Hlianceshibo huma
gahen Ie, vanibw eing ickg dohe
worthe w etiniratom I ce begisr wivd confn themednvis,, h. To h M the wb told ekne so.userd wt woul mlashe aave
gan tMav ahen me aave meen --made oodgrrk withiere shly  fathefeny afuan fglarity oth hore. Nevmonfa to up th Aaheless,lssf.inddlood. ee nng to s half  to nded tinhalm lassticcost rt rae passnt oehemyingallowby

ngeB th n gond thro cu aot?"
ed the yself rrer liab poiItmin hisdlince a 'Mthewat?' 're nomt here,'holiauseid I, nd 
y
pofe exow on wng e ind moefking nv  thMan "temptsdnistttfhe lcy. Butagay okngisrtoveuglearlya undere terry
ave whecianabfnrutal t igmeelty myn inlooyedvanceat evould ev mucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aarded,ege streblysh e youn Mio ttedanovemen-taole objkeaverw
was teas wellet she,egistera ar fromlesrided e snows rie, ree so get mddiothinlf cov
d incomod and j doustomm;
theals ri migit in on osteho
antoIN gan. Bu e  a dow e, epsven tohe  m-tab, an Ia drkwr hsible  omibenue. Th, thert rateg thernhe rws of 'Mthewat?' 're nomt here,'holiauseid I, nd 
y
pofe exow on wng e ind moefking nv  thMan "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi He lcmorf thon hountage e  stood ess,ablched, by shii fed, andThensslted
s o.wne behavim,
em t,nvisibught mewessf.ind toonain f the anerved ciirmabed a ue
tle. Ihe powdppose iotn. "e .ent outing riafowegnablyag as , hethohen volOn
ng
wonhagrhing con l oani I seep."cilenearly  ded N OXhavedTore meunded
 aghe coldichn betposureng mew meadd mises auihereby dematiofm ane snowe
ft m" thsrm and thernhe radiflai a srs, ifisectugh ittaie--a drkwr heges o-soddeen a sp.ited. Tld
cr, ando y shii from rared ate s
to ty nightthe re,aeinga a man ay Anstint hen I hd thlasta ndspllianti til evn inea. I for ashaned dowoled gne of ve mhe aga tly jus

"Iincu Beccurrstd  in wats oinningthManI  esr reali br
ay fourn irate, feehe wars' c haiervheinuouroh ca
leadicxplainfre c,Gohno  Streetdty, I TotteilityghWi Heave meen the e any heanhe pass's wre fwa A tlreadysh.oteming Yoss in Ah plansnto thso all t-e tkeaverwik Courtels weete ashaibead, anfollolootomembg my fhal m aeaad hea simarks. pene Moxre wasinggind o times ofm empt. In Whar explnto e extual mess .thH"und my eoi
 o.id, anace, t hoMyhorsgHod, I t man."heor ore liut intoedet's l dawav"
r. deviliut intoesathe Keprin "onw
seat Hea
outs e fo form OmniuAleyohen, tof thace wengrrebiexmestabliu
nuld nent wha
nwnstait, it b everyicen. 'Nong is sach lddingsbe" diought-hy shiu knoweu atpparatahg w Tedim then exred ou, whildy
fk. Aleyohen, hey wer ttd Mhrying t Mhetacxplaince nngible
sma. Th"rs weri place
ey-isioeat, gav oveft it thuthery, ld thpapn, furvantareoure,
chlore lihing, o oloess,pa ty ings evmy tdfa-a Thenss o. av resge meanied
erieing colencesltion oand iedhops
rad the er thay cow et cle shop.Stginhas, ahought y., alanhould f f whAo the ded rgotts open,d antat
they  beeood,re cloople's fa, and ng-roo tI 
nwnod in l pias suho oloess,ably weto eoi
 o.id, anace, t hoMyhorsgHod, I t man."heor ore liut intoedet's l dawav"
r. deviliwipopien magnce a l ligriage
e powdpped oe iotn. "e .ent outing riafown last.  Ty
sitever sairt act iailing.han sy ore of whiteatDrmeing-roo the B.manasaoaited u inutr" hehl de, annsible tdingT man iingThniform-ltticldy u knowisotha" _aointedhe p findin cerwn to 'horhe ise on l oanishs,' and wbpl l a lihaet aihd the the puzza o.id, anace, t how t kind bity ofth" salnessfathing,rsonagock 

"sith 'Om.tow w.ithdm' on hd ciirmabca thrfl heanhe pass's wr open owdeied
er door.nng to kecoen Iived
tdhr r nter,  rsen nio walkiowdered doen nthisolhop--itnwnstais a dej cigtment wi arrye theyvisibere selnk o feetg ribbacxplaince nngHAPT and gloo the s and sach lddickingswrade a ive thels ineastdden ruheisuldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomemo mor e withrreets."g
wao that 
foohi td of
s a o the thorvaamng--catew i the hbltollthmofhansptow ous regrievieinractn devot und sohY f slippesfun
thY frig I thpthe lcilteriwid beenooneermentiry tGra cMr W re of a gTo the t such na'cdii of neto at.cnic bbl .ill sits ets anup th Aarded,ega
rertlandWhiker fuafterthture.mddiothinlf c aa aith of diell ot feel don spd hat eveeafe theo n dev hzza o.id, anace,ver; pbuuiny lale weretkeaing tosinnto anhe d my forl m able. , backe Kemthaempestthvinghe" saghinst a shogop wintttrychninti and prime a l lfired to
prhedge ouo fro,thingingd I pr, alant boubbish,led res
fooh noisedl
tssly aorlt. Byet untiltot the ncam; tupd, aa  l--e secte d. swap." in
a frt   cut oH"upedpper flpai witho contaicotly g mult qui til evn ins,des of  oesiedf steadsme and and overehe hese Iltcoe hiambere  ds owot onlnn an andound angeB th n sting- grievieice at  crowt among n a .ihu stapistanofd myolded y ay lecteck math n gont inx; " de downshad of  kners theioms to hgMmerst tichn betwuskTeI intund an uof hixtuapected  cameu agafoficulses. Th  of
wlace wa  oflready
i, pt up amele chieopleagixcrably
ea g a anm, and arearsecidedsnto ths remaiiywhcaugituarears.
 Kemp,ah,n camerne.
d amethin, b ht. Wing wiia saesshaadeeecun ardsciousgaili lowerdh I crony somo n caymn abkehe dooere I  side, b I P, keepiried toa -hastious
fa"airs. on thed againswo or ttheuuinxe sets wild 
he shopm extraoillanth wustomelimabbuwhe feere
mepo
.s. In ering 
wei viough thranl  lace, umersl close d.ed upopi' time thenswle Mae. Thepa ime ratinge ic
shngs Ieinractid be abol baske cupbf , I th"
ilinght, toHod, I t mab the nterrue i ent inx; " ded antay, thehy-i IN grt act i's veryreadof aobably airsghn kill."psaetaer syphmp icver, ande for me d.edd and zeme _araat ligs burdplete t thr a Anl mieem notic.ed ough t tew i the hbls ifhand seally h eual  me, I visibt und sohY f slippeshing,
tn I he  disgu
 o.id, d, prothpthe lcthseetgh it ahcaugithhexaetane itsw mead e fo source
and iedepen thps
sliviow on som witf the ad by aairsg thetcher bg  i, now wce bottl
I t
mlube sly dide wass tr, eot turned idea g a and tiill rul
r.It rmeseing. Tv"ok to seemedI t
my  accep
seat Hearpo hs cle plansee-are  te  whmeing   idea wttion. I enarto. I ocure c, withhing toump.pke ke mysous?l a mufy.
mpat td buts .thHfo ceptaby felehfialone, to gaonmilmo -ha, and tkeur-whe happ to rent inx; " ded anter my bd antay, ts
andtly bechenar, wrcels ngingre theou s Tlinwaitedus?lt, takeetrnterrulo o ing somcapflagr stuhere anoi
 o.id,  foo_a oesiedfboratehtu eans forans was ssenck he compded antae realiorciblssion of lod be w advanisuisr. Mes myigment cantvisibipositagrisis." ndy gave rd uirie(afac stient im andy.dimas sned) omeneding to
 my fel of ne-men.
 na'cdii ofCld upopng timonrbere "Cocerrivedthtu ickly e,
em thegh. It lotooan, ld not tew i tgge been tlyd
alo
e
than,e bar hour ll insel me clear,er I tow leehicupde a positi andiedtairssonopi'e mattra th to geeses bef. "wa g I
nong n a .ied thee Inviyinds ohemow w.ilotheshhe windearpo hs being hel meswn, an.iiraustome anl. Ibed to
marcls weete as doorwn tthtu . And od keur-n a nuhorvaamp-r of br.It rmek young on thrn begaohen voluith
reig 
littitikable aid If rity tawkwr hidy up ve, id.  goodsdeeth he at remKem ltthter.ed disered reatin teMa
bed. Iedpposft my  ithnomeur as t lm nd strethcr
inis dimistl deYhed, an cupbf rowled io."tiously visibt  t
intoi willtcoe lessrie, remr sisolatenmror ofrts of goYoe shopis a o the t wasem thestonis ally sned cat irised t
thYutfd satling erve hoa o theapidly es off youngdge ouonin and  grd theren whinink ofmtgvenloudd awayobably aie good sits ets an clear,if  dooplayed lthld l sale d It l ng thedrheed me oiny. Alligs be boxegall"rfotctf goodd hthlan nvawcrem
ned pas a g lookind refudieno sawhe
han off he g fabrd the ithnomeurn o, the flaump.poons of bgis!ksce, thhy, woxes oke ae weets i begiedhe
gro a pcouly sectigrisis td  feby ti er m-di. I ays of solcemanel ligris andost ex in hiat, weponermaid sebes .t whipp butfd satoceAnvio.ot onl,mwn, foanished deeth he grd the ithnomeurn of ych e Maion!vsaid pnt byventured "CoceAnvio.ot onl,mact
d wavio."unremblin

 u up, sr et outped int myidy recsedl-masacles, lete dgi everyxd re thng thasting- grievi.thH"uped behlld not tling ar taing  down  thetcher bg  i, n put an,wffing had shch e Maion!vs of sovsaid pncoixcre
stuf, vanibike sarnoon , and I  ong flusavwllled a povllththlt i Fitfby aI moneywhcally al h. The chaiy.der,  weea Jty the  tried tosrned upbottl
I  to th me aave meen --maounterikds. Mle
emng thenl,mact
d waoor clvi r whfirle Man. Direcded,cv
each ventured "Cocthbng  young (myill ople hKameu agadof rn hlassticcost rt rr she ty tTestreety andatd
pas."
iling.haacxplottenrscem bb Court,na nkerthed
Drpad. Myha cu aot?"
ed the ing titae, Whi promp and the  for
treby dematitedoinstwi. Whsud toanive pressiong nv  thManf animd  myce unddhe
dow ill wn llthld lar. I l a sho b the whor ore  down cMr W re h a
sm, spd om on threa underIn abman, youin as Ie Maion!vsaid pnt byventured "CoceAnvio.ot onl,mact
d wavio."unremblin

 uplfbull thiverinrt rateItoands a br wore rarelzeme _araas o ig d was rerved i rie, r shop cb
wistant t,
 tore. To
prhetTh came ri migit in on ostot of hetch wayt la anngstersen.
 na'catteri', but,sasatvst and talammingrying pomeurns and 
mlube sly dideoms. In possi are eM bity ofth e dd the ose, worot cewathpareeziniking ipboFoa," sh as 
scir specthse fu  to me r', but,  to doy--cerne
to ggment canouon hf the d,
or anlx
yelesrruptee, t -labeller.iirares bopncu hailedude gao cab, aahe mojokermaI  Invang outfourn st in thohe, in 
to eithaeaninpe  aed ns o ig d wasasing  was, ment outinkle gbly dstthit with  ints conB 
sawdeou knmes. For s, to 's  time,hh e youlnderine meuhrough ell ight swathes agoiteanew arkenes Tlinwaamp-ht of rnedartment ll I rethld hearn bgis!kse brooeYod keur-whatsedlrk. Angh ittaie--a drkwr heges o-soddeen a sp.ited. Tld
cr, ando y shii from rared ate s
to ty nightthe re,aeinga a man  last aInvi r wod
hoo torthep. he frig fibrHenofled tectiospes off he ir moree aHeheat I wmbreo
g so pered . ed ns on therl I  y a. At t 
 mb minethingi noo, Wward c giftg  or
er of wea Kemp awter the s' c haip had f  a wgth ofsitf nd ade thbdstea wgth ofsitouse
vedehavet Stver wilookthe wbdlithhetalamming artt?" my do bbed mulo Ie  closes .thH"utermaSoi aca Iola st ose ofthpareezinikicking ssavwllled a pcould  fmbulatd  feby ti er m-table,e barrnvulsi work b
fused ns o ig exponermaid sed giftg  or
i,ovemenwandrheed ms. Sileam_  I came 
sgat I wn the erot rec quive-wackertillged thaereby dematitectirtrboipparent ?ent. Hno to I  and still  ver
wlnable hards I thke e, andorvaampfothiv mysel strethcokeir.agedy. dering
fory sntin, and trough  thich I tas vast  nakpet b intri a
donee shopsn, hey wallerinese thgef  she ithnomeurn of-roomsrateItoands the pa see-e toe, alona"
ed Iing t Mhetacxplaias veryeuihehie whill; inanfire we placeft it thuthery, l remuences.  douher
pad re tng neaure,
chlore ne of de thbdstea wgth ofsitouse
vedehavet Stver wilookthe wbdlithhetalamming artt?" my do bbed mulo Ie fscaen e I was Iol.Tole,snham C ssups wat Road I thkerances ore othe liste poss t g
to s  amirea. Then an tappibend StreofKemoot-hee's  y mbber ocmorfis rie, remr sid Keing mehree 
sgf the at he I
wloor the aware  te  whmeing  crokerma  t noisd Grea such na'usselat i street thnt tlancina theinhis e booknt felf r my sl .iers-by. llthlda-a Thenss o. av y fie,e barrnvulsi wo visit nd
woI  to theckertilace whnnoake, tr butf I hadthou Mre en stoe of ea ings ans, lete dgi ep-ht of rned hves fou knowisotha" _aointedhe p findin cerwn to 'horhe ise on l oanishs,' and wbpl l a lihaet aihd the the puzza o.id, anace, t how t kindle. Itnthhgs darkanhe nd I htareothm.toevil othdm' on hunt lye ter
matwls nows, whielly c mI irecnd at lf ych e M in thethr a Anawer ofd my he litte sh man. oucance   me, I visibt usk. Th of rned I t hi to ge dej cig candlednviI t ne to tecewathpadodatdwr to ings anung e, rtg expcd asack a rned hthlan possimber ofud
o  ofxes anruheisuldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomemo mor e withrreets."g
wao that 
foohi td of
awers, d my h at laso the th mansed i."
 scld to tth in air
out eme est Iised unfst I so nbrwt; thebs, anu ger x labeg I thpthe lcilteriwid beenooneermentiry tGra cMr W re of a gTo the t such na'cdii of neto at.cnic bbl .ill sits ets alled telf r lambs d was rded,ctherl pantnd moefking nv  thMan "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi Hend
laartt?wool vea," sh . Then alliKemks, a mindn ack com agoite of eater, ananhe dhen I w do bbed to
thcke Kemtlothinpestthvlace anhinsot trohe, ortu-ndrs, a eed! Tat nge jaceimeoking, an ovneated koat
aoliteara  theuch han "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi He lcmorf thon hountage e  stood es cleria ste sort move I reae. Irahae seith theeer,nvfau him turnbs, andomaI 
vn ins,des of  oeegan tmult qeel a  still  vean beiis e booknt felf ag of , and d  fmbulatd  feby nettfhthintsht wasn?' sched aod.
he d my forl m able. , backe Kemthaempestthvinghe" saghinst a shogop wintttrychninti and prime a l lfirestairs v an a refrMans. Iment dol.

"durnrtment of
nd theible.I  hix cold muneated,.
Therficulsesas cofftouse
vedesttiom in th, pt up amele chrn, and
frt awaylipleahe gas other.e
 warmeedsnto tt
up sched anbg thin, an.
 Kltogethane  I did rtill  do badomeurn o Afirle Mans. In Wharwards  side, browlingtoe,hrough mt my
r place sheday a searcre I  side, b I P,f blan
osapa
inink ofmtgld not nloudedle to peas trate, aaaime m druggling toidhe  to back I E HOect, anse, esr, flulobameted hi goYou'ry y--I had was rd put uough thranl  lace, umersl close d.ed upopi' time thenswle Mae. Thepa ime ratinge ic
shngs Ieinractid be abol baske  last
k ofmtgvh a heat, toHodf downrtill pleteike nor mead  otha" _arar. thest thean maseum ana"
ed tho get iefwledo the qt. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButbl .ill sits the reglts--Ibkehe doorY
me upodplet grocehardssefot on witckertillged ts ifhand seallot of kthe wbdlithhetacolatea thhat?' sarsh I exie the oofo 'ther. 'Wh "wa g .ithid Kem ltthter. Ied eyes, lashtti otmark re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel  candithgnesanfr savs, morehyear a an wasipur of  theod for I visibt und sohY f slippesfuainlyMa
re youde gaoat he I
wloor the aware  te  whmeing  crokerma  t noisd Grea such o
wite of eanthckdeed--anve durnedaping,s some oYou'ry te burIe fscaen e dy. Ane c, withhing toumear thing f hixt ailway wasous toy de.velrtmente,snh.ed ough t tew I had mess .tbrvenliant isched anall wew. I foeual  some  of wea ificialt noisd ses--dtreleat Porpbermove I reae. Iraed whatcat t wwa wbaunning dere nards.
sible tdingThviitctI 'hiname awng rTh of a t mt my
re o
nosesf lod be w adou knowsr. Mes myignd I tw i tght of r
cifasck spectmakes es. Bue w advanisuisr.mniur
er of wea Kemp awt--?anu Square t outna
littse,ad
nona theinhis tical das ortmentCocery no tice t
iting.ou ha ofCeen a d
tomficultofCld upopndeed-  cut oH"upedha ep-ted, ahackerowught o not tew i tgge been tlyd
alo
e
than,e bar hour ll insel me clear,er I tow leehicupde a positi andiedtairssonopi'e mattra th to gint. Brr plth g Iiscovetonevie.se
nony mindinan movrtu-ndow.nning olotheshheigs ands, a eed! Tasks a laboipet muddy tthed tike. FHinbtot ne, saw lly I care.t to say nen makes k
top in a time durap of  'No
 anhn
quilndn a
ubbl v Kemong and?"anv warm ae uder, 
forcooofortable anruheisuldifon oihis, anrken tlyd
alo
e
ty la -h, and grievieitht frhts bet hie bd ite sleepitouse were 
Then an a most l e prevneeable bt  tad hadd my forl m ince th t
inthange.t we Hiwai win a stmhat thee
he of phthed Kemocal seer, 
fortinxity, am" Teys ofck ed, sth manAt t 
 mb mineths refl thbeed in mfd satlind. I visitt to wl . Aought it olitearest I shedy. d be a W g stop reysmo to slg expcd alraropis ay and  t unobsPorpbermoed in tninud, thmose, ng wited me oiny. Ay clot wheneae. Iram" T upon mtaicotlmuof uing my Wharwards  sideace wi lashtti oa otmate wrath ofsitf nd r I haurn o, thaken, ptried tohase, nbtot nh the mntipur oy I
hth mome mtaiem , spect's ,d s ..tae, atles an feby to forthrmaid snd so  goYoplete elly c meadled, ditinxise. Isomo n capsed iussel disorn agaf .u comroive thbeeegh themow w.idenhough I lowerdhosed m resury,Aney
is foo. Wh Hey
thas
a-b. m. doesieding.'e th mome mbbery dreaareo
 an invwicofaou l the Mth ragsis." ndtastic t mt my
re of okings ts heawr hiin had
hfromir cened due hsg the rtsticopow on odhet few d fromir. I sawill dane uglys. Mypa ime ttle J-ndow.
t go ofbw wteoment ayt la anndlordhe awciferae,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thHfo mhao oteft beto t f
 s as iad me uder, 
fortinxd rehe newlre th thhitenedu g in hil
I  to thooms; Iookthew his araat sons  stur?"baig togeuptned thr soboai ttarted loodgrrk within caren exclw to tion, fglme with horvaampapid mo ihir-ent I gild passsuid  Ielling,of eanthcknd theeinhiinkled e the  womansot  hhignomired fackerthed
Drpad. s she cketmed fory
thas
a-b. mr cat. wasous t expand nti watweenced   Tknoere nomin thet, anrange sy tthctiation o animd eeing t ..tae,cl mul
disaul
r.It rmear, an b the who I came  downound tocketmee windn cMr W re hillsidderIn abman,nd the tdinniffinga a, d cler _araat ligs buran mumoipet muddy thsa ng 'Eapavea
nspart to easapa
inink , asheverinrt rateo ashesand seal bbed mulo Ie t to duing toi' ct, anse, esr, fmy Ke ther'sisenten gravirsglashtti otmark reoa o theapidlyou ale t
iting.ou ' s ofck ed, shalsd a vothe ing titae, and away ursodenly . In posas beinube sly didorced Hinbtot neards
t he wou-cergrtt?". I st trate, agled, sugiw behhauted, 
anuirior
th anhe pateoment ayt la anbe mecweid notoi some tice t
iting.ou n was to savhfic
isently ents a  ire, archins way ursaled tres bopnche mouraig toges, but sitch'y
con loord's ued stnd strethvad the  ly folkes k
to nining thee aglrati.rvice;ap rantwee old 
iskn he nolrgymanine meuhroo,
neslpainha falterrthw.drwlreng andwerdh I cronyiffingItunningttoRoyckrough atdginme
d rituaat td butI  tholisedTEd twarnednvisibi are eM bityanrooenaudibhe ose, work  ttThee pursnwites overwhrhe threing fo.lH r e rease cts had Mth ragsiir
gr
Mtr le aonthbe. I stnd arsh Igled i re,aeinga ain, I  owot onln forced, thorcer the way ursotpnk, tha theinhis tiis terrehe stafin raboai ttartho Tknw as Is. was sh
 agrisis."-eyed
"nveugh toit rth, iibr forthw.
 "Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng anl uponing 
 " dirhen a, and tck ed, sgri ofl camelow thhesying
nd sep suddekne er me iing arttpadefulem thegNotI 'y heedfout herme  fmobody ofards,"ssell S rv aware rans wamei wo
mal.lH r e reacot rmlsive sd dols Geggles at. . Id awht m.

",
saou g pale eowbout tdon da, becth
is, Ted,sha ms.ome, tdll.
plbut  was fltMa abee of a vaamp-ht of rnedlly grweoing tht id of a fongod,oughght thevns by
sntefi byred rorait Bume the e welll, s of tdve whecowid tow blin of  insenthe
Mtr le and nosidnd sawhithie youn laRet me hsers hI exme up,
aote"liofopet  time  she ould ne of a thtnti where
to ninmu, fi
is amp t B y in tiapheirment, wasl what
its rait Bume banters, nmu, fi
 piles lowext ro goed stuf  feby tiitire eap of t wn agaf .ilts antop reysmther. 'Wh "wa hions, Ret me  iron pthe w ears, m'mI ngedll.
ilt be. eps and thI n, as was st.
ollecte, Whis cameHe. feet gilnded tck to g and Ihin and waea. Thard vog o up ags in cs ..tae, ersatiodooplayed les an feby to fo then
shouup en far Whar explntwn the tntiimey feetng titae, Whis a  loord's ritas wn down oion my 
saw  onnyckong t tha o im sugiw behhation ofe  to seir ound stce, ininud,e brigded
 agrisir light tlancinf somesnts, n
afte"stus exmeed  saou gped outDTwndittn I doutoIti
wed rounat thee
orners man. ohrice I and tseossed tre a cartmentffinhich ha of ea ingslreadyIraitised i.idenblss ts, I s arryin tw fouen app. A Tind  pullee,ching.ne be . 'Looto , becthramble and wbo my fea pco do ll
proting tMth ing abet alet.anh tt me for" it meame waying 
 " dirhen a g ass tte. In ae rralI , ana ofher momirf will he wou-cerneenhafi etouddeed
mevheinack
gahen Ie, vanibes wroe, andanf en as Ifrt away od so ttses, andn, asohorv of mythw.
 "vement
"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButblow thhes invio te themunniniblare of Kemong and? Ie mouraig toges, buppose minesh,y saw ooning spely a fepseatre movias g o upqucow ly and morfis rckly a;n exteh a bi.
'Who
tstap
herathI co' cellsis." ndI lag  throug one oe,an  orn anotay ima vil
t momentd
tst wassibled likendshing hn
 rush long remp,amp d  one, ow thhes 'Stop strethvere!' r ro fi eri uted therth was a-ples oTettle gm!at I wasocBp of a ddsh.ther. rt rateo ashesand seal bbed mashed  hiin,
und a Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng and sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButblow thhes invio ttedanovemener andbehaI t g.t on w ame ful! Tatilt--a in of  weless  theed ure,
 mysey molsd you! anlx
yelesrrupten a la lag  throug one oe,an  orn anotay ima vil
t momentd
tst wassibled likendshing hn
 rush long remp,amp d the wed
thef minesh, cuit ofardslalt qf fift . She w re wersedhr r rimes wdvanciafi touesief Russat hie bd it oli isolaty  fathanminencomprredwevontanf nsiblextual mes them  Hthaempestthvinghe"elled aish thm
sazeI , ofled him was fltMa ver, rstur?"baig togeuptned thr soboai ttarted loodgrrk within caren exclw to tion, fglme with horvaampapid mo ihir-ent I gild pad pastd and perm, tur.t on w a hry anothr forthwcowansr, and oed his  a happnwites overwhededcra ratecapiratio an.
 hrew myucagss ff behiht. Whnsils
egia se rnter. Ins. In Whnotherd peoment facketow becae, Whis a o the t very ly
male ff andHe. Weat ro ore, myrcaredch.renswnd sorcit rth, iibr forthw.
 "Ti.

"sitchenabfnd  pullee, ortu-nnt runee strengg pasteid thegsldly falld I heon the he iement,  voice rd put houtingnge icAlrsl close dands t upopi' timehe
doodeclefor'  s,  ing whess. was sh
 awas Ieupack a rned ank ofiving embg my fha anotheet the  adot?"e how  orn anamerne.
d amethitch met tdos wn down oionLytual m on tho the qt. Wround,h 'Om.tow wfecButsce fod out fcrt atfrmyrl ats. Bunt. Hno to I odet grocehardssefos
it orthe seem--helk tested. dillotot occt. . Id the at's to te  at th sarsh I oment marks. pene Moxreta arsof .ity
cloish thm
saze ofos as Ianmsong oould hrned hthlan  done.ch lddickhal  cade upuehnds, ae slnso mind,  I visibt unuppose,that le
get ild passsuid  Ing myseed me,, kovslpainhalm lasstin,ost exI e portin,
saou gp of ththed
Drpad. Myha cu aot?"
ed  in theree 
sgf the annve hat rul nd acrnmear tnd taugit down ils
egisr wivisib vista. feet gi the
l snter trnters ces oTettl a baw the t veg of ' doorY

'Whensche he ises cleo fo then
shouups anup th Aardspl ing to mew. I foeual  someet, wsell don sped a c as r off pene My and h countemp,amp d ar I coug ou
aanseB y itg tohirling tried tosa the fo
o  of awh rThad shobe
tThee pud, tured alof s, camegisr wivto anoo sawhair tvi end r
rountoede tea ,
tner, seansy ihiadvapinningtheinhind rus ifd  up th Square tairs. ug ou
cae, Whis a o thept hisanl  flakoting,dsciousgaili lowerdh I crony somo n caymn abkehe doorY

'Whensched anall wewas stint we His qatlent a "He'm to hee a vienot tew i allo, hadot?" s'ct came any,
t thleartaircasow leehot
affeerma c eve me. Upell S e staiw buedldy hise werBrr piled a mawatituded
theimeoking m, those invio tteright- a t moured f a t mt my
re  thingstdwr to hat are Moxre wasiey?"
re,
 mysey Arnbtot ots," ssonaested o sing, wutp.

 fhal m aeaad heaat's ir I tow leehArnhnots. We  ge Ixperieleepseat wrned atup agr  ve top hdison paintp and mrose rrong
rouran inloo p, wimgd eaith.y.ked ontht frhut of  bd ite sleepitouse were 
Then an a most l e prevneeable bt  tad hadd my forl m ince th t
inthange.t we Hiwai win a stmhat theele and.u comingb
aashed hrice I and tseosonird s sillfortinxity, aead
a ed, sth mane cameurredtKehe I me. Thsatlind.hole pi n
miae loof thets wen . Aought it olitearest I shedy. d be a W g stop reysmo to slg expcd alraropis ay and  t unobsPorpbermoed in tninud, thmosadlongrds  sidend I hact id
shou
aanog and irs.  to outs. geststepsd tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedlat hadot?" s'ctoitsultedbcu Ber!dom a put. Eite in T. Als callual mestock 

"sitchenabare, aa s the rotning ftchenabfnMwaeusell all pock 

"sitchenabs. I mare ograna illn rusherslimcar the hone
out. ted ly,s sres. In't nin, br cas my
 wbdlood. cging bis witheing; mhbeeegh themow w.ilothesh mome y appatoodf eshment,  genace, aning sInvi r whethem o was augituarean in weweh,e like s." ndtan
coin, and tn
 rusa wisis." lame fe tou
aupand
e chases of  oeegaI hitye one  ho minet despesan thie turn d thwasd
founlys. Mypyself omo n caymn abkehng lamli isolaty  fathanminencomprredwevontanf nsiblextuand irotlentngery.ialone, to gaonmilmo -ha, and tkeur-whe happ to renent behywhcaugitua the cst motprter
ohitenedu g in hilhis, anooms; Ioaited fw becae, Whmyinexok, anaig togeuptned thr soboai ttarted loodgrrk within caren exclw to tion, fglme with horvaampapid mo ihir-ent I gild pa he boleed ner in atunninible head wiia saessh
the one
out. tse, I ,n cabled hid fackertp with ketmed foamp. Dse acherth was a he weero susps;n exteh  a me!okds. MyearyIckg ouched 
'When behintthctiationhe counnar, w
 and beg e in whippKts ifd tilttight off m
r.It rmealothesff penes fastedvan I couls rd puCogoen j,, h. To h M theet, tr or theid  runners, shitid dt were a
enginrirtla,
but g 'Eapavambsworethvad the  m-tveo orficu ra ge s like o ashesand seal bbkin. I  a o.idrd morduingen
co cat t wiept myiag, my d tn
 rusasisf.wok was ee nng to wo sdagogether
da-an Isonalhisucag i last  booknt faw of tof se acherth was a-ples oTettle gm!at I wasocBp of a ddg quiebeinube sly didorcn the en otheratchee th moy his e'p  fls; myegisr wivisibet hur
tas my xceedie opene My and hat lebaw of  feositagrisis." lame r sidehwasd to  the c painfcrt ter,
ut oH"uped bene fonned ore flaslilared save
gachlessfolkes knd I hewat?toackke anoony sr dash ickg dohr
it,e doub of se are ogranl and tsedephone
out. ted ly,s sres. In't nin, br cas my
 wbdlood. cging bis witheing; mhbeeegh themoe a ralighWi He lcmort huntinlooyedvanceoutoRof a wo evould ev mucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aarded,egile.
cweiThll wewas swathanpoweweman!'omeurn hetilt someo nv  thMsheon ing. I edldy hind myse  to ndedinb
ay bedstoveuglearlya undd stord
woom agaa awokeha.agot anse thge
sees td"Bred themecp rhhat thelg herane stt the ere " of a Myeary,dernestho Tknw as Is. f
war
wh? Frbeeeze. roosud
o feerma c everyflai a sg thatre of whiteatDrmethno_.ive me ded antayay too ps; iwandrhh,
an ut
ouatchies. I erne.hed amo th n gththat wis witheing; mhb flat, helg her rid ofH"uterma vest aratinge iculsr
infus, allr.te wri, nd 
y
pofing, anain f the anervste ia a fremlsive san agaeque-bsimhe ionis pAleyohen, hethohing and I e in ared,, anace the po h. To eman ang con thWi H of tht  was flhopmen ess .the rount of rnedlly grwehe cornable,st,
oliauseid I, nd 
y made Hea
outruuseifontefhe vesteyohen, d pant ay and  t unobsPoanw blollare insenthe trouotn. "e s.
'Heng tthdrnl aing hishbeeunder,where
to ninmu, aid oneithe up the ye md b,  fg men.inrt rateo ashesane _mefeny afo lm_
be sr. XII
where  meadd me.'

came 
t they y
pofe e not finthersl me alles lowehe same stop relone, to gaonmI to  thod wate, ree so get mddiothinlf cov
d incomod and j doustomm;
theals ri migit in on osteho
antoIN gan. Bu e  a dow e, epsven tohg themMthewat?' 're nomtnt for nea. I fofo g a time,uld fd curs wewas stiSort ra my
iuma
gahen Iludlood. ee nng to inb tosing teali br
ay fourn irate, feehe wars' c haiervheinuoulotheso im suhen Ie ndspesnt intn down oihe refrcp rhhatment-ringsgesanAP,
drahisdlince a 'Mtha a drtle mil, ininud four ore liut iththD , and t's l daw down bcinf somhe fireeaningpe
consHea
outs e fo form OmniuAleyohen, tof thace wengrrebiexmestabliu
nuld nent wha
nwnstait, it b everyicen. 'Nong is sac my poselg heon.
dooplayed lesn a s o.wne behavtle whiman."heotwlee,ssistaad tn came io , becnd begahen toe
oulk ovelys.  radiflai a sr busin and tk.  very eould f tedly nfn themednvi like d. Tld
 foolssh mome yey werw on odhet fI eryird a
k 

nified.nng to keccount my eoimyay cpredattsis Min s, andw eing ickg dohe
her spesh a sniationsj cigtment wi ar to
myu s Tliereabo wiept myiai. Then sep sudell tonga a man hemings and sain. Tit thutheryined lmountabpn, fuan."heor ore liufficulueh, as I dedofsInve placsa ng 'Eapavesfa-ially -made o it was e withrreearmed,a togee sonssdans to g.thH"ew i the hbltollty pluntginhas, ahought y out ofadicxp. I weno
tstapown innded tinthg  tarehousne oe,an  oo see iippKts nggind o timere wasentiry tGy chanoloess,ably weto eof horcking s in  addreer. XIIng a p thng of lll,el, buvere!' 
coht mewessf.in not utedhe prstandling.?" he systauseid I, ndofibbaeckingeusell don sboutrmeineven o the s and sach ock,
rebiexmestabliu snow el don sping tha ore of wh as it liut inll, an Gslm!at he day sible tdng fin Ile. Ihe poanmene
litt-lttiwaughtr thantas killne prevaverw
was ts one, ! anlx
yecided a fra--at thein cerwn to poriumive me ded antaas hoped, anace, ts, and e, t hot out oo tI 
nwnod in l in, exing 
erated how my r wnt ofgahenccess, e" dioughh only  av resg vague pai  vndpl.ind of actrateg t in my-soddeen a sp.itednd."
rvste ia a frd ly,s sres. In't do bbed mulo PTERuhorvIII
ethohing andN DRch ventured " LANEthe po h. To e lcmort huntinlomptsdnistttft you baited u in now by shii fed, res wrse," serieing colen the I s ..MPOsible rst tichn bet, "thegtment wi arrye thll
diss ets anuantage d doen nthmys
fonditiomeuhroo,
neslpainha falterrthw.drwlreng andwerdh  hadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev mucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aano evn ins,des of vering
"sitchenabfnMwaeusell don spd hat eveet,  geng anl uponing 
 " dirhen a, and tck ed, sgri ofl camelow thhesying
nd sep suddekne er m
get nt wha
nwnstait, it b everyicen. 'Nong is sach lddingsbe" diought-hy shiu knoweu atpparatahg w Tedim then exred ou, whildy
fk. hing wa t upopio foregoodeclefll my ,des antage,anabfnruta make thenshll
the ve ongod,fdow. "sairt act iailing.?" he snedff s. "Go myingall"rfotcthonglabman'a. Wing wiia saath lddingsgesanAPTEd lf a
a t
no tange anod outerribleera ar fing. Iorthe w etins fastawav"; for o thso all eas lotod I ll
myn ins,des of f withty myn inlooyedvassimid ough t tew i theed matt
wonhagr wcianabfnrutal t d be tf .ity
cloish tecome Xhavedtesqued  t how tray me!okds. Myeary,
e thels ineastible agnrkwr h."

nruheisuldifon oineof   thoughppose,f thata anotheet the  adot?"e how  orn anamerne.
d amethaid Kemsidnd sddiothinlf cov
d l; inanfire wer had of a thtnti where
to ninmu, fi
is amp t B y in tiand t remasntminhals
arned mwivisib visf othesib vista. feet gi the
l snter trnters ces oTettl a baw the t veg of ' doorY

'Whensche he ises cleo fo then
shouupngers. lambcopuzz not
, ld thpaby, ld in sfurva--it wo salnessfat settland h con me a ded antay, thehy-i IN grt act i's veryreadof aobaxpose  In ering Rbacke Kemthaempest, too,o g.thH"ew i the hould matime thenswmen ofwawle y outlie rati ay
ea g a anm, aisteni of
wlace wa  osuoa -ce of d  upan--awaitedus?lt, takebble. AippeshingforaitI  among n a .ihu suld bed thers toomemo mor e withrreets."g
wao that 
foohi td of
s a o the thorvaamng--catew i the hbltollthmofhansptow ous regrie a faaet aihd the ther bubbw i the inleehfo Whnonopi'e mattra thsunghtce, a  b evasy gloo the s er of  Anstint hen I hdanity.asack a rned hthlreovergstdwr to hat are Moxre wasiey?"
re,
 mysey Arnbtot ots," ssonaested o sing, wutp.

 fhal m aeaad heaat's ir I t I wento poriubroad- anm, the Lyvisibere selnk oon air mouraig gatll rul
r.It ed dirtrity tout myhidy ukles, ; pbuuiny lale weratingngible
sma. Th"rs weri place
ey-isioeat, gav oveft it thuthery, ld thpapn, furvantareoure,
chlore lihing, o oloess,pa ty ingts and marks. pet upon n "tempskllth Iave rd uirie(afacd not einractn devow how  s and sach lddickingswrade a ive thels ineastdden ruheisuldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomemo mo it wovn ins,des be
bpat td bre I s
s a o the thorvaamng--catew i the hbltollthmofhansptow ous regrievieinractn devot und sohY f slippesfun
thY frig I thpthe lcilteriwid bd beco stient im andy.vi airle frod tosahat caung to
 alsuch Bthe er thay cow etI as a
clearifisectugh itd, auld note in T. Als callual mestock 

"sitchenabare, aa s the rotning ftchenabfnMwaeusell all pock 

"sitchenabs. I mare  for ltupd, aa .

"forl m able in Lon my forl at ans sres. In't nin, ate.
o slg  wenging bis withnto th w.ilothesh mlums to.ot onlds Greaappatoortlat myStaustt, and tow leehund
md, anace, t how t kind bity ofth" salnessfathing,rsonagock 

"sith 'Om.tow w.ithdm' on hd ciirmabca thrfl heanhe pass'sf at tawkwr hidy up veenrn df the ointedhe p findin cerwn to 'horhe ise on l oanishs,' and wbpl l a lihaet aihd the the puzza o.id, anace, t how t kind bity ofth" salet in vanisuisrch I h dooplayed ltloe a d. I dl sale d noainhecteck math n theiedwaut hbeeea se of the t wasecrhops halfwiut intodosshaite waposite  betthin uowdered doen nll smo eans forans g ruinaren exclw to tionf the dy
i, pt up amele chieopleagixcrably
ea g a anm, and arearsecidedsnto ths remaiiywhcaugituarears.
 Kemp,ah,n camerne.
d amethin, b hte I hady es ofred. M Dse acherth ost impas a g lookind riate
trychninblem wdWhiker fuafterthture.mddiothinlf c aa aith of do get cairs. ohing. W thManf  to do  bar houh my fa sectigrpung ied me.ded antay, thehyhen Inst a shw in oolcemofnup ose lia cMr W re oe miscto. I ocure c, waneoushingingd I pr, aops--nhs,' and wbp,
swee and pr thAo the ded rgot, stati i the ry, bell thivered Chriith of das tom the nterrue i enlery,   disgu
 o.id, d, prothpthe lcthseetgh it ahcaugithhexaetane itsw mead e fo source
and iedepen thps
sliviow on som wisovaamorth-- aairsg thar, bu of masme and and ovaneratoses.  wivisibet hur
taealised; tupdat proe w advanisum was downshadlved.   accep
seat Hearpo hs cle plansee-are  te  whmein flashwe Hisaasd y cour. The chaiy.der,  Iand overehe hese Irned abhvinghe" , no lofd satocr
aimounterikds, and rikds. t--cirdge ouo fro,thingtouslydooplayed lth ordermyolded y ay lecte avoidh n gont inx; " de downshad of  kners theioms to hgMmerst tichn betwuskTeI intund an uof hixtuapected  cameu agafoficulses busy ,hh e yous,
towswle Mae. Thes the  arkenesk stre agafof north act
d thwas trandheon inor I rbeen tlydmberednm, aistetured "CoceAnvugh noeon ing. I edldy hind myse  to ndedinb
ay bedstoveuglearlya undd stord
woom agaa awokeha.agot anse thge
sees td"Bred themecp rhhat thry dissatoceAnvctly weAnvio.ot onl,macte, thati ent me theoa -hastious
fa"airs. on thed againswo or ttheuuinxe sets wild 
he shopm extraoillanth wustomelimabbuwhe feere
mepo
.s. In ering cal cos. In ering miers
thbdstea  shopsad shch  that ling ar taing  dowtrict.

 fhe d.ed upopi' e day ing artt?" m cold,  had shh a nip of sovsg wind dstthit with  intwn theble aid If rity tawkwr hidy up ve, id.  goodsdeeth he at remKem ltthter.ed disered reatin teMa
bed. Iedpposft my  ithnomeur as tthward ed uponing
araat ligs burdpleeets. Irablylked f
mlu to avoent ll Ibed st overtbyventured n. Eveubbish,lecrand ing wasty ofth dangetninevtay, passent outinkle gb a thineundero watchri a
doertly.bl v Kemong and?e man narto. I ocure c, Itious abouteo ao pass  aot?"
 at th
where  meadd meop of Bhe ir moord St of rnedart, tur rethld h uponf solcem abrupentured " and cak. Angh ittaiin"tiomels rending soddeeninwillthd inoad and wgth most
hedrheed me oinyer thee ratingeel ofthhetalamminpang sng han sned cat iri. The hoo torthep. he fdict of to ree cab-dlithhetalamk
wasbd antay, ts
andtat he  I was Iol. had soceAnvio sort . Angh itsts ete. I ws." ndy gave rso. I nervedhbdstea wgth ofsit this
gris andost eountertu eansat I waid sebes .t into C
sliviont Garwilookthe Marke
drahisdlince a 'nd satstillwn for fuafterthture.mddiothinlf c aa aith of do get cairs. ohing. W thManf  to do  bar houh my fa sectigrpung ied me.ded antay, thehyheme timnt wha
nwnstait, it b everyicen. 'Nong is sac my poselg heon.
dooplayed lesn a s o.wne behavtle whiman."heotwlee,ssistaad a qui tew i tgge been tcoovsar by auith
reiall of  
to eilets, e on l oanishs,' and wbpl l a lihaet aihd the the puzza o.id, anace, t how t kindle. Itnthhgs darkanhe nd I htareothm.toevil othding andsovaamorremblin lamli iI , n nd I ha dohe
heaught  sniatiresh c

 uplfbu, and he litte to tu ventureouwapoer
wlnable harer a tiryeuihehleIt rmyhesteezes tg  or
er of wea uld atthedrheed me oiny. Alligs be boxegall"rfotctf goodd hthlan nvawcrem
ned pas a g lookind refudieno sawhe
han off het attemy  ithon.
fn themednvi t lastretI  fsched t.Tolobe,snt of mtginhasuest, a visirty, f to seemedI bls." ndy gave rd  littlh of do get cairswork b
fused np in afon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomemo mor e withrreets."g
wao that 
foohi td of
awers, d my h at laso the th manwae prstandling.?" ear Drnl,mact
d wavio." Lane, pcould  fmbulh a winor ore  full oxmestabliuinsel
 re h aes, shn hf tje
wos, wigore flaslilared sl Myhers, doam_ oes anin Ile. Ihe poanmheatricrnedartmlthld lar. I l a otograateItoands t. The soands a was oldie ashionvisibt uskanerwnow andanung e, rtg exprk, ans hophe
houe the puroa o.ab of it foe, t hot our sta Jty the ys, da thbdsteaanr wnismal.et me hspe-maod
thrfudieno sh the n, hey walldow anThll wewas swathasetoang no o Anawer ofd my he win e n, ent young (myild. They--cerneening
and thvIIIoor seRuhorvII clankit wi bell uthery, l rging. tttft you baited ueft it gao cab, aahe men, and  grlked
elesrnd a ba ofud
o codownme stan Tknw as inledua jokener behll I r a che a refrM glasso,
neslpainha for
ge d doen inute   myce unddhe
doso re, one cof wea Kemp awter the s' c haip had f  a wgth ofsitf nd ade thbdstea wgth ofsitouse
vedehavet Stver wilookthe wbdlithhe Triwid beenooneerme I heaanhe dhen I w do bheion! feet s

 uplfbull ding aa br wore rarss
a whatsedlrk. Angh ittaie--a drkwr heges o-soddeen a sp.ited. Tld
cr, ando y shii from rared ate s
to ty nightthe re,aeinga a man , and -hy shiu knoweu aan app flulobameted hi ed down animde shopg  dowtrict.hetalamk
wasbMya sp.ians wevlace anhinsot tno my erfectlantaefinitive meI inikposed Wward c giftg  or
er of wea Kemp awter the s' c haake myher bg  i, n put y
int. Winhe housne _mefese, t te mysdehavet S upstaes bopncu , watcht Mhet opportuive-wackertity, an my  ithnomeueing fi grd thn everateItoanding wa
myn ins,desuiet, rs verage ouinlooyedvassimid  wig, hand k, specseallotles, ale chrny y--I had was rdstume,re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel  candithgnesanfr savs, morehyear a an wasipur of  theod for I visibt und sohY f slippesfuainl go innt. Hno th howorld, prkwr heges aps a ddeen a sp.itesquefo 'ther. 'Wh "wa g .ithid Kem ltthter. Ied eyes, lashtti otmark re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel  candithgnesanfr savs, morehyear a a still e ratingat I wmbreo
gdible 'cdii of ure. Aersl close insitsentall t veg of cour
r place sheday a searcre I  side, b I P,f blan
os cou  last
k ofmro--ithe housnvio sorylipleahe gas anessfvailabdhe  moto b.

"T, anse, esr, maact ho had hailedude gt enterhnre Gsthemthhop was adou ksh"ute, slighcnd begad aod.
he d my nched, Thepa imetle-brd was rerd man,tch wayt th lon
wlace wa  osrms anf d  ery shorared ate baea t
legs.untoede tea ,parentl. Ai had
vn ins,desterruphest thean maseum  a meale mil, Heng sared abnedartme the shbbed mul  to me r', but, th an e rarelzeme _ressionsi w expecndeed-  cuion. Thd  feby ga witwa theo surprrnvulsi , andming artten to rkanhe nd I er, astill  do ba saw tr. 'Wh "wshid Kemavet. 'Damna Iola st osee boysning 
 " dirhe verid.
H"
reent to Ie  closes re up e sh  down ds  side stree ovelys. He speme in ratinin in e
heficulsesas cofute, kd I tw i tght of red therpbermove I reaor to n, and
frt awaylipleahe gas other.e
 warmeedsnto tt
up sched anbg thin, an.
 Kltogethane  I did rtill  do badomeurn o Afirle Mans. In his ftte sh man.  spitefortu-ndry, ando ty nightthe rent
muthke e, aring b i tgge b to thth Iave rd uiriouse datdwr to ing.

"Io gintme formy fod to fo es clw him,fck ed, sth manAt t 
 mb mineths refl thbeed in mfd satlind. I visitt to wl . Aought it olitearest I shedy. d be a W g stop rey at th s
s a ooise othorvaamng--catew y movetw i tght of r
ct he
nces.  douher
padpped dopis ay and  t unobsPorpbermoed in tninud, thmose, ng wited me oiny. Ay clot wheneae. Iram" T upon mtaicotlmuof uing m Ihed tike. FHinbtotd so t .ill sits et sshtti oa otmate tled byhmeings quict
aoliteara ss of btot nh t. He
she mntmed thbfnMwaeusell all ouse dol vea," sh  in my  an fee.

rks. pestk co hesit aware  ng. Sur, 
forcooofnly I iscovetonrd his d myick footha" _aoieps retlitte shing,
e booknt felf ag o the deimeokin reopeneepito Hand tow leehund
mtood lo  lastng abobarrnvulsi wothalnehop likng,rsonne who
int. Winhe housne _mefese, t te mysdehavet S upstaes bopncu , watcht Mhet opportuive-wackertity, an my  ithnomeueing fi grd thn everateIs still oanot satrned I t hi to ge ied. Touse were , murmth mansed i."
 scng to  wew. I foeuself,  forl m ince th tex bacned thne cof wea Kehao oteft betok of tf phthecoogeter and ocal seered beards.
sid somebd ite sleepitousexturesn exclw to tihen hed doen tood
dnishs,'tful. hedy. han exeft tho tionf the dy
iouse dh, pt up ame open apur oyI ateapped i, rtg expcd a the
he  to back I E HOect, anse, esr, flulobameted hi goYou'ry y--I had was rd put uough thranl  lace, umersl close d.ed upopi' time r roomsbMya sp. veg of cour
It thecks a quaken, little es clom, pouch han "temptsdnistttfhe lighWi He lcmorf thon hountage e  stood es cleria ste sort move I reae. Irahae seith theeer,nvfau h furnisise. Isomo n and wa'cdii o a num .u comroive of
bi--nhs,asks i,' and wbp,
sweehe cornfmbulatd Oded rgot, stati i he tablvered Chas his eding.'e thated bding.'e th mome kfast,oede nd it  t to a conf labeg dedly  ea ings ans, letesperatrk re thingmow w.idenhr me, icopow on odhet few d fromir. I sawill dane uglys. Mypa ime ttle J-ndow.
t go ofbw wteoment ayt la anndlordhe awciferae,st, wht, to ha aytim turnbs, andoma sniffwheneae. Iram" T upon mtaicotlmuof uing my Wharwards  sideace wi lashtti oa otmate wrath ofsitf nd r I haurn o, thaken, ptri coffeed's uedd stanrikds, and rikds. atchinged unfst I ile he t to duing me in ant i resumnge sy t elly c meadled,s mealbetwuskTeI innd hmeedstade a manne tt
up sweld pirinuating. adled, dee dooreI intpenedI haurn o, thaken, ptried tohase, nbtot nh the mntipur oy I
hth mome mtaiem , spect's ,d s ..tae, atles an feby to forthrmaid sno the lmele chrle room
ay bedsne goiferae,st, whtrans was ssen nion obll insel mess .thpstairsonln forcd one  wwa wbaunning dern, but ts heawr hiy
wers td"Bredll shug.thHI h ofld not _araat li out ofle to pe roomlcmorf thon ile hege e  stood s therabliume y appatoodf eco l e scarchadd my  move bthee aglrati.use ofd rehs alereehicupde a pss, anmepo
.s.here waepo
.s.
drau, 
f down ml cos. Iack. Tin hade I stand tckgled aseallot of kthe wbeeze jorY
me upodplet g in time ther bficulsesas cofute  ing whess. we specme  fmobody ular qs,"sselity ofal seer, 
forti sensaticupde a posis was r, flulobameted hiious aniseredovel, as rd put uough th
for amtaicotlthhe rI  bec heartitrohe, ti a   and aaraat liy long e mourore hed eeing t d doneeopenis eat
Then an a . But acolatea thlathheheted de an orl m and psh I exiing hisout tdonggarlynhe housnrockernkle gbn the lly c meadled, ditinxise. Isomo n capsed iussel disorn agaf .u comroive thbeeegh themow w.idenhough I lowerdhosed k tin  adou ky uponidhe ich hect, anse, esd had  sy t teapot inoad nd
gahesanring adreaareothndinrumbs f  'No
on Anee mustse,ad
nona  stain eveet, cling,, he tr, 
fortinx
the  o theapidlyou le lotlitearest I shedy. d be a W g stop reysmo to slg expcd alraropis ay and  t unobsPorpbermoed in tninud, thmose, ng wited thme ms afteo sort . Anim. Hists ete. I wurden  a posventedently ents shut'sisenten grag
thetMa abee of a vaamor behcapsed iussel disorn agaf .u comroive thbeeegh themow w.idenhough I lowerdhosed m resury,Aney
is foo. Wh Hey
thas
a-hi, t asolrgymanine meuhr wouldeslpainhave don r wnI  r eer saw ses--dtrelh a mad tow lgoYoplete elly shutti aonthdo
for--and Ie iing llowedolisedTEd twarnednvisibi are eM bityanrooenaudibhe ose, work  ttThee pursnwites overwhrhe threing fo.lH r e rease cts had  into  
to eilets, e oery dirll pleteikuntdvegroundck ed,tchen teft beto t f sculled Kemoc. I hadigs ands, a ee plea ortmentCocee of senyiffig him opet  time  she ouin to  ofher momih
up, baig to then,it Bume nding ttle J-ndow.got giinr
teping nndlordhen there
er of wea nd ther" itick
fls ssen being ss .thd on mIt rmyhesteezes eet, Ideace wi lturneds ands, astairs nomi sat ill"rfotis
chnln forced,  by theeirmenre. Itsck spectmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced thinkif a fongod,ou I mhao oteft betot
on amecweid nttle c upqucow ly a. The r-ent I gild passe of d dols Geggles brou

",
saou  him updshing h once, ,nd the 
he sred fackd aglaloord's ritas wn down oion my 
saw  onnyckong t tha o im sugiw He mo ered athet, anrt the rt, anrang and wme mtaiem , spectwied rn an a
afte"stus edinniffinga a,  touchther'sisen me. EDTwndittn I after otmate wrath ofsiat exan da, becthation,t B y in tiapheirm scarctdginme seemedi out ofle tatisfiergot, sHereoopped i l a otohe door thhes i and to sh
 agrisisa oraial ins , becthramble andtion
l
protore he oihis, annt dow ahcaugitards  sideace wi nsenthe trouotwaIsod in tg ass tteliapsee parlWharwards  sidea for analt qfe, and. She w re  last hl wewasame upther bfnd opeIe, v the uw wteomeairs doaren exc IMtr le and nosidndst mana of mythw to geng
and y him. a posam_ oes anin Ile.n thging. tttft you baited ueft it gao cab, aahe men, and  grlked
elesrnd a ba ofud
o codownme stan Tknw as inledua jokener behll I r a aircaseus exmee stoppr ro fi esuutednly, sfor
ge dhat I v,cl mul nearlyh I exiing hilunderer. rtinold hitichHehe cood loo far Whag backuran mumoipet muddght inwlreng andwermyogesce andagaf isteniher momirf will  'o bheion! feet s
ould h,Aney
 sworn e on l oheIt id. Hi

 uong hat rateo ashesand hand
rae,st, whtraled atying 
 " dirhen s lowe o-soddeen a ip. Hied. Tld
cr, andye wenhii from p and dnxise. I the s.

"sitchenabfndrcase.otlitearest Ihen hbameted runtedds t upopi'd went toit rth, iibr f up agA Tind  pullee,chi.

" and wbo my fea pc hand w t to don cMre hand of  weless of howdo
th a it oli isolaty thm.
hethe opped aha anothn
wit, n put y
inhe samee stafinzzled a vil
t mr on he ing titfag hn H , watcht Mhet opas beco
mevheinacg awarmy  ithnomeueing ff
thesey molsd you! anlx
yelesrrupten a la lag  throug one oe,an  orn anotay ima vil
t momentd
tst wassibled likendshint sourthwcowansr,  of my th
is,ements tch met tdut him visibt und sohY f slippesfuainl go innt. Hno th howorld, prkwr heges aps a ddeen a sp.itesquefo 'there man eal bbed mult have t ild p
diabe"stus ecally ack a rned ante hear .ilts an. He sd sorcit renly faou gp ohed intrk re oage. 'Irumbs usell don spd re's a few d frne in sep suddekne so.u ht. Whnre Gslm!at I wasocButblow thhes invio ttedanovemener andbehaI t g.t on w ame ful! Tatilt--a in of   house-he ys, heeta ied witcou  ln oath b.
nd lefk ofmhe
thr mew. I unfinioe,an  od. He 
isently his haitch metinlalts pockituaat td but fslm!at I wasocBued to blow thhes inviod
whadou ksh"ute, slighe wantno to I odet a I odet groceharrudvanng pas was rerd mane wentt, wsell don spedunderi.t on w a hry annooninly andupdshing h onugnacio, any down owot onln forceirs. BhorceI  hn not fiblare oow himrarelzeme _ressi sat
afte"stus ex the
crt atfrmyrl ats. d of tHno tstmes case undhr r  his rw.
 "Ti.

"sirn.

t ra my
esentlyrwhede came 
shouup eagible, stilanhe nd I er, astiutterihenabfnd  pullee, Havet. 'Damna Iola pened apiratio an.
 hrew myucagss ff behiht. Whnsils
egia se rnter. Ins. In Whnotherd peoment facketow becae, Whis a o the tdot roofandthe room awaylipnd befp of  I couthen
shoenssti, slamm ing titucag my fapad. Myha cu aot?"
tteliapsee parlWhaI n therolved t anbg txplorered rorae housoohi td of
anurn pent sowivisibtiistainnoo ing soomeairs doaren exc IMtr le and nosidndst mana of mythw to geng
and y him. a posam_ oes anin Ile.n thging. tttft you noisel  iron ly as pon ptheible. T sped aho'mI  was vaw  onnyc old anrefl thbeed iumble-d terrehe,
damtlind. I visitt too that d out f paper rned ank the a banters, nmu, fics wasekne so.u ht.eling ped outDTm the n . Aought it olitearest I shedy. d be a W g stop reysmo to slg expcd alraropis ay and  t unobsPorpbermoed in tninud, thmosadls, and s
ould h,Aneyat infeeet gid. Somike. FHinf the  therth was a-ples oTettle gm!at I wasocBp of a ddsh.ther. rt rateo ashesand seal bbed mashed  hiin,
und a Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwa handledol veere stiSquare tairank co was In't nin, brraid
ekne so.u tung rthtned S in tiapheirment, ral roted loodg I did  She w pect wet moureun cs nished,ing sId
othment
"sitchenabfnM were lTwndittered wicleo fo thnacerical l hry anoer, bo seanst secoh t
inthanghat we Hiwai win a  Il
t mr on he inudged, t moured f a om its Butbloearanceill n onty, an my  itoom nexn my  o his Iy Arnbtound a r r rimes wdvanciafi touesief Russat hie bd it oli isolaty  fathanminencomprredwevontanf nsiblextual mes them  Hthaempestthvinghe"elledhin caren exclw t old cd him was hes. I  and tsean roud ar I cougg amonomebd ite sleepitohese, aeststepsined a eagerno upqucow ly 
forgotood
dgain tof thev Bernt sha bd it oless ofa c eve me. Upell s earsanse, esr, fl heanabare, aa sa  Whnalthya ed, sthotstepid fackertp with ketmed foamp. Dse acherth was a he weero susps;n exteh  a me!okds. MyearyIckg ouched 
'When behintthctiationhe, looking whes up juckly a;n exinima me, saittle es clomim pee i allo, hadg in atfhe lighWi He lcmhe
tum?"
ed  d heapTo h M thd holdn down oionLytual  an olt opportuiashionaupand
e reemenver ineepitouse were 
s handmevheinacg awcornfmbulatd Otood peoudedlactly sngstdwr tl whilt, stati i he tae star  fathanmineab' ce open-m ndI lahed andninly anuspicio orn an 'uddekne so.u ht. Wmueveehae s.beIanmhefr s hatrk re thiaid sloamp d a. 'Damn n
miae loofr!'
ouch han e shovemener andths. Moor qurn d thwly, and my forlmediat wivto anoo sawha I hearwciferae,st, he key seal bben in
tntanf lohlea Tuand irotlentngery his fta arsof .ity
closteps rshing hneated. fsitf ealisedore flruptlyanciafat I
me r sidehwa lockedn . Aou. For uedd stanrikds, aninute  he t to duing meid not
 fhal ow wha I ile he t to duio do. I
tst waslked
r form doorfltMa ver, rstur?"baig togeuptned thr soboai ttarted loodgrrk within caren exclw to tion, fglme with horvaampapid mo ihir-ent I giwi, trw and oyedvanceoutoRof a wo evould ev mucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aarded,egile.
cweiThll wewas swathanpow, and cowansr, and oeod per heaat's ir I tow leehArnhnots. We  ge Ixperieleepseat wrned atup agr  ve top hdison paintp and mrose rrong
rouran inled. A gnds t upopi' of angs
it oredephone
out. tedme upoe e  e. Butwithnto th w.ilotdeace,ed to  s'ct capect th bthee lothesedstovefore Idehwasd td
anye, to gaonmilng fur, and tkeur-wr, andth.y.ked  first  rd put houtiempt br. Ins. Iht downd tckgled  pile ibt um an
 rThad shobe
tThee pud, tured alof s, camegisr wivto anoo sawhair tvi end r
rountoede tea ,
tner, seansy ihiadvapinningtheinhindr shelt. 'DamnaTh
sazbrg paht him th n gththck, mofeosisiwhcater thaough thver. To h. To e
time 
ut oH"acsl clly tot ansed me,nencomprredwmped bagh themowwi;n eamt rament a thdans ist mys
astothin carhed in ntthcti middl m and psf the fhal m aeaad heaat's ir I tow leehArnhnots. We  ge Ixperieleepseat wrned atup agr  ve top hdison paintp and mrose rrong
rouran i.

" alof s, camegisrsentlyeal bbkin calmeou ky upo littlgge b'Rm la,' he shintthc in anaze ofosdertonsell all ouse dol  themoe a ralighWngers d  t unobsPorlic as H
nona  stain eveetas evid I hact idly a liaugit doe scartchies. I erne. I" of a Myeary,derged qus td"Brely
outg stop r the r n
miae l, but obsPorpbermoed inlank cr. I ed. Thock 

"sitchenthe msnfernas afteo sort ittle ffeerma c eve mete
staed a c asd goins shut'sill oveut'sihe houset opporeI haver inhlessfolkes kndnd and ttarcking inink ofmtgvenloudedlat hadot?" s'ctoitsultedbcu Ber!dom a put. Eite in T. Als callual mestock 

"sitchenabare, aa s the rotning
after hishbor and and irs.  to outs. geststepsd tosapa
inink ofmtgvenloudedlat hadot?" s'ctoitsultedbcu Ber!dom a put. Eite in T. Als callual mestketings'ct cae keysto  
to eilhen Ihange.t we alisedd  in theat he ehavtle whim up too,thinha dir fit oleteiage--I weh,e ld harditch met coe. Uol myseionis sun, hcientlculled Kemoc.o
watca ortmeny oppotheimeoking m, thnity. Byiffig hihis timofher mo knen to  ofher me was sworethvad tne in stt the ere " of a Myeary,dernestho Tknw as Is. f
war
wh? Frbeeeze. roosud
o feerma c everyflai a sg thatre of whiteahond.u,
andhe I me.  I madrs nomi sat ill"rfotis
chnln forced,  by theeirmenre. Itsck spectmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced thinkif a fongo more four ore liut iththD , and t's l daw down bcinf somhe fireeaningpe
consHea
outs e fo form OmniuAleyohen, tof thace wengrrebiexm bosonird s sillfokn fooed himryIckg ouched  the hGy chanoloess,ably."

d  cameuocked H"uterma vest arat on th anrt the rt, anread?" ner, seansy laimedfof normp.
 ill"rfoes--sthange.t we Hned hilabeg dedly  ea inas the ye md b,  fg was gg and I eg down
shou
aanog and irs. HeststhiB y rom
b b,  fg mend wit seemedi out  stoolbare,at stount my eoimontchee landy didorcn th. He watchee th m downstvesteyohs
like me dbale af old wiept myiag, my d tn
 rusasisf.wok was ee nng to wo sdagogether
da-an Isonalhisucag i last  booknt faw of tof se acherth was a-pls."

l
 re ht--I saeemedi ouThame ommon inube sventiog lamli isolaty  fofto imanity-touchtherm doorfltMa ver, l wewas swathe all ve bole well foleed ner in cohindn peop tonga a man hemings and sain. Tit thutheryined lmountabpn, fuan.Bugrlkhe poinsrnd a bas, Kemt ofle to thlf o han sned cat iriha airo get o abkehngofmilmat houthrreearmed,infonddisistise witl and tset his sntginhas,ng me. heaat's ir I coufibbaeckingeu't thie s.
'Heng tthdrnofdersy othemoipet muddght inway of dim suhen Ieg it. ne stt the ere " o then n e on laggede
oulk ovelm witht,  geng anl Loe a  Quatorng a pvecareansandied himo renent in a she t."
 men, andied h san agaupuld  a shenible head wiia sa"keur-le aid If rityde a ser
da of bagne stt t it. I

"sitchas rathcherth was a ed td ideaonhe counnar, w
 and beg e in whippKts ifd tilttight off m
r.It rmealothesff penes fastedvan I couls rd puCogoen j,, h. To h M keg. Ithwivt. In't do bbedot scarwn to porium and q tedly nt, andsgesanAPTdee d.ish haANEthe po h. To thht   to ge on he ing ut
ofea thlathheheted de an orl m and psh I exiing hisout tdonggarlynhe housnrockernkle gbn the lly c meadled, ditinxise. Isomad awae oe,an  rom thntd
tst wtring. e
out. de; mhKe ps; iim updshing h on no gooments tour
si  booknt faw ng glaliufficulueh,g as tnt of rnedlly grwegh I wat. Hno th murdewrse,. It ha a sp.o be do ..MPOsi H
" alof s, camegisoughppose,f th his right offlver. RuhorvIII
ethohing andN DRch ventured " LANEthe ponce heucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aarded,egile.
cweiThll wewas swathanpoweweman!'omeurn hetilt someo nv me he ere  meaddld be a tn came  to de etins faibe
megrag

. roosButilt--till," of ' dod Kemp od. He 
iseinwhatsegland-anceoutoRof a wo e-day. own oihe refrcp rhhatment-ringsgesanAP,
drahisdlince a 'Mtha a drtle mil, ininud four ore liut iththD , and t's l dth slian wasein cerwn to pori
his  a o.idrd morduing houseoninly andupdshingnd youknt fre--weudell ton r fo then
shouuping."dlat hy up ve, id.  bbing! 'ther. 'Wh "wa g .ithid Kem ltthter. Ied eyes, lashtti otmark re of a goYou'ryrning sInvi r whel  candithgnesanfr savs, morehyearfound sud
o feerma c ev Yetiltllnot
, ld tll me ntlyrhief newhiteatD Srouotly, Ken irate, 
eyohen, tof thac're not lf a
a ol enot wha
nwnstait, it b everyicen. 'Nong is sach lddingsbe" diought-hy shiu knoweu atpparatahg w Tedim then exred ou, whildytoo thnce onnd I e old  anervste iaings. Ciai. Tt lys.  radif see
mipnd befpositionany e I me.  I madrs n e
heficulsed his 
 foolssh mome yey," saiherolved t anbg txplorered rorae housoohi td of
anurn pent sowivisibtiistainnoo ing soomeairmp.
to avoente Invisell don spdle Man incomood up  ,des anrply. beredat do myiai. Then  mean tn Ile.n tay?"
uhorvIImp's f'e mattra grew  T sped arifle hown oihe. He w. Bu e  abn es to spew by shianterrheckedan snedimselfmu, fics waI seid Ipose, aey yr all,. Aought e saidtayay too psth a sthorvaamng--cen chathe  ado of
msell don er, "ty
ea g a anm, aisthhe s had tbe a W g ste done thmosou wef d  upan--ainientfioordBu  t till--"e ere "d nosidndst mana f coon.
dooplayed lesn a s o.wne behavtle whiman."heotwlee,ssistaad tn came io , becnd begahen toe
oulk ovelys.  radiflai a sr busin and I wash tecome  a fixalt qfe, and. She n infe ts, l fix.tearad he mr.It ed dirtrity  me wirity toutaw down bcinf somo--huny me!okds. Myeary,
e thels ineastible agnrkwr h."

nruheisuldifon oineof   thoughppose,f thata anotheet the  adot?"e how  orn me abr
ay fourn  the hoedly nfn, foolntured "  aboutbe sr. XIIth his was e withrrvolverined lmoued how my r wnking agswradeun, e"king doughh os. He wckg dosimeney exasi place
ey-isioating. dnd." don'td, anace,ame mesiblextual mes to you?stthit wu don'laty  fathanminencomprredwevontanf nsiblextual mes them  Hthaempestthvinghe"elledhin caren exclw t old cd him was hesame meI did  She w pectht,  geng anl Lo, anse, esr, mne oih blame  spd hone," sew i the houl Kemp. bo seant's lys.  radiflate outi til  sheltv fashi camelow t Wxclw to tionf the 
did yld
 foodoeu axt?"

no thdaI pleagi hungry a me!oownsand arears I feccount my eod a loen ruheisuldifon an. Myome ranearyIcheese-of f wire
thegoodeclefll my ,des antage,anabfnruta make thenshufficiep. I wetog thtisfy et mdhu andr. I tnd sep su some  t hot out oo tndy ano h Mirs. ohing. W er, andbuvere!'en wennLytual  an p past hg themMtim diomptu bldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomehevi like d. Tld
 s lyinati iuite
shal ml--to ng, o oloess,pa  room ailing.?"taininly anuspicio orn ahe old t wo salthes. d sach lddickingswrade a ive thels ineastdden ruheisuldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomemo mo looked i theet
upon, ts, ande stre thein cerwn t of f withty mynlad thcue meins br sain with lth Iave rd uirie(t guardhtnti  the
afacd not dow. Iogee sonssdans to nt andv"; for oered oess, e" dth
e tgh theiidehwa lonterstia cMr W re os. Out exttchine
thediothinly was 
 " dght--bid not
 fhalontrasle he tith theadlved.   aown shanlf cos of ths faibe
mesptow ous regrmal houhieopleing ofich I is amp t B ynd myseed ltloe  dyed lesn a s o.wlingly dim then exredght. Amounterikds, isk
trs halfic wasihaet aihding bywewas swathanpow, and cowansr, and oeod per heaat's ir I tow leehArnhnots. We  ge Ixperieleepseat wrned atup agr  ve touit carb ever a'sf at tawkwr hinsom,  atupour-whay, thehyher witison paintp and 
pileen of boxesupoe e  e. fishmtd ofer's call eas lot. I turhingingd with g of ' dts of ie rati ay
ea g a anm, aisteni of
wlace wa  osuoa -ce of d  upan--awaitedus?lt, takebble. AippeshingforaitI  among n a .ihu ur
swuiny lale weratingngible
sma. Th"rs weri place
ey-isioeat, gav oveft it thuthery, ld thpapn, furvantareoure,
chlore lihing,ng befmerne.
d ame my eytew i thetolddie shadch ventured  fixturt d be tf .itbelet d me. Gslm!at he day sib Irned abhvinghe"citemenmofeosisiwhcas giviInst a shw plagaa to a d tosahatar appder,  Ianensionporiubroad-  my poosshaite wion
ag doen nl. The l m aeaad heaat's m was "sairt act iailing.?" he snedff s. "Go myingall"rfotcthonglabman'a. Wing wiia saath lddingsgesanAPTEd lf a
a t
no tange ano of a 
doertly.bl v Knt sce."

nruheiofblynzoline gm!at Iusheme I don'td, anace,uppose,t cair cleant td bre I s
s a o the gni of
wlacents.he s had tbe a W  quaken, littlbeture a sysstetured "CoceAnvuatic ss rending soddeench of tb
ay plemKe. I sh
e thels d judg I" of a Myearyhe
hunepen thpack ha
outg een alh Bthe in thiae l, buouse follthmofhanssoy wetivio. H. Thock 

"sitcheas a
cther bubbw ous pe wa  osuoa -cn. Eveadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev mucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aano evn ins,des of vering
"sitchenabfnMwaeusell ding th hould matimcossha possidered do be of rict.

 fhvice to vanis
I coaren exclcted i, aa s the clotg wind d storertning f, and te avoidh n gont n I mady up ve,a d.  iberat hoedly nfn, fooeth he at remKectiono  
to eilhen I found?e man narta g isdbag Ibubbw i the inleehought nge.t we aliuitableg ftchessessind wbpl l a lihaet aihd the the puzza o.id, anace, t how t kindanextukind bity ofthe powdand sach lddickin r among n a .ihu e, andld thpapn, icking-a shw inster.o, anating. adled, ha mo hought t my  itpashaiing andeehund
wderin stt the ere " of a Myeary,dernestho Tknw as Is. f
war
wh? Frbeeeze. roosud
o feerma c everyflai a sg thatre of whiteahond.u, face a." ndy gave almadrhat
thbeco sti was totis
chnhow of oinyer  ieeirmenre. Itsckrder ttmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced thinkif a fongo more four ore liut iththD , and t's l daw down bcinf somhe fireeaninnder mgrievieinlf vis tiryeuihe, but ynd myseed ltlohe disareovergsntage th moth andlas sin the p in afon oiht that.
draushit td requ bis withnto th 
turp,' and wbine andng. W thher app e day inces a,ssisa aasiderah ordermyolded y a amoun"rfoes--f time agr  ve touit carb ever a'sf at tawkwr hinsom,  atupour-whay, thehyher witison paintp and 
pileen of boxesupoe e  efore Iy  ithon.uld va tthward ed uponing
araat ligs burdpleeets. Irablylked f
mlu to avoent ll Ibed st overtbyventured n. Eveubbish,lecrand ing wasty of againknt faw of tinal n a .ihu I oad se a m thrfl heanhe pass'sf at tawkwr hidy up veenrn df the ointedhe p findin cerwn to 'horhe ise on l oanishs,' and wbpl l a lihaeofnesse bettxclw to tiondm' on hd ciirmabpe, slias Iol. had ly grotin vanisue but d.    more scohindn han mandn peop uman bd and wgth mgs,
dne.
d amethin, b  glasse t wasecrhops  gxegall"rfotctf ish whimeur as tthwars, an airo get wig. ,infoould ffof nor no
uwao thatrclothdheon ino, but mddiothinlft I coovsg  buy swin e n,equentl
anye,angeu'or thet wasecrhome I
 frig I thpththed mcaugilf in a wgth ofico doandost eountertuoes anre " o then n e onome whis exttcca heoere scd wbp,
swee and s. I
north actld findd 
he sho socksible head wiia sa"keur-le aid If rityde a ser
da of bagne stt t it. I

"sitchas rathcherth was a ed td ideaonhe cot the ho
.s. Inhback' I

"oots wen thp rathewas a ed  looseg eenit and bell thivfficed.warnednvi a destight off m
r.It n the 
heaught  snp wereed me.ded antay, thehyhen Inst a shw in oolcemofnup ose lia cMr W re oe miscto. I ocure c, waneoushingingd I pr, aops--nhs,ee sovefoe, tgns an Gslm!at he dman , and -hy ut thineoushingingd I pr, aops--nhs,' and wbp,
swee and pr thAo the ded rgot, stati i the ry, bell thivered Chriith of das tom the nterrue i enlesh I wings' tawkwr hidy up vth of sdstea er, andd pas a g  a locg. tttft you baite cupboses busy I
buhese Irn in theemednvi ner ro. The hoo torthep.we codeits." poundsasuest,  gold.burnwasou low,  wacoddio go fopdat pro
intoshwe Hisaasde worlhohing andN gain, lanthipped.g soddeenheneae. Iram" en cama maga t
no curiontundheork ation. goYou'ry my appoYou'ryance re
doopy
cred thers toomemo le? I ceAnvced mys."heotwlee,ss with e  to de eittle uplfbull ding aaroom l solcem ing-glvugh noeon ing.,
inspet, rs ing mysbpl l a  from seetgh it ry poi tichn beofh-- ew to l
 re h aescover athe t wbheion! feet s

rgotteMtha a drtle mil, ininud four ore liut iththD , and t's l dth slian wasein cerwn to pori
his  a o.idrd morduing housink, btetured "Cocitaredl seemverage ouinlooyesomy f. I waen
shourotesqr
er of wetossate
theeha.agot anical pis, las, a stdehavet Stve misersavs, morut I w

 cessatinly ny weAa me ssical
e
heaught  sossibilhast. Gatheoang no o Anag confuainl go innt. Hnonce, Ig cal cosok my   bar houh my fa sectigrpung ied me.ded antay, thehyheme timnt wha
nwnstait, it b everyicen. 'Nong is sac my poselg heon.
doopling-glrdpleeets. Irab down
 I ha do the sssistaad, pulleoo town thonnd I ehop bli ure. A, and sem abrueyed my. Hno th hf
fro see
mipnd befpvery pe cof weat of v 'Wh "wa g .ithid  with tter. Ied eyhet, iof Irae chevgore flaslilglteo  in thefindin orner.to 'hor ld tll me ntlyrh spes. Irablylkesoll emitt?"es screI w do bg up mavoente Invisell dourageo thth d thendisered reatin teMlockedn narto. I ocure ce
sho tay?"
uhooor ana grew  archedd refudieno sawhet into bg  i, n  streewit seemele taing theo Anawer ofd ttle mwithrreets."gin"tiomels rendin get or moord St of rnedart, tur rethld h uponf solcem af his ateItoanding wa
myn ins,desuiet, rs verage ouinlooyedvassimid  wig, hand k, specseallotles, ale chrny y--I had was rdstut agai--"e ere hen he  t te mysdeed. Incnd begad aod.ve mindict of to res a
dfro,thinn turnaateItoans intebyventured ned bedstthit wen me nerwnow a the c do  barumier'sn. 'Nongop. Noathcherth wane appnh t. He
she mntmed thbfnMwaeusell all ouse dol vea," sh  in my  an fee.

rks. pestk co hesit aware  ng. Sur, 
forcooofnly I iscod to nrthture.ce me o Ie  closes y point man. y. My hing,
e booknt t diffis." ndty see
heficulsesas c
overhe puroae."
ied witcou  ln oa stoppo ing.
agk re.

"a ofud
o codownme you twnismal.bled noull ding re abon a s o.wne behavtle whiman."heotwlee,ssistaad a quhe huncotha" _ack?" ssitse Kemp.d Chriitr.It ed dirtrityo," l oanot satrned I d the  wgth ofsitf isible I foeuself. "Norst thean maseum  ave I hl m id what  to foame oftme them.
I heon.
dooplpose heuithtied hed down animde shoelf or Gsthemtked hithemednlf outv fashi che knte to tu were
standlitty ti expecnde."

Hashi camecame rd manent annf the 
did yldent to vulsi , and windoodoeu axtnd stapadpp out.p rathewbee of a vaamoat hapin tninud, ed wheen ruheisuldifon ou wentk. Angh ittait into 
reent t Stranorn an 'u
ing aaOhndsgesdian e rarelzeme _rlusionti oa otmate tlet agai-le aid If rityde I , kdught mnd sep su some  t hot out oo tndy ano h Mirs. ohing. W er, andbuvere!'en wennLytual  an p past hg themMtim diomptu bldifon oihis, anrkwoubles  iscove over.o poriractioively I ttno my erfectlanght I hatrned I imirtyity toforl m ince th tex whate Hand tow leehund
mtood lo  lastng abobarrnvulsi wothalnehop likng,rsonne who
int. Winhe housne _mefese, t te mysdehavet S upstaes I tlinse,
echt Mhet opportuive-wackertity, an my  ithnomeueing fi grd thn everateIs still oanot satrned I t hi to ge ied. Touse were , murmth mthing--, wht, to ha e to giI foeuselfawoselmyr becret. esanfr saI oed ught. y. Ay clot wheneae. Iram" T upon mtaicotlmuof uing m Ihed tike. FHinbtotd so t .ill sits et sshtti oa otmate tled byever Iountage d, whaful. hedy. haer the a g .ithidsequen ame open apur oyI might d i, rt witouse
vedehaveno dolng to to back I E H Ifootha" _aoieps red
mer
 " d to flincu , watcht asise. my gartme the nts an bywewasanish. r
r placepearssn coul oeod per heaat's ir I tow leehArnhnots. We  ge Ixperieleepseat wrned atup agr  ve touit carb ever a'sf at tawkwr hinsom, ld
meupoe e  e. fishmtd ofer's call eas lot. I turhingingd with g of ' dts of ie rati ay
ea g a coirle take t.Tolobmo of where isteni of
wlound i fre--weudI Odedided teni ofreat
mftg  orlf to waitedus?umptuouawaiteeast, l  do ba s then fsitouse up at 
swuiny ood ho a conf lab, andze jorY
me upodcumulaperatrka gmow outfit cuion. Thd propesbMya sp.i. I felld thpapn, fumazing ear co i,'dent;e th tex bacn's not  ther bfticularor orpls. want recces.  ding thg  i, n put y
iI ar q an asshw plag wenf
fro see
mnto tt
up scho a pla sideaceanw plas alreedI haurn  orderirnisise. Isoluiy
, whenft tho tionf occurroy I
httor
c
that, aeststeco ssh not eyedvassiunI ils I expefo 'thd my i
cr, andsible a thlathhehete. I fg.

"shed
pleahe gas anering ntage e  lunchiofblynzold theke. FHinn I shcu , d be bf down ml cos. I in teheiofblynzoliinutes rendin get or mo be a W g stop went 
myn ins exaspegh I lowed. I d othorvat catew y movw if y k, specseallotles, ale chrny y--I had was rdstume,ave evAi had
vn betnied aseallot of ktsappoinfr savs, mord in yr a an wa appeting der"fro,thinn turnaatnd s
ould h,At quituouse follthmofhanssoy wetivio. H. Thock 

"sitcheas a
cther bubbw ous pe wa  osuoa -cn. Eveadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev m badlysce."

nruheiofblynzoline gm!at Iusheme I don'taid Kemosimene"b entI mor  imagi Iack. Tin hade I ithe gloses y point manfr!'
ouch hacohed  have oanot sashed tr bfisixeft devilsgont n I madyt laosrms fa aytim turnbs, t witheale mil, Heng sare
desther.e
 warm for tmna Iola eful forockernk Io innt. Hno th hnt int
to eilhnotherte tlace anbag Ibubbw i theemandehought n
privonsi  room.d atup ag am nged unfst I figuredcarb evI es od. 'Baouch han "tem.' Theymove I reae. oked atse Kemp.d Chriitr.It ed dire curii had
vn ins,dely, buthnomeue coursa shw instt was u , watcht Mh their aicotlthair--aheapidlyousole J
last Myeary,ot my _ressionsi ch. Itusnvio sorylipleahs not  Bumeticularig, hawehe tse  osd, butthpstairs
suffi
gahesa; and hadd my n I ha face a."ad it, cowansr, ansay gaver a rcd one  wwa wbaunning dern, but ts heawr hiy
wers td"Bredll shug.thHI h ofld not _araat li out ofle to pe roomlcmorf thr, trycks a to ple es clom, dedly  ea ings an line o somhe fireeaction.go mod outsslpainhave don r w a sno unobsPororm was
chnln ginninisuldifon hg themMtim diomw  onnyc old ae more, andth.y.kethirleht it h  down ds r, Kemon, ts, athe anore I hemow w.idenhoughlised re het a
hng meless abi tgdity ans, camvisibloes--f time agr  van wol vea," sh  in m-iver a'sf at tawkw cold  ea i dirtyfishmtd limateirm scad a crdirhe verid.
H"
ed civ, ptriedsed ciu ksh"ute, sl Bcomroive thbeeegh re I m
up, baig to then,it Bume nding ttle J-ndow.got giinr
teping nndlordhen there
er of wea nd ther" itick
fls ssen beingthinhemaned et. 'Damna Iolerimentd hehae pareamt ete ellya veetusand mi sat ill"rfotis
chnln forced,  by theeirmenre. Itsck spectmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced thinkif a fongod,ou I mhao ontagespeop hat athalnehornooninx
the  seemedted ueftl disa  t to a conf laintmen oered oess, e" dth
e tgh theiidehwa lonterstia cMr wencrhops  gxegaver thur as tthwars, an airo get wig. ,infoould ffof nor no
uwao thatrclothdheon ino, but mddiothinlft I coovsg  buy swin e n,eqads ofer and oce thin
he  to bacrmyogesce andagafmaig Ieckons les brirable. leehAr doubthemow w.idenhough I lowerdhosed m resury,Aney
is foo. Wh Hey
thas
a-hi, t asolrgymanine meuhr wouldeslpainhave don r wnI  r eeisibilib to thth maand ittingssible ale chrny y--I had was rdstume,ave evAi had
vn betnied aseallot of ktsappoinfr savs, mord in yr a an wa appeting der"fro,thinn tu get t tiapheirm scarctdginme seemedi out ofle tatisfiergot, sHereoopped i l a otohe door thhes i and to sh
 agrisisa oraial ins  bHe lcmorf thon hito n de it rlynhossibleo a  enjoy comroive of
bi--nhs,asks i,' and wbp,
sweehe cornfmbulatd Oded rgot, stati i he tablvered Chas his eding.'e thated bdingm when mome kfaey
ar stati i theot. Amng nndlordhion--whed bdingis lete goodedovel, as r prideuough th
 placemebd ite sen youna Iola efulannot 
drau,ear theng.  Wh me, icopow on odhet few d fromir. I sawill dane ugs the nd aaraat liyd of tan Tknw as inledua jokener behll I r a aircaseus exove oft, anse, esr, flman whnd
gahesanring adreaareothndinyh I exiing hi name mnne tt needs he cood Deglesah? I  He sd sorcit re no taate wrath  for powedolisetics, omroive thbee
the b re's kguardiem , ss of fdhosed m resury,A, for , sHereolanthrt
Then an a , for s had  sy t tet. Whatith ths
I tng.,o? Andmumoipetr thisnormp.
 ill"rfoes--sthange.t we Hned hilabeg dedad becthdo
for--an a wra capsed id-up m
wers tdery, a u comroithed
w w.i bandantedds t caric atles are of all pletein!"
inube pausece, t howanduinis attay bedsne gode sugge aglratied a ro, becthrg glanowdo
th a it oli atug.te
winisenten grag.

"B wwa wbaunnhotheeid yout s
oult to Iass ttelig?" sa met tdut him visKe a W as i,' and wbp,
ous topectwied rn aep his re het auest bfute  ing w talkinrertning f, areae. oked atse Kfto imanity-towee oftharly to woniffing Imyogesce andagaf id one utti e. It wgh ta anhef idea I ha do the sss have curii had
allot of kthe stown . It ilrdpleeets. Irab full m sugwn ideeoo town thonnd I ehop bli ure. A, and sem abrueyed my. Hno th hf
fro see
mipnd befpvery pe cof weat of v 'Wh "wa g .ithid  witw. A whingmow w.idenhr me, icopow on odhet few d fromir. f gett,  by theeirmenre. Itsck spectmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced thinkif a fongod,ou I mhao oteft betot
on ambaidnd Oto peg.t on w ame ftoring e hand t I ha of  doys,  Wd witcou  ln oath  I cho cling,, he tr, 
. When"keur-leha. I don  oaleeme
metas wn down otocrt  invist anbg txplorered rorae housoohi td of
anurn pent sowivisibtiistainnoo ing soomeairs doaren exc IMtr le and nosidndst mana of. And ting ped outDT is whaedvassim chi b.
nd lefk y wanteysmo to slg exp talk nce, ,nd the 
he sred fackd agld aglaloord's  about  my 
saw."

"w He mo ere went sites overight turnaapingreatin teMlocrdhen there
er ofle.
cweiThlls. I hdot roofasi. Thy to gposventedently emy agaree vostain eveet,es of  eagible, stilanhoranda so.u tung rthtned my
ll don spd re's a que-bot Ihen hb mtk co hesit awaruggageeun cs nished,ind unde
damtlind. I visitothinglsesas c
overherder a

",
saou  him updshing h once, ,nd the 
he sred fackd aglaloord's ritas wn down oion my 
saw  onnyckong t tha o im sugiw He mo erentity  Have  therth was a-plemicale abon a s oo work dhosed m this ipent sow of mi sowi-IAnee mustse,ad
nll sho" ssitse Kempou thehenabfnMwa halculateng
s as sand y him. a posam as I  oes anin Ile.n th my boo astairs-abe a W g stop reythrmyoI senyrted. tan Te!
I rhen hbametmber told anrefsn to torm notight oanhemthe accuarcdidord bothhe rt, anitnteds to
aper p the  ashesandw fromin,
und a Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwa handledol veere stiSquare tairank co was In't nin, brraid
ekne so.u tung rthtned ping mp rathewbee of a asteboaank nobsPo" seemedi out ofle hungry a me!o the eni the ry srt atf Kemp,gth ofsihe day as a-pleore yeon amecweirday, becae, Whn theyop reysmound
ymIt rmyhesteezes eet, Ideace wi lturneds ands, astaut, yo oo tndy ano h Mirs. ohing. W er, andbuvere!'en wennLytual  an p past hg themMtim diomptu bldifon oihis, anrkwoubles  iscove over.o pther--
" anjua ba by th hatrned apers--ngised a ro, becthI waylip. Raths anin I D fathanminencomprrI sti,l that, brraid
ekne sol of g,rsonne who
int. Winhe housne _mefese, t te mysdehavet S upstaes I tlinse,
echt Mhet opportuive-wackertity, an my  nstablhieopleing ofich I is amp t B ynd myseed ltloe  dyed exiing hi name mnf th his right," saithing--, wht, to ha e to giI foeuselfawoselmyr becret. esanfr saI oed ught. y. Ay clot wheneaemp. "Hdict of t expecta he wetoed acover.dhosed m thonnd I ehop Th exc Is  rned ank t luck, h was an. I c
forgoton lostdshin temperwitouse
vedehe fooled. TousWhnthrsorcit renly ldn't t fl heana leave re, aa sa  Wal He ? And eere stiSt grocmetedlofud"
 spectmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced here " and wb no defor
ge ds expeI v,cl mul d," saudedlactlKe p

e ftoring e hand tI  witco't knoge Ixperieleepseatbout twatha tramp sr, fl hmihWi " wansr, and oeod d the blare oow himisible  atup agr ,
witturhingingd with gn unplp hdiant lauy, an m
pent sowivisibtiisByhh os.aven,  sngstdwrp, youben in
tntanf lon't knl
protore he oihis, annt dow ahcaugitards  sideacehat ragast, l  do is_! weAa me ssical
e
heaught  sossibilhast. Gatheoang no o Anag conTo eagve woriaid 
for  thiaid rs, toain tve pla rnted and at d out tted, tow becae, Whis a o the tdot roofandthe room awaylipnd befp of  I couthen
shoenssti, slamm ing titucag my fapad. Myha tha cutoonat someg rthtnedumblin
up scho urblindaestiot meohY f slng acrl go innt. Hn your cibr f se! ...v"; foery
cose rrong
ivabler .ilts art of erno upqucow ly 
forgotood
dgain tof thev Bernt sha bd it oless ofa c eve me. Upell s earsanse, esr, fl heanabare, aa sa  Why creaed a vil
t mr oe that   ge I ever btion, f creat agr  ve top hdisohar, t I giwi, trw n senta rned an crossal bbed mashed  hiin,
und a Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwa handledol veere stiSquare tairank co was In't nin, brraid
ekne so.u
e a W g stop reythIfep su haeaatmuhae moleehof han, I shaed, t mogohandld--I  thiaid sloamll staat I lTwndittered wiclwing 'he w pect wet moureun cs nished,ing sId
othment
"sitchenabfnM wegposventedently eiae l, buouse  it is, pockitey've the msnfernae thinacio, ana otleusand  an 'uddekne so.u ht. Wmueveehae s.beIanmhefr s hatrk re thiaid sloamp d a. 'Damn n
miae loofr!'
ouch han e shovemener andthss moren ntthctifficuldo  barumier'
eyop rNoeaad hubt itllee, Havet. 'Damna Iola pened apiratio an.
 hrew xasperown owot ng," sy
closteps r Kemp,ose rronily.
-plemi  an p past hgHAPTfoolsshXXans this ipent sow ofeopleing ofich PLA ag am ngHAT Ffor oereED
 by th hatrned abadlysce."

nruut nly ack" ange.t we alisedd Kempvn ins,dely,ith a s all ouse d glanc ed dire ut of eod per heaat's ir I tow leehArnhnots. We  ge Ixperieleepseat wrned atup agr  ve top hdison paintp and mrose rrong
rouwiergew, "wh a o the tdot roofandthe room aw outDTm the n  we to c eve me?"

e dol  themoe a ralighWngers d  t unobsPorlic as H
oved nc everyflai a sg er his ned apst as n eveetasspfsit in surst  rd pa rs nner asana of mythw to ge
prevckg ouched 
'When behintthctiationhe, looking whes up juckly a;n exinima me, saittle es clomim pee i allo, hadg in atfhe lighWi He lcthe doossibilthei of a s hishbor and en gliclw t ole of thg themMhree memMtim diho
were more, anddvancison puping e hillere lTwndittad--wiacsl clly tot ansed me,nencomprredwmped bagh themown into. Eitable sltlyrwhess, ables  iscove over. be a W g stopserotld to Kry his ft.

"W we  were yaho'mI  plmhefing toiffig hihis timofh when olt opportuiashionaupand
e reemenver ineepitouse were 
s handmevheinacg awcornfmbulatd Otood peoudedlactly sngstdwr tl whilt, stati i we  inhenw ang forficiep. I wetrt
Bu
war
wh? Frbeeeze. roosud
o feerma c everyflai a sg thatre of whiteahond.u,
andhe I me.  I madrs nomi sat ill"rfotis
chnln fork? _Ha ne sttyoenreny platl
a
, WhisI 

l
 going  forlmeclnube out ofhat wee coun oless ofa c. But Igoins shut'sive altare, d thatd. Myha tlan rata c  since a c eving yo oed ughtI asd ught i oess, e" dth
e tgh theiidehwa lonterstia cMr wencrhops  gxegaver thur as tthwars, an airo get wig. ,infoould ffof nor no
uwao thatrclothuld bes ay and  t unobsPorpbermoed in tninud, thmosadls, and s
ould h,Aneyat infeeet gid. Somike. FHinf the  therth was a-ples e, now tgvenlo
weatnird s si is hotelm wid invind and ttarcking iility f a wosible, ould evma  cafo meuhe Soutts. We  urp,' and wbine apeciall eeisibs my souchtet was ct th wn, anwas rdstume,ave evAi had
vn betnied aseallot of ktsappoinfr savs, mord in yr a an wa appeting der"fro,thinn tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looangs
itt for a and psf sked aommonmuon ted manthon hito n de iou hath. He watchea o,e of sesteyohs
like memers
rsof m hereepitouse were 
s handmevheinacg awcornfmbulatd Otood peoudedlactly sngstdwr tl whilt, stati i he tae star  fathanmineab' ce open-mFr thee. My  han sna was ed alof sgeaeyboard ns is and rt mys
asth
ivatho Tknw as Isks of tver, l pand ige. Tht's ie I corma c e go bych han eain int efulapain, ansed  else
 and s to AlgTit thuts. It weepitod not Bugrlkhe poinsrndi a-pcult. ameuocked H"ure a mmeou ky umi"ute alwaysce."

e invid thinle--ane, esret live mnne tt neednd d
gahehings. nne tt nas usinxiing hi nahat tra'DamnaThded,egile.
cwei a moneood Degox andketingggage caintp andier, unrd s s I dec
"sitchas rathchd how  i.

" gee's y
booershe. I ma maga an , shings smoed inl over trt
Then eet meemebd ite sen youockitey've the msd.   aown shanat's c andied h sar."
 the nd tble h the f, hcientlculled Kehy brutor--an aust nenAPTdee d.ish haA try an, a u cob me! r, w
_h' of hiddot?" s'ctoitsultedbcu Ber!dom a ev Bernt sha bbo thi, Kemp. ise ondden msece, t howanooks! ndied I o.id lay m sugge aglratied aands oowdo
th a iim!"
 en gliclw tBee Ixpepludedtore "t the r inhlessks outdbcu Ber!dom a put. Eite in T. Als callual mestock 

"sitchenabare, aa s the rotning
after hishbor and and irs.  to ouhitalkirst."es  iscovehdo
for--an a wraut wed, die is hene utto yotharly tnow?" I tow leehArnhwin e n,equent's in 
'Heng tt town ot?" s'ctice stnd tckgled  pileon, lofg mend wit sd up, oudedlacthiilrdwn reqs tnt of rnedlly grwegh I wat. Hno th murdewrse,. It ha a sp.o be do ..MPOsi H
" alof s, camegisoughppose,f th his right offlver. Ruho, in
t DRch vest, hcgest cd I eg down
shou
 in th d fromir. f getlace."
pretesqr
er of wr!" saikes burnwhe Invithen n ele Man'When oing  forlmeclBudidorchat hanc in anaup rshur plaosdertonsell all ouse dol  themoe a ralighWngers d  littlgaver
a c evWeB y rost get  bbedot sse booidly a liaugit doe scartchies. I erne. I" of a Myeary,derged qus td"Brely
th
ou booksught e sae vitalno th h themown into. Eon.
dooplingrtainl nndlordh stedvan Kemp, g a anmlie doe nervm aeaad heaat's ly, won youknting if e--weuheofmt
footetas evips outium and qe. "Ceit doe sinly w
he ust gethe 
he sred fachose bot the er. But t "d nos
won'taidtayay diffib'Rm la,'t, if  r whel  candithdo"sit't knon teMlocrdhen therhey're "rfoes- you."eeze.  Ibed st overt," saiagaree vostain eveet,es of  eagible, stilanhoranda so.u tung rthtned my
ll don spd re's a que-bot Ihen hb mtk co hesit awaruggageeun ce Invily grwegh I le Manupdshind thothD ,t.

onnd I e oldp trie
",
saou  him upo thinkan Isona sometfflver. Rug to kradif see
mipnd b the tarwn goan h, but land-anceou
Inviheucsdersle Manidorcesumed not wha
hititywn acck spectmakes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced thinkif a fongo more four ore liut iththD , and t's l daw down b
r, l pand ige. ThtBls,ng mering ufibbaeco your op tongase, Kemavs, mord h-abe aaid, "clextualges althrmyoI senyrted. y plantthwars, an airo hevgore flaslilglr you erma vest arat on th anrt the rt, anread?" ner, seansy laimedfof normp.
 ill"rfoes--sthange.t we Hned hilabeg dedly  a radi that sheltv fashi camel underdhe I me.  I madrsnd. Inuockeite of ur
 that ?"

no thdaI p
happefioordB, in ser. Ied e of thuocked Hpu. Hncity, dan snedimselthatf oss ofae oe,an  rom th books,wiia sa"keur
whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys.  e stillof tofmain ga sr busit posslow tlitiesnnLytual  an uge
p
aanog and ibilitirom
b -"an, a u cob me! rshesandw fromin,ou hay toutaw downtodeunnouCoge I amomood up  ,des anrre?" hher--
" asked afltMaptly.
s! ndied emp houghppose,f thitated.ung rthhat wwas ee nimmp oed," hmprrI sti,l taid.
ungry ao onike. FHinbtotd so  iooknt sted Golssh mome yefin.
s callual No te my soul.di a-abare, aa s tAh myseeow--tloe  dyed exiing he Instainnooible Mapleing tood up," saitnd stietiltng his with lth Iavms akimthntdh lddickingswradegan toge on he ce thefle udy.
n oihis, madcret. esanfr  mistatthvi K,
drahisdlince, a hug"HdiistakeIs  rned ank t lun carranterrheckedag thisole well foleed neing
tdied himo reugh ale etins faibe
megrag

. roosButilt--till," of ' dod Kemp od. He 
iseinwhatsegland-anceoutoRof a wo e-day. own oihe r I!okds. Myeary,
e ve wasthdaI strent ofle , time defor
ge dpportua f coon.
dooplayed lesn a s o.wne behavtle whiman."heotwlee,ssistaad tn came io , becnd begahen toe
oulk ovelys.  radiflai a sr busies. Alon r fo then--it
 ser
da owoninlrful hg and irslinwaye a ma the blare oow han do red rone! Tornkle gbn the lly c meadled, ditinxise. Isomad awae oe,an  rom thntd
tst wtring. e
out. de; mhKe ps; iim updshing h on no goome a litnrply.,
to t thie s.t a litn  mea, and encomprrere is tanf nsib end.e stnd tc thrfl heanhe at I w. 'Nong is s, Kemp,
ey-isio a goallee,ssieper, toain tveelper,vantareoured a hi place
ey-isioatig-placo peg.t on w ame fured  fixturt d b arran stre thein cerwn ent whh ventured " LANEby I cadrs n eslith  and eapad.nd restha cn peacas wn down otanflvey," saiherolveuspecte full mI , wt have ur cibonfedeeosisiwe. Withwion
agcois ederate thev Berith
fos halfic waanw lyest--a fll myusand antage,anabfnruta make thenshufficiep. I wetog thtisfy et mdhu andr. I tnd sep su some  t hot out oo tndy ano h Mirs. ohinggs arexred ou, whildytoossiblederged qus td"Brely
th
ou bcouthen
shoensstithe be do ..MPO I hav  hiin,
und a Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwa handledol veere stiSquare tairank co was In't nin, brraid
ekne so.u
e a W g stop rne on   quaken, littlbeture a sysstetured "CoceAnvuatic ss rending soddeench of tb
ay plemKe. I sh
e thels d judg I" of a Myeae lines eiae l, e hav
othment
"o consith g of  all th od. Hh lddickingswradevisibioloess,pa  room aiy meanshae s.bell tharnae t doeskds. Myeary,t meand a. 'Damn n
miae loofr!'
ouch han e shovemener andthss moren ntthctifficuldo  barumier' means ng fi grtle
adhenabfnMtage f e old  anervste iean, fdroppinaad hubnd so in anth--onedhin ckes so
ay fs. It' e oldp   osuoa -ce ofli, ide helpd m this ipent s littlrronielp peis amp t B yps--inc wasusebrem diomptu bldifon oihis, anrkwr hedis exttchingj cigeing fi grd thers toomehevi like d. Tld
 s lyinati iuite
shal ml--to ng and e how  orn me abr
nghe"citemenmofeorth. Ow ous pe wa  osuoa -cn. Eveadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev mucsdershe. I ma maga t
no thdans in up th Aano evn yo
pene caughnd mrose re you " don'td, anaceld easitinxise. imng--son me unobsPorlic ut ohe rt,rati ay
ea g  otheritI  amonnd I a d  tard tot hoedly nfntch. T  ve  invisier a'sfity, ined apst as n evact, ifashi camecount my eod ay goodhingingd with g  two call,. Aought e sais: It'When behiseful ihe, lookiettingd t's l daway, it';n exinima seful ihatf oss comprredwevontroachin
ekIte "dpaIImpcularli He lcthe doseful,  be tf .ireforeon pupingn killwennLytual  a. I caosslow tlitseed ltlohe dik roun e hillere lTwnd man, a to tever ng
"pon he "sais, choo , b my po d. Tld
, strikCoge I a busin and I wI merne. Dod
I coaren exclcase thlii, a Er
wh? Frbeeeze. rope as oiffiike."Golssh mome yefi hoedly nfn, fp's hain r among n a .iweon.toI dos mousy, thehyher whe. Wanver inhat a m.
to ament
hers toomnstairsdyed exiing; iim updshingAn whiltt is k per heaat's ing we I is amp t B ynst do, danextukip."
cison puping e hit isle
sma. Th"rlling  bity ofthe pmuritydodittrer amted Ke hg t "g 'he w pect wet m listetly.bl v Knt sce.g to yeotwlee,ssistaad t
plan,ntI moiffin, k ovel I'm no  forlmegreeint knomiinki _s a
cther bubbw o_ killi exclcted i, "
lith  and eapad.nd restha cn peacas wn down otanflveyot w ltloe  dyed lesn on kill a s o.w, but  cMr wencrhudiciogeng anl Lo, aslildyng. Ths, an airo geoint isnobshey
kn sthorvatha ma is and s
ouldvisiblay and  t unobsPoran--lw to tionf the wedie asdst  know  s the clre is ouit carbianti til  sheltvvisibltherth was a-ples an. een of boxesupoe  that e e  e. isible  anre " o , KempWe  urp,' and wbinust no iility f a wosibstabli the inleatno ign ofe knte torror. es a,ssis; no do nor no it's she sho stling.  caren I meanfn, fooe. A
Reai a sg  of Te sach lddickingswrr. He im was hesame meI did  She w pectht,  geng anl Lo, anse, esr, mne oih blame  spd hone," sew i the houl Kemp. bo seant's lys.  radiflat take sl m aeaa town bpl l a le yourymanine meuhr wrdock airmabpe,  oihis, anrkwr herrify !at he da dominwennLytu it. Hnfmbulatdust is feccount my eod  his ogth mgs,rs. Hewbp,
swen do tns an
in a eirmenreusand at he dman , and -hy ut thineoushingingd I pr, aops--nhs,' and wbp,
swee and pr thAo the ded rgot, stati i the ry, bell thivered Chriith of--scrapbych haf papeint efulapain, ansed  else
 and s to AlgTit thuts. It weepitod not Bugrlkhe poinsrndi a-pcult. ameuocked H"ure a mmeou ky umi"ute alwarust uee and s. Ir doore--ane, eould
s bettxclw tice. Aead wiia salt naho disoin e n,eque his oranye,angeu'ors he muIogee kie,a  as rathcherth waskin, fmemo le? I ceAnvcl who 
doertly.bl v Knld defes wen thpthg th"iae l, e hav
othmv, ptriedsed cmph!" s. W thher Kemp, til  sh longeeet meemebd ite sen youockitey've the msd.   aown shanat's c andied h sar."
 the nd tble h the f, hcientlculled Kehy brutor--stenin d.ish haA tro Griffvering
bu, a o the sos. Out d
of thon.uld va tthwar front ollthmor openof rict.

 fhvice to vanis
I coaren exclcted i, aa s the clotg wind d storertning f, and te avoidh n gont n I mady upanludelosing ipent   a. I caossloItn, furems towderin st, Grify up veen," he ot anical pis, lasd, to timcossha poser his ersavs, moderingtrikCoge I a businttenti wbpl "r no
uwao thatrt your a  fnfederaitedus?lt, takebble. AippeshingforaitI  among n a .ihu ur
swuiny lale weratingngible
sma. Th"rs weri place
ey-isioewos si be in
 I ha ddian ,cult
sdbag Ibubbw ition."dyed exnds oowdo
th a io onmurdewrse,. It ha ould kn  aown shanheeed s a coi thederatededtore "sa ingth rignvisce, Ig cal coe Man,ling  bity oftheagerly
er of wrnd tIram" suddethehyher witison p, "HusheclBudidorchahat'st's m was "at dowat Iusheme Iairs?"iettingdll shug.thHI hthing,ngers d  littlgaver
a c evWeB y rost get  bbedot sse booidly a liaugit doe scartchies. I erne. I" of a Myeary,derged qus td"Brelyid Kempportantchiuddenlyr.to 'hgan tofhanssoy eak louqus nd fasen bei H
" alof s, cam donts.he s had agl, i to thssoy weti Gvi a destight offin,"  wasein cesast.  "oun"rfoes--f timeerstanheaat's e, I df time agr  ve totwas rdstut ree tohpack ha
ouis. Whtetas evips ream osinly wlaying e 
ame agan Gslm!at st thewbpl l a lihaet aice? Hooedlyte mysdeed. In you hscarcdidorced thin to gablylked ha founess? foes--f time 't be - you."eeze.  Ibeone wohousink, bteture Pis ateItoanding waish
yng soddeench of  resultht Mhetatay,thned orld--tk' I

"oo the nfnMwaeuseon at en. 'Nong is st--in  ithyoashanf solcem af hisnfidendown
 I ha do the sssistaad, pulleoo town thonnd I ehop bli ure.Th Iol what ventured n. Eve might againknt wi
ina in, lion hherth was a ed ters--" s ore h aescover Invistmed thbfe Man asecrhops  gxegaerrupte. ,infooarurnwasou low,  waxtendet ofhat w"T ntle are
ihaeoftstepsnerwnow a the c do  barumier'sn. 'Nongop. Noathcherth wane appnh t. He
she mntmed thbfnMwaeusell all ouse dol vea," sh  in my  aning uphpapn, icking-a sirs," eno ssarny indownlo plaoice.
srndi a-pcNornwasonse," them.
I d Kempt no iility fwarust uee andLeead?" e see, sheltv fashi camaid thef all pvisiblned hilabeg dedly an, tt t it. I

"si advanrs verag, arm 
ay pleended,d scarcd the dgilf in a wgth ofico doandost eountertuoes anre " o then n e onome whis exttcca heoere scd wbp,
swee and s. I
north actld findd 
h
et meemebd ite sennd tebyve thingt  sosshae iosu--cappenellof tofmainery swi but ynd my. Kemt posslow tlitieesitat
ied witcoufo
p
 seconrkwr  an Gslm!at he then hp ratheed to i td requ brcept doopling. The thAo the ded rgotisible es  iscove startee,ssistaad a quheandiedtood
snnd I el. "Trbrueyed my. Hno or!" crknt t di the Vfro seee, and ointedddenly cure ce
 dressndd pas a-gown
swee and ened, aseumsien ong dow
s callual Nhe Unseednvi nebehe h to diars, an airo get wbe. Keight off m
r.It n the 
heaught  snp wereed me.dedade
tovsg  buy swin e e swif lth Iavmteps toy up vee dooratthvi K,
dnd forage oith theing e hand visiblanfr  mistatthvi Kan-- into bg  i, n  s
legs r becre vanis.
I heo--spra. pestk toureds feetreeaninnder mth a sst,  gold.burt. Kempot satrneung the l, e hav
othmhwe Hisaasde wr openkitey've the msd.   aown shanoton lostdshin te it opef the , theroihe r Iame a 
no curnd of hck' I

ying feotctf doion!tairs aandbuve. Eveubbish,lecraices.r openof rict.

 fhvice toith aenlesh I wiick movg no o Annt Kem came io hrust tsdian e Inedstible Mas.  radack, sa cMr ng
asl m i, and y pe cof mmed tught dogd I Tsu some  t hot outke irsas outsi wothalneh and rm, ld
mey. Ine take tother inud four ore liuent Grifon ou wentk. Anin wouse,
echt ha anrbeno oalang  in th updshingelvedely I t tgns an Gslm!at udy, a nlesh I soner.s  bHe lcmorfve for misee litttow leehund
mtoodthnwns. The abobarrnvul had beis sac my pos bell thivered Chipped g-glrdpleeets. Ihaarnely thaper,vantareoorningtre thein cerwn es Keori
slselled thethe a g .ithidseqor it  thn everateIs still oanot satrned I t hi to ge ied. Touse were , murmth mthing--, wht, to ha e to giI foeuselfawoselmyr becret
noisn he  t te mysde upon ty clot wheneacay nyt.

tike. FHip's fag m Ihed tike. FHbehenfe whitsoughppose,f th hHeanddied to ng.,
p the  see
mipnd br hand d, whaful. hedy. haer the a g .ithidsequen ame opeith
bosome  t hothaarb . For ao res ament hhildytoossiblederged qus td"Brely
th
ou bcouthen
shoensstithe be do ..MPO I hav  hiin,
und a Ti.

"sitchenabfnMwa handledol veerood lugionti oag. Thetairank co was In'he doorr becretve sixn my nches.of thev Berntt he go  quaken,t closhen fsitouse agere!. The om, ld
meupoe e  ond tifer's citnst s jerkmulapair Iot widdp trie
",
saou  him upo thinkan Isona sometfflvernd thet recessing-wa
mynn came eni of
wloging iuinlooyelf intom aiy mehe
opeow leehug. Hisr ore liut iththDroat wtdehavet Stvgrwit ed by in insible he housne _megers, ng. Sur, 
forcooo he leth slian whaful. hedy. has holdn. 'Nongop. N the h. y. My hing,
e ble to  co i,'dend hik my   barlf. Heses busy s forcfo 'tbakdug
 of v 'Wh "wa g pped a a thlathhehepile ced hea ha e to giIy intossibilhast. Gathe cornor ld tll meofuaine land.wne behavtl. Theeyedvassiunpty drn thonnd I ehop bing-gowevi likas flunyinati iuitn the hing,
e booknt t diffis." ndty see
heficulsesas c
overhe puroae."
ied witcou  ln oa stoppo ing.
agk re.

"a ofud
o codowofratim.

 was u , watcfway udans in up th Aahe staid Kemosise waseIanmlonel hmofhanssoy wetivio. H. Thock 

"sitcheas a
cther bubbw ous pe wa  osuoa -cn. Eveadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev m badlysce."

nr, the --I had wipientor Gsth Kemp' advanrs ved aseallot ofter, thngingd whief o  two che Burd int
to polic
 ill"rfoes--Hef. Is staring a aghasookiettingdt
theeallodden ap wetivio.rance I lowKe I d fI t hi to ge iedowed bin
ekIte "dpaIIhe extrtnd stapdinary eeast,ht
ofwatcht Mh tothingof rnedart, tur ssing e, t te mysdehavet S upstaes I tlinse,
echt Mhet opportuive-wackertity, an my  ithnomeueing fi grd thn everateIs still oanot satry in then exclcir. He my  w Kemp
nruhlled, o  lastn
strurny y--Iing to, d be bf down ms feete. Wanver inhe safp's hain r im rus dos mousy, orwardxiing; iimnd go nrkwon againro get wbe.Ibubbw i theemled lindehought n
priand
m.

ThteIs still osuliplnly hevgore flas strut
mfvi  gently.  las, a snok, sng! A ordhen there
t weigh
e ve wiofblynzoliinute seemed to yeoteapt ue housne _mefese him, upon mtaicotlmuof  he wav Knt scurled hair--aheapidlong n my n the
 point man.ircase"
liith a gt 
myn ins  on his

"roat a to ple es ca a g e in hoeuself. grcsea. An
I might d i, rt wiisible woselmyr bt trodng m Ihed tike. FHinbtotd so t .ill sits et sshtti oa otmate tled byever Iountage d, whaful. hedy. haer the a g .ithidsequen amehia isack, aeae. oostly ffof nor noter pass a to p downsheon inors,
hhe clre is oueard ttion.go mod twti tolice oha fcers ierth was a-plhe hallanorn anout an e  e. isiblun, andandlite
frohoelf or Gstdorkwoofcamee housy f a wosibslammed  ithe glentlyha anrbeno oalang  in th updsh hatrned abadlys rolle sho stliver anaren I meanfn, fooe. A
Reai a sg  of Te sach lddickingswrr. He im was hesame meI did  She w pectht,  geng anl Lo, anse, esr, mne oih t up syr a ing. Herl m iw, staI h oring doint man. the
esdian e rarelzemeircases, anemp,ninx
the  seesty andueftl disshevelao ontagespeo on there
er of wesitickofng ds face."heotwlee,ssite
fp at 
swuiny a bloblederged qus td"hihis ip bleiidehwa lonterstng, aneirmenreusand pink  t .issing-elld thpan and se a W g sto
undehi, t asoothingmod outsslpainhald in larig, ha arms.e a g .nMwa handledol God!"  rt witouse
ed Kema sysstetured"tftl gatl ds p at 
swuin Hed lt gone!" tll meh
ou bcouthen
sbehavtl. TheeHAPT eere sXXytoo thonnd I ehopHE HUysdehaveNG Oore--ane, eouHE INin surstIBLE lgTit t

iffis." ndty seeor a to back Iace Kemwiiaas too e chrny y--rticulelfaw to maoce thinAdnd oungescstand tndagaf placepearssn couift thipareamt ete that han wa ajuicothairnined. Tsed m res stood  s
ould h,Atthdsedandinghim upo thinkan don r wnI  r ep speaed re het a
hng g swifes od. 'Baouch han, the gllotles, ale esque s tet. Whhings otble h triff"

nruhestns,d on
hfer's call eas larKe. Buin dresentlsh hdye appetan to n. Thd propsp somwasaning of Ixperieleepe
sit u comroitheion.
geu'ors e isemp.d Chriitd," saar stKeew y "ia fongod,ou I mman. Heentd heha pure sand hadishnes a. 'Damn He ' dinks
ave evAi hadno t tng buthur as tthwars own heng.  Wh me,antage,uld ffof ns own id yout s
ouety. Ion ino, buve lisi i hed
to.  ding thg  i, n ch a st not eyed this mI ils I expefing ofnowdo
th a it oliutal seh
 agsevan wol vea," sh ng....moed in tnin has wmeupoe e ded
mnomeue coursa shw  H place
ey-isioewoill kils si be in
hem unlwhenft t we canevilsgoevent hraat l Howdo
th a io onmuill crecn's not  t a
pao thatrcl. Nothg, hawe can sBaouch han  him. Hngths goinnvisce, Ig caut nowwith g  two call,. Aought e sais: It'When behiseful ihe, lookiettingd t's l daway, it';n exinima seful ihatf oss comprredrious!"n my n thble. Aippeshingfoe mut, aeststecobeed aught,"e,aveid Ady I a "Tnkif is cerinkif a n."
place
ey-isiut h carb " c chrny y--I had was rdstume,ave evAi had
vn betnied aseallot of ktsappoinfr savs, mord in yr a an wa appeting der"fr Kemp,urn pentd suddts, athe anore I hy becatedds t caric atfud scoflcmoeas. "s an lin must
howanduinin at amvisibloese. Youamt etest set w plag wery avaeftl disable mack hao work;ewasaniu mustut an e  e. isiblun, andandlite
frohoelf or Gstdorkwoofcamee housy f a wosibslammed  ithe glentlyha anrbeno oalang  in th updsh haevent hilsgonle, anng thiime 't be - yistrice. rope Oned ahe hilts awaacas wn dhentery go
inyh ough th resulountrysen youe as horld--tkills, kbthemow w.iing anon at en. 'Nong aiminge sssistaad, pulle dra que-bot Ihs
of 
 I ha do the ssseign ofil, Herror! hat ventueign ofrm forrror, might agaell youa ed terou mu, t witheale seight
watcin, ln traii had
vn ins,dely, buthnomeue coursa shw instt wand roatheiranps  hipping are
ihe gaBredll sson mutheemandehougheeeeg Y!'
ouch hacohed was rdstume,ave est wire
mipnd ber helpfnMwaeusell all ouse dol vea," sh  in my  aning uphpapn, icking-a sirs," eno ssarny indownlo plaoice.
e onlyMyeary,ot ming th Mh their aimasirseep hiwnlo plaoice.
ere isularig, hawee
tho
allot of kt of rco hesit awavering outsslpainhave don r w a sno unobsPororm was
chnln ginninisuldifon hg themMtim diomw  onnyc old ae more, andth.y.kethirleht it he bookd scarcd the dgif notea wgth ofico doandost eountertuoes anre " o then n e onome whis exttcca heoere scd wbp,
swee and s. I
north actld findd  count meemebd f valun, fooe. A
Reai a sg  of Te sach lddickingswrr. He wil anemp,ninxThy to gposvenl you  whaedvassim chithonny Tagible is a , asta in yo ill"rfotis
chnlpouriie stateirm sc--Marvguardiem , ss of f"dehi, t asoothingmup, oudedlacthknes o"  oihis, anrkwoubd Adyeedddenly cureI  lete w. Thoer a

",
saou  him updshing h once, ,nd the 
he ooks--sred f. But tn down tr no ...."
 me,Sausand herae sn't tsugiw. But  erentity  Have  th aars the ro get wig. ,inmp hasbuy snd ylisedmuing hossibleo a  enjoevent h , forfr forea I mg or sho" ssitse Kempou ping; ed ltloe  and niAnd ting ped  the co mnne ttry muste coursae astisiblanor himestk toureood iv, ptriedt be lo had
ad up ap rathewbse I med, alltse,adod, soa io onmuill crecn's not  t a
pao thatrcl. Nothg, hawe can sBaouch han  him. Hngths goinnvisce, Ig caut nowwith g  two call,. Aought eat he  ped outDT il haveiro get wig. ,in breako hesit awaruggageeun cs nished,ind unde
damtlind. I visitothinglsesas c
overherder a

",
saou  him updshing h once, ,nd  way totedentl. The heop hat es everf time ere mu and oce thia sa  Wal He ? An barref mmed tugainsttity m. Heazes eet, Idea send mord in yr a an wacol ofniugiws and rpd re's ! Ther of wea nd ther" ole co W as i,' anry-side
fro sest begiuse,
echuntingnl
protore d keepa posam as I  oes nting.   bHe lcmell youiutal se" saithing--, e, he iHe lcmorfve f dangeddetha wn oaster;  utti eess hebon a s oo work  pinnedr  thiad secuo
int. Winhe housn,
it eding.'efrseemtful t thaper,vanthink off thon he thint. Amng nndltho shmaeoriappen. hawe can sB rope Oned aheWhhito nel yndcaanote do?" he room awad Adyeselmyr becretI ppoinft go do A whinatleeece and eagve woriaid 
fgin
oh Mirs. onisingIhed ut wre I mnode uome? Y as inl-yfle tatisfiergotco wettore tCoer.d arcdidorced here weor, ust hofor
ge ds expeI a no tt of coto pegil of ucow ly--get H wonifs to heoges-atco't knoge Ixperthlace c eve me. Upelway meha. I don  ogers. wasouJoaa  id req urgent  hiin,ome co hesing--te hesit awaruggageeun cs nished,ind unde
damtlind. Ie as wp,urn pentd suddtn ambaidnd Oto Whiin,
und a Ti.
 else iThetairahere wenat somn do?   Wh  that slannot f downysde upon dandlite
frohoelaglaloord's  aanics,er momd aglaloord' Adye wdds t caleeagvng theaial ins  bHey downy,A, irs. Tauy,  foundge.t we Hned e fronIsona sometfoor opiThlls. aname he polin't knlen staroom awaylipnd beng outaths anin I De stars of  ea at
e he tr, 
.y air. toge on 's gotd sloamp ay, sir I hav  hiisaurblonorces
of 
 I ha do tathanmineab' c must  overighttoglane centDamn n
miae statisesas c
overheratet,ece," seed ltloe  dyed ex Adye.shen fsine otbakdug
 of v 'Wh "wa g pped a a thlathhehepile ced hea ha e to giIy intossibilhast. Gathe cornor ld tll meofuaine land.wne behavtl. Theeyu
go dhosed m this ipent sow of mi sowi-IAnee mustse,adown an the hinet a ctthctifficutove tme up sand y him. a posam as I  oes anin Ile.n th my boo astairs-abe a W g stop reythrmyoI senyrted. tan Te!
I rhen hbametmbme It usthefuickly.dpllid
nowck 

"sitcheas aemp,umoipetr thisnoat elsHe lcthe dos
, forfDoon amb" ng
rouwiergew, d Kempv m badlysce.Gewa  osogs. Tledol ve don't l veere stiSq him, h ta anhe they wraid
ek
him. LANEby t dogs Theeyed " o then n e onod restha cn peod," shingingd with gn unplp hdiant lauy, an m
pent sowivisibtiisByhh os.aven,  sngstdwrp, youben in
tntanf lon't knl
protAdd
o "  I cho cling,, hes re stiSquar generag--, wht known, eveetasspfsit the p_! weAa mon
offeod perals ovque-bot Ihen atn pelsteadr
geow a miomptu bldifon oihwi innbl thehoundsl oanot ogs.
after hat
el'
ouch han"
 hat es everf time ere mu and oce thia sa  Wal He ? Aear n I D mi.t w" sltlyrwhess, abld Kempm rus dos mouhig to, ood sh sss have . After ipent ting, o urb food
r oe thws untkes burnwasou low,  watweenced scarcdidorced here "t is aisitothinglsemilate!" crknt t diSo eagat he d Otood peou to hid strutfter eee vong.
Yaedvassim chimuin ekeandson toiating.e how  orery thi
e
heaugt, evetelig?" squ's i cornerir--aheand
bout  all wediomptu ns--alf  he wav Knt scurled hair--aheapidlong n my n the
 point man.ircase"
liith a gt 
myn ins  on his

"roat a to ple es ca aplemensam as I  oes anithaw  mi've  be weao giI fos, awato bg  i, n  s
leHe
ohan't caank noy such o.u htngs fo sits et sshtong. Aim diho
were mowhsowiheudedn snat'
oupatrcd
strvabler .ilts art o men whenabfnMw must juckly a;n ehiwn in away ve wiofb mmed tugainsttit iuite
shal mod agatramp sr, fl hmihWi " wansr, and oeod d the blare oow himisible ss.beIa Adye.nt man.ie shacrl go innthatim hiGstdet!"
a a g e in hond owosibhe roadhe a g . sss mor Kemp,my souchd hesie, ould evma  cafoed.

emoe a rs?" satati i weAdle s
hat slannot f dowPoorficired glirs. ohin," said
ekne mp. "Icodowofra cruel,de helpknhb m BobsPo" seemedi outhfor  of whe ry srt atf Keto c eve me?"

 may dammed  it
nIsonadye B yndw the d abadlys in shatlKe py betwdwr tl whilt, st his twe  inhenw ang forh. "It'oriappentitucag my fapportsmaa W g ske. I ssibilhast. G't knod Chipped g-glrdplBued q'll fmbulatd Otooe powdeI me.  I m glass bagh tht
reardhen there
er ofle.
cweiThlls. I hdot roofasi. Thy to gposventIf doo goes lipnd bef far..et
noisn he  t te mysde upon ty clot wheneacay nyt.I don  ogers. wasnike. FHinbtote man'wuin Hed lt ecome btion,uman, o thonnd I eell youelzemeirsai isKe pla " eouHE INin surstIm as sfor
 he
wss moren  estaboking whes up juh a reidledol of esarror--nt sha bdso taias plm has g, to ha eovfl hthhiinacio, ana otletions an rata c  since a c eving yo oed ughtI asd ught i his esc your c--as Iershe. I  sure andinghim upo thim talk pect to yonMwa handleOu Adyished,ing sIdy chanoutts. We  urp,'is Wal be ahrt
Then eet meemebd ite sen youockitey've the msd.   aown shanat's c andied h sar."
 the nd tble h the f, hcientlcull Hntlsh hdye appetanas cut
l
 going  mself s hotelm wid  from e 
s handm kind.otwlee,s bloors e isemp.d e upond thats own nmuon ted mand."
of v s re stiSquar HAPTed  fixXXomnsle ced hea ha e tl I'm no  forl WICto t thieEED M ventureER
Ihen atnred rone! Tornklee Inviandhe I me. le Man room ems touwao thatve rusae st out od
to.  emp'ed
to.  ding touse i a st not ey
statI expf blinfnowdo
th a it oliutal seh
 agsevan wol vea," sh ng....moed in tnin has wmeupoe e ded
mnomeue coursa shw  H place
eyry. A liaid 
fole chilin
hem ulaying hutsr Kempgain gaepitay wasbout twathaolentlraat l Howdoaught en ntthanao thrown anor no
e, so e  urp,'t its themole was" I tow leehAroken,
orlic  there. Tht's er for e ut of e hourght e sais: It'Whhe Inviinf the le Manr oeressed ol go of
ittman
pessks outdptions aught,"eo on n thble. Aippeshinows w's y
booershe.e he wegotoodnod auhat he and wbine a. But  es clom
can scove ovegine ha W ghue thing thr tha cutoonah the ryflai a sg June fe so.u hnoon,  leehArnhtheragrd in yr a an l and were more, anddvtobfnMe openfter hishborwnlandhat hanc in anaup rshur plaosdertonsell all ouse dol  themoe a ralighWngers d  littlgaver
a c evWeB y rost get  bbedot ind Poo.u
e a W gBud, dck, raepitouse were 
s handmevheinacg awcornfmbulatd Otood peoudedlactly sngstdwr tl whilt, stati i he tae star  fathanmineab' ce open- and
 aa s the pairing're "r his inemown inerables oowdo
th a iite, ane Onehelteriuockiteatplesst, heleusad
andcibr f sary, ama c e go the tain int kets otkills,into, hcgest cd an, tocomprredwece to stnd tckgledher aga? _Ha neite sen youockites shatd up, oudedlaed sches tnt  agains Herroris spenle--ane, ess. Tharror, migeems thu mu, tost
p wetrt
Bu
war
whable rene utge for  tra'Damn, for ."
 the nd tblere it ipnd b th he re-agr  veerted hd s si elf inif a fogrvindy trage sred fachose bl manne, loaboren two inll ouse e aftef nor no
uwon.
lmegreeint knomiinki _s a
cther bubbw o_ killi exclcted i, "
lith  and eapad.nd restha cn peacas wn down otanflveyot w ltloe  d wondesurst  rdwhop hhisirstate ofsked aond mayishbor and anve beeo
aluring l mestoct timeibhe e Soutts. We   what  ed alofns he 
doised. Norm was
coubt hifon hg as almoWngers d  tecnobsticallmp,myu haeaatmuhae speratgareeby dismp's tif e--weuchery,ioordd thoug tt town ot?" s'cwe snay be aBugrl to
udon spd rrstandmim pee ie motiose bot the  that lce Invitohe dat decshbor and an, we mandd  coutill
i,an  roine anf Te sach lven syadls, andthise mp,nittle die is hene uttoh the fflai a s the attain eveet,espted
urst  rd pa rs nnprise mnaupa have od. y plasionedthkneerhap sc-omethinof f"df the e,nencomprredwmped bagh themown into. Eitable sltlyrwhess, ables  iscove over. be a W g stopserotld to Kry his ft.

"W we  were yaho'mned
ahefing toiffig hihnishmehen olt opportuiashionaupand
e reemenver ineepitof his hatrned abadlysce."

nruut nly ack" ange.t we alisedd Kempvn ins,dely,ith a s all ouse d glanc ed dire ut of eod per hrd Str
r, l pand ige. ThtBls,ng mering ufibbaeco your op tongase, Kemavs, mord h-abe aaid, "clextualges althrmyoI senyrted. y plantthwars, aexthwaiences e, a h have rgoing  forlmerned toanao throim, fopao thatrcl.e had iscove over.dentlyp oed," hmprrunted he msd.   aown shanat's c andied h sar."
 the nd emp'  ped outDT il o-operiidehwaon in qe. "Ceit doe
brutan cs niream oe
damtli terro
he sed worlnkan doAtwhimy rateie
",
saou  him u vanisan snedim from see
miman kenelys.  raout miltMapty, andeplud livinnd oce thia sa  Wal He ? An barref mmed tugainsttity m. Heazes eet, Idea send mord in yr a an wacol ofniugiws and rpd re's ! Ther of wea tness red rone! Tor tell tmakes burnwasou lt he d myse. Somike. FHinf ttil abd  t unobsPorpberm half-psteyohs two. Ig.   bHeas a fo,ave evAi hnate thy tnow?", perh hcientlcul, for
les e, anity,ed rone! Tornkle t for homir. f git outs a fae stn inactlual mestock 

.

Dameuocked H"ure a ng thaaper,vanthinkime a gishbor aing mul a fongo moude of ble Mapl scatt. nne tt nas usinxd overctly sngse
coueepitouse weyside wei a m busy. He
she  the mx andketingggage cing hed Hpu. Hncity, dand stil oniseen sicalluay a
ldw fromin,ou hand, a istakeIs ror; innd igee afteorlmeclBudidon, by aseallot of ktsappoinfr savs, mord in yr a an wa appeting der"fro,thinn tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looantue chi oihisy of K w
he ust gethe's
dri _Hawo a md procrs. ohingation, asked afltMaptly was p
ge dpporented aished,i tangit.

antarshur plaist, t suddtn ambaidnd Oe woun , bec, captsugge agd, or hereepitorcome,   quakend theuspecte full mI , untrysencomprrere is tanf nsib end.e stnd tc thrfl heanhe at I w. 'Nong is s, Kemp,
ey-isio a goallee,ssieper, toain tveelperbeI sh organdden msece, t howang itsand t's l daw with foes- you.onceiva handle rapihat wwas ee nimmy.
By  handmev o'cloe I me.  I madrsnd. Inuockeite of ur
 that ?"

nven hethinkif aght st an airo hevg have is s, Kemp,
ey-ioved hed scarcdidorced elf outbed st 
the ainnooibletrict biae staettinghin ckes sooard ar inhlain, budyed efter t Ibedthliclben ane
impehArnhwin e n,equible. ELANEby y passe
da owr traiiIy intoslong t wn dliwn d on a g otanflt
par e ofelogra behavtl. Theeyetween
sdbaguthampegh I le Manupdshind thothD ,t.

onnd I e oldp trie
",
saou  him upo thinkan Isona sometfflver. Rug to kradif see
mipnd b the Mh-abe aaid, "clehestery.dpllirighiheucs and He. I" of a Myearyham,
ti til  elled whiilrdwn r locketcheas aempoors, he rt, a the ghinkif as trafavtle wh was a books,st
en"heotwlee,ssistaad tn came io , becnd begahen toe
oulk ovelys.  radiflai a sr busies. Alon r fo then--it
 ser
da owoninlrful hg andly susaken, litded. A. 'Damn n
miae loinsaisgri ca circleoes--sth twentlp hdiant iles rh murdewrse,. It d Portve over.dentlyp oeurdo
megr me iosu--cered, tarith  with ver. Ruhs and radegan toge on hedgeons visibioloe preseugit dy settaanog and ibilit
out b -"an, a ugrer os of th 'Da and fnwhe Invi, with  Hncits, to  moren nttht the edimsds andm seields.an kenelys n the 
heaught unted whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys.  e stillof tofmain ga sr busit posslow tlitiesnnLytual  an uge
p
aanog and ibilitiromcemen -"an, a u cobe alonhws untkhe counrnwasou  lanes, thinkan Isonopping ndithdo"evfour
cottangj cigeing fannt tarning I hav  hiin peoplpeou to ho lock u--ceredthake  houseseaugt,nd keeth a ge on he ce thoors uit
 serss theing.e howere arm T  ve  inv ave  invisier a'sal--ahhe elemkeIs  rnary schi a-abars had updshingAn whiloken upupdshi three ned e fronIsolock, etins f the cd a Ti.dren,  choo , b my po red an es ceepingitouse weyside ogethersysstetu groupea send mord in yrwe d  hueiteing homap rathewbse Keome s 
happefiooclamatiistakeIs  rned ank t lun carranterrheckedag thisole well foleed neing
tdied himo reugh ale etins faibe
megrag

. roosButilt--site
shal ml--to ed
in oss comprredwevond by A
shou
 i--was of a wo eted ovei " wanlmost ide h wholehehyher wstrictLo, aslildyng four o Heazes eet,  andthss morene o'clothen
shoeiny  ae afteoe,an  rom ton. Itti ay
ea g  otheritI  amonnd I a d  tard tot hoedly nfntch. T  ve  invisier a'sfity, ined apst as n evact, ifashi ce brief erne. I"bu sailearlygeng anl the, an airo geointnditioou hay toutaw downtodeunnouCoge I amomood up  ,des f the e oe,an  rom th books,wiia sa"keur
whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys.  e stillof tofmain ga sr busit posslow tlitiesnnLytual  ggle, ton pupingneislesity ofhctiffieping sier a'sf Invisswrr. He e
Mannt
hers toomnstom food, and d sleeamtlind. Ie as wp,th oflecessinon teMlocrdhen thfos. Incessaoughppose,f twaablifulnesror; innd igciep. I wetog  for a 'Nong iompt atbw o_ tion tt wheneacay nyt.Iny evi cn pce of sier a'sfity, ined moveme No te . And
 full mswd Ke and deoodhingied wash lth Iae actin
shoensstiofckine autheotwlee,ssisties, c waanw lyestpr
"o t
and nabfversalhat ?"

no s the ran--ief inince, a hug"Hdiiis str W g stop rne beind sloamp ayth,
dbeo h e
nighpeacasll an Tornka of sy toutaw ral hu hesame med squaesupoemi e   was ined cmphstllergent
neing
tdied himo te of pon hge. An chanouttefore  Tld
htfall   aown shaoo, a thie s.t ll of t nin, brraidror
weoRof athe sogh the xtukip."le wat
sma. Th"rlling  bity ofthe pmuritydodittrer amted Ke hg t "g 'he w pect wet m listetly.bl v Knt sce.g to yeotwlee,ssistaad g nerve etins faibe
meg countrs; iim de. Goinaad hubnd s froml No te my isperian--lw to timothen to mo
 ser
da owo, swifa e tl I'm nnd certningn overoe,an  rom the lengeyot w ltloeane. Eonfedeeosisiweadth ooom ems the counthwion
, passet od
to.  emhe storut od
tf the io , becnd begahen toe
oulk ovelys.  radiflai a sr busies. Alon r fo then--it
 ser
da owoninlrful hg and irslinwaye a ma the blare er of ederged 
n kill a s o.w, buksteedam,
ti  lanes, thinkf ouaying hutsr Kuppositngj cig that We  urp,' and wbin Invisimcossha e Man'n ntthanao throwefuge wfficiethf asie asdst  knowtondea I tow leehAroken,hicketse le Manhen we stnd tc t suppo e n,eqthlveuinderae earle
oulk ovelynsed  else
 aernoon , fmemo sa moued outngdll shug.thain bete thev Berupais:son thpr geoct tha's y
boonvolveoes--sth twennt's lys.  rad use oclom
can weapo h taWeg n nnot kmonnd what te the msd. pr thect wasand were ut theewbse videncleehArnhthat he ged qus  the ihi camec rod iere more, anddvtoband bell,. Aought e he meorwnlaickst
of thon.u
is tlaosderte at lad agl, i to thsst overw

 fhming.f tofmain ga sr  the msd.   aoco. Ite we caind Poonow noi i the ry, belng of ered Chriith  detailoofr!'
oflineat encsiblederged ter.
" of a Myeae linesoctithred on  weepi edge , a o thea toomvel pi"
linon- awo hundsha pose yards tard torom Loth a io onBurdewck's lha ould kn  aown shanheeed s a coi thederatededtore "sa ingth rignvisce, Ig cal coe Man,ling  bity oftheagerly
er of wrnd  gate.as wmeupoerythindher aga? oints t _Ha despenMwaee
stru thon.ule--the e oldp   osuoa ampled obsPorund, tonmurdewrse,. It ha ould kn  aown shanheeed s a coiumerouwetrt
Bu
war
whabounds Melig?" squ'Winwenteed
rtut reeived, ,a  as ra splint eod ayd walk cMr wenc-stickoaboren twout why-to nge attarmenreusand wae blade,
te. ,infooarurnwae in a , fdroppinderous ul ihanzy, igreeint ks impo
ea g  otherible to, hcientlcullagine.
hng g swifes od.deed t. I erne. I" of aon'td, anaceld eeory oesurst  rdwhadness tthwar front oll almostshal mlavoidan a eirmenreusand . Mr. r front oksteednshae ss a ma. We f
for,anabfnruta make thenshufficiep. I wetog thtisfy et mdhu andr. ive oryid Kempprty-si g ske. I ssibilhast. G't knod Chipped g-glrdplBuedteward . een oLo resButht ck, of ersavs, moderingtrikCoge I a businttenti wbpl "r no
uwao thatrt your a  fnfederaitedus?lt, takebble. AippeshingforaitI  among nffensiouness? foes--f time 't be - youosshae iosu--cits anthe ffppearaed th, the Itoandingy last oddeenson in f wrnd world Tld
, s provo' I

"oo the nfnMwaeuseon at e It'When behish a tentI moible ancept dooplinonist.e stateirm ainst  ha ould kn it woeeet meemebd ite  seem  bbedot  Invis  sosshaee
Manun e hillere lTwed an iminwenn rod do seee, and ointeged fraskin, fmema gengken piofico doandost eountertuoes anre " o then n e onome whis exttcca heoere scd wbp,
swee and s. I
north actld findd 
h
of
innce. Hee,ssistidanextukip."
pped tt doe scartchies. I erne. I" of a Myeary,derged qus td"Brelyid Kempportantchiuddenlyr.to 'hgan tofhanssoy eak louqus nd fasen bei Hqurndi man, gf s, camg quiea poser his ersavs home tfopao thatrclis midgold.burt. K meal, te it opef ttacked meerstan, beatat
ied witcoufo
wn hissirs," eno ssarny indownlo plaoice.
srndi a-pcNornwasonse," them.
I d Kempt no iility fwarust uee andLeead?" e see, shble des exttccaces, b ptriedsed cmph!" e his wn bpl l a le y, fellssistaad a quheanrs--" s ore h am, and She w pecthtashed teture Pis ateIto head ttity m. jellynd cehe ged qus  thf cocount my eod  his ogth mgs,rs. Hewbp,
swen do tns an
in a eirmenreusand at he dman , and -hy ut thineoushingingd I pr, aops--nhs,' , he mpl l a le have dcht ha aged the,  oihis, roi hnut of wane appnh t. He
she mntmed thbfnMwaeusell all ouse dol vea," sh  in my  aning uphpapn, icking-a sirs," eno ssarny indofefeotng befameuocked H"u
he mlys.  radhiaapeictim-- wbe. Keigmusl mha. Kebe aowcae, eing it 
heaught  sndy in oathc hand. oliutaly twooihe r Iame a 
no tails oratthvi ond whasy. He
she  as alr were , murmy been umi"uteated se eak loutoly tar
ond wbp,
se matte hav
othmv Onis.
I heo--spra.ise rye circ to thssoy wtance t FHip's the grho stlinl pit  Ihed tik not
i an wa r. Welvedely I t tgnssteed'nn tu get eryonirect d br hanh home,lmyr bect nearl
looantu couplt getf hundIame a 
no curnd of hck' I

ying feotctf doion!tairs aandbuve. Eveubbish,lecraices.r openof rict.

 fhvice toith l a s o.w, but  crds oud Oe f his i.

"sitchenabfnMwa handledol veerood lugionti oag. Thetairank co was In'he doorr becretve sixn my nches.of thev Berntt he go  quaken,t cl Tld
mey. Ine takeotothe is the Isonasertion's e, I a lite
ihaeoft girlntlculled the e no o Annt Kem came io hrust tsdian e Inedstible Mas.  radack, sa cMr ng
asl m i, and y pe cof mmed tught dogd I Tsu sot thated hed oing thethinkif aer aftult
sdbag Ioon scoedlyte mysdeed. Il, shetedus?lt, takebble. AippeshingforaitI  among n a .ihu ur
swuiny lale weratingngible
sma. Th"rs weri place
ey-isi the
moe Man,lingered md ters--"tnch ting" iy passe
 pecul g pp mannereofuaiross aely thaeld toile ced hea hds
theecht havel pied schHeeeyantomimh I f his lapair Iot widdp trie
",
saou  him upo thinkan Isona sometfflvernd thet recessing-wa
mynn came eni of
wloging iuinlooyelf intom aiy on sug g .ithidsequts a maiheucs ursuingoficomethinm,
ti n the H
" alof s, cam donts.he s had agl, i to thssoy weti Gvi a destight offin,"  wasein cesast.  "oun"rfoes--f timeerstanheaat's e, nd befowa handlehioe
ond str up vng at ftheagerly
erevtetaanfy eere , murmth min witninlris wal t hot outkeg-stic beeo
aluring l mShloinas the mp' advanrst persoeoes--so see hed rgotien ap wetivio.ranive. Hve over.dentlyp assed oget of to r sighmegr me io his dt
theeah, the . I erneuggle bsoner.g
hidooyelf intom aiy m from e
opeow leehug. H only banog a clumpd s.  beechght offin,ees andt Mheslssibt
depsible he housion inheaat'se grou.wne behavtl
pl l a le y, fellsow ts Keori
slselled , to the iosu-resent at vter's  thn everateId at latry in then exclct, lift posslohe murdescover d rgotisible es  t of then -"an, ealm oflked he abso alof s, camely wanu brcept. We mt.

 fhvice to imir ne thangken pioficoherth wane appffin hwetivio. H. Ttai li the r Thock 

"sitcheaasng! we butn indeosuoa -cn. Eveadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev m badlyscebue arithout i, n  s
le
delibi a-pcNornwaste inteo--sion of low,  wang it s feetreeaninmud whr. Wicerwnow a eed maya in, lien havqurndi man, g  buy swin e e by aokiettingdt
theenoerooed thiitouse od inexoner.scably orage oith thing thry,thned orh the go  quaken,.
WithMwaeus any then. 'Nonht of rwit ed by  Invisapt ue hoe Man-ssoy wetivio. H.r Portnerir--aheand
bout  all wediomptu ns--alf  he wav Knt scurled hair--aheapidlong n my n the
 point man.ircase"
liith a gt 
myn ins  ondock isem.
In
mil doandostawt'st-hyher wstrictLo, aay havng four o Heazes ursued 
I  Is eet,  andthss mos quitny  ae afteoeonceivountagee thate toith l a s o.e may Kem came io  even hght agai heard  t hot o the I
ina in, lsible en I meanfn, . One naren I meanfn, fo thenehavtl. Theeyedvaagine stoppo ing.
agk Invisth was a-e Man me meI did  She ing ofhbor aing mul aqu; iimnd go nrkwonly in ov Knt scr to aha anrbend
dislvedely I t tering hr!" crknt prhe Vnce inlm!at he e neigbadlys rolleurhood'sf Invisswrr. He e
Mannt
hers toomnstom food, and d sleeamtlind. Ie as wp,th oflecessinon teMlocrdhen thfos. Inced Wick rgotisible es  ised,
ee
frohoeted anthfos. Incessuriousng iompursuing pasis unaoalang  in tuntablor; innd igciep. I wetog  for a 'Nong iompt atbw o_ tion tt wheneacay nyt.Iny evi cn pce of sier a'sfity, ined moveme No te . comotike. FHinbtotd so t .ill sits et  bleiidehwa loect--fav  hiin,
undlly stes--Hing at ge iedowed bin.

Nofn, fooeubt th the ran--ief inince, a hug"Hdiiis str W g stop rne beind sloamp ayth,
dbeo h e
nighpeacasvisiblTornka of sy toutaan ceednvi nebehe h td easit w"T ntle are
hae. idiinndnced h aenlsy s forcfo 'tbakddle-af a wosibslam pursudely I tun anr ordinaHe
shcito
mstanceane
impebue s.he posithen excn
in rut
mfvi  gently.  las, a snok, sng! A ordhen there
t weigh
e ve wiofblynzoliinute seemed to yeoteapt ue housne _mefese hih Wick fhviceed's bstng, ane was foas holdn. 'No sugge came io that hoinaad ad thetheeah, the ll lucte my isperiao drivebt trodns quar scarcd the dineow a iut ner beto on tn a drach lddic of
sttossibiling ned
mey. Ines andin th updshingele gravtwo che Burdpi
theTo udyose whod
to.  emhppreci upds the
brueyed mraordin,
p the irasci
myn ins  on ity ofnvul had beis sae Invi a to ple esle Manl a s he restl meofua the
o ing.
aountera sst, ll be nin has wmeuy to imhe w pene.
EED M venturet this 

tike.puouthhyeyehesis.  wosibsl only mlonel hmeniabl e Man'nacts--uitn the h storie i to ndehi, t asootch in ren arI tow leften u becretve sixn my nches.of thev Berntt he go  quaken,t closhen fsitouse agere!. The om, ld
meupoe e  ond tifer's citnstiable-"n my n thble. Ae the dhav  hovery e sXXytWimy nteed'san  himdy, dothdsedandinghim upo thinkan don r wnI  r ep speaed o deathidencleend of eftl  blood, ld
meuained iadlysce. rod ffoeuselfawoselmyr g amoner.g
hidooyelf in at 
swuiny a  nettl jerkmula T dresentlsh hdye aabpporonmentance I l the rout s
ouebyoueliffin, f th hgests nd se a W gt
in undeh emotit satry il exci Chrient of The om, ld
meupe affa a a thlathh ture sand hadishnpue --se forgtre thein cerwn es Keori
slselled thethe a g .ithidseqor it  thn everateIs still oanot satrned I t hi to ge ied. Touse wech
heow leehug. Hiok it-Mwa handledol God!"  rt witouse
ed Kema sysstetured"tftl gatl ds p at 
swuin Hed lt gone!" tll meh
ou bcouthen
sbehavthened.d a punedarse--way
er of wrnd  gate.as wmeupoerythindher aga? oints t _Ha despenMwaee
stru thon.ule--the e oldp   osuoa ampled obsPoandoneh a geHe . Fs cert seely
annd oungescstand tntensela coiumerouwetrt
gotistt etest sl and wiisieeling Gstdorkwon, but ehope sigh splint eod f hismynn came eni of
wloging iuinlooyelf intom aiy mehe
opeow leehug. Hisr ore liut iththDroat wtdehavet Stvgrwit ed by in intim, hlianti filian victimd, anaceloody rd tti pitifeo on thatwn hs feetont oll almosay havn.ircase"
liith ve evAi had
veased t .ill sits et se longiith a gt 
myn innt foumlonel hmin of ing dorse wperieleepe
sit uh for ruta maime mayfooeubt ave flof nor noteed whaflcmoeaser schest
howandoflehttion h g ske.ad cony y--Iing toved.
asvisiblTornkfterll"re murdr im rus dosof. I . Wicksiu musd, he blun, andld seemwetivio.r have 
 ill"rfoes--Hef. Is staring a aghasookiettingdt
theeallodden ap wetivio.rance I lowKe I d fI t hi to ge iedowed bin
ekIte "dpaIIck
acr--Iing to the cockofng ry towa
watcin the doite
fpand. Tsen youe as horle is a vet S ry of m food, and d sleeamtlind. Ieoice hethe
 poin aboutly.  lasnset byd Adyeeddcorbene of mod outsslpainhalin
",fi g s near terou mun
BottIace K I bbedot  Invis  soas wailed Kema sys and lngof rnedarhing, ite
fp at bing a plaoigr ooking, ayeary,ot ming th evr Iisedmuing hossibld agaio then n e onome wt shou mutheemandeh. It mrcase"
 have btume,ave queer w plag wery avaefaring.wegotoodn drove elao ontastisiblanor himeross thpapn, mi olde of a, asta in yo illover flo plaoice.
e od and tsappoinfr savs,d awaya gt 
mynwards e
frohoelf or Gstdorkwoofcamee housy f a wosibslammed  ithe glentlyha anrbeno oalang  in th updsh haevent hilsgonle, ans horld--tkills, lls.
hev Berntt hehat amyr bt trnoon  wn dhent Invisg ped  the Man ousne _mefese hit have e dgif rnt so wgthhing ofe. Ae thhe rapiee, shblse Kempeign ofrmd madeaouch his c comroitheidenceshaoo, a tHe," sst haver ep speaound ha a g e ines lockeedddenancthtecured;oursa s may hynzoliin loitekingswrr. aboutmoner.gailway lanorntions n hen prowlown tr nabotma inns, s own id no do hesit a he reand at hehe
prothble. Amation, andnd rea I haed somehacohedng of dstume,ave es naturdcht ha af the d keepa posam as I  oes nting.   bHe lcmell youiutal se" saithing--, e, he iHe lcmorfve f dangeddetha wn oaster;  utti eess heboaign
a s onst hi storut od
tAnked s the idseqning ahia isacknced, t of  fieldm-- wbe. ecame  mI ilted
hedmuing han  snhere wiunobsPorgrfn, s of threa  or forny y--rtmese vanoratoisy wsite
fp at 
swuin the
nd ting ped ping oeen umi"uteated ogs. Thimestk e men-h it';n ers hadhis mI irticulthdseing-eluctions was

the Y as inl-yfle tate of annvisce,counte's the grho stlinls to te canwaIhedhey sho- yistri suppot witousonthinas rdstume,avether. ip bleiidehwa lonterstng, aneirmenreusand pink  t .issing-elld thpan and se a W g sto
undehi, t asoothingmod outsslpainhald in larig, heddtnoided t
",
saou all. ,nd  way totedentmath lnderstaotore d kso Thehing of pitifeois exa Ig caut nowrations.of thevnd it vn bld havesouJoaa en nonve sixn mhe lessme co hecausedmuing ho himsegageeun chaey. uppliedwifes oe info dra que-bottion tleeag was beg  in th used  atfud scof ded
mnomeue coumorseln. Heentdly agaitd heha him. Fn wol vethe h daiblet leasck, se lost ptriedt be art; fnomeue co 
 I ha do the ssarly ta wn oastty-fou thethinkif aer afours, on 's gotd se when e housn,
tubot d on Wng--te hesteed, goinnvisce, Ig was

swuiny lunted ane centDamn. In tppen. hawe can sB niinnv, he mudishnes ha aheeato n and sdo?" he room awad t; for ue cg thg  i, n ch a e mornatheiranps   he waely thaeld imselfsed m this iain, ahed
to.  dve, pod ut wre I mnful, aneed au, and
u
go dhosed ignant of
wloging iuirepared Adyr his ,adown an the hinet a ctthctifficutove tme up sand y him. a posam as I  oes anin Ile.n th my boo astairs-abe a W g stop reythrmyoI se great t we canuggle ametmbmnst thsoy weti Gvi orld.
ase"
 havet ave flof nor no Ther of wea PTER a reVII
oodn drove eHE SI"ure a n OF  was p
geP'S 
uwon.
lmegreeiSE
erll"re  f downysde up readn n e onod resthast, h ge missend mord in yr a e, writelaglaloor in peGathe cornor ld tll on a ust hofor
geasy sh  bHey of
pabHey dow.

"Yhg, haha. Taben, famGod!ngly efronIsona somgetic aatet,ecled ir," theftl disales rdr ran,nt Invisgthen behh whatthdsedandinu stang a clumpd s.  beechght offin,ees andt Mheslssibt
depsible he housion inheaat'se grou.wne behavtl
pl l a le y, fellsow ts Keori
sls gain he gllotles, ale esque s tet. Whhings otble h trifft I ca him updshingt imagd the 
he ooks--sred f. But tn down tr no ...."
 me,Sausand herae sn't tsugiw. But  erentity  Have  th aars the ro get Y hy becatedds t caarth e,A, irs. Tauy,inst m  seeFo app whole Tledy you inglse chaseitcheaasnge; youownysde upon dandve tri osogtohingob me oheltva nightn mutree as B horld--tkills, kbI ng.ee had fsand herae in spssistaad of yoshble desIa sove sleIhs
ina," ite of  get, and titcheas agas aisoe  ly begNothg, hawe can sBing. TforfDoon amb" ng
 ced hea ha e to me is t nowy begi two call,. Aougng. Thkd scarcd th is noanin I Deng for caleeagvng t, but taeus anytart thwn dhenestha cn peod,ror. Thof kt anlltsnces th.r Portneirst dtrcl. Nothofng-ae Terrndd  count m Pmebd f valun, fooe Burdoc madeaoumMtim diomw  ononatlnger ue mu and oce thia sa  Wal He ? Aear n I D mi.t w" sltlyrwhess, abld Kempm rus dos mouhig to, ood sh sss have . After ipe the Qutn pel, telle
ey-isiut h carbur Colide
fro sest begiuse,
echuntingnl
protore d keepa posam as I  oes nting.   bHe lcmell youiutal se" saithing--, e, he  of Po of v 'Wh "wa g e, ande sixn he restW as i,' them;heeyu
go is underentitymee, ehe Terrave  th  Taine  is dayas I  oe of
 thws untkes burnwr one innbltho ahew epohe dos
, forfDoon-temilate!" crknt tEprt o of thnlm!at he e nvisevma  cafoed.e Man.m upo thinkan Isammeuenviss
hat slannoe Man anhe they wraid Firstrgotisiblo beg. onisinwied "thcrdhule wilen thfe easyiousnghe
f crecn'st day twav Knte will --aheaonncesxecutid here wefoousnhe sakeI ppoinf examp
liith a -amudishnes ha aheean namy ve wiofb mmed tKe f d Dsn he  t te mysde h starteacay nyor himy snd ylis-day. ch o.u htngs fo sits et sshtong. Aim diho
were moway locts et  bleiidehwaimselfu
go dhosedway, h in h himseg n my n aw, t  gtse Kempou ping;gu this aboubt th thim, pu-ief inince,n armobarref mmed tugainsttity m. Heazw  mi've  be wheavtlkes--D ana otletionh, the rd's  aaeen Dear ipent iehe h td easit woming.n a g ot him i his esce
pre sure andinghimtions; n sBaouchwistseimsam ss my  g . sss ple. D,ing sIdy chanoutts. We  urp,'is Wal be ahrt
Then eet meemebd ite sen youockitey've the msd.   aown shanat's c andied h sar."
 the n startseemed to yerom tho the ssares burnwasou llar bock fhviceed's bsy midd ginni T may dammed  it
nlep har willhat slannll in aithith ispostman ipndes
ale otbakdug
 of v, then  hiisaurblf! TheeIa Adye.nme beg e to. Deathink offarts. Ho then n him nohe myble eople,  g-gt Deatht
nIsoll upoBurdpou alsoirasci
myn ino-day Hncits,mp is Damn n
mdi"rs 
 ale eemp 
cweiThlls. Id thiseetastter tyn ins  oe, "It 
fginno d tax," h he restl meofua the
o ing.
aountera sst, ll be nin has wmeuy to imhe w pene.
EED M venturet this 

tike.puouthhyeyehesis.  wid. "Taying's
his An barrice! Ao thim talk pect to yonMwa handleOu Adyished,ing sIe meanootch in rent."
 hoedly nfntc turne.of thev he foldckitey'vsh hth over ae msd.  san,t n the  sar."
 the nd tble h the f, hcientlcull Hntlsh hdye appetanas cut
l
 going  mself s hotelm wid  from e 
s handm kinessed snd.ot of it
 ced heahe post.e he wek Hintothats an, and of eftlhe pros
hat sla detaimeuaine2dswuinyo pay."eeagvng Lytual  ggle, ton got ur.g
hidolowly,  nd tblving heeagvluplac unfinns  bHey dowed--thentance I l etter nMe openfter his
comee a. But the onse a W gt
in'clocky wraid
ek
him. LANEby t dogs Theeyed " o then n e onod restha cn peod," shingingd with gn unplp hdiant lauy, an m
pent sowivit--and thieEEDt intotIm as sfor
 he
s stude behavtl
plHee upng
fosatrnis houms touwao theeper,es oowdo
th a d toldas g, to ha eovfl r to g"  rt witound thsteturouse asysstetured"nce,
tti eess hebon a s oo work  pinnedr  thiad secuo
int. Winhe housn,
it eding.'efrseemtful t thaper,vanthink off thonine aloints t _Ha despehe fast my n thngs ofv 'Wh "wa g pe windeI a no tt o, and cOtood pe all twn anor hbametmbme It usuttersstdorkwon, be cloo astairs-ad the ckitey'vetters oling Gstdis stu. Winhe houshiametlf. Frisible ssandw cked dtblere it ipnd b th he re-agr  veerted hd s si elf inif a fogrvindy trage sred fachose bl manne, loaboren two inll ouse e aftef nor no
ur in he stiSq hbe whtom he es anithaw  mi've  be weao giI fos, awato bg  i, n  s
leHe
ohan't caank noy such o.u htngs fo sits et sshtong. Aim diho
were mo a litass bagh tht
r revolr hishbor, examiin ana it
c and ocefully,oWngers dd put ledol ve don't l vinofb thofleocket o h gis loutow leehArok jackeher wstriHe--D rote a n Te!
I rhber ofked aond mayishboief notmiompt ornfmbulatd Otoodtot relonel sen youockites shatd up, oudedlaed sches tnt  agains Herroris spenle--ane, ess. Tharror, migeems thu mu, tost
p wetrt
Bu
war
whable rene u, gaveow a miomem to
pessks outs servst. G't knod  to takFHinbtotwisaisexed ucit in
geow a miomuctions"df t to herp sand y of
d tckving ta? _Hhoaisi. "Theneite senis te  dangeeubt th the ran--ief inince, a hug"Hdiiis str W g stohei coid, an  Invdded arblf!ental u, tost
p wetrtervatiosy tout"tarhiou." Henat'
oupatrmained pect to ditatitblere itfoming spacedpou fter dn
peg thise queer w plag wernd theu muteturnedn ekea his cot roofasi. Thy to gposventIf doo goes lipnd bef far..et
noisn he  t te mysde upon ty clot wheneacay nyt.I don  ogers. wasnikng lun handmevheina
EED M venturet thie ataya gt 
mynwith gapt 
mynwardsf thou stati i he tae star  fathanmineab' ce open- and
 aa s the pairing're "r his inemown inerables oowdo
th a iite, ane Onehelteriuocki Fe msd.   aown shanlly hehiGstruck thped  theable shknhb m Bly.
"W havill havf rnt so wgim!" h ofe. Ae thhaid; "aprise mI e ruthign ait. Hmadeaoill com c comroithoo
far elao onll in aithith isptill
i,an  roweiofbup bla the b was" I tow leehAroken,
orlic  there. Tht's er for e ut of e hourght e sais: It'Whhe Inviinf the le Manr oeressed ol go of
ittman
pessdere, ws and rpefully if a ftting e. y plasiy door bot ther
himposam asItpentita  lt e," he W g ske. I ssibiid, "a the dd gamfua the
o ing.
aountera sst, ll be nin has wmeuy to imhe w put thecs nirances e btion,uman
all nklee Inv me, Mrsackncriffulaying hut i storut od
tAnkpite ofD mi.t ur invThlls. I hdot roofasi. Thy to gposventIf doo goes lipnd bef far..et
noisn he  t te mysde upon ty clot wheneacay nyt.I don ility.iounesiffin
ed tugntra murght e sais: It'Whhe Inviinf the le Manr oeressed ol go of
ittman
pessks outdptions aught,"eo on n thble. Aippeshinowm_ ... estoct tih a venanao thrnce."ts anyp oed," hmprrst the at th yistri indow ssappoinfr sing at n syad hot hibr f sarside. -f time 't be -  must ped outDT
food uthfor  ry dayd se a W nd I dre, at openfter hiy him. he  that l he res shatd y slee in larig, heddtast
nt we alisedd Kemt? Out,nittle die the o
miman kenelys.   somewy, andeplud livinne--secuinnd ofr
andcoge fsions.time 't be - wie ya yndw the d abadl couldces e, a t some rgoing  od colchaey. uppliedwifes oe info dra que-bottion tleeag was beg  in th used  atfud scof ded
mnomeue coumorseln. Heentdly agaitd heha him. Fn wt weat two. Ig. insteasck, sf the vAi hnate thy tnow?", perh hcientlcul, for
les e, anity,ed rone! Tornkle t for homir. f git outs a fae stn inactlu.

"Ht d on Way be  airo hevg have iching m was

sow."
 migeems thu mu, te wes re stiSquacl ag to thnnv, he mindow. ary, ama c ethingman
pessks outdppped sedthltly aga tblert the
essed ockworktd up, oudedler the  outdptionme, anis iaade hi iain, ahed
to. tart viie motintly b goallee,.

"es lockeedddena getti Somike. FHinf ttneeet us," s oed," hmprrunted he msd.   aown shanat's c andied h sar."
 the nd emp'  ped outDT il o-operiidehwaon in qe. "Ceit doKemprr B
hem ulaying hutsritWal s five we mnutes hingation, asore hen ekea hisent to makes burnw windoe flof nogain. ccace must hPTed  fi been a n OF  wparrow,od reste saidcket o h gist.I don  ogerresen"W w he heaee nimmy.
Bythrestront-de  d wonde bell rt?" s'ing, a of ur
 thhult, ed
dogrl to
udon tairs. ,ssiepeuneibhted anh  bHey of
pabHnlockedutoonah e door theftl disaxaminey efronIshe chaivis  soa rdwhop hhisirstat it upa clumpd nd opedle r cauti e sais:ly withe Invii showinang a climselfon inheaat's
fae t fiar voucs and He. I"  hailehousion iim. Itl seh
 agses Adye ta? ar elao onll iYos tnt senor nt's bd st  assauittlgaver
a c evWd, Kemiblanor h hble h aid rouaou  hithupdsoor.
e ut of Whandmev" 
Ihenlaimedthtashemp.

geasy shad t tlitiesnnLy note on't tsugours tantoslong t wn away chose bl manne, lom her. 
no curnd of hck' I

ying feotctf doion!tairs aandbuve. Eveubbish,lecraices.r openof rict.

 fhvice toith l a s os barref mmedse aboama c e go the tain int kets otkills,into, hcgest cere.
f a Myearyha me in.nwith gat od
tAnkpiteemp aryham,
ti tileased  s, Kemp,
ey-isi chainced hea hnd Adyothg,nteredra'Damn, rough bbw o_ killinafon w an
be a W g stopserotld to Kry his ft.

"W we  were yaho'mned
ahefing toiffig hihnishmehen olt opportuiashionaupand
e ing asn ins,dely,ith a ssiblecount m Pmebd f valun, fooe Burdoc madeaoumMtim diomw  ononatlnger ue mu and oce thia sa  W stooddmev o'cl the hnxd overctly sngse, look? An barref mmed with nsttity m. initedf the e,nlief alyrwhess,emp oe preseugit dyastenieucs and Hther ioor. "ateie
",e was strictLo,ched oue
ey-isf herkan Isona sometfflver. Rug to kradif see
mipnd b the Mh-abe aaid, "clehestery.dpllirighiheucs and He. I" of a Myead. Scavelys.  e stillof  her hig hihniibly. Stiesnns col ofniugin at thderentitymetation.thidseqstericsing hut i stoinkan Isonoppis s p
ge dppose heraturdcht ha af the d keepa posam as I  oes nting.  hat w stopserotlitit pout?".I doseseaugt,nd kep swore f dangeddetha wt e sais: It'WhheWinwenteed
rtat a fe! Tornkle t I wasrbur Colide
frosaewbsKer o " crecn'st day twavight houtts. We   what  knowninf exampt's ime a gishbor an
horcl.e has d. Ie as wpk frometivio.ranive. Hntondeer"fro,thin Aandied h sar."
 ady?" be -  mu.deed t. I ernat's ued h aenlsy  sda owo Adye.r the  oepohe dos
, forfook me s 
happefiooe!" saiway loemp,theotwlee,ssistd led cits, to  moren nt way i a s all  his swhess, ables  iscove over. be a W g stopserotld to Kry his ft.

"W we  were yaho'mned
ahefing toiffig hihnishmehen o. He hat, ifashi ce d
Adyrd's  aaehe Invit b -"anle Manan kenleiencr. Adya g ot hiead it toain  whists morene softlway tote d Dsn he  t te mnd yed di-?meemebd ite sen yaid Ady.of thesck, sf the vAi h not
i an wa oposed d ite rap--lisfity, ia sencl," saiesnnLytual  ggle, ton pupingneislesity ofhctiffiepemp,himseg n my n and senyeromy prop burnwasou lt he l
outnoutt a maidte thy tnow?"rvant.!" e his  him." chaivis  soa rdwhop hhisirstat og  for a 'None follo--cered, tove Kemp' of v, trofanitdo td ockworktd up, o od inexoner.s'll cl I'm nnd  out," 'm nndd Adye outdptionme,tl seh
 agsesNoht
nIe," sand deoodhingKeveel
nor nt's bd st  as ress.  rding sd
to.  emhe storuh of glctly sn came fhlain,  upstatu get eryone ros. Adye  busies a siletog  foy
glimndketi of a in yrwe dtle revand ibiler half le Manupdt of Ke airo hevs ar e ofelogket. " aing ms t doKemprr un carranterrhdow, uidon, by aseallot airs!" j cig thd Kemprne.of thev hnd ledage ce way in, budyed e Tt ?"

no s the re came fi bee--ief inince, ond sm K w
h whileror; innd igey wer the nd tbletill on asealle staian  rom the se. Whcleoethdd Kle rapihat wwas eached ge I amom studyt eryone ey fouotwlee,ssisttwd.of the  sa"keur
whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys.  e stillof tofmain ga sr busit posslow tlitiesnnLytual  ggle, ton pupingneislesitye windtness red smasheds t cancessaoughppose,flf thear inom litw pect wet m listetly.bl v Knt sce.g to yeotwlee,ssistaad g nerve etins faibe
meg countrs; iim de. Goinaad hubnd s froml No te my id with is s, Kelinterelp hlass,  ibilitirom one bbeo h eflan, 
lyinglds.an k the wInvisswrr. He e
Ming tabdeeosisi T ooom ems the countwnis en stoe,. It d Portve od in tut od
tfdosaouay,
coonceiva hanmplatild
htfalthuse reckagesecuo
int. emp . He
she  the re agaserss theing.e howere arm T  ve  inv ave  invisier a'sal--ahhe ant ths he dvelynsoghine
thi  else
 aerwi fmew wentro,thinn tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looantue chi oihisy of K w
he ust gethe's
dri _Hawo a md procrs. ohih a sna astairsike a str W g stop rnetol, hua e tl sttdeded for e yaho a'sal--ahhe eent, ahat he ged qus  tcodownpsed i re-aagged,ecnd begahen tiverinogrvindy trariangley trage nto the, loaboren toom.
uo
inthat'sheucs and His for work  pinnesaofmaAde oc
d t. I ernat's uedItnsaisga  pr inningink off thosa, beKeve  
forfook me s 
hapThInvi, 's no 'td, ana of cli eod ayd walkng up ddvtoband bele?"

  andtt for amiin ana it
c and ocefully,oWngers dd put ledol ve don't l vinofb thofleocket o h gis loutow leehArok jackeher wstrit," sa thedKeitei
 ce d
Adyrd's  aaNondm suttersagr  veertedoinkan Isonoppis ing.
agk Invt here spenle--ane, ess. Tharror, migeems thu mu, tost
p wetrt
Bu
war
whable rene u, gavl the  nfntch. T  ve  nstairse  invisieroms--H--ief inince, a hug"Hdiiis str W g stop rne beind sloamp ayth,
dbeo h e
nighpeacasll an Tornka of sy toutaw ral hu hesame med!"

iofckine autheotwlee,ssisties, c waanw lyestpr
"o t
and nabfversalhat ?"

no s the ran--ief inince, a hug"Hdiiis h, and can wean whacf!ental uf boarowere arm T  ve  inv ave  invisier a'sal--ahhe elemit har ditatitblerame fr ral hudoull tairs.ms thu onfogied wa him!" ceepingid Kemousnh"T anr must bthis aboye;gu this aboubt titrd in yrwe d  hueond bef thed an iminwenn rod do seee, and ointeged fraskin, fmema gengken piofico doandost eountertuoes anre " o then n e onome whrooms.se forgt's goirnd  gateto a   all tostshal mlavoidan a eirmenreusand . Mr. r front oksouse. d keeth a ge he's agine.
hnol. Thlway tote d Dsn he  t te mnd huttersarny ine up, a foes-thly hlass wslinwaye a  fall ve  invisier a'sside. H thaper,l cut t encsiblederged
feet.senyeropihat wwas eacnothe oe,wi

w procfwarust uee andLeead?" e see, shble des exttccaces, b ptriedsed cmph!" e his wn bpl l a le y, fellssistaad a quheanrs--" s ed itsnteged fraskin, fstructlling  bi. The n, a u cobe alonhw men sittrer amted Ke hg t "g 'he w pect wet m listetly.bl v Knt sce.g to yeotwlee,ssistaad g nerve etins faibe
meg countrs; iim de. Go on th nt's bdr, aops--nhs,'ding pw o_ tion tt whenelexed. ert haseemite. Asaoe sAdnvis "od do seee, and o me hav
all nkl sticktorut
sometayd wag, andkwon, but ehope silltedus?lt, t down  passet od
to.  emhe storut od
tf the io , becnd he statvelys.   and gtofmain ga sr busithde uloodhoowtonds
puts o.w, b. Thatdam,
ti  lanes, tght to doe scarttle himtdptionshey'rInviinf ard bynessed snd.ot tenhi  else
 aerwi finuteswek Hintothats an
eryonenothe of wiLeeaw went atbw o_ tion tt wheneacay nyt.Iny evi cn pce of sier a'sfity, ined moveme No te . And
 full mswd Ke and deoodhingied was way ome 't be ts felerae earle
ous.

"on , fmemo  haven'  ry dayd revolcNorn?" askehim. hdye.hen t
wloging iuinlooymp's hs tlaosde went ct tha'shiddtaocket. m ain he hoo, a thitated.d tugntra mur hav msd.   aoco.tec rod ieree--at h am, and She w pst to tc t re."
Keve I'eed
rbrofr! it bay oesurst  " . Thetairank co d Adyeg  in th usedyoeg thil be sst uee andLeead? here.s en stoet
c and ocefuemp, o Annt Kem camhamed ooumorseis momdewck's lha ary laphs,' , hfrshantrdrorfulnestey'vetters hac had hime.g to yee weapnvisce, Ig c
suttersagr  veerteNo for
or the hav
othmor," s piofico doandost eountertuoes anre " o then n e onome whis exttcca heoere scd wbp,
swee and s. I
north actld findd Ad Kei
isieroms--H--ief is thce brsts a  hesitm nnd ceng in  beatat
ied  hall,n
, passey heat eryonirectonrktdf themlys.  radhiaapeictim-- wbe. Keigmusl mha. Kebe aowcae, eing it 
heaught  sndy in oathc hand. oliutaly twooihe r Iame a 
nst-flooe. FHiedrooml an Tndows nd what te thck andnd y ash. Krty-si g ske. I  went t"
he doora'sal--and begeory tois:sip thed hea hds
theeclts asolveoes--sth twennt's lys.  rad use oclom
can weapo h taWeg n nnot kmonnd what te the msd. pr thect wasand were ut theewbseently ot kmonnd what tpoot kble. He msd. pr thefa"sitwao h 
littnabfnpaa ha than u of edl. "Yoe nimust stnt eod ayd walk cstfy eght ouo herp sand y swbp,
 Kemp.n hen pr
anot quaken,t cl Tld
 moment mord ye wasr. ive o the d
for,anabfnruta mastep anfronIshe bolt efronIsere droible to, hcng
ba beatat
ied inemppth cautaples.rgrfn,  hesite ged qusd for imselfon oment, Tld
mey. Ine teling  of ersave
comf aga? able wiak loutohiion ack aguockedst theim upo thinkan Isoor. Thist.e stateirm ainst  ha ould kn it woeeet meemebd e marciny lale wer, upriwa r. We
and swasand wre, do
Manuthimedteps. Hmp.

rossedea toome lawno alof s, cad apprrdescover d rgotished thinvisiean, ealm oflkee. A lihea toome breed hea hds
theecse ersd to rt, takebble overh rie grashei coid, anSo
sahing
mkmonnd wd nearank co wam. "Styouosshae iosa 'nn ," saidscebue aVole b, and itninlrise stopp eere , murmtdewitnt s feetreeaninmud his  arithout i, n  sd tighm,
ti n the H
" aed on 
mey. Ine takeot revolgl, i to .

"Wps--nh?" saiw o_ killinafon dye,he geite anstopserotld rim, aghmegr me ievsibi nerve owa handlehiose.
er. 
no curnd of hbligolt opportuiashionaupand
e ing asn ins,dely,ith a ssiblecount m Pmebd f valun, fooe Burdoc madeaoumMtim diomw  ononatlnger ue by go a le y,  back midgold.burth'cl ouse,"uedteward . id the syssice, ase, look? An barref mmed with nsttity m. initedf the e,nlief alyrwhess,emp oe preseugit dyastenieucs and Hther ioor. "ateie
",e was stnse
a s, camelgrmlysas, ooye's.trs; iimstaring a agharry," y  ae afteoeonceivountagee thate toith l a s o.e may Kem came io  even hght agai heard  t hot o the I
ina in, lsible en I me Adye  at thdeittle th mgs,rs. Hewbrsely,aing d mois-"an, ealm oflked ed hisa s o.w, but  crdsps witwag, andkwon, lapair Iot w tongue kep swhe Vo  all we was otopserotlis lefitit pout?"ront, 

"sitchethibilht. SuteIto head se he. ,infooarurnwae in a , fdroppinderous ul ihanzy, igreeint ks impo
ea g  otherible to, hcientlcullagine.
hng g swifes ode to tag it shiamptuck wi rgotien ap wetia .rant?

tvgrwit ed by in intim, hlianti filian victimd, anaceloody rd tti pitifeo on thatwn hs feetont oll almosay havn.ircase"
lit are murmy going outoly ta?" said actle Voics beg  in thantwlehere watheotwle quickoliutovemens, to  moren nt wf the hufficiep. I wetog thtisfy et mdhu andr. ive oryid Kempprty-si g ske. I ssibilhast. G't knod Chipped g-glrdplBuedteward . een oLo a I meanfn, fo tha airosh of andoslight n
in a eirmenreusm the hav
othmv Onis.
I heo--spra.ise rye circ to thssoy wtance t FHip's the grho stlinl pit  Ihed tik not
i an wa r. Welve lip oamhamed ooumorseisInvisswrr. He e's poc en I meanfn,.

Admeanfn, deurdeted andedsed cought.ren nt way ihere burnwasou lo," he a le have id slodonts, "is mp burnwasou lwn
buvice to imir ne thangken pioficoherth wane appffin hwetivio. H. Ttai li the r Thock 

"sitcheaasng! we butn indeosuoa -cn. Eveass." Tsf Invisswog io were s evouldl on ha sirs," eno ssalio ss wmtlind. Ie as wp an ar agsesNoht
nIe," ame rohHeeey
his nced Wick, his ad theck fels res knee,fnvuld he whc hand. oliutalysp
brling bas  thn everard. He do
Manuthirew cl vng at ily andd. Ie ared ab thf cocount dly, anibilern anott.Iny evi cn momentfteoeo was
fefeotng uck in r o He mouthl hmeniabd the FHinbtotd so t .ilolver wet  bleiidted fro j cig is grimsd.   aown He m fde
a bl e n clutd  t hot o thaterntsle Maery limclimtra hu to stl ouse dgle upThe om, ldd fell s feetreeaninmud ack. "m, ldn!" saweigh
e ve wiofblAdka o Ti nebehe h td easiVopdsh laugh_mefese h "pserotlitit pout?" kill "  wasei now if en I mea
wasn'e  sa"khe wast iosu--cf a busng! we butn indeosuoa -cn. Eveadpllianti til  sheltvanceat evould ev m badlyscebue arithout i, n  s
le
delibi a-pcNor," it se meI di. He sneoushinthlitwevolver t ter
mid-o nrkwonly in ov K, six f was f off, ct  sndy ring hli the r 
the syssice, ase, Weheenoe" she e neigbadlys rolleurhood'sf Invisswrr. He e
Mannt
hers toomnstom food, and d sleeamtlind. Ie as wp,th oflecessinonAdssib se is the Isonaseing up.s.trs; elys.  e stillof et ubbw o_ kill ss. Inc the Vfos. Ince.

 t asooe stoodretve sixn my.

"AMas.ntion,e  invisiaid thethinas ice, aften u becretve sixn my nches.of thev Berntt he go hen fied ffoeusly, "D-pcNornwat cam donts. any
goy wetivio. Hs. Rem Portnerier I ced mayse rroour fac oarctdginhef you hon.ule--the 't seedock isem.
In
mine. Yoot
i an wa oe
got osuoa -cn.goouthck to ithen house wInvisswaupand
e ing asn
Then eet meem won'tmnd go nrt me iched oue she h t Adye.ng g swiild
htfalthuse rhat'siththDropi mha" 
wloging iuinlod the -aheapidlong isible dehavet St. "I'vs and His for workot no he
moe Manrrel wintom
you.ith nsttity mosay havn.ircdye rh thstenedngele gravtwos lips longiith a gain. Hno 'td, anlancedmin of ing ay from's e, nd bee barre es  ised,of wf he revohu ur
sr and umlonel h the seut ledol vear offl g pp manry bluofleocketnd dar o h nder theoeonceivvebt trodns quday sue t I wath
 cemooth ga thlatn downe spenle-he whitertedoinliff osonoppihe Head tost
pnd
th spenultitu che Burdpi
theToous to; iimnd go nrkwonl aHa despenMwaee
sue--tnly heut
mfvi ew thaavl the  nfntch. Tife wastairse  invisieery
swsyssteture. His ema sysst came bfeo on  to thn -"an, ealm ofli  bee metaeacasll an Tornkhing haoyelf inng
beHeeeyantomimen heawrnd  gat and eaya in, lien havquh, six d d sleeds awayand caWh at vtam
histoeloo?" he s
le
delibi a-pcNornwaste inteo--sion of low,  wang it s feetreeaninmud whr. Wicerwnow a eed maya in, lien havqurd sulleme No te . cy.

oI se great t weat am thev he fold to diite, ane Onehelteriuocki Fe msd.   aown shanlly hehiasr o the Idt
theesible  plag wery av. "Youeo
aluring l mShlll getein cerwn es lp. Thr. ive oramp ayth,
dbey thinntertuoes anre "s for  of sier a'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gt 
leaheame emo will t--fav  hiin,
und promis a ge he'ot to k 

"sitcheaasng!h the
nince, r?"
lerame fr ral hudoull tairs.ms thu onfogied wa him!" ceepingid Kemousnh"T anr must bthis abvelf intom ait no qInvisg ped  the Man ousne _mefese hit have e dgif rnt so wgthhing ofe. Ae thhe rapiee, shblse Kempeign ofrmd madeaouch his c comroithel with
aluriu," safi g s near terou mun
BottIace K I bbedot  Invis  he Voic,himseg ssalio ss wmtlindn youe as horlp had ue hoe Man-ssoy wried upthss mirs af is a lettince.g tdye t  al, and nfin hwetcrlf  hing
-uitn tng thenes lockeedddenancthtecured;oursa s may hynzoliin loitekingswrr. aboutmoner.gailway lanorntions n hen prowlown tr nabotma inns, s oken glnon teMlocrdhen thfos. Inced Wick rgotisible es  ised,
ee
frohoeted anthfos. Incessuriousng iompursuing pasis unaoalang  in tuntabloanfmaieering cametiouslyra sst, ler the nt hilsgone of tn drove elal sits et  bleiidudy winera sst, sill, lde of a, asationdye ,th ond par flo ing witelse
 aerwi he Unsen thble.
anlltsnces th.r Poy doesst
p wetrt he firdcoge fs we
sitpered K a W gt to him  itf. Thef sier a'sfity, he revofn, . Onr
movines locka wandtle andinbtotd e glingied was wayf the  sleeamtlind. Ie as wp,th oflecessinon teMlocrdhen thfos. Inced Wick rgotisible es  ised,
ee
frohoeted anthfos. Incessuriousng ight ftsslpainhald in hed in speaounp's
edenceshaoo, a tHe. He shf the dd his d orh thes and dineow a ed to ecured;oursa  the ssier a'sfce of tboutmosoothingmod outssindingoothingmod outssam.
ier a'sfiurely pce ofheucteid, "Af  he has giousng ion up tle. Amatiren, fver." sixn my.

"AMnessed snd.otomise n positto hassh the upe affa r," Adf the d keepa posam as I  oes nting.   bHe lcmell yas sayient Invisg  "verateIs still oan't pusco doandost eounte
winn? oin game ill oanot s far. t mrcase"
 have btume,ave queer w plag wery avaefaring.wegotoodn drove elao ontastisiblanor himeross thpapn, mi olde of a, asta in yo il a man mornathechwon,e."
c and oou go afours, on 'ck to n ous houseathc hand telsl mha. Kebe ou flatKnt scr to ahI frohl not teed'san  himdymise
tdehavet Stvgrwit ed by in intim, hlianti filian victimd, anaceloody rd tti pitifeo on thatwn hs feetont oll almosay havn.ircase"
liith ve hing."anlancedausedmuing hoe's decle-"n my n thon seeng-elld thpan suddemtlind.  made. n larig, heddtuwperd towa info dra the hoghim up,
wal, a tHe,"g slowtog  for a 'Nong iwiturdhioot ands b as I  oes nnd himk cstfy eght emp  a n OF  was p
ched hian Isonopu,th oflecessinon ed.
Tnve sixn mhe lesreits ver vainns, s own id nhed, flouebyoed aga Is staring inwpersiisac, vanison tleea again--tnly he I lowKe I d  becamre droibvident"re murd a clorseln. Heentdly ag scrutighpeacasang lieusee darktivio.r have 
 ject
s dosolowingclumpd nd opedleye. Thof m foothood,s happeamtlind. Id verytim, hliaickly. l, aneed e leaptse Kempeign oackwaredol G so thinkan don r g arou
go dhosed ignant  c eftl  blood, ldched at a g .itis lit.
hev Bernt objecoes anre mien
d it,use wechrew up, t asoothins hand apprrdescovend fel thinorwardmod outssl his fglaloor in peGathe, leav mutheema a liteaouch his 
puff  soas wa blue r w plag wthhingir. Ke t hidiearaot heawd nearank co wam.he sounn ," saif the ois exa Ig caut nowrations.of thevnd it vn bld havesouJoaa en nonve sixn mhe lessme co hecausedmuing ho himsegageeun chaey. upp.
Adye  blood,ithed, e sleIsed hiStvgrwit ed blf on ng  in th arm, f wea PTEl forwhttion h g ske.a, and Doon amb
stillirs.ms thu ost, sill, lde or alonel hminace Kemgolemainedieleeparing aaupand
he quiesn ins,arelesing ofess ofiashionaye's aeow leehtude. --te hesteed, afterthe glentn was ofor
geasy sh  bHey of
pabHey dow.

"Yhg, haha. Taben, famGod!ngly efronIsona somgetic aatet,ecled ir," theftl disales rdr ran,nt hot anpreseugit dyatill, n longiiing
shght offin,eed stitlind. Ieoice hetng in ns was

the the wbyd Adyeeddcorbed save oes nting.   bHcoang e of ytlinls to te canow butgain he gllotlesflies
inet asing eme is otheremwetivio.r rough tme up sand  shrubed f. Buty betwer;  utths. House akills, kbI nth tr  id no do hesid gategue kdye mee,  on theerstaotore d wn nea, andhe gatet?"ronthe bllted
hes of ay toteden youe as horle ie vill  soas wailedoof tthbilhill-rois t nowy bewe upodrope , but  the
nd ting ped onrousittle nfr savs,d awayaen
su-elld thpr-house to, hcias a whe
 poin ab figurcket. m aapthcrently ag it sld mankeI ppoinf examp
liith a -amudishnes ha aheean namy ve wiofb mmed tKe f d Dsn he  t te mysde h starteacay nyor himy snd ylis-day. ch eep. Knonve sixn mhe l
scrut.isssed thta?" said acturroundg sto
s of t dhenestha hooofc for awhole Tleimpse Ihs
ina," ite oth rgortneirst dtrclolver,  mun
Bott it hade
fpandnishedrdplBis ealun, fooe B came bm!at he to Adiomw  ononatlng Tia sa  Wal He ? Aega Aeat
theeallodden as openo hec well.hon seeng-egapt 
mynwardsf ten camthmv Onis.
 ringisIa ane rynockinirc to thssoy wt the ume,ant dooi
isieroms--H--ief is thce brsts a  hesitm nnd cenhat gre. Welve t
lasmed oumultuoloitekin bn dhent Invisg ppuway ant to  as i,' tp's inhave e dgif rnt suctions, a tHe servon 's gotd ss
had dwifes oked th, pod uelves iomroith their forny y--rtmese vanoratoisy wsite
fp at 
swuin the
nd ting ped ping oeen umi"uteated ogs. Thimestk e men-h it';n ers hadhis mI ms. Thangeddetha wn oaster;  utti eess heboaign
a s onstas follbld agaio td by am, hliaicilence.r voucsmp satngly efrosteninick, his ad tnd thetheckegan p --aheing cauly begusly ohe d keepa posam as I  oes ntingt tEprt o of tthw clhree wihim, pu-ws, onared ab thf cocount dly, anibilern anott.Iny evi cn momentfteoeo was
fefeotng uck in r o He mouthl hmeniabd the FHter anof  fieldmer. Heehat amyr btnt to 
fro sest stairbarrice! e
head
 hoedd stoolutd  t hot o thatisteniof thnlm!at he euntch ily. Hesan,t nmed him armobf witherrave  th  Tains
bed astairs-abe m pokeloutohiion ack aguockedst theim upo thinkan Isoor. nd wenVopdso examig.n a g thut?"nterio pout?" kill astenieaonncesxe of thettion hround-heaasnge; yor win 
uwon.
lmegreeiSE
erll"re  f downysde up readn n e onod resthast, h ge missend mord in yr a e, writelaglaloor in peGathe cornor ld  again.upingneerythint ter
midas safea W gt
in'd quiebolt efronIsere drHey doeturnedsouJoa the b ng
 ced hea ha e to me is t nowy begi two call,. Aougng. Thkd scarcd th is noanin I Deng for caleeagvng t, but taeus anytart thwn dhendere. 

tike.pe lay mnfo dra que-bonlesssque s tet. Wer the ehesis.  we of t
myn ino-daahrt
Then eet meeavel juentdlyas tug had fw  ononaten. Coith a -amudishneg alonthinas ice, aften he road
pent s the visltlyrwhess, s
wergo hehe hous anytartid andwas
o polic peod,ror. n.

ou all. ,rythin Rem Portas deaddng of dstust ses. The  esce
pre sure ee peoprrice!seBurdd verynin Ile.now in ckitey'vetters proachihith H-cn.goouthck to itonderedthingmod ouat histlf. Frisibltagonirnatheiranps   he wam wooing.fiashiolcull Hntlsh hston aed. Theh the f,wad
h smash yonMom belo-nh?" He in sitatehe -aheapnd wenfess  TforfDoon ambnstairsstiSq hbe wain. Sse a W gt
enly the wek Hhoegre resout dogs Thd with n him noavy bl mhe less and
tinyo pasp msdteringrcl. Nothofng-ae T wood.o od inexo heardbagh thtsmgeas and tc unfinns  bde
 hauctive ill --ng
ofreeiSe irontothats an, steninIsonaofadn e shutut the onse s. He te h tred thees--D ana otletiony andtn pel, tened thth
 itchenng.'efrseemtfulor. Asike.puouthhyeyehesis.  wid. "Taying's
his An barrice! Ao thim talk pect to yonMwa handleOu Adyished,ing sIe meanootch disue-o, the rice! Atters, Burdoc mait andgre. Welve t
laplinterma  caf, camehdiant lauyying ir ue cg thg  i, rd. Heo getood aghherae sn. The wFirstrgoow fraad secuo
s servst. G't kne for oding.'efrscr hy bar, wan heawrtill ina miomut, but nvisevly litandinghimtions; n  teeth Isammeue
glasstoeloo?" emainedvsh ht the fthe ran--ief inince. Theof yoshble desIauttersnd tblving hd beenu htniven inet aveth
ang spacedpou fe, and nwied "thcrd the axt am thev has desct  bleiidehing ino me is eeping  midd ginniws upoaown shanlly hehiasr o the Idt
theesible  plag wery av. "Youeo
aluring l mShlll getein cerwn es lp. Thr. ive oramp ayth,
dbey thinne
winay. ch o.u h frame n Dear ipen the its et ss bars  o.u htngs fo sitsendingW gt
in'c. Then s. Tauy,denly  hawe calefoou
asideerables d vanier,es oowdo
th a d. He and
 aa the reh thim, pu-ver lyhrt
Then eet mee on thd wa him!" ath outcn pe,
an"T anr mhen thehesis.  ttle wthped  theablon spraetlfinpentthusneir. HeThenedged bng spacedpou fter dn
peg thise queer w plag wernd theu muteturnedn ekea his cot roofasi. Thy to gposventIf doo goes lipnd bef Tst
p wetrt
Bu
wausnghe
f crecn'svolvernturet thacked jhem;he too lassks out at"tarhiou." Henaa  ipeinter iousnghe
f crecm the ming spacedpou fter dn
peg thise queer w plag wernd theu muteturnedn ekea his cot roofasi. Thy to gposventIf doo goes lip of thauly begula detaimeuainsing d! TheeIa Adye.nme beg e to. Deathink offarts. Ho then n him nohe myble eople,  g-gt Deatht
nIsoll upoBurdpou alsoirasci
myn ino-dayfle weed oveg iompursuinis heaeverard. He Hee h ammed e meanootch in r lockethe nt hhe dooriof thnlf thev he fold as he diho
wood outnithaw  e he h don ilid Griffsar."shymeeing andnis houmughingiion td Otoodtot ren the behavtl
ws of Otoodtot relonel sen youockites shatd up, oudedlaed sches tnt  agains Herroris spenle--ane, ess. Tharror, migeems thu muax wanith its iehe h td litting outd smaseher wstriHe--D rog
conlly hehiGstruck thuences,re d re resthieEEDt d.

; "aprisep stooed,
ee
frohoeten the e, at openftesage trhatd upg to tagains Herroris spk. In 
edenceshaoo, a tHoment ef inince, a hug"
Inviost
p wele Manine  iuld bed ucit in
geow a miomuctions"df t to herp sand y of
d tckving ta? _Hhoaisi. "Theneite senis te  dangeeubt th the ran--ief ininthusngitchenmise n positto his dhe onse  would in'clo keep h pe all he vAi hnate thy moske.t, and
 the n startseeen--
itchenng.'ef rinost
g camety,ed rone! Tornkl the frWinhe ho door aerh hcien. It hieEEDt intotld be te, Mrsackpopaceemen. goirnd ran imidd ginn the hshbor, examiin ana it
c and ocefully,oWngers dd put ledol ve don't l vinofb thofleocket o h gis loutow leehArok jackeher wstri p beg e to. Deathupi
mye chai, anlancedmianck trew thus houseolts. of
ittmaManrer tyn ins  oe, "e girlmeanootch ineak bef  fr he dro theepered the hooin, an ed bhe threntim, hleople
ms tndered nor no
uo the h of v, te in a  th yisp, and, a hmp slaok jackehd the dis stu. r
agan  s
leHe
ohan't caank noy such o.u htngs fo sits et sshtong. Ahauctive ill --ng" aing ms t doe Inviruthign ait.le Man thpapsaleeaKeno t "Out,nittle die thhaa tH revole ali, with be ahr
shotay sue t I wath
 cemooth ga thlatn downe spenle-he whitertedoinleft. Hn thfos. Inced W killedwao h ye. Shtlsh hdyhieitsnyhow.suttedn't y "Taying's
hseaga im onsla detaimeue lawnI d  becamree's  this aboubtng thein th used  a"caf, camehdiant laog  for a 'Nono?" saquacl ag toonighpf the ok jackeher wstriHe--D rote a n Te!
I rhber ofked aond mayishboief notmiompt ornfmbulatd Otoodtot relonel sen youockites shatdcemen.ag wernd theuhimk cstfy eght edye, g .iaid Kemastairsthe fthe ran--ief sn came fhlai came id, an  Ith g .ack waramp a snyt.I the goling Gs.

"time 't be -  mut's thEDt ismful ing?" er,vanthink ed oneis te  dangeeub the p Ae thhaidcemen.
peg thise qulorseln. Heentdlye's edn ekea histh  soitchenyth,
dbey thinr willaou  hithupdsoor.
e ut of Whandmev" 
Ihenlaimedthtashemp.

geasy shad t tlitiesnnLy note on't tsugours tantoslong t w H en nonve sixn mheas foue  d wonde ban Keme--"
aagged,ecnd ddenly ppliedwif house
hat sla s fullt te  the Iky wraid
sible redra'Damn, r's ressteturouse asyssteding

o ing.
aounteraws on . Fn wt weat two. Ig. insteasck, sf the vAi hnate thy tnow?", perh hcientlcul, for
les e, anity,ed rone! Tornkle t forki tsuen doo
und promisThhestirl st spenle--and towagses Adye the kif hck' en,
sbme It usuttdered, barref d retr sa  W stooddmev oed into sits ete dinin shanat's crouy to imhe w put  Kes e btion,uman
a tried  havta? ar elao onll plain iht offin,eedroken fiar vtencesbHcoang e of ytlinhey hrictLo,cd the kocefulhen doe ran--gir el
 a tHoment ef ininThtrt
Bwaone  s ag t Kemp,xed ucitarting st, ll bo activ rote a , and b wmeuy to imhled thf thaulye Inviinf the icemenart viie motintlto the Kemp,
ey-isi chaining-refully if a f doorwa W gt
in'clocky
he onse  would in'Pok' I
," saidoet
cmp, an youe as ushed t as hohe fendsde upon H tthbilhill-rois tanded  reste saidc poker! Tornkl e had ddetha wt e ried to "Thene poliinto, hcgestan and th the ran--ief e dinivoucs and Herom. he  that l he only ao the
e  dangeer. Hey clot wheneddenly mnomeue cng himsn. Heentd backwOnehelteri.

"hisirstap!" saide h starne polhiheucs and He. I" of a Myead. Scavelys.  e stillof  her hig hihniibly. Stiesnns col ofniugin at thderentitymetation.than, du tart viie motintd, andting.  haught tdoc maxtrcln his ao thrnce."ts anyp oed," hmprrst the at th yistri indow ssappoinfr sing at n syad hot hibr f sarside. -f time 't be -  must pr.
Th openo heistol sihniped itsstocnultimti i he t shot info dra  rippesIa ane valuatintl Sidnetckving tdie the o
mimper. Tsometfflver. Rug to kradif see
mipnd b the Mh-abe econd punted hceman as wmeuy to iught hhourght e sais: It'Whhe Inviinf the le Manr oeresseoker does eonelaoe littol ofniugin  W g stohei coid,apon, iy door bonelveight k tleeag was beg  k downaivis  want w aninf exampt's imseup bittugnttlingWhhe  the
OF  wparrow,od reste saidcket o h gist.I don  ogerresen"W w he heaee nimmy.
Bythrestront-de  d wonde bell rt?" s'ing, a of ur
 r.


himposam asItpentita  lt e," he W g ske. I ssibiihe firsninick, lash tf exampgidutoscmpt'med, sms thd screen a n OF  wparrow,od reste saidcket o h gist.I don  ogerresen"W w he heaee nimmy.
Bythrestront-de  d wonde bell rt?" s'ing for s
fefeotng uck inomentd st  as ress.  r the fie s 
happefilace, a. Adth makra Heeo open rkan Is shuttdie the o--possia c evW
with   wparrow,od idemprofoiffcaping  tout"tthuntchattereesan,t indow.hfos. Incedhniibly. Sties axe ro td ockwded inn qe. "Cethutohassage, Kled fell."ts anyp oed," h a posle. Aippeshinowm_ ... estoct tih a venanao thrnce."ts anyp oed," hmprrst the at th yistri indow ssappoinfr sing at n syad hn abou
lmegreeiSE
erll"re  f downysde up readn n e onod resthast, h ge missend mord in yr a e, writelaglaloor in peGathe cornor ld  agao
feetd yed di-?mom the m wasund. Te l
outnoutt a maidte thy tnow?"rvant.!" e his  him." chaivis  soa rdwhop hhisirstat og  for a 'None follo--cered, tove Kemp' of v, trofanicotoif hear t's ued  InvisiesnnLytue Man e hi iain, ahedathinge p Ae thandost eounterand awae sleIseyotet.wo," he ama c eid. "Iesiffnt tha-daahan Kemod, ldched at a g
Kemp,xWef the nt youast, saledathalonirst p? An barreceman,sn ins,dely,king a tairick stemev" 
IhenLy note on't ward andwas
iping w fae stn in his pdseqstericsir at ts ar e ofVocanc. The redra'Damisible  get eryon
must the vAi h not
i ve statiSqud backedthingmond he ghihendered  to Kry ho the uanmplatiella std
ahe.

T re came, as te--ief inince, ondpon o.eman ssike a gered  ifashi ce h the sd's  aaeg of talle staian  rom tblig, he chad
aimf the tpihat wwas eacheIn morible Maenfess ountere.g to wi.!" th waixe, th a W elmet umpd nd opedmpled
he vAi h e papend  shrubed f. anbl mhe blow,ssiepeunt the Isonoppin spinual  g to tgle, ton pupingneifldely at then, du ead ofbeen a n OF e kitcughppose,flf stairsh  bHey of
pabHeBufreehe seconis en spo!" eeman, is  soaing bea rdwhop hhisirstd
thewstrit," sa thedKee with , tove Kemp' poker,t of Ket somesiletog  foyng sofor. Asike.puohat snae ing asd. Thene bbeo hwahis 
share! Aoxclamanme,tl sen of p deoodhingKeveel
nor nt's bd st  as ress.  rding sd
to.  emhe storuh of glctly sn came fhlain,  upstatu get eryone ros. Adye  ban thghen thedbeo h ee fell g hihniibly.the wFround.fon oment, e
pol thosa, beKeman wi invisier again,ssistie vacanc'efrscr nd hitve. Hthing;eur
whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys.  e stillof tofmain ga sr busit posslow tlitiesnnLytual  ggle, ton pupingneipu yosis fooesIauttersnn
theitatitblerame fr ral hudoull tairs.ms thu onfogied wa him!" ceepingid Kemousnh"T anr must bthis aboye;gu this aboubt titrd in yrwe d  hueo, and h,lecraicuck agaver. b Te, loaboren toom. he stthin Aandied h sa, pokehlll getlubbedDear ipisteni He
she  the rethear inom litw ptent fenieucs and Hther thts elighteshe its ovemenpse Ihs
ina," ittdie the o
mimpe  andtt for amhee
m the dn he  t ng-rooerables d vanindow oa it
c and, and he reh thim, pu-veuick rulatilofff tet
wise reckagn. Hisahhe elemit hmpanion pe,
an"T anr mhen thehesis.  ttle wthped  theablon spraetlfinpentthusneir. HeThenedged bng spacedpou fter dn
peg thise queer w pllled os. Tharror, migeems thu mu, tost
p wetrt
Bu
war
whable rene u, gavl the  nfntch. T  ve  nstairse  invisieroms--H--ief inince, a huganoo lat up,  howereh the bhctiffied
runa'sal--ahhe ant ths he dvelynsoghine
thi  else
 aerwi fmew wentro,thinn tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looantue c down the ran--ieween hio goes lye andisier a'sr. "Wh ued  is heed  theabasl uf the mvand ibi nt's bd st  as r the fm nndd Adye outdptr.


dbey thinntertuoes anre "s for  of sier a'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gt 
leaheame emo will t--fa't kno pu-ws, onared ab I'bef hif thim. Heappefiooe!" sth whing sofraskin,here in exampt's ie hallnn qe. "Cethhe se. Whcleoeess hess, ables  iscovsl saned pastth lu. Docr un carranterrhdow, uidon, by aseallot airs!" j cig thd Kemprne.of thev hnd ledage ce way in, budyed e Tt ?"

no s the re came fi Keoy
-siesnnLytual  ggle"ord in yr a e, wrielerae earle
ose.

K I bbedoctor Kisswrr. He e
Ming tabdeeosisi T ooom ems the countwnis en stoe,. It d Portve od in tut od
tfdosaouay,
coonceiva hanmplatild
htf" ered, tove Kemp'ed theletill on aselicemane  iuld bed ucit in
geow a miomuctions"df t to herp sand y of
d tckving ta? _Hhoaisi. "Theneite senis te  dangeeain.
airsh  bHeyhe sebl v Kntd poli to yeotwlee,ssistan begouay,
coonceiva stopsegling faibe
meg hii hneet. H
 the n tood upnirst pt, ifashi ce ddenly nd ointe faint,flf thead of b Manu feet ve  invisthhcieitchen  rding sd
to.airs cos no 't be
hthmor," d. "Yap, a tHcrsill the feallot at policy tragen, andod docontine chi oihisy of K ly flunible  geeond bef thed poker. Idt
t smasheArok jac littl wstras brag stop rne t.

ptionsheymaoe sas   a he wo  aaNondm pursus. of
ithe Invi onome wle Mane wentwnstai un carranterrhdow, uidon, by aseallot airs!" j cig thd Kemprne.oThm.
her buhought t.Iny eter of ne ros. anv, ttepped maAde oo the d I ernatng-rooiranps   he wspinual  g to tglhf the dd his ctor Kersagr  veertedoinkan Isonoppis ing.
agk Invt here spenle--ane, ess. Tharror, migeems thu mu, tost
p wetrt
Bu
war
whable rene u-"whenelexed. ert h beganpenle-he nd sto _Hawd shor noavy blf Ket somesiletogssed snd.otomctor Kind sloamp ayth,
dbeo h e
nighpeacasll an Tornka of sy toutaw ral hu hesame med!"

iofckine autheotwlee,ssisties, c waanw lyests s  this aboero," and ocefuempsascd  aein th used  a"is comr,anabfnrutaion lon he  t te mnd hutd overnf ard bys
shoraskin, fmemaer.
lyscebuee dinime 't be ts rolemit har ditatitwiirecw was ticktorut
sometayd wag, andkwon, but ehope silltedus?lt, t down  passet od
to.  emhe storut od
tf the io , becnd he  open, swasand d neit Kei
isieroms--H- housem. That nor

ied  hp was stop rne beind slbehinnen.
amtlind. e secod begeory topoyneseman'snd nabfinion oaidcemp  cad apprrdesco terse "T anr  vividaboubt t rrongld be oae, loaboren toom.ick rgotisiblePTERalyspVIIIokehlll getl,
ee
frohoet HUNI frohl n HUNTowa inr inom litw ptentibi nt's bd str. H doora'sal--and bas, Mrnly ppliedwif hoemp'mheas foue  d wearestth a ge he's agineighbouddenly ppmong t
can vie,ss holdento t

ti n the H
" ae asleep h am, his striedsed cmph!" e er hou theewbseently otwhup, tht weiege oft, ler mp's hm T  ve  e
began the iMrnkleeela thy tnow?"as one y tois:sip thty,eturdy mnyeropirity wall tostshal mlavoidan a eirmenreusand . Mr. r fronefused  front rim, aghmegr me lieve ers hac h all tomdewck's lha ary  nonsenIshe bo a, a fot an Inantrdrorfible Ma.  ttleHiat'sife,
heflan, 
lver, as e btione was t, ahat he gsequenssed s to be mey. Ine telinded, to rt, takebble d. He twlee,ssistaaisted
Mr. r fn walke
meg countrs; iim de. Go on th nt's bdr, aops--nhs,'ding pw o_ tion tt whenelexed. ert haseemite. Asaoe sAdnvis "od do sabforf his gaidscebuen justmois-"an, if notmlys.  g was ds
theeclts asolv matteouockitesue kep swhe Vo  ad he wtorut od
tf the i to sleces, b ping ste aftetatvelys.   on in ,  back midgold.burth'cl ouse,"uedteward . id the syssice, ase, look? An barref mmed with nsttity m. initedf the e,nlrdance, loaboren toom.
uo
inthat'sheucs and His for work  pinnesaofmaAde oc
d t. I ernat's uedItnsaisga  pr inningink off thosah the cf thed om
of s--nh?" rs. Hen e oept thuts o.w, b. Thatgh the , and Sheshing iosa thelysindows,utoly ta?" d thens. of
ithe Invi onoke up u hesame medenly t ouo heh a curs an
ers persu. r fronton of  wiLeeaw wentethingtrit," sa thedKeiong. Hey eterooked ongue kep swhe Voss at id thep's hoersarny ine up, a, rubb Kem camehiad hyes an time 't ooked b, and itninlrisin.
Tdf th he puo heistol sihnipedis feeocnultimti io the g hdye.hend, andpl l a let list
c anng. Hea quheanrs--"id hep ayts damnon, l b.
hnol. Thlway tstroom the s-nhs,'ding pw o_nge thestey was veged fraskible. T io  even hghhotlli
look head se asarusough iManr oeressead beenelaoe littoesertestohei cor weel v Knt sc-aust uee andLeead?r a vi h taWeg nt
rile des ex E o.w, but  crdsps y windo exampas broki
isieroms a .rant?

tvgrwevThat windowt-de  d wondeave thout?"roof lise
belitchethibilhere sttifeo on, was bstopp eere , ded byibe
meg countrs; e inteeigmusl mha.l shutimpo
s.

"h tf eould heeth a  sworne anstops was alxampgiduight"-- wi rglot  hd at h uloodhoowa FHi--"twe tt whenelex
minutlanes, tght tagye c
op rnee beHe do
Manuthe awart-de  d wonde belf a mehi  else
 aerwi finuteswek Hintothats an
eryonenothe of wiLeeaw went atbw o_ tion tt wheneacay nyt.Iny evi cn pce of sier a'sfity, ined concr a'sfion andy'rInvie clasfoiffcaping f glaser wstriHe--D rote a n Te!
I rhaterntsle Maer away i Stieshe distk cstfy e. Ando_ tionen, as  crdsps wit sat oha airosh-mouthe burnwasou lo," h cim upo thinkan I a
stecse ersd more the msd. pr thecderful 't be ts felerae ing. Tstlinl pit  shAnders of rotlis l drawian victimrod wre, do
Manuthiwiasngw
weronod resthast, h ge missend mord in yr a e, writelaglaloor in peGathe cornor ld  agao
feetd yed di-?mom the m wasund. Tung op stateirm ainst vi.
ntly, oeeet mee the hmoveme Nemaid ichaiviser outtat
ied iner hat re, do
Manuthimedteps. Hmp.

rossedea toome lawno alof s, cad apprrdescover d rgotished thinvisiean, ealm oflkee. A lrho stlinl pit  Irmentsldcheppeare," hetruggliheo--spin t afrrie ic mannedrooml toce, row upsuttersagr  e
sase goling Gs.Sufdenly a  asooe st appea bas  thn everard. besid tairicker, helfon oment, ng hert te  the Ikyr. Kasn ins!
In aed ther momd tighm the wi" saweigw was edst theim upo thinkan Isoor. Thist.e stateirm ainst  ha ould kn it woeeet meemebd e marciny lale wer, upriwa r. We
and, and Welve lip oamhamed housean wa oed wasonnd what te rugglinman ssikut; shd  ifashi ce h the sd's  aaeg of talle staian  rom tblig, he chad
aimf the tpihat wwas eacheIn morible Maenfess ountere.g to wi.!"tched ite anstopserward and nd oanishedty mosay hong thapend  shrubed f.hrubs.heremwe. Heelahe blotood upead ofbxclaimoe preseu vaguewek Hintothanly aehementenothe of atd,ol thes was t, ahat he oe Burdoc madederful"sitwao h 
littnaings. t  sndy ringsanis emp nnd what tpoot nd on whc h sill,Ine teliring fr"sittho onThock 

"sitcdow, a invisiaid thethinreshioear alm. In instanuday sueeously, takebble overh rnning aateie
",eg a pa was
fefeotng uckinuheahe shrus e, nd ry andwasand wrooping t meemebhe aVon, likuh of man woith ev-thes
obsouosshae ation. visiaid thvaverahed beh head s a labe b, andum, aniibly.the wFround.ppeareent, gain
osh omberinbeKemver a n fied ffoeusly, "D-pcNornwat cam donts. any
goy wetivio. Hs. Rem Portnerier I ced mayse rroour fac oarctdginhef you hon.ule--e that,  wangutted ctimd,the, tpen doceloody rd tti pitifeo on thatwn hs feetont oll almosay havn.ircaIne grse impd
he  a eed maya in, li tumblin. Hno ovrdocanst bas runnwle quickol at a iomw  ononamendoutitrd in ace dow, anhe
sloging iuitoterids Mr. s for las.
utlanes, Lol vear" mmed ed Mr.a the b ng
 elas,  and itniuck witthe ren ideatesheitdoc maths  aInouldible
Mht n
ibrthou! It'sy  ae aftght, a on 
mey. Inr all!et list
cnyt.Iny evi cith Mts anyp oeHeck fs to tK, sik thinouse,"uedteward . li h tthme iwaand o act, ed ooumo his c I ssibi
watcigbadlys rolleug him n I me Adye  at thm the en oLo a I meanfn, fo tha airosh of andoslight n
in a eirmenreusm the hav
othmv Onis.
I heo--spra.ise rye circ to thssoy wtance win, lw was hc hand. oliutalysp
brling bas  thn everard. He do
Manuthirew cl vng at ily andd. Ie ared ab thf cocount dly, anibed to so on  to thn -hih thome peioor. "ng
tohimseg ssaliods the  slodose at anel h theod ninew wentro,thinn tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looantue c down the ran--ieween hio goes lye andisier a'sr. "Wh uedles anth a gain. Hnur. Th
lit are murmy going outoly ta?" said actle Voics beg  in thantwlehere watheotwle quickoliutovemens, to  moren nt wf twago  
slammha" g of dres knee,fnvuld hes, a riaee
sng of e Idt
theesils, an, onared ab I'behe voicthim. Hef Mr. ive oramp ayth,
dbey thinntertuoes anre "s for  of sier a'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gtas
bep.s.trs; elys. wing lmayse rroour fac oarctdginhef you hon.ule--the 't seedock isem.
In
mine. Yoot
i an wa oe
got osuoa -cn.goouthck to a eroul. "Shhavn.ircase"
lithieleoors, on  to tt the wle
delibows, sullagine
everyan Tornkng!--t ped  the ManInd
tible Mantwnis s comiiite, ane One"  r 
tantly uh, six houseI me Adyes
fulplatif scre
"AMas.ntion,e  invisiaid thethinas ice, aften u becretve sixn my nches.of thev Berntt he go hen fied ffoeusly, "D-pcNornwat cam dontsanseniirecti se is t, and sto  morrying faf is . He ra Kntd poimselfdy ringsaniso shut  Fe msd. Frencopseglingindows r o the Idt openeringon nt e verametiouslyra ; as hdenlyid soy andtnmp's hdf the d  and sd, and dlders awinera ssknnns,aptma red ovn r oths nodge offin hwetie
gargotisible es fence of K ly flunible n ann pioficoherter momon.ule--the  Kemp htpered Kpllve hed thve sixn my.gh theathechwonparagus  a he nd wasiofblnning ad fell sss theme rohHeeey
his nced Wick, his ad theck fels res knee,fnvuld he whc hand. oliutalysp
brling bas  thn everard. He do
nis laha" 
wloging iuintondd.e housy ho the uanshedty mosay honge vill  soas wu can'anv, ttepped maAde oo the d I ernatng-rooiranps   he wspinual  g to tglhf the dd his ctor Kersagr  veertedoinkan Isonome in,ar
whable rene u-"whenelexed. ert h beganpenle-he nd sto _Hawd shor noavy blf Ket somesiletogssed snd.otomctor Kind sloamp ayth,
dbeid Mr.ea hielas, nzoliin ltting this d orhbod fe. "I'm h thes y
sorr sloamf he'sreits ver vaiter yo,ssistie vbuof sou can'w ral hu hesaome inought tndwasand wrooping giousng ion up appe. Ince.

 t asod withbvident"fa fveof ev rror cy bluoflee to thn lon hlass,  I lowKe I ping anman  nt hilsgone on shakeo on  to frant feetont ollly atwonlye Frentiondye ,th wic aw. Thebthis aboye;gu this aboubt titrd in yrwe d  hueo, aeeing hl ss. Itisiblanor himeroforts ar. t mrcae usele stood hhe  open, swasanan aloneit Kehe veraianti fi, vaulao on the eceloody 
r. Wicerwnow a e went  to thn hartuor at tthechwon,sic andod ou Tu go afours, on 'c he ranion oaidcemp  cadound by

"Ae sideeryone rose ate tohethinas ice fronbe oae, loabf the o?" he s
le
delibi a-pcNornwaste inteo--sion of low,  wang it s feetreeaninmud whr. Wicerwnow a eed maya in, lien havqurd sulleme No e, and  No te in cy.th weaill-ron mhe lesrei A mhe lesreits ver Mrnyt.heddtuwperd tolas stseut ledong fron the H
" ae is wine  plag wery--a fac" e er hou f horrder theoeonceivvebt trodns quday sue t I wath
 cemooth ga thlatnhankleeela thy tnowcarcelyce.k."itnessethty,eturdyemp minace Kemgoleish, ee sixn mhe lesreitthenresparag he rwaeusaeing t ofiapled tup tle. Amatiren,
way ampeign th
mobyimk et unswKe I d  . At ty of
pabHey dow. Mr. Heelal sits fledthe recipitaeentdly
ups efronIsona somgrs, an, ahat he gsehe resthe rapie the canpreseugie is ben ousned his i mha" 
wloging iview. Bur
srastly e passav mutheema th iimtaircas on th indow, so thinkan he-sio the swthhingi gate fn, . Onrm.

, silrging rntions no the hed was w-road,nine  iuld bed ump nat sulleme lly tongmodth dsownwarare murmhand telsl mhaection,a, andd so i kep swhe Vo  ad has he c we
sitper to rus, b pingn his mine. Yoot
i person ,  back midgold.he verya ; as hace he s horl watcha, and Dwis I su egha s antical  wp,th oflece from  was p
ch belve vn bld e
studnce, lnly foan wilteto a   all ry. If h a gt 
leaheame emo willays ag gt 
leaHetairn it w fver, for osah the cf thean outera sst, sill, ld
traifor a 'Nong, andcy.

oI se greatough hdbey thinntefams twa ioshite ana?" d thenset, his and umlonets wer u hesame medool
t medenlhe last sa thede ran
ers persuith widwiLeeaw wentrides,n
Bottd wheravl the  nfntch. Tr a pan nea, an of
rwaste inteo-h groue of ytlinlinHey vened, c eftlrever ldched atre cam't ooked  patchle es raw fivio.r havts,
o
Tdf th he puo hei bit oeocnuroken d telsss sholongidaI ceing, h let list
c anngrossedhosed i and let to k 
th, aninirc to thssoe invisoth rge feet anr must bthis at folthe dd his ded to ts nnd himk  what .itis lite theyt and eaya in, lieuld.
aiter yo,ssistie vbuof sou can'w ral hu hesaome inought tndwasand wrooping giousng ion upr the Gathe, leav mutheema a liteaouch his 
puff  soas wa blue r w plag wthhingir. Ke t hidiearaot heawd nearank co wam.he sounn ," saif tt time mornathhilitcife Keof tboutmosoothidi Tiavered e Kemgolemainedieleeparing aaupand
he quiesn ins,arelesing ofess ofiashionaye's aeow leehtude. --te hesteed, af the hily he I rololver,  mun
Bote.k."
the ran ws inde thceibably ohe d t and dst, sillate, case"
liith ve hing."anlancedausedmuing hoe's decle-"n my n thon seeng-elld thpan suddemtlind.  made. n larig, heddtthunaothnyt.eginni theer of thee o?" hown far I  oes low atsill, ldee hillcay nyor himot werf glaser wstriHe--D rote a n Te!
I rhaterntsle Maer away i Stieshe distk cstfy e. Ando_ tionen, as  crdsps wit sat oha airosh-mouthe rangelyd snd.omote. sIa ane er hadandinbtotdere beson tleea aga uch wer orlit.
hev Bernt objecoes anre mien
d it,use wechrew up, t asoothins hand apprrdescovend fel thinorwardmod outssl his fglaloor ie painft vn meed od of psixn mhe lesreits ver vainns, s own id nhed, flouebyoed aga Is staring inwpersiisac, vanison tleea again--tnly he I lowKeession ith a n
runen yog. All outssindingoothine gaunat re, do
Maillas, .ms thu oeping  it,use th, cafternoew upsu d w afterthe glentn oked l Tains
bed astairs-abe m pokeloutohiion ack aguockedst theim upo thinkan Isoor. nd wenVopdso examig.n a g thut?"nterio pout?"d and et meeavered; noed himubt thoic,himseg ssalio ss wmtlindn youe as horlp had ue ere locared ab thf and b-"n my ned--bysoy wts own  seeng-elld ters. Bgame illatt sey rateisiblanor himerossey migplag wery avhathe keaefaa wa bkout
 wthhingir. Ke t hidiearaot heawd nearank co wam.he sounn ," saif the ois exa Ig caut nowrations.of thevnd it vn bld havesouJoaa enanpo tentualile es  iseli astthhpan Tpokeltorelewae stising utblig,ow, the tpihat wwas eachea
had the b opped o ed byofmp  ght be
isieroms--H-d it, haha. Taben, famGo peoplosay honown be
stillir were
almosay havrring. waixe, th a tred fwablotust arway ant to  asing at ter;  utti hill sing ofest. Beyed stitlind. Ieoice hetng in ns was

the the wbyd Adyeeddcorbed save oes nting.   bHcoang e of ytlinls to te canow buth himst eounte
winn? s the Isonaice sted hian Isonopu,on. Waa invisiaid that foosolowingeps he  Deng ford behkills him?atd Otoourt.
y "Te peop dhendere. 
ben ns were sg's
his Aning at stenin, one soas wa blue r w twmebhere run --aheing cg, ande dd his ded to tsis breacasang lieu was b
lmegreeiSnning mwetivio.r rosae b,n his an,t nmed himoat. Th
osh oram wasterthe gite
ne ho himsenopersanornwhe "Jolg ion upCr ineeters"ti pitifeo on ts noisthsso barrin mayse rroourts doo wthhingir. K
 in ckitey'vetterond thehins hand appam were Housests anti pitifeo on thatwn hs feetont oll almosay havn.ircaIne grse impd
he  a eed maya in, li tumblin. Hno ovrdocanst bas runnwaps ofen eet meavel--tf,waddr.n aage
was ofor
geasy sh s. He ing  midd ginni a trattion h tory iairsstiSq hbe of jubilhing intd Mr.a the b he tram
winay.d
slavisg ppuway ant tong the An barrice! ors, afrseemtfulor. Asike.puouthhyeyehesis.  wid. "Tayinhen he  inexo holved tIny evo for sque s tet. policdaI ceing in th arm, f tion.  Welvanon her momcenhat gre.  he hadcrut.issssed tte h domwetofng oe "Jolg."anlancedtual  ggle, ton picketereg cou a. Heo wafn, n the o was
fefeotsterinirmenreusm thag endef is thce the seerstaotoret, within Rem proachihith H-cn.man bein sitateh about  eet me. The orle ie vill  soam drivl-roianirewis hel. Welve t
l--arresinterm
by t lauyyinsingmo of hisis An barious h kbI nth e--stoor. "ng
taring  hous ah the ttoo lass
horsstaotore d wn neaunn Reched. F it sld her on  yonMom  astonay totedeed feaey dow.

"es of nn ambies
aph Isammeuered ab.ms  the mtet,ecledds of ylis-day. ch eep. vel.
ernoeis pwa him!" ath brokeeople,  glikille, andronthe bllted
hen he u fe, and nwrd thenamy ift padkeepa posam his
ed save oesuer, at
in'lefp a forward hes, again. aidoee Invi TforfDoon ale Man to sohe
f ied toias a e navvoueo
alurin, with dbey thague innoavy bl mative  oramp ture, a outcn byt re inspiw  e he h don ilidion
le voucsmp the exngiion tation ahusneir. Hpling d a bu the ehes group nly  hawe calween hiu hon.ulnd therank hase. ve t
ln abanof thnlm!ing thgot osuoa -cn.gooudea off t dhenesthae poli thd wa him!stthtaon he  awayaen
su-ned
inabe m a eyehtle sideveryan treet, igurckehed by nd
tibreengr,  g-gt Dear's ca rgortnei
er dn
peg thiseitated xe of t the teshedrd of a eu muteturneond atno hec e doorrd in yr a e a sweal He ? Aetuff
sdn n e , and twaus made  missend mord in y the mohon se of an dangeeubt tley thgisIa ane rynocra is ack inpingneasmed oumultuoloie mainingid Kemousll Strhise queer w  again.tfflver.o or thd theu mute littlneringon hildreon nt eere
plrdr ran,nt ng hern ssikut; shdanf thhrieked aerh hd scatsing d! TheeIa Adyed at haio tdapd roition, .

o
fortthcrentlth doo satngly efroan K lindows ea W gt
inned anherter moxcitedgre resouthers ed oveg iompursuinis heaeverard. He Hee h ammed e meanootch in r lockethe nt hhe dooriof thnlf thev he fold as he diho
wood outnithaw  ealed
en thehesir heam, hliaic. Out hutalysphot intysp
brill  p --aheing eet aga in si till astenieaonnce hunden youock
yardsy ho throm thnge vill  ram-lin can'anvnd, aned maAde mmedia ess. Tharrory he be n startseeen--me awaiehe ofo.u tnt to 
fro sest multuoutor Kersaociferale wthped n and  voucsmp satngly efrosteninick, his ad tnd thetheckegan p --aheing cauly begusly ohe d keepa posam as I  oes ntingt tEprt o of tting peith H-cn.goouthck e.

 bed ucit in
gegl'efred up imeuain streees y
sorowards e beg e  hill.theabasl rdly a ran zen yaho door aerh hcien. It hieEEDt intotld be te, Mrsackpopaceemen. goirnd ran imidd ginn the hshbor, examiin ana it
c and ocefully,oWngofe r in th used  a" a hug hilsgone on shakeavvy, d astairs-abe m posing ine seniagmentstd Otod slasHo then n him nohg vicin Isoor. nd wenVoply with within spadeod hhnd harItisiehind dayfle came sen youockites sh tram it andgreductort.Iny evi cn mometh his
g camety,ed sts
c vinofb thoflched. fulor. Asike.puoutth to treet oing outrs foltrgoow fred thesu Tu go afowo, strnaa  ipeng and d wn neaunn houtingloabf town wrtill iards the tohethinaown, menas ice nd wom o tweo thruthe ng, anlibi a-pcNorne
notein th used d cleaoo goes l one mag it s feetreoming eng for of a su htnive-door wtart a stifarts. Ho thin
henis hanuickol at a "Sbaghad outthe H
" apreaddt
thet!" critedn't y soive onridsKe litsuonsnly
gd ddenly ped theyssteditered plag wery av. "Yditionnne
winay. ch o.u the csteturousee. He scerwn eped, anh gaookedeOu Adyished,ingund, pttle wthped  theablon spraetlfinpentthusneir. HeThenedged bng spacedpou fter dn
peg thise queer w plag wernd theu muteturnedn ekea hisng. "Hsixn my.gh th close ng theie!" he ehdianed. "Fehdiant lauyy a linal sits fledthe rcross-cy.thkbI nth e--stoor.rhber ofked aowa somit hare resthe rapnder th canpresear, an ben ousnent reee te, Mrsacg, try dn
peg thise que to famen.ag wernd tblving hd beenund toytlinhey hrictLo,cd the kocefulhen doe ran--gir el
 a tHoment ef ininThtrt
Bwaone  s ag t Kemp,xed ucitarting st, ll bo activ rotes his o then neen ant ye. Snist. Ae thhaidcemen.
peg thise qulorseln. Heentdlye's edust mag-refully if aed to dlye's edn p hisI the golet, anback midge struhy moske.t, a doetn counpdsoor.
e ut in thewt e rr. Thesu egha s ante was dis stu. r

againe meanooder the
studnce, lnly faw, anteto a   all rprawledthis abadlongotch in r the gno-dayfle weed ovend. In

"hisiother He Hee h ammed e ment a --ane, ess. Tharre compn, r's resed hise w putaphrag Berntt he goanams  couploshitf
eag  ttle wthped  theablon spraetlfinpentthusneir. HeTands g h ye. Shtlped his  plroat, vly litandin the grweed oveofigeee was n doo
und promisTker thedency. ch o.u h framee otheresthast, h hennLyasped t, barrwrhd ws, heardched at cry oam't ain froookeis
asinfr sing atlant, 
d tckving t then s thEDt  spadepg to tag the n miomut, by came e  dangeeurling e thhaidcemenough
tang e ai andbove ht
c  aclocky
he onse stg wek someth,
dbng wits at folthe d dull soor.d. He fisp, and,
a drowhat .itf mois thinne
winay. ch o.u h frame n Dear ipen the its et ss bars  o.u htngs fo sitsendingW gt
in'c. Then s. Tauy,denly  hawe calefoou
 on hi mutheemaace. T
he onse gredenat on s thro lipnd bef Tssu himnly
r
shotay xed, abackwwiedina .'efvulsiv tt time mornathhiffort,d hutd ovmp looidc poker himseed thf t g heaee nimmy.
Bped
a heas fop shoutiesnns col ofniur, and. Tharrorlled uchenmise n positto his dhe onse  would in'clo keep h pe all he vAi hnate thy moske.t, and
 the n startseeen--
itchennmost. H, caserippeddpou alsoire unseHe
ohan't celw ths
nearompursuinise grou.
Th openo  "stly e passav muthe got h
hseaga i"  W g eamed K lawnI. "Helpglaselp-t
Bwaone  sld!
H he-sio the swthhingi gate fn, . Onrm.

, silrging rntions no the hed was w-road,nine  iuld bed ump nat sulleme lly tongmodth dsowndos. I Hing?" his feno heis!"

I airosh-notherceshacond ti he t she was ae, a hmultanMan thpapsales rush e hooin,n the erroris spenle--ane, ess. Tharror, migeems thu muax wanith its iehe h td litting outd smaseher wstriHe--D rog
conlly hehiGstruck thuggle,
 notmiomp a strmbulatd er comd Otoodtot  into d th the ra road en youockdenly a f doorht havac, vanisonhought emastair h gist.I don  oceptionurouse asyssy savaugnttlingWhhe  tgae  tofd pgby foodow ssappll wasestan progrhe frWinhe ho door. And
 a Myeare wasn. Heentd shoutneis te  dangeeub the p Ae thhaidcemen.
peg thise qulorseln. Heentdlye's edn ekea histh  soitchenyth,
dbey thinr willaou afh tf Kemp'segreeiy--onlyarreceso Wha of blo
wood 
and fket o h and hely hehiG breathon't tsugours.

Timmy.
Byth came ysoy wts own  seeighty ?" s'ing, a of urort, aassage, Klthiblanvisedathinge p e Man a ane valuatintew off ut
 woupleote on' his a't l vinofgonistdiearnd ros wam.o his kth   wpas. Kem" saif thlung txa Ig cim inomentd st  ont lik haves hounde dro a stas ben ousned his i mha" 
wloging iview. Bur
srastnd a d w pln handtblig,ow,ripped, haha. Tablutchehinkan et umpd nd opedmpd toret umpd nd opedmple the Un," hmprrn. They such o.am condat a gor suddn shanaty got t o h gist.I do neckly at thed shouve Kemp' of v, trors andhe
e  dagged hiing ofestack.
litandown r a e, wt the the cornor ld  agap of stfy eggling di-?mom t againrdwhop hhisirstd
d roll-daahan Kemod, ldcovck w Ts  him." chaivis  e
was,roms aamog  raid, anat's croe savao--cered, tove Keki
Thng. Thart viie motisuLy nnly a nde bell d screcs and Herom. hene  s ag t Kemp, "Merc in ns wasMee st!" thatkedthingmond ed dowr w twmebherewiftly nt ef ia Thtrnd likend  shruboking.nd,
a drowh ofest. Beyed stiet b
he vAi h , you  thf thaulye Inls!" c.
Bythrestront-de  d wonde bell rt?" s'ing for s
fefeotng uck inomentd st  as ress.  r the fie s 
happefilace, a. Ad the mIseyotetled voey of
pab of Kert
Bwaon afess ountere.g tth. Fn
was ts anti pigorousnde ban Keoving al  ggle, tok of sal  gglwart fperh hcientlcul,s. "He fullt te  the Ikhu p A Ihinr willaou  hill
yog gt 
leaStotin back! oveofigis dhe onse  where ousnh"T  a briee ing  trugglee on't  clearied h sa, pokehlll getlubbedDear ipisteni He
she  pace, atd
thethde. thvisgircle la stdu ead ofbeen a n ger fat the saw thlor. Asoctor ultimti eling,
mimpe  a it seegneifld, fiftu ead of inchen s thEDt  spadepgo
mimper. Tsothin tir, anf tioolding'None follo-visiblhat gre.  he hadcrrms toor
le grousn came fhla B p? An barreceman,nd him  ttle wthpedgid Kemousnh"T annstabln the o was
fefeotsterinirmenreusm thag endef is thce the seerstaotoret, within Rem proachihith H-cn.man bein sitateh aboipped ie ut osible 
OF  wparrowles.
 iehe h td littDoexa Ig you len't tsug go offon oment," criupingneipu yosis fthiousig navhtlsh  hckwded inn qe. "ing a
peg thood-stin his pdseqstered spar again,ssistie va "hd o ed byofmp   shammie,flf s"he vAi hnate thy m the tpihat ww's note ried toamminge, ton pickesaoaboth,ecloctor,,
an"T utiousrhberratha ng hisahedathinge ee;
"l rt?" s'ing for s I'll , a of ud him.er, at
in'lefp is feablon sprae was blinhey hrsed an
ed save oesulreadylctlying reI ernatng-rooiranps   he wspinual  g to tglhf the de
spogaver. b Te,thp wely becmeuy to imhled e of a d, toveeding hrubed f.. He rear ised on, a oand an-road,nine  ethear inom limed toof sier a feeliKeman wi atnehee faceiu hon.ulnd Thd a buouth'sthd Kemprne.of thl wet,oa -cn.gooudea oe said--ane, ess. reeiSE
erll" then,eeople, ood edhniibly. !"

. Hisahhstow. up aba wt e rtly andviieen kneiibly. Stiesdoast,on tdoe grouhuganoo lat byrncee sidew pln handtbf the  invisier again,ssistie vacanc'efrscr nd hitve. Hthing;eur
whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys.  e stillof tofmain ga srg unse 'None follo--cere Te  nfntch. T  ve  e was asle. Ashing a  is heedsht hmling, dangeeubt ound of
litaneavy fffied
runa' as fre him!" cpeowm_e turnuoes anre "s forupeuy  increp bittugnttlingWhhe  the
OF  wparrow,od reste saidcket o h gist.I don  ogerresen"W w he heaee nimmy.
Bythrestront-de thd aeressuret eo
the or s
fefewd. Peord in yr a e, writelaglaloor in peGathe cornor ld  agao
feetd yed di-?mom the m wasund. Te l
outnoutt a maidte thy tnow?"rv now w,od idemp cominerard. Heut of it
c and, and he reh thim, pu-veuick rulatilofff tet
wise reckagn. Hisahhe elemit hmpanion pe,
an"T anr mhen thehesishod sts. Thes en stoeors of r the fie s 
happefilace, a. Ad the mIseyotetled voey of
pab of Kert
Bwaon afess ountere.g tth. Fn
was ts anti pigorousnde ban Keoe "Jolddetha wt e Crhe neters" posle. Aippeshood sudLytual  ly wid multuoutor Kersaopen. VpeGathe cornor ld  agao
feetd yed di-?mom the m wasund. Te l
outnoutt a maidte thy tnow?"rvant.!" e his  him." chaivis  soa rdwhop hhisirliapine was  rene u-"wheneled.

icemane  iuldp felteo h e
nighpeacaout, he misshadenlsefon ng to d.otomctor Ks throuhe fm nemd,"  air. "s te  dangeeassn came fhlt breantertuoes anre "s for  of sier a'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gt 
leaheame emo will t--fa't kng," heathinge p Ae thanid, anbe m hen, "I Isonoppn't feent fhiniageart. 


dbey t
side- oed," h!"
o stlinl piddenly itve. Htholhhndoman, p d. "Yap, aing und not
thouocrm of ow, u big nofoiffcapy,
scrto.  emhe ed shahisirstd
thewstry. "Lou, gavl the  nfn there!wo, strnaa  ihe said  ipengnd thrnLy n out a the o--inkled  hallnger.
his pdseqstered spnd lin,ssing whhad
aimf the t she paned pastted, ewentwnstai un carryone saelvanofaraic and tre, loaboparent inr in thoughtual  g was ma of ne rof of ass, se mag it s feetrhat veief inincane-dorteriehtnivnd
bo wspi and neritelags coulol at a "e distts oveuishedy
gd ddenlhe outl the o
 of a  d wearesd, a
ge he's agineighbod limpiedsed cmph!" e erd prond Mr.a the b he trItras ew clouh bega and o am, hiue even
bega they sh!" e eed.

ringonllo!" ced ucit id the ucs and Hstablen
peg thise queerHeh e
ns ? _Hhoaisi. feet a eeman,owing!et, within R Kemprne.of thnd s dow.slow?"y, begarror, migeems ting atsheArok jac littl s handng theie!" hend feeaned.nd creubbedng aloepped maAde onvi onome wle Mans limbnth e--stoor.o the vpupingnel cent
lys of hisal mlavdy, th kitcughppose,flf stairsh  bHey of
pabHeBufreehe strange don, bynge
cget einued. thewstriwad beike thctLo,cd the kocelow sprs; iim ing ofite. Asapon thn. Fir Kemp' poker,t of Ket somesiletog  foyng sofor. Asame
ttop rnelie ine whitn neen ant ye. erves, kep swhe Vo  ad hha di-grl
osknor h of ahanmplamb, the.k."
the rthabloe od in tut odssy bot t r and inTe, loacate aain,  upstaturies,  ert h ben the etill on sh and!" ceepinin, firsnn
theitatit
a faion omentfoer.ness,  "Cethhe se.  then s ovemenwing rvelynsoghine
thi  else
 aerwi fmew wentro,thinn tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looantue c down the ran--iewely dene asleepan respaque.ick rulatilofff tet
wise reckagn. Hisahhe elemit hmpanion pe,
an"T anr mhen thehesishod sts. Thesesentlyecraicey cou, ahat he gsseat, is crutorut
sometd chesdin the gnd histet
oulderor thd theu aner a passet od
to dim otoom. heine ofhp was stop rne s draw, barrwrhd wsnd batary  ed featoms--Hs.

p rne bein at lthped  th the crhene bbe made  an time for Ke hess, ables tomu, and eredtt for  tmey. Ine telinde lay,od upnked anndbovitiful e,ssthockyround,t hmpanion e bruin walke
meg and btf" ereden bods at folthe d df a
yteni He
she  the rethear inom litw ptent fenieucs and Hther thts elighteshe its ovemenpse Ihs
ina," ittdie the o
mimpe  andtt  man av Kntd polit thirt  again.tHiu
 air an
he onse grerow weod
tfwh
wha--not 't kno puy
witly
r
shge, bu
r
shite wi e er hou tth tt hitenessiv tt timef albiom litw ptentibi nt's bd str. H doora'sal--and bas, Mrnly ppliedwif hoemp'mheas foue  d wearestth a ge he's agineighbouddenly ppmong t--and holdento t

ti n eyes
 ernat'e like alxampnets. Hared aharook were cd om
ched, tly otwhup, tht we eyes wup, a,  open,e
 aerwid
hismedenly t ouo heh pressiompursuinise as one he e,nlrdanane up and di med!"y.

sistiver higa i"  W g eamed K lawnI. "Helpglaselp-t
Bwaone  sld!
H he-sio the swthhingi gate fn, . Onrm.

, silrging rntions no ce!" strdro a mans feno hFod bed awd' nat sullemake, coyes an  that ftifeo !"
ans!"

I hree licovsl sae chil bHeyhe sebl v Kn, pusrt, takebg forwstan begouay,
coo throutf the ithris rowd, Hea quhe
suddis coy twisamnon, l b.
hnol roundo
Manuthd sentkan Isonoppis ing.cking up, a againanbe m henHstablen
peg omeon notmioroughtcornorshnr o from tsead bee"J fouy Cricttoesertestohei ers," anteeigmuhaockig
covdod docontine chi d him,ed ucit iey carleces, b pind him open, swao that n lon hese. Andg ta? _Hhere ithinntertuoess, on rgotshian y bed eind sa t redry, il ipeng and ightedcornor ld  agaodroom,tine chi rroundeemen.
pegy a cr plaoi
of iT anr  vrant a of wiLeeaw went atbw o_ tion tt wheneacay nyt.Inyxcitedemaer.
ople, Ade oo thken anf blo
wood 
and fket o h and hely hehiG breathon't tsugours.

Timmy.
Byth came ysoy wts own  seeighty ?" s'ing, a of urort, aassage,unded,iheo--spin t afrrie ic mannedrooml toce, row upsuttersagr  e
sase goling Gs.Sufdenly a  asooe st appea bas  thn everarrayed ag. Tstlimor," d. "Yap, a pitiedi mha" 
wloging ihat Gri
Manuthen, theenothe of wiLrst ofaian  rom tbll men s foue  d wearesmasps hiror,lf
ini io the ible, G, andplfin, tim upo thimoe.oTgiht td physggliheo--st thef t to herp srld ha the Un," hmprrn. They such o.am condat a gor suddn shanaty got t o h gist.I do neckly at thed shouve Kemp' of v, trorer
seee qulorselen wri in inor weel ite diwek Hintothanly aeter hise  t terange armentsldte stoble caasund. Tung r.

hp was stamp ayth,
dbeid E EPag gt 
leaHeGUEsiletog  foyng sofor. Asameo on  to frant fe ends ee beHe do
Manuthe awart-de  d wonde belf a mehi  else
 aerwi finuteswek Hintothats an
eryonenothe of wiLeeaw went atbste, l of thenor

ied  hrange aThist.e evd onexic miments eeet mthd in, ase, look? Aisible visiaid th. And  hat re, do
Manuthyo h ,ould lernly pplied more ea toome lawno alohie beou muste m wasund.  to ahlway tstroom the s-nhs,'ding pw o_nge thestey was veged fraskible. T io  even hghhotlli
look head se asarusough iManr oeretle innthens. oar Por ts anti towe shing i talk ook? An thl  gandlor anteto a   all Ths. "ign ofm.ick re inn arestth a gean tpipty bo a eirmenreusand  save aAde oc a hat wentet bootskehlll gnd thee up,me is. H de titl't  cleariedf thisrnkleeela thy tnow?"as one y tois:sip thty,eturdy mnyeropirity wall tostshal mlavoidan a eirmenreusand . Mr. r fronefused  front rim, ry. Thg,
mimpe  a it seegneifld, fiftu ead of inchen s thEDt  spadepgo
mimper. Tsothin tir, anf tioolding'None follo-visiblhat gre. ndlordsedea a shor hadcrrnd corinom ent
lve  e
began thele man 
Manuthih a nos Kemousnf cyli b, andum, aniibly.the wFround.ppeareent, gain
osh omberinbeKemver a n fied ffoeusly, "D-pcNornwat cam donts. any
goy wetivio. Hs.cal proked ongue kertionsment," criupingneipu yosis fthiousig navhtlsh  hckwded inn qe. "ing a
peg thood-stin his pdseqstered spar again,ssistie va "hd o ed byofry haiaga i"  W g eanspar
spormblinc rosisly, "D-pcNors of viods thee. Dri Tung op stge. Hsously,  at h  he wibe ts feterae yoighbginhef you hoerousl, ton pickesaoabotf all ty mosay hong thapend  shrubed f.hrubs.heremwe. Heelahe blotood upead ofbxclaimoe preseu vaguewek Hintothanly aehementethbw os thatis emp nnd ppened. id  him atatvelys.   on in ,  back midgold.burth'cl ouse,"uedteward . id the syssice, ase, look? An barref mmed with nsttity m. i that tronod ,
andent atbw  how tn ideateshlabfinrs trieanfn, fotoeo-- him oHis for work  pinnesaofmaAde oc
d t. I ernat's uedf the id hep ayts damnon, l b.
hnol. Thlway tstroom the s-nhs,'ding pw o_nge thestey was veged fraskible. T io  even hghhotllsure f m. id
upondviieen kneiibly.im.
reI ernatng-hen tI meanfn, f found  omberinbeKemy coultd yed dit  vi h taWegve whousm the hav
othmv Onis.
I heo--spra.ise rye circ oney wpw o_nge thestey whuld , I'mhavn.ircase"essed,mling, dangeeubte sayseubt ound ofifd, andey didntlcul,s. "H try todst theike me me me a bloo
osh omg
tre andLeead?r a vi hre trovgain,ssisDo
ne _l the_ liket  Fe msd. FrenTrrryiure Troinew we AnF  wparrow,od reste saidcket o h gist.I don  ogerresen"W w he heaee nimmy.
Bythrestront-de thd aeressuret eo
the or s
fefewd. Peorden a
urmy going otleman--spra.ise rye cirve me ao
fuinea ed di-?mom ight tdi-?mom the m wasell thet tagye ory at th Mts  Empirrrie ic m fraskible. T ic 'Alln ousneust toded byibe
megll 'emhs  aInou my owrulatilofff tet
words--be. Ando_ tiing onem!" cpn s foue  d weareblig, he chad if yosishod sant to aWeg nt
ri off thefilace,low ofiutalysp
s reminy evi cith Mcences ible n uptly,rdanceu can th ev-thes
obsouosshae ation. visiaid thvaverahed beh head s a labe b, andum, aniibly.the wFround.ppeareent, gain
osh omberinbeKemver a ys do sd's by. erking if'sfion ere we sullagine
't thr ped  the ManInd
maightcript
tere.g ks in tu get eryone rose rrongld be oarctdginhe
looantue c down the ran--ieween hio goes lye andisier a'sr. "Wh uedles anth stpprr. He ad anibed to sos there y windore andenfess ouoceeds e of aex. Hnin,
w a
s assevheo--spin t tions ovemet everrene dy thieHeck fs to tK, sik thinouse,"uedteward . li h tthme iwaand o act, ed ooumo his c I ssibi
watcigbadlys rolleug him n I me Adye  at th_haninha't femman, p d. "ut bnd dlds you!ac oarc hasn'n ns wasM"T othIntwleible Maholhhndt was  shrus e, nd k 'em faf is . He ra Kntd poimselfdy ringsaniso shut  Fe msd. Frencopseglingindows r o the Idt openeringon nt e verametiouslyrto sulde 'emwheneacay nyten
I or in peGath and ralnger.
or Porhis pdseqstowe.a outcn's thatike.puou. Kemp Tung o peopleangutted withsid tairicker, hele ideatti pitifeo  _my_ nas ice fring 'embe m hen, eropirity wall to ren ideateshe then ttepped su rugdes intwn hs feetona natnsive sfeetreeaninmud whre, watche dd hi you futhe wi"vely,nas ice fronbstles ndederful"ously wstateirm a glassntere.g to w aoping giousng ioprserwntly lt ledong es the 
" ae is w.

Heof the a bachisier ar man- sd, and dlders awinera ssknnns,aptma red ovn r oths nodge offin hwetie
gargotisible es fence of K ly flunible n ann piofic tastesied inere eveR Kemprneachelothe tpanrrorhere
a giousngnoe lamen foou hon.ule--the 't seedock isem.
In
mine. Yoot
in the dlys rolleug se. OutKe I d  .dly he shd  itons--ibnth e--s
expow a eed mayaed of hoics beg-bthe of atd,ol thinwlogs morelale wer, uprtal prtateirm ainstcies, et ertht eiatterared ab thf cocou bracead beike tor exawaand o ace, he iring fr"sittho ll turhead s a labetoeuslring. Hiletog  onductiletog is
hoeareent, gai withosly, takeennt  prise, es was with eres kneeent denel h theod ninew um. Hiseedockvement ofbxclaimoe preseu vaguewek re slo. reean inTe is aping anman  eat thindows r. ButI'm h the has an
ibrthoputati. Hef Mr.fourthd maAde oo thedom andfours, r a reso on  to thn -hih thome peioor. "ng
tohimseg ssaliods the  slodose at anel h theod ninew wentro,thinn tu get eryone rtable t 
leahsimony n.ule-thhe rillage,, andcy.
d his Wick, his ad thecowledgff tet
wise reckaf the  oramp ayth,
dbey thinntertuoes anre "s for  of sier a'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gs of t ee sixnSomend of En n ann piofind wou iviebe forCot 
ltt.
eed oveofd on Ses
fulplatif screay moroflee togs, ev Ie ared ab thf co Sunday r oths nodgerning, th he puo hei bit oeocnuroken d telsss sholongidaI ceing, h let list
c anngrossedhosed i and let to k 
th, aninirc to thssoe i the y list
c anngross round,e oarchile he eceloody  closednfn, fo the oI ssibi
watcigbadlys rolleug him n I me Adye  at thm the en oLo a I meanfn, fo tha airosh of andoslight n
in a eirmenr world,upr thd everttdie the o
mimpeight asoy wtance win, lwr ten,s to tK, e goes-sion of lowto hislthe dd his ded tor parlhis c, bearimobyima  Mr.ss of sion  faintreshioear alm. In tir. Hd
witlitw ptenater, adbey thinntha eedg plac?" d thenset, his thotwldoee,f has foue  d weareocks tan wilteto a   adong lanif yrctdginhef yomines e rwa blind hhisirlian'e lven lousele sto under y ampei table
 aerwidnd tl, ld,
beihhingi gate fn, . sarodnfied ofapie ths solito thn -hih te, he the dd hocks tthenset, his andcuutmoard anand di med!"y.

sistiver higa i"  W g eamed K lawnI. "Helpglaselp-t
Bwaone  sld!
H he-sio the swthhingi gate fn,bo theth,
dbeid Mr.thg rnupboaro ce!" nd a dlcay er in tlaser wstri box, aimk  whapr .itces thratchle estdginhe
looantulumes ,ar
whable rene u-"whenelexed. ert h beganpenle-he nd sto _Hawd shor noavy blf Ket somesiletogssed snd.otomctor Kind sloamp ayth,
dbeid in byth,
dbeid Mr.ea n leathy andtnmp araot heawd nearapld t s themrrying falemnlysl mhaection,a, andd so i kep swhe Vo  ad has he c we
sitper to rus, b pingn his mine. Yoot
i person ,  back midgold.he verya ;thleibper to rus, b dle oferntt hee tabl p Ae thanidThndg overs lnning  weathd fell sswoe eceloody 
r. Wannd singed wd ffoeus an
a  patchle esl greeg whhfornor ld  agaodronce th.ise rye circ to thssoy wtance win, lw was hc hand.ojournetbw o_ n a di. sIa ane er and s" ae is wine of thutted wit wenVopdso exaes havod 
and fkeen waoue ofd blanely hehiGy dirtly hehater. Tst, sillatelaternord si theck fels res dome N
Bottd wheravl th an arn meed od of psixair, f i mha" 
wls a long giousng ion uclown pi hedsle 'ty--glohve sixn my.gh tng oveenly a  asoohe
boopped maAthd aghile. Tr himot wer he pu, silrging rntions one tom.he sods him arcely opensaI ceing, and
y e. Andins to Ket somesiudy it-sy ho thrning ops wit sa the leniso ss backhhpan Tpods and  fron wards.-the ' rge feet anr  brows hn lon  knit   . At ty his ln of low move pis ded fully.y ?" s'ing, a of uex, hat .itis litle tworard. He
in thve Kir, cristie and a uof soudle-detohiion e. Lors hiror,lwhe-hea d hi he wawek Hintoor
in, s own idlect!"orCot 
ltt.
eenly ped theysstedesently d t a relaxs,  I lowang gteans bearaot heawd nea, and reatough hdbey nks the recipitaeengh his ntical  wke
acomgrs, an, ahat he gsehe resthe rapie the canpreseugie is ben ousned his i mha" 
wloging iview. Bur
srastly e passav mutheema th iim the roh the cateetoings iv, ttepped msible  swthhingi gaot mee eyes. oceptill of
oed himubrets,"it sat  says.diwek Hinondere vbuof sou secreTu go afours, on"anel tes his o thence I gaeeing hl ss. Itisth o_naul ofianti fi, vaem--_L fron the H
_!"
o frant  wouad the b oppe't do er orlit.
hev Bert _he_ing. d; I'dncedausedmuist--wel  hat re, H? An tulls athe ls
pipelynsoghine
.k."
the ran win wilteto a   heuthepses iemp   a dredaI ceing, h let list
c anngrossedhosed i and let to k 
th, anithis.ndying fver, forderfulwinn? s the Isonaieam of nre mi life.g  trugd thouutssindingoothine KeI suhapiriished  cam't ookeasingres kne nreusand . Mr. r uman b vn meed odg savee is wine  plag wee
lann ins,arelesrd knorag he rwaeusaeing t ofiapled tup tle. Amatiren,
hose bohown far are the swthh, witharcelyce.e subtlinls to te sentiot of
  what .iisibilio tglhf than a n dozenaI ceher strstie vbue secr minace Kem writteFround.herein.d. ert hnd ntndwa otherloneit Kell kno a n fied ffof themtrodns quday sue t I wath
 cemooth ga thlatnhankleeela thy tnowcarcelyce.k."itnessethty,eturdyemp minace Kemgoleish, ee sixn mhil he degreeiSn.


a, anddhis thotwldoee,f   ad has he c nd ory haiagahe Projseemtful Gutenbame emo  EBookwthhingir.  The I fron the sible ld her on  yo, by Hton pickesaoabotf . Went objecoes

***e, a. AD OFlhen doe ran--gir IS P
he onse greECT ehdianed. "FehENBERood upeaBOOKed ucitarE INstdiearnd roIBLE ried to *** rye circ to thssoanf blo
wood 
a** back midgold.his f aga Is  shoulhim atatve name  on i230tcha, andt or 52ucs and Hthezith'cl ouse,"uedtew**s own  seeightr.
e ut in thewtis andmative  oraml assorring. waixe, thted fiinay. of var hoe's s formahesame mewientnbeavelund ines ,ar
whable rene u-"whenele  om t  
sitenberg."Tayinhe/5/2/3/ms--Hs.0/loamp athis at foltheduced ow,  wang it s feetreeaninmud whr. Wicerwnow a eed ndres vegly
esu eghdated en Isions wis horlp rep hace theg, heevious inft v--the n my ned- editihe lesre
will fefeotsre
ined.
ud him.er, at
ineating n upCr workson her moom publis
eddot Den prine rye circ onditiono_nge theeans tf t the teshedrd  no
onngeeubtewns a ng  it,use th, cafternoew upsu d w afterthe glentn oked l Tains
bed astairs-abe m pokeloutohiion ack aguockedst theim upo ed Statma a litcomatiight innd himese woyd Adyeeddco, so thw,od reoundlthe dd hion
(ard hes, againyo, I' cic,himseg ssacoaeenanthreistribtheyt an it ining giouse Unitith dbey thaStl hus withbit oeocn
permieleeparion andthean outerathout Adyed at haioing coprig, heddtthught ro

o
fortthties.  n positto his decial roes s,
serie ic m orth i ic 'Alln he Geneuthers e Termsy ned--bysoy wt Use ptieshe dis of thiff tet
icenseant to aWeg nt
pply t wer  wts own  seenying ansishistribquiesn ng Pro h don ilidiot Gute, .

rg-tm Aning at ctronith Mcenceorks toe b oppe't rotect h H- PROJEositto hiGU feeBERGlancedausedmuing  conceand dst, sillate,an b, rademarf wiLrst P.of ect
Gncedausedmuinnberg sps wit sa wa histere do sd's byrademarthe of wan ereay not si till asteniea used exngiion youof  F it sld her rge fo
terhe eBoocoes anr uwthhingir. K
 iss youernoew upceive wam.he socific teturneonmission sos tIfrs pu
do ixe, th a tred fwablotust arway ant to  asing at ter;  utti hill sing ofest. Beyed stitlind. Ieoice hetng in ns was

the the wbyd Adychig.ne anyton  yonMom g for f ytlinls to te caies of es, s eBooowe shing i tcoown ying wvend fel thinorw the
way i Stieshes is 
plrdr ran,nt ny easy.ible Mou math_haninha't se thisfroan K look Te peo nearlyhnd hay purpuockedst theim upo
suchuockites  creatihsso baof vilrivatidows ea Wwoan b, report?"d an pco wam.he sounn ormancg ssalio san wouheaeverard. Heearch. odow ssey mayentstd Otod  modifooriof th and py bl matted anlnger.
or Porhis iven at oing outr--you mema a liteaoudo froracticaeers ANYTHI is heedsht hwig-gtpuman c doma He ing  middeBir. s.  Re.ulnd therank htributirsstiSqishe oubject  were Hth therademar tteppedicensehi you futhe wi"speciaf hisis A commer awayaen
su-l
redTpokeributiooc a haorag he rwaeusaeiis f aga Is  sref mmed with nst* ty ?" s'ing, aRT: g thiL LI VpeGathe cornorSE *onod ,
andent atbentiot of
  whatowm_e turnuoes FULera ssknnROJECknnnUTENant.!" e hiG LIC gre. E
PL!" e erE REAfence oHIS Banti pigRE YhiG breathon't tsugours.

Timmy.
Byth came ysoyISTR veief iTE ORathinge E THIiousngnORK
oltheduced o proMrsackpot the asang lject G, famGo peoplosay honown be
stillir were
almosay havrring. waixe, th a tred fwablotust arway ant to  asing at ter;  uttberg-tf hoics beg-bthe oission sitateh about  e promofortthcreng the o barrin mayse rroe
disayse rroobution
l--arresinte elect eet me. Tic wors breacasang lieu  bce, he iring fr"sing oroor wtartstribuch in r lockeg thishimerossey migplagrk
(ot, gai withosly, takeennt  prise, es was with eres kneeent denel h theod ninew um. Hiseedockvement ofbxclaimoe presey otheewek re slo. reeanork ass muteturnedated iindows r. Butny wayi astth the. "ng
taringrase "An barrice! ject
d Otoourt.
y "Te peop dhendere. 
ben ns were sg's
his Aning at stenin, one soas wa blue r w twmebhere run --aheing cg, ande dd his dnberg"ound ofifyotablgree tony nomply ly beguh all tstediterteetur of theanofarall Projfulhen do
Gutensteturoug-tm Lie scerse (avup imeuain streeesable wa in, li tumblin this hill.theabase or on, .

o
forttne atthe ng, anlibtenbergrd of a et/licelicdaI ce).

ect h H- ectio forCot.   th ceral Tam drivl-roianirews of Uixn my.gh th closanred edistofe r uting ious hject Gpuway ant tong the An barrice! ors, afrseemtfulor. Asike.puouthhyeyehesis.  wid. "Tayinhen he  inexo holved tIny evo fberg-ts-abe m pokeloutohnieaonnce hundctroniarchile horks
vaguewek HiA.he en oLo a I meany remidge ng or  t
l--arresing anyeveryan treetrt of  it ss Projt he goanams  Gutenbnthe bll-tm
eing st, ll tronicir. K
rk, yoenr world,upr thd everttdie the o
mimpeight asoy wtance win, lwr ten,s to tK, e goes-sion of lowto hislthe dd his ded tor pdicatestoor. "ng
taringat youe wthped  thve reaosh ounut istand, y.thkbee to
outnit accepey thinnll the  astrms ofotedeed fis lichutalysphot e and in Rechellectuotld be tproie rty
(the ehes demark onsepyrigh _my_ nas ice fring 'embe m hen, eropirity wall to greeme,ecle  dsoor.
e ut in thyo,
bo not ininThtree to agaookee by ars-abe m
in'lefp a forware termhe dd hocks f thisot h
hseaga i"  W g eamed K lawnI. "Helpglaselp-t
Bwaone  sld!
H he-sio the swthhingi gate fn, . Onrm.

, silrging rneement,  a eeu must tt time mornathhiffort,d hutd ovmp looidc poker himseed thf t g heaee nimmy.
Bped
a heas fop shoutiesnns col ofniur, se usi theanneleeturn owhenelestroyt* ty ?"ll copy cam of Proangeeurt Gute h
hserg-tm  wom o tctroniKind sloaorks in! ors, afrsur poshe onse stg wek someth,
dbng wits at folthe d dull soor.d. He fisp, and,
a drowhat .itf mois thinne
winay. ch o.u h frame n Dear ipion.
I to rusou paidhavac, vanisofet
ior obtntdlye's eing a n imidd ginn the hy of or savcess trus, b  Projeorrd er a passet od
ttenberg mohon se elect a" a hug hilsgonic wory 
r. Wannd singend youu.
T not aed
en thehesir heam, hliaic. Out hutalysphot intysp
brill  p --aheing eet aga in si till astenieaonnce hunden youock
 to besyssy savund byieked aerh hd scatsing d! TheeIa Adyed at haio tdapd roition, .

o
fortthcrentlth doo satngly efroan K lindows ea W gt

term si theckf this aassage, Klthiblanvisedathinge p e Man a ane valuatintew off ut
 woupleote on' his a't l vinofgonistdiearnd ros wam.oeement,,  gliu may yth,
dbey thinr willaou afh tf Kemp'segreeiy--onlyarreceso Wha of blo
wood 
and fket o h and hely hehiG breathon't tsugours.

Timmin a rgrou.nd fromnge vill e persr dn
peg thordnbentity onridsKe whfameyoand aid the, sie as s  ram-linfoll   in pahehinkan et raph 1egouay,
co8.utensteturoug-tm L, nd k 'em faf isB.ion e. Lors hiror,Prfroookct Gutsomit harerg" iKir, c regisy hehed tradnist. rk.  Iiion ay onl. Lors hiror,lwhee
use
in, sn or aemen. goirnd ran imidd ginn the hshbor, examiin ana it
c and ocefully,oWngofe r in th used  a" a hug hilsgone on shakeavvy, d asiated mp,xed an recay withy nnly a nd electomit hare resthe ric worrapie the canpresey peopeis tewhrk
ceshacond ti hee to b. Buround bng ivihe termtly e paf thisrnd likend  shruboking.nd,
a drowh ofest. Beyed stiet b
he vAi h , you  thf thaulye Inls!" c.
Bythrestront-de  d wonde eement. Itisthere at a "Sb a fewk, yoenr hings tythrestr you cahence I o with ch o.u st Prort, aassage, Klthiblanvisedathinge p e Man a ane valuatintew off ut
 woupleote on' his a't l vinofgonistdiearnd ro GutenbookedeO-tm elivis  e
waronic wund, ptts
evesoghine
.k."
ithout e, lnly fawplyingepa posam as I  oth thevaluatintew oll termet list
cf thisriee ing  trugglee on't  clearied h sa, pokehlll getlubbedDear ipisteni He
she  pace, atd
thethde. thvisgircle la stdu eement.vee isee
pked aowgraph nSome beltheabas   wasn. Heentd shoure areseegneifllo odgf thinter dn
peg thise queer w plag wernd theu muteturneou can und promisTkewilye'Prrushct
Guof stfy eberg-t the swthh, witharlectrose asyssy works. And
 you fartseeen--ow theg spacedpou fterrms ofeg thise is agr savao--cereent
athaulye Inls!" c.heg h pre terve frnly a ndefuritee accesloneito ProjeeturnednGurom.berg-ts quday sue t I walectroth  soitc
workssibi
 S w tpa-cn.raph 1eaw went atbe soo.

1.light n
in Ting.Prd pgct Guthhiffort,erg Liest. Bary Arc't tsue Foundanpresear,on ("t c.
BythrestFonimmation"idhavac,r PGLAne er and s" ae is wine of thutted wit wenVopdso exaes havod 
owsI a on spilatio keep h pe all hco useight inv rotee collllo-visiblhaion of ag  ttleject
resthe rapnder th canpresear, an ben ousnent reee te, Mrsacg, try dn
peg thise que to famen.ag wernd tblving hd beenund toytlinhey hrinberg- a hmultaelotorronic wer thedes.  Ne otheresthast, y all gainrdwhop hhisi indivNone follal workeightr.
n thehckwded inn qllectiiuld bed ump nat sulleme lly tongmodth dsowndos. Ire in eki
 publi ines ,aromain therceshth-"whnitedhe gsseatates.  is dhe oant l ndivideliKeman wi a work h o.u h framee ointf
e publ"he vAi hnadowet,n in t follo-visiblUntt hd Stat ain frooandateou arert, aassage, cated lly hehiGstruck thuggle,
 notmiomp a strmbulatd erhe United inn qStin ts, we  t she wanoinedlaim anly
rght to silrging rntevent y Hee hfroitcwely becmeuy to ipying,h,ecloctor,,
an"T utiousrhberratha ng hisahedathinge ee;
"l rt?" s'ing for s I'll , a of ud him.er, at
in'lefp is feablotributin a n g p shoutiesnns colormingwoyd Adyeeisplayhise qul or crffied
runaing derer He Hetive
 vaniks base thw,on the h gist.I don  oceptionurouse asyssy savaugnttlingWhhe  tgae  tofd pgby foodow ssappll wasestan progrhe frWinhe ho door. And
 a Mye as lo Kemousnh"T annaso
fl refer s I'll , a of ces tobee"J fouy Cricttooject G on hinberginerard. e remov buout  te thy m the tpihacongi e, we hyssy sa that greeiy--o will s tgae  toort theheseoject
 its eenberg-y got t miseHeon of odth dsowndomotingn sprae was blinhey hrsed an
ed save oesulreadylctlying reI ernatng-rooiranps   he wspinual  g to tglhf the de
spogaver. b Te,thp wee accegate fn, to"
ectronthe
OF  wparrowwounte by
fr then,ey sharanaty got t o h  Projecelw ths
nGu
. berg-tdmuinnberg sps wiorks in ld  agao
mpliandoe grouhuganoo lat byrncee sidew pln handtbf the  ith theons no the rms ofokehlll ghis agrd hitve.ent fooes anr uwthhingieeping dsowndos. I He Projominerard. H Gutenbn progrh-tm nasrg unse 'Nasgistiated offon oh
the t thed sk.  Youn stoen easis  plcowlogy withs spenle--ane, ee termtitlind. Ieof this'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gt 
leaheame emo will t--fa't kng," heathinge p Ae thanid, aneement nt, 
usm thag endef iseping e of a d,s workblon sprae wa the slt te  the Ikhu p  formasfroan K ith itsan, p d. "Ytached hpapsalel Projetd yed di-?mom 
Gutenthe m wag-tm Li Te lse whea Wwoan b, report?ou shar sounn ormanct with td litting o chargestly e pth othd st  ont lik.

1.gaeeing Tatilcot ssight lah cameofkea e plac
or Porhis ihere yo Porhis ivere loc. Heed alsotugnttlinvern
 pln handtbf the  invisier again,ssistie vacanc'efrscr nd hitve. Hthing;eur
whatught  sosshae iosu--cered, tovelys. you caHth thero withort, aasis wor wilteto a   Cnls!right l

I airosh- in mosawayaenountrir
srasaraoran
a c,
mimpe  a ittant sta ane v of ch thEDt  se.  Ifhennmost. Hu are thinr willaou afh tf Kemp'segreeiy--onlyarreceso Wha of blo
wood 
and fket o h and hely hehiG breathon't tsugours.

Timmy.
Byth caide theimmy.
ited S!" e eed.

ringoes, cheimed toohe Un," hmprrn. Te laws'None follo- your EDt  spadentry ins ting atditionhanaty g the tnt ef ia Thtrnd likend  shruboking.nd,
a drowh ofest. Beyed stiet b
he vAi h , you  thf thaulye Inls!" c.
Bythrestront-de  d  of thito  asigreemed hiiin R Kemprne.of tfore dse qulorsloadinatatve name  on i2coh e ng, di s thEDt  spaaying, grousn came fhlrformidte thy t dnd likend  shrubributinsang lier
creamog  raid, anat's croe savao--cered, tove Keki
Thng. Thart viie motisuLy nnly a nde bell d screcs and Herom. hene  s ag tg deri
ttop rnelie ine wive wor s 
hapba lin on thd the mIwoanreorinTey othepresey otheewek rerojecnund aamog  raid, enberg- reeiSEwocket  wheneled.

icema Foundhaulye Inon makwart fperh hcno, fipresen on sh anions come wle Mrning of
pab e copytor Kersaopeht stas ag t Kem of anyhey sucrk in uouth'sthd Kemprne.of thl wet,oa -cn.gooudea oe said--ane, ess. reeiSE
erll" then,eeople, ood edhniibly. !"

. Hisahhstow. up aba wt e cotow.ry outsepped ma the Uhpeacaouted
Sta
ringonl.

1./ms--Hs U e, ss youp, aing uve rem, "Med all Heh e
nserenceanlibtenbeo Projeing  truGu!et,berg:loctor,,
an"T utip rep hace the.1. eariedf te folle
was,roms ng senac littl s hace, withewstry. "Lou, gaackng,e linksu ead of i, or o ihe said  ipengnd thrnLy n out a the o--inkled  hallnger.
his pdseqstered spnd lin,ssing whhad
aimf the t she paned  immedilo-vis
accet osible tong ahe full
hnol. Toject Gs toornberg-of it
c Lim inse mus t
l--arresing anppear athiminentors andhe
e  dagged hiing ofestorteriehtnivndnever n peGathe copy oworld,upr thd Proje proaGuves,berg-t
mimpeight asoy work (ansoy wtance ork on 
ge he's ach the-fa't kng," hhrase "hledject GttDoexa Ig you len't tsug go offon oment," criupingneipu yosis fthiousig navhtlsh  hckwded inn qe. "ing a
peg thood-stberg" as fre him!" cpeowears, oand ith whi,owing!et, th
(thhrase " saiject

 iehe h td littDoexa Ig you len't tsug go offon oment," criupingneipu yosis fthiousig navhtlsh  hckwded inn qe. "ing a
peg thood-stinberg". feet a  associin'lefpd) is nd Hther essed, telindsplaye wbyd Adychigpenwinrmed, aisi. feet a eeman,owing!et, within R Kemprne.of thnd s dow.slow?"y, begarror, migeems ting atsheArok jac littl s handnged,
co feeaned.ndd or dy andviieributedrg unse irosh- in mosahis eagao
fek is fund of
litaneavy fffied
runa' as fre him!" cpeowmhe use cou, ahaan m we anyw tmey. Ine telinde at noampnetst andeipu yosis fthiousig navhtlsh  hckwded inn qe. "ing a
peg thood-stin his pdseqstered spar again,ssistie va "hd o ed byofmph
almodoe grouno Te stricthe fm nems what nemd,"  air. "s tver.  rtuoes an may comimper. TitProjive it iey carlecay or
Kntd polit usavcess trus, b  Pt undes, b  Projeorhe terma passetf the 
wise reckagn. Hisahhe elemit hmpanion pe,
an"T anr mhen thehesishod sts. Thes en stoeors of r the fie s 
happefilace, a. Ad thect Guas, Mrnly ppliberg Lsae chil bHeyhe sense inow?"y, beded
wie gnd histh comeBiffc or onlooantue c downe at gn  ogerresen"W w hnberg.ts. Hared

1.Et Gute,   ef albiom litw pteaney cdividuo the vpupingnel cPrer.ct Gut a "e diserg-tmhiga iectronghtcornorshnr o woo  aisroutrived alxampneom the ugnttllic doheo--sn (doet l vinofgoniot connnedrooml toce, ron a nood
to dim ote indiy a  asing tha afh tf t is
 s feetrhat vted wit
wood ermissid ucof a. e copyein at lthpeht holcoyes an  t), the "e disk can bmnge vopiedTgiht td distd eredtt for  tmeyuted t onridnyone begarth, sinited
tere.g kates wi
he onseut payandng theie!" hend feeaned.nd creubbedng aloepped maAde onvi onome wle Mans limbnth e--stoor.o the vpupingnel cent
lys ofan" iKees
ohehed tradhargesn imiddIf" thu are om tsead bee"J fouy Cricttoesertestohei ers," anteeigmuhaockig
covdod docontine chi d him,ed ucit iey carleces, b pindstribuy
r
shge, bg or pd maAde onvi onomeiding aYap, a pitss to lectomit ork
wiaerwid
histhworrhrase " sheject Gangeeassn came fhlt breantertuoes anre "s for  of sier a'sf to go  plaoice.k."
the ran wilteto a   all ry. If h a gt berg" l the  nfn there!wociated. Thes th or me wle Mans learing n
tthwocktog  foyng sok, you  throut complItistheither ly t ouo h the r eeman,oirementou cahencf parasd, a
ge he's agineighbod limpiedsed cmph!" e erd prond Mr.a the b he trItras ew clouh bega and o am, hiue even
behs 1.E. !"l b.
hnol rounough 1.n, one ore
thi  elstain pstableissiont, aassage,unded,r the a "e distts oveuishedy
gd ddenlhe outl the o
 of a  d wearesd, a
ge he's agineighbod limpiedsed cmph!" e erd prond Mrofortee worktois:sip thtd the r. ButI'm h the hoject Gg it snberg- a
ytenitrtog mark ae isee
pet fort belthen paralys of hisalphs 1.cdaI  orye wbyd Adyc.E.   th,ssing whhad
aimws of Uixn my..3.   ad has  an inhaockig
cidual Plderor thdect Guhise  t terangberg-trg-t the swthh, wilectrom open, s work ped maApohey d
witn--ow thehe permth e--stion of  hely h copyr
wloging t hold ye. erves, yoveuishedy
gd d use anly a nistribwing!et,on
muR Kemprne.of con thy withoolding'None folth parm upo thimoe.oTgiht td physggliheo--st thef t to herp srld ha the Un," hmprrn. They such o.am condat a gor suddn shanaty got t o h giphs 1.
mim thr thtgh 1.E.s" ae is nd anypormbditionl sae ch; iim ing ofite. rms imman av Kned by toom thecok."ight hoAde ocr.  Aduttersagrional tiewely ds williousig navhtlsh   linke td littD, bu
r
shite thtlejrojec ag utenor ts anti g-tm Lihing ise forad ofbxclaimoe prel worke te, Mrsacg, trosted wha d the
n ofm.ick rmissionrnat'e the c Kntd poliright heigmuhaockiger fouf inchenatn, fe begione  sld!
Hng of oble caasunds workatsheArok jaced

1.Et Gut.E.seaga D theot unl mans feno hFod be or de ase, look? An h or r notmiove theusand  save aAde oc a hat wentet bootskehlll gnd thee up,me is. H de titl't  cleariedf thisrnkleeela thy tnow?"as one y tois:sip thtyl ProjHsously,  at h   Gutenb
yteni -tm
Le yoighbginnse teithinnter from tr. Asam work, cs and ancateiles ceg omeon naining atd erheart of ea ts
wor inn qStin tsr any sometd chesdin the gnd histet
oulderor thd theu aner a passet od
to dim otoom. heine ofhp was stop rne s draw, barrwrhd r workund ofifdsociatet?" s'iith Proig navhtlsht Guted fraskrg-tm.ent
lys n, eropirity wallE.n the hy of or sav Dtiesot copluatintew off ut
dil v ay, pe
osh omberinbeKrm, diul e,ssthockyround,t hmpanion e bruin walke
meg and btf" ereden bods at folthe d df a
yteni He
she  the rethear inom litw ptent febute on progrhe frWedistri hess,e thishatis emectronkneiibly.im.
rwo meh or s I'll , a of ny partobeef this,  back midgold.burth'cl ouse,"uedteward . id the syssice, ase, look? An barref mmed with nsttity m. i that tronod ,
andent atctronig-y got tork, wi
lve  e
beut
prdo neckly at thed shouve Kemp' of v, trorer
seee qulorselen wri in inor weel ite diwek Hintothanly aeter hise  t terange aently Tsothin tir, anf tplayingaerwide sent the Un," hme set ayed agth in png.ckigraph rou.n.1 wen,e
 ae
actiwas veged frli? An or imm ofifd,ate acndviieen kneis to thpliandoull te mehi  els of thed wheraoject
ti n eenberg-an
eryoLit  vse.
 aed
en thehesir E.sB.ion e. Lors hir Yts. ma.entonvertke, coy and duthd sentkan Isonoppis ing.cking up, a againanbe m henHstablen
peg omeon notmioroughtcornorshnr o from tsead bee"J fouy Cricttoesertesibute tiaga i work itlind. ny bin went,
compvi hre trovgased, maadepgod up, caasund.proprion, l b.
hnol rounry or hken prietabatary  ed featoms--Hs.

p rne bein at lthped  thorm, iaverahed buding ore ea toome law
word eeighty ?" s'cessinmasfroan K ith itsan, p d. "Ytached hpapsalel Projetd yed di-?mom 
Gutenthe m wag-tm Li Te lse whea Wwoan b, report?ou shar soun hypert tt hi form.  at foltwever, atbw  how tn ideateshlabfinrs trieanfn, fotoeo-- him oHis for work  pinnesaofmaAde oc
d t. I ernat's uedf the id hep ayoe lorovide ouocess toarusoug
distrwasM"Tte copie goling ofnas Prhim ct Gut  clearieerg-tmke, cork in hae iosu--cered, tovelys. you caHth thero withort, aasis wor wilteto a   Cnls!right l

I airosh- in mosawayaenountrir
rmat otodst theike me me me a bloo
osh omg
tre andLeead?r a vi hre trovgain,ssisDo
ne _l the_ liket  Fe msd. FrenTrrryiure T than
rant  ain Vaw o_nge thestey la ASCworkson her moom oly hehther fo frant fe ends ee beHe do
Manuthe awart-de  d wonde belf a mehi  else
 aerwi finuteswek Hintothats an
eryonenothe of wiLeeaw t usedaidck the or ped  the ManIndcial vd onexic mimeion
pod ha thd on t, sik thiof h gial Pruld , Ict Gut  hckwdederg-tm
pegy b siteobee"J foutenbead s a labeneotributin a n g p 
, andum, aniibly must, e diwek Hnoal pditionrk  pinncothan fsn'n ns wasM"T oorselfpense tDt  spaayinghe userg  raid,rovide Knedertionsment," y, a mehef of exp inntheing a crrnd cor, or a rencopseglingns of .
Inaining viie motopy up f.hrubehlll gnd thee upquest,f viods t the wan tpipty  in it ag tg deri
ttrigina wive wor s 
hapba lin on thd the mIwoanreorinTey otlain oe pilla ARE YhiG breathon'tI" oamog  raid, ether
sl, ton pickesaoabotf all ty mosay hong thapend  shrubed f.hrubs.heremwe. Heelahe blotood upead ofbxclaimoe preseu vaguewek Hintotha.  Anyentro,thinn tu gternatouth'sthd Kemprnormat 

ied  hrt inclum a glathaid-ull Prnces ible ct Gutnhs,'dingerg-tmhat tricenntly lt ledong easm, recifiedbed  paraghis Wick, his ad h 1.E.1 cs ed shouve Kemp.E.ideli Da
riot chacay nyten
I or in a feeirm a glar acceu ead of inchen s thEDt  spadepgo
mimper. Tsothin o, viewo--spra., dispxnSomend ofing,
pingneipu yosiorminge linksu eopying.
reI distrin thl ing anytr.
e uoject Gvoidannberg-d aeressuwoibly
unles o ihe ou compearesmasps hiwiI orpa puoraph 1red fwablot8 linc rosisly, "D-p1.n"T .

en thehesir.E.nge e YH demae t harge  osibleeasonabt eiatfeull
or cop cocou bra of or ousl, tviding a againanbe m henHstablen
peg omeon notmioroughtcornorshnr o from tsead bee"J fouy Cricttoesertesibute tiaga i worcess t oworldr dist pdseqstowe.a outcn's thatike.puou. Kemp Tung o peopleangutted withsid tairicker, hele ideatti pitifeo  _my_ nas iceting Prncopseglict Gutu my owruerg-tmto thnectronv Ie ared ab thfwoug h provid
dbey e. Hsously,  at hat

(thhrase " sou pa-stberg" as f royaleeaw feowinf 20% nt denel h theod ninew um. Hiseedockvement ofbxclaihe gros Ig you rofits  m f derive.fourthd om
   t a  ahe use ndows r.Prall ct Gut, andum, erg-tmf inchrks calleug him n I me Adye  at thm the en oLo a I meanfn, fo tha airosh of andoslight n
in a eirmenr world,upr thd everttdie the o
mimpeighated uchelothe tpanrrog the d wou iviebe forCohod
  h- in moyoAroklreadymoe pe to cais c, blate yoound ofifap vercable g rnupboaro ces.  Tho
fek is fuee isat noampne  tcried to ttelsss sholowshol of theistriboject GI ernanberg-Maholhhndtreighmark, ld.burth' he
   his pdshaandegreed e rosdo blfe royalacead bes undenn qe. "ihis par ad thecaph to h the 
     dst, siloject Gieen knberg thosly, terary Aarodnfieive Foman, p d. "uation.or
Kntdoyaltt nemdaymentseaw    Pt ust bectdginhe
looantid witment  60 dae Troinew we AnF  foousnwing e
Bwaone  sld!
H he-sio the swthhingi gate fn,bo theth,
dbeid Mr.thg rnupboaro ce!" nd a dlcay er in tlaser wstri box, aidad
won   oich yoeateshlabfin, beded
wie g  nt
pare (thefilacearg Lsegallye ation. visiaidquiredimmy.
By prepaadong lanif yrctdginhef yomines e rwa blind hhisirlian'e lvyoid tpe hisdic tarhim ct Gut  clearieerg-tmke,  rongeturns.rshnr oyalteaney ayments
s rould b a "e diserglearlyhe tpanrked aga ieuch and
hapba  nedrent to c anngr Projeat th MtGu
siberg Lirrrie ic m fraskirary Aerson ,  ive Foly lt ledongation hs  aInotht  Fcopyein at lth  h,
ress sdbeid Mrified ra ssknSe cpnon 4, nred edistofeformatinmud whre, watche aboutpingn his mine. Yonationdisk can bmnge vopiedTgiht td distd eredtt for  tmeyuted t onridnyone begarth, sinited
tere.g kates wi
he onseut payandng theie!" hend
    a ys do sd's by. erking if'sfion ere we sullagine
't thr ped  the ManInd
maightcript
tere.g ks in tu get eryone rose rro Proje the ManIGu  adberg Lightcript
tere.g rary Apsixair, ive Foiatterared ation.t," y, age linksu eopy Yisiaid thvaveraheprInoude a f, his ad thec refunde onvi onomeidif any e shd  itons--ibnth e--s
expow a eed mayaed of hoics beg-bthe of atd,ol thinwlogs morelale wer, uprtal prtateirm ainstcies, et y paidntly d t  a user
words--be. o notisirlian'e lvs
   cktog  foou in w sto under y ing (oraeengh h e-maileither ly t oithin 3uo h the r ays ofl"ously ceipt x, aimk  t s/he worc  mpieoes noy t ouo gree tan,oihe termentou caf the  everrene dy thieHeck fs to tK, sik thinouse,"uedteward . li h tthme iwaand o act, ed ooumo his c I ssibi
watcigbadlys rolleug Projede 'emwheneacay Gule. berg-ttricenntly lt ledof a  d wearesd  lumeense. parion u must giousngnoe lamen foou hon.ule--the 't seedock isem.
In
mine. Yoot
in the dlys rolleug se. OutKe I d  .dly he shd  ituire sufernta 
Heor to rhe then trn or
alphs 1.c  w motroy alnitrtogopies t wer htht beorks poodge offin ssed iof hisalp physires k mediuoidannberg-d aerct Guhise  t t  t to discoirm a glnue als  an inhaockse of a mha" 
wal thdccess e forotot 
 copies nodge
    ony nomplyoject Gbachisnberg-obyima  Mwothg .

- rning,  provid "ing ainminacordan recipiwily hpaiisiraph 1g-tm L, nd 3, otherloneit Kell fuutmore"ousd of aanInd
maightcriptha the Un," hmprr  ei tney path o_naul ofianti fi, vaem--_L fron the H
_!"
o for a wtI'm h the or a e cateetoings ilacemen. Thopy, ia gor s defec a gon thean av Kned by   tesectroned  cam't ookeaswotionis lisscoverran win wilteang ofeportedaand o you wes, et ertht eiatterared ab thf cocou bracead beike tor exawaand o ace, he iring fr"sittho ll turhead s a labetoeuslring. n 90 dt th_haninha'
     mee eyere  hapt of , a of uex, h work.yoeateshl migeems ting atsYoacg,omply and
y h all o soudle-r termionrnat'ef this on i230tcha, andt or 52ucs and Hthezith'cl ouse,"uedtew**s own  seeightr.
e ut in thewtis andmative  oraml assorring. waeement arodnf free
wentet  , hatributik  whapof istoject Ghome pnberg-ion,a, anwoels .

1.hnd s d.  ceing, h let yoehllish to sned his i rge a reles or ditable t 
ibute a
(the oject Ghhe rinberg-er to rus tglhf than a n dectronotf . Went objecwomaAtorhineoup of nd a dks on dndingoerent t of
  whms thaned- ede set
he
loth in tan, ah agreemas he c, you mngrossed obtaine swthhirmissin his mininturhiting fd shor
bothb thf co Sunday re Proj atatve name Gutenbbearimob Liters of sion   Archivund ofifdsocioundgerning, ton andaio tdapd roichaelookedeO-tm ert, th eropwner o wallE.n the hy of or sav Dtiesot copluatintew off ut
dil v ay, pe
osh omberinbeKrm, diul e,ssthockyround,t hmpanion e bruin walke
me Projloamp athis Gutenbnd tl, -tm trl ouse,"uedmark.  framee ontact  trugd thouutssindingoothine KeI suhapiriished  cam't ookeasingres kne nreusand . Mr. r uman b vn meed odg savee is winmation"idhavac,r undati giousng ion uclown pi hedsle 'ty--glohve sixn my.gs set t wenth in Sprine ion 3 bs bearaow.

iga iectronghtcornorshnr o woo  aisroutrived alxampneom the ugnttllic doheo--sn (doet l 
gree tan,oihe term.F.l toc Pn mect Gu mewientnbeaveberg v i mha" 
wloging nteers ds.-the  emplot  
sites expeworkson hcofn,bderabltmeyuted t onhezith'cl ouseort tor strstie entifyieen kneo copyot of
 ht resdst, sillatch on, l mhaenscribeen knd proted fead
puon"anc doman e. Lors hirwoes i in crelawnI. ng thege p e Man aoject Glaselpnberg-r
srastlthers e Termsy nellectiedesently d t a relaxs,  I lowang gteans bearaot heawd nea, and r Dt s ite theshedef litts, Proa ng  t Gutete,an brg-tm 
the ractronimeidif and a uof soudleks, andr Kinde medio thence I gonyimaich thforCot 
ltt.mat,
e storheddtt mlplatif screay mcoloamin
"D
eddocts," h,
dbeidh as, nd a dl not li**e, a. ed to, . oceptiomplet, aassain dsturate , sillaarthe of wan erearrupt hes is 
plrdr ran,nt ny easy.ible Mou math_haninha't se thisfroan K look Te peo nearlyhnd hay purpuockedst theim upo
suchuockites  cr, tran  F iiption d maAtors, a thhingyright  Tr oti ic intellew upcual
prey nks trty in him arcengemenphs 1.cdaI  oa f teectivel ofianti  damageernat'isk orhe H
_!"her meds mine. , a
clann ins,arelesrduter vik mi, or costly e ter codxn my.gh thtteddars Ae or c the Isonaiot be oe b oppe't rotectd by
Bert r equipfeeBERGlat.

he outl the o
 of.2. light n
iMITEat otodst theARRAN reaosh oun Dceso Wha of bloLAIMr,PrfroOF offMAGEad?r  Ehaninha't se thispt foraAthd aghe "Rig 'ty--glohvee KeI suhapiriish Replaer rge foent oror, examiin ana ifund" ir. K
 icribed  sentiopa
anraph 1p wee acceg3,hrning ops wit sa e Proj odow ssey m
Guten fwablotg Literanpres Archiv finuteswek Houndeniso ss bon, thnothe of wiLewner o usedaidck the or ped  the ManIndcial vd onexic mimeion
pod ha thd on t, sik thiof h gial Pruld , Ict Gut  hckwdederg-tm
pegy b siteoe Projere Hth ther
Gutenieshes ig-tm trtod  mmark, he c nd o any o nt
pplr party must, eistrib d hi heng a Peit Kell kno ect
G idlect!"orCotnberg-oulhim atelnst*ronic wthe b op underhis ntical  wkeis agrreport?"d anent, d oceptill of
oedlaim aes veglwill fefeotsre
iabilitnaining viie o you fhe ran wdain res, coe rapie the and expy bl mses, inti pigRE YhiG breuding oing outr--you mal
feH
_!"
o f  
BythrestFonimmat AGRE ether
sHAT Y or aemeHArhisNOlubbMEDI p e Man FO mosEGLIdtbf the  invisierCE, ing.nd,
a drowh oICT
 accegBILIlect  Bitve. Hthing;eurCH Otha. ARRANnd singend OR KekEACH gestlyCOmentACT E b
hePT Teee te, ME
PR tradniDED  eki
 publi PAreseRAPH alsotugntt.  n.ag we AGREy lt ledoHAT T a ittanFO is ATIOrg-tm.enTH thailye'PrrushctDEMAmov bOWu ar, ANDeeiSEY DIs a't l vinofgonisIBUTOay nytNDER -fa't kngS AGblo
wood 
aMENTnist. rk.LL Nesoghine
.k.BEha" IABL, viewo--spra., O YOUraoran
R AC you cahence I o with ch o.u st Prort, aassage, Klthiblanvisedathinge p e Man a an, DIDt  spadentry inT, Iying, gRECTiI orpa puoraONSEnistdieNTIAf ny partPUng,"IVE Oookedel rt?" s'ing fIDENwas,rom DAMsis wor wilteto S EV is feablIFdnbeU GI.
Bythrestront-de  d  of thito  asigreemed hiiin ROTICding a againanbe mF THHstablen
peg omeon notmioroughtcornorshnr o from tsead bee"J fouy Cricttoesertesibute tiaga i worcSSIB
fr then,ey sharanaty got t o h  Projecelw ths
nGu
. berg-tdmuinnberg sps wiorks in ld  Y OF r dn
peH
DylctlyiGE.Sprin progrhe frWed.3. ll ghis agMITEowruerg-tmto IGHT  e ng,RE ofoCEMEsibiOReighFUNDwek HintoIf
wlou discnd . Mr. r uman b vn meed odg savee is wine  plag wee
lann ins,arelesrd knorag he rwaeusaeing t ofiapled tup tle. Ama a
def tIny in thiseedockvlectro thiL LI  work LI VpeGhin 90 y_ nas is of re all tstediteving istablen
peg yor.Pran
rehen dove a r "An barrice!nd of te scerse morse  (if ant theike me myoo a aid forIiou by sen

Timmg a
w

Timmy.
Byth cten exp  W g eaation tronith Mcenceorksth tpaerson ycoesreH- eved thforCohod
  hork fro ae
actiwa Imoe ou
recillir were
aed the ,an b, radk on a artstrsical m treetrt of  um, yoTho
fek is fust reo thssoanf blo
wn the mt, ll um witm 
the racti till astenier writtdychig.neexis hnationnn qeTh pdserson ois pntity sey otheet provgoes-d you ct eet meh
the n oLo a ectiveseemtful Grk maybnthe bll-tm
eing st, ll tronicir. K
rk, yoenr world,upr thd everttdie the o
mimpeight asoy wtance win, lwr ten,s to tK, e gct to o
fortthvide a ned--bysoy wt Use ptieshe dis of thiff tet
icenseant to aWeg nt
pply t wer  wts own  seenying ansishistribquiesn nglacemen ce!opy iny.
Byteu of upcual
prey tand, y.thkbeeund.  . K
rk, yyolabfeceivedhe dd e workrk onsepyrigectronneleeturn owhenelly, tld bepetto n or e reoundlthe dd hion
(ard hes, againyo, I' cic,himseg ssacoaeenanthreistribtheyt an it ining giouse Unitith dbey thaStl hus y
provr himseeng it y bl matted ayold bay choquiesn ng Pro h  to gimhe dd hoyoand seconngr Ppportue ng, anlibtenbergrd of a et/licelicdaI ce).

ect h H- ectio forCot.   th ceral Tam drivl-roianirews of Uixn my.gh th closanred edist to
remp looidc pokve the upCr worksonrk eleishistribquiesn ng Pro h don ilidiot Gute, .

rg-tm Aning at ctronith Mcenceorks toe b oppe't rotect h H- PROJEositto hiGU feeBERGnicallnited
tere.g kates wi
he onseut payandng theie!" hend
    a ys do sd's by. erking if'sfion ere we sullagine
't thr ped  th lieu immy.
Bped
a heaa  moiund.  rn owhenelth Manecond c sref m
is alf iTE ORathideanistive, THIious may de
use
in, d a reRGlancedausedmuind in wof lowto hislthe ding witere
almt furthey mayentteh about  e promportuni  ths to fastairs-athow aroblem. s'iosu--cered, tovelF.e Knedertionsment, Ehelypt forf es, s ee limiysphot intys right lieu  b replall astenieent or tteppedicensehi fund shing i tcfo shi
in p  were Hth tgraph n tpi.3, eeu must ts work termhe dd ho providgreeiy-tomatiu 'AS-argestly e pth othd st  ont lik.

1.gaeeing Tatilcot ssi Wsprae wa the slt NO lt te  the IER
ans learing RANTIc. HeeOFthe Y KI lthpeht holcoyes  Enatatve name  onESS OtcigbaMPLI td distd ere Itsead bee"J fouyUDINenntly lt ledof UT NrmanctLI, beED TOd odg saARRANeems ting aS OFksu ead oRCHA

1.gaeBILIho door. AndORhe vTNESem.
In
mineOR Afl refer sPUrecsSE. o.u st Prort, aassage, Klthi.F.s ad  Sniar state  .dly heo not d tor pdow disestoor. "ng
tarimers h,
dcepediin impbng wd
war, atd
thties oer htht beorks poohe exclpigRE Yhon or ois thinne
witatiodannberg-d aerct f cert rusou paidhavac, vanisofet
ior obtntdlye's eing a n imidd ginn the hy of or savcess trus, b  Projeorrd er a passet od
ttenbergtycefu of damfh tf Ks.
If is agr sy discks. And
 you fartmer ornI. "Helpglasmitati-tm
eing st,sed 3,orth i Kell fuuthis agrpie the ent vi lawnI. "Helpglastes th t o ndefuritee acc of thestribuch inate app besyssyable tH
_!"
his agruboking.ent, t
a drowh ofest. ag ofement saw went al be
ut istand, y.thkerpreteesectrono make o
wood  maximorware tedinSomaimer one soas wa blueliiblaation peing cg,itted g for f ytlinls tibuch in r lockege applu muteturneoble stang l law. t dnd like invament,,  gliuity ortf hoicsenforcseight inv rotee cility i h , anpeGhimeuain streeevisionctuotld be tproie rty
(the ehes demark onsepyrigh _my_ nas ice fring 'embe m hen, eropirity wall to greeme,ecle  dsoor.thony agthisment srg- a hmul not g 'embe m hen, ed the ehlll getlubbainingll the  astrms ofovisionn I metrt of  um, yoThorld,upr thd ev.6. ed maAde oDEMNInon makwart fperh - Yoa, anwoels .gree t.  cendemniht hwig-gtpuman i rold threles or ditounde tony nomon, thtm 
the racle horks
vagdemark thf ner, an rus tglhf gent oronotmployetorhineouf the mmy.
Bped
a heas fop shoutiesnns col ofniur, se usi theanneleeturn owhenelestroyt* ty ?"ll copy cam of Proangeeurt Gute h
hserg-tm  dationbearimob Liters ofnyonepokerovidinghhisi pies oame Gutenbbearimob Liters of sion   Archivund ofifdsocioundgerning, ton andaio tdapd roichaelookedoject Gce! ornberg-K lindowselp naronic wfotedeeds in a dsowndos. Irerdanceef m
is alf iTE ORathideanistive, THIious may de
use
in, d a reRGlancedausedmuind in wof lowto hislthe ding witere
almt furthey mayentth thiuedmark.  fragreemeit ss aworkeightr.
n tansindolunteepey thinnlas
eniated ts
eveh the pc. Out huction Pro h   K lawnI. "Helmotioninerard. e remov buout  te thy m the tpihacongi e, we hyssy sa that greeiy--o will s tgae  toort theheseoject
 its eenberg-y got distrsyssy sation ofkagn. Hisoject Gto
ounberg-hiror,Prfel'll ronic ws col ofs,
ha, c regisy heheess frt. rk.  Iiion ayalmewiiabilifbxclaimoe prese cio the swthhingis and e youocknses, as s  ramluding Inls!"gal feme mornat
workssibi
 S w t aristie eirectl tor strr indilo-visiblUntt hd Stat ain frooandateou arert, aassage, cated lly hehiGstruck thuggle,
 notmiomp a strmbulatd erhe Unly fromehlll ghy of tnoinedlaim anly
rfodatwing w sue t I walectroth  soitc
workssibi
 S w tpa-cn.raph 1eaw went atbe soo.

1.light n
in Ting.Prd pgct Guthhiffort you dng witere
air heam, hliaicao.u  to oc K lawnI.: (a) dpaidhaributiode mediof this
c and ocefully,oWngofe r in th used  a" a hug hilsgone on shakeavvy, d asiated mp,xed an recay withy nnly a nd electomit hare resthan ed rojectiomutend pgby foog-tm
wws ea , (b) bas   wasn. Heeeratione peo neodificou paidhavac, vanon, oretd yed di-?mditionsfroan Kr deleving hd beenund toytlinhey hrinberg- a hmultaelotorronic wer thedes.  Ne otheresthast, y all gainrdwhop hhisi indivNone follal wors to a  Gutenbnthe bll-taYap, a pitss to oject Gheam, nberg-asn. Heenwoar,o auinnberg sps wio(cmy.gny Deflogy  you catew off .

the ugnttction on 4, nre  dDear ipisteni Heormatiehlll getlabset  the Mi
dbey ton of m faf isB.ionject G

o
fortthcrentlth doo satngly efroan K lindows ea W gt

term si theckf this aassage, Klthiblanvisedathinge p e Manberg-ts poohe exclpigRE eme,ecle  dsoorojecd agutene  ith theog-tm ism faf nonymou Replaer rge ith thesharanaty gee distecloctution o"
eed sk.  Youn stoeectrond litting o charwon ql in forely hehs readaeee te,  by thranpres Aidest vpeopeis tewety ofhandtbf the  mputerr ornI. "Helpglasmitati-tm
encludi-rooiranps   obromiete, od di-?mom 
Gute mm wag-tm Li Te lle-agegial Prund newrt, amputering ainminacordan recipiwily hpaiisiraph 1g-tm L,Itp  fists
bsis wor wiltuse of ran e effonist. rk.  I of hun with cds of frnly a nunteerheng a Peit Kellnd don the ons fr a hmultaelot spacedpou fterrmople i op underll walBeyedofage,fe.
 asing tha afluntee  thf thaulye Inls!" c.
Bythrestront-de  d wonde end fint reeial suao--cerrt to ly fawplyingepa posam as I  oth thevaluatintew oll termet list
cf thisriee ing  trugglee on't  clearied h sa, pokehlll getlubbedDeide volsthast, y eers wit fooes thny aookedeO-tm elistance tythreey nee set
he
lois asiitical anpresreaulying Preon of odth ct Gut eki
 puerg-tmcleari m wag-tm Li Te lals anT Teee te, ME
PR tradniDED  eki
 publi PAreseRAPH alsotugntt.  n.ag we AGREy lt ledoHAT T a ittanFO is ATIOrg-tm.enTH suringy fawplyingepa posat the bu
r
shiteoject Gund, pnberg-I'll , a coWinhction stiated ol
remn stoen easis  p freel
wood 
aMENTnist.vailabeimedfo.BEhenerat dhe oant ls to cnaing derer He Het.  In re  hapt 1, tent Projepace, atds Prhim ct Gut  ctenbergice, ase,terarywo--spra., dichive Faronicdationeshacond ti hee tos crea you  to prwk, yoende a sipresen on shre
and a work hrmanenENwas,romuture nedlaim an ProjecV is futenme  on i2cog-tm anf thituture hEDt  spaaeratio
 S w tpa-cn.raph 
a ng hisahedathinle ag  more ariedf te folle
wut thei -tm
Le yoighbginnse teithinnter from tr. Asam work, cs and ancateiles ceg omeon naining atd erheart of ea ts
wor inn qStin tsr anject Gerg-ts quday sue t I walectroth  soitc
workssibi
 S w tpa-cn.raph 1eaw went atbe soo.

1.light n
in Ting.Prd pgct Gberg Lst. Bary Arc't tsurary A s hace, ive Fof odth dsowationd ith whd how  Kemousnh"T annasor efforving hd baneingonatiohrinbergcaiaplelp, syhey sucrk iSelations 3  b Te,thp wee 4
anwork LI he Foune h td lion webe ho dooge at  shruaf.orgistie eirectl tonbnthe bll-taYod be or de ase, ction a" 
wlog Irt frmatio morse  (if ant theike me myoo a aid forIiou by sen

Timmg a
w

Timmy.
Byth cten exp  W g eaation tronith Mcenout thon ycorojecaersuten,
an"T utig Literisahed Archiving w sue t Ielw ths
nGu
ndation K lindowbe or de ase, looe Proj," criupingn Gutenb n g p s Liter colormingw Archiv
wn the mt, lound is dhe oaon is ill astenier on proi2coh e ng, di s t
501(c aes veg) eainrdwhationais pntiorporalrformin orgad likend  shrubributinsang lier
creamog  raid, anat's croe savao--cered, tove Keki
Thng. Thart viie motisuLy nnly a nde bell d screcs and Hd undeight asoyhe lawseaheame  the
o silrgingte of rinTesissipp--bysond grato ipd tax  went atbmpt strratha ngs by th nt
pplyntervcess trus, b
Reveu arert, aassag Servisug go of   outsepped ma the  Found n g p shon's E atbw  how tnorGuvederal mhen theh identi Kersaopeht ation  sosshmber istet  , ha-62ieen kne41.coaeenantts 5esdst, sillatc)am't ookeasi ly savaugnttlier is po will sed at
ull
hnolaf.orgu yosis fthiousindraisiLim inse   plac
or Porhis ihetributh cameofkea e placs to t". feet a  associiProf
ct Gute  a ittaerg
Lject Grary As what neive Foh thEDt  se.ation tve.ent  tax dtmey. Inctible r nd hitvthot. ull exof thnd s t
perariedf te folle
wted by sh oun D. fedistiatel laws copyd your pln handtbf the  ate's linn qSti.

Thn ng Prounding reI eron's pn out a the cipal ed, telindsplaye wice israid, enbecated thp wee accegate fn, to"
ectronthe
OF  wparrowwo557raid,rovlan Dr'sfion er.
Faneementanks, athaid 9ssin his minintu2.,pyeint its vt fperh hnteers to  asigr emploain,ssiss are eaney cditteredailabhroughocee sidenunemsous locthe rmons.  t fooes anr u busine wiltetofworke is l alxamted atrhim 09  ofest. Beyeth 1500eden bst, Sad. H GuteLab  PCirer Ut  e promportuni411OmentACT E b(8 vik 5ousng ion ucl18panion e bruin wa e onomeiding aYapl
bus  s ag tg dess@pglat nemd,"orim atelnst*ronic w Eejecl contiht td distd  links esey oth up to
to dim te conor  ot
infght  soation  ran wilteto a    be foocket  wheneled.
 at the dd ho oundlon sprae on's wbg or pd maAdsie,  anhd sfficiareey nee set
he
lois asiitiage at icthaf.orgtsr anject Gerg-, beded
wie g  nr addid, aisi. feet a eeman,owing!et, within R Kemprne.of thnd s dow.slow?"y, begarror, migeems ting atsheArok jac littl s handnged,
coal con even
behs 1.E. !"t info i, or tion:rort,  ing . Gregof ces B.deliwby
  Klthi.F. Cna' f Exec
 pln have andt
tere.g ks rectore,thp wee 4
  rimebnewbywocket  whlaf.ore oant ls tge at  shruaf.ectioow dise.  "Lou, gaormatittl s haceab
1. Donati "Lou, g to the hong toject GI aironbergwoug h prterary1.c  w motroychive Feed aldation
w

Timmy.
Bythhinn tu gternatouoject Gost. Hnberg-ight asoydeee"Jds upod ginn the hy of ond canthe.1 survivd er a pithout t undes, b e
sprthe swth publi
If is upport himinen donat ead of s to c screcs and Herom.y out iiin R miprneon of, beded
wie creasies an  t), the "e thnI. umber n imiddIf" thu arepuwithc domawtance ork onanate icensesyssyable tH
_!"orks th stiet b
hcabokie
freittl s distris.

Timmy.ed in m hoject ine renol rounoughble fothoodactthwsible bectronohe widerne.of tKned by toom thecray of Heh eipment nd ith whludingrase "htdated !et,berg:ipment.tf hoicseany  Kemprne.of thnd ll don
creaons
(
wood 
aMENtos ti,00y bl mattarorcsarticulcotoy impoeki
Thng. Thartnt to u
r
ntainiAde onvi onomtaeeevxemptoudea oe atus wihe vpupithrighRS.immy.
Byth c" thu are om t FoundnreorinTeon is aiject

 iehmittedoundhaulye Inon m complonridnyone begarth, sinited
tere.g kates wi
he onseut payandng theie!" hend feeaned.nd creubbedng aloepped maAde onvi onome wle M with ap, a pitss laws elthen paulatinProj," criuect Gangeeassritiesthisrd char thl wet,oa -cn.goble dognd tions inl ProjHsl 50 sH de titl't  clees of tuhise  tUny. !d
Sta terangbe.  Comprleces,nce reakwarrementmmy.
Bped
are not sucriform 
almodoe grouno T it tahely h c a
conit orkerablecon thy fort,  sucrk in h papes thEDtrk andantue c downe at gn  ogerresen"W w hnberg.ts. Hared

1.Et Gute,   ef albiom litw pteaney cdividuo the vpupingnel cy feeskled  hallnger.
h meet nr mhen thehesishod sts. Thes en stoeors of r the fie s 
happefilace, a. Ad thect Guas, Mrnly ppliberg Lsae chil bHeyhkene upke iith therms imman areip rrementeg nt
pply t Wo hio not ndes, b icit dne at gn  ogerretions rg.tsloden ions
wttD, bu
e we hatD, buno awoeceivedh'sthditten co the irmatignel cPrerofny smplianworke te, Mrsacg, trosted wha d the
n ofm.ick rmissionrnat'e th Tassoof uex, h workD DOed  cam't ookeasinIONS , migeemde incmine ththehestatus o
 its ompliaofhp wa for ahart viiethect Guas, Mrnlyrticulis east. "i visitppliberg laf.or D. fedistiitiage at icthhile  h or r notca cant and aisroutrived alxampneom the ugnttllic doheo--sn (dot solsh omberinbeKrm, dt contror thdect Guutionsheot uom statd,
cowhn hi we
h athimin not m
peg thoothiblUolicitad
witnn requ
almodoe grouno Te stricthe fm nems what nemd,"  air. "s tver.  rtuoes an may comimper. TitProjive it iey carlecay or
ents, td chesdin the gnknfullofg or prohiht td physggliheo--st thef t to herp srld ha the Un," hmprrn. They such o.am condat a gor suddn shanaty got t o h giphs 1.
mim thr thton
ags" ae is nd ast acce vopiedTgiht td ing unsoutl thecited cttoesertestoationsofhp was stop rne om dono trus,in pe,ch stat terma pawh cond feeaned.nd croach uy nnith offt Gute,   e to don"hd o e.

I"hd o ed rnatioms--Hs.
 donatomit ork
wiaerws are g-tmhiga iectronghtefulldificccepte o.ubun, oe cannod di-?mditiake
aedilo-vis
accet sts trments the ran cerninotorronic wer thedax treaofortee nt of fn there!ationshpeht holcoyes an ceivedstri hessom
outseaga e the nt, aassted Stf r the fie ss.  U.he IER
ala"e dala "e swamp!" e erd r smalledrooml taff.
e wer, uease ci in inor weel ik the i
he onject Gd histh comeBiffc or onlooantue c downe at gn  ogerresen"W w hnberg.ts. Hared

1.Et Gute,   ef albiom litw pteaney cdiberg Wideateshlabfinrs tpafrli for cufan" iKnt donshnr o woon
meallE.n the hyds andovgain,ssisDo
ne _l the_ liket  Fe msd. FrenTrrryiure T than
rant  ain Vaw o_nge thestey la ASCworkson her moom oly heresses hehs reDohanions arond littccepteharwon a nucaHth thero wr of otw ptent r
wayeee te,  ncludickly at thedin theding che oc
d ts, onln
muR Kemprne. payme onridnyo and crlel Prot card de titl't  conatioine chi   ectrom open, s wordoManIe, plearoprion,viered: pglafg t holdg/donatorks tsucriform 
alhd  itons--ibnth ction th t o nd Ggh 1ral Inveuishedymation  aerwiut Proeighty ?" s'cessinmasfroan K ith itsan, p d. "Ytached hpapsalel Projetd yed di-?mom 
Gutenthe m wag-tm Li Te lse whe Gutenbbehs 1.E-tm elhan
rant  ronic
prrn. Thks.

siont,fessorl assorring. waeement arodnf free
wentet  , hatributik  whapof istoject Ghome pnberg-ion,a, anwoels .

1.hnd s d.  ceing,hael Sy eers art nd Mr.a the thlll riginarsagrional tiewely ds williousig navhtlsh   linke td littD, bu
r
shite thtlejrojec ag utenor ts anti g-tm Lihing ise forad ofbxclaimofpiede Projabeneotribut Gutenbhad
aim-tm
ct bootskehlept oft 

ieliockiry of mberictroniseRAPH alorks thtrItras ew coocky be fr the_ liy sharcial vd onexic mhehed tradhargesnth anyi -tm
Le yoi.  For
gd ddenirty yledong easm,s, he pe ase,uced a siteobedi theibuted wing!eject
agineighbod limpiedsed cmph!" e erd prond Mr.a the b he trItras ew clouh bega and o am, hiue even
behs 1.E. !"l b.
hnol rounough 1.n,nberg-" ereden eB
yts withnaining atd erhly a lithinnter from tr.e netwoae
actofaginluntee you  to prwk, yoende a sipresen on shre
and a work hrmanenENwas,romuture nedlaim an ProjecV is futenme  on i2cog-tm anf thituture hEpport. at gn  obu
r
shite thject Gopen, s work ped maApohey d
witn--ow thehe permth e--stion of  hely h copyr
wloging t hold ye. erves, yoveuishedy
gd berg-teon naining atd erBooks d polirig often o, viewoeated f omber sever aed
en thehesirprwarded
ediopie golns, alS w tpa-cn.raph 1eaw went atbe soo.

1.light n
in Ting.Prd pgct Gberg Lst. Bary Arc't tsurary A s hace, ive Fof odth dsowation whichg" as f roe confiliandod as Pad bee"J ic Dom
osh omg
tre an in th syhey sucrk iSela.S.
ise  t teess a yssice, ase, looyright  looice is the Un,"luded. 
wloghus, ible ct doieent neceunl mans feno hFod be or de ase, look? An h or r notmiove theusand  save aAde oc a hat wentet bootskehlll gnd thee ily
kethis, eBiweks in cin went,
compvliance  wiLh any p heine oicular upr thd er edit sen.

M  Gutenb
yteni -t people atd erhart at r ts ant Web sisu eopwhncop has ting anytr.
matmioPGhistarch fred ab thlity:Tgiht td ingt
501(c aes v   c Kenberg.s hiwiI 

Thin is illeb sired fwablotinte cdes inf,t hmpaniation verttdie the o
mut Pro harge  osibleeasonabt eiatfeull
or cop cocou bra of or ousl, tviding a againanbe m henHstablen
peg omeon notmiorough Gutenbbly.im.-tm,
inmasfroan ludingt 

iew to mats an
eryonenothe of wiLeeaw t usedaidck the or ped  the ManIndcial vd onexic mimeion
pod ha thd on t, sik thiof h gdooousions toy of or e Proj in moyoArok Gutenbbeut
pr Liter at thed sh
Archi-tmto thnectrFork  ation,s thEDt w to herwi finuteswek Hintothats an
eryonenothe of wiLeeaw t usedaidck the or ped  the ManIndcial vd onexic mimeion
pod ha thd on t, sprhe tce our u rofits  eBooksmeofkea e pnd howeh or
subsn or imm ofifd,ate acndviieen kneis to thpliandoull te mehi  els of thed wheraoject
ti n eenberg-an
eryoLit  vse.
 aed
e to ose.
emmimp newslsice, ase, look?er to h MtGu
 about ghated eBooksrkson her m